










Enable Cookies





































































JavaScript seems to be disabled in your browser.
                    You must have JavaScript enabled in your browser to utilize the functionality of this website.                







 News About us Contact us  Catalog & Pricelist Become a Customer Career   LOGIN  REGISTER 
 


toggle content

Cart 0


 



McDonald Paper Restaurant Supplies

(718) 768 7688
 
Mon-Fri: 7:00am - 6:00pm Sat: 8.00 am - 2.00 pm







Search













 





Home
/ 


Enable Cookies








Please enable cookies in your web browser to continue.




What are Cookies?

Cookies are short pieces of data that are sent to your computer when you visit a website. On later visits, this data is then returned to that website. Cookies allow us to recognize you automatically whenever you visit our site so that we can personalize your experience and provide you with better service. We also use cookies (and similar browser data, such as Flash cookies) for fraud prevention and other purposes. If your web browser is set to refuse cookies from our website, you will not be able to complete a purchase or take advantage of certain features of our website, such as storing items in your Shopping Cart or receiving personalized recommendations. As a result, we strongly encourage you to configure your web browser to accept cookies from our website.
Enabling Cookies

Internet Explorer 7.x
Internet Explorer 6.x
Mozilla/Firefox
Opera 7.x

Internet Explorer 7.x


Start Internet Explorer


Under the Tools menu, click Internet Options



Click the Privacy tab



Click the Advanced button



Put a check mark in the box for Override Automatic Cookie Handling, put another check mark in the Always accept session cookies box



Click OK



Click OK



Restart Internet Explore


Back to Top
Internet Explorer 6.x


Select Internet Options from the Tools menu



Click on the Privacy tab


Click the Default button (or manually slide the bar down to Medium) under Settings. Click OK



Back to Top
Mozilla/Firefox


Click on the Tools-menu in Mozilla


Click on the Options... item in the menu - a new window open


Click on the Privacy selection in the left part of the window. (See image below)



Expand the Cookies section


Check the Enable cookies and Accept cookies normally checkboxes


Save changes by clicking Ok.


Back to Top
Opera 7.x


Click on the Tools menu in Opera


Click on the Preferences... item in the menu - a new window open


Click on the Privacy selection near the bottom left of the window. (See image below)



The Enable cookies checkbox must be checked, and Accept all cookies should be selected in the "Normal cookies" drop-down


Save changes by clicking Ok


Back to Top















List of McDonald's products - Wikipedia





















 






List of McDonald's products

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search







This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article may require copy editing for grammar, style, cohesion, tone, or spelling. You can assist by editing it. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article possibly contains original research. Please improve it by verifying the claims made and adding inline citations. Statements consisting only of original research should be removed. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)





Contents


1 Beef burgers
2 Chicken
3 Fish
4 Pork
5 Other products
6 Breakfast
7 Beverages
8 Desserts
9 Former items
10 See also
11 References
12 External links



Beef burgers[edit]
All beef patties are seasoned, consisting primarily of salt and minced pepper.

Hamburger (formerly known as the Junior Burger in some countries) and cheeseburger – a 1.6-ounce (45 g) ground beef patty, with 0.125 ounces (3.5 g) ketchup, mustard, a single dill pickle, re-hydrated onions, on a toasted bun. At one time early in McDonald's history, the pickle was removed from the sandwich.[1][page needed] In all or much of the New York City area, it is served without mustard.[2] Also sold as a double or triple, adding an extra pickle slice for each beef patty added. A triple burger and a bacon double cheeseburger are optional items and are not always available in all restaurants or markets. In Australia the average serving size for a Cheeseburger is 110 grams. The hamburger and the cheeseburger are the company's original grilled burger offerings, having been served as part of the 1948 menu.[3]
Big Mac – a signature product that was introduced in 1968. Two 1.6-ounce (45 g) (approx. uncooked weight) ground beef patties, special Big Mac sauce (similar to Thousand Island dressing), lettuce, cheese, pickles, and diced onions on a sesame seed bun, with an additional middle bun (called a "club layer") separating the beef patties. The Grand Mac, its bigger-size counterpart, was added in December 2016.
Quarter Pounder – a 4.25-ounce (120.5 g) (originally 4-ounce (113.4 g) until 2015) (approx. uncooked weight) ground beef patty with ketchup, mustard, chopped onions, pickle, and two slices of cheese. As with burgers made with the smaller 1.6-ounce patties, the Quarter Pounder is prepared without mustard in all or a large portion of the New York City region.[2] It was invented by Al Bernardin, a franchise owner and former McDonald's Vice President of product development, at his McDonald's in Fremont, California, in 1971.[4] In some markets unfamiliar with Imperial measurements (such as France), it is known as a Royal Cheese, or variants thereof, such as McRoyale.[5] It is also available as the Double Quarter Pounder with Cheese, which includes another patty of the same proportions. In 2013, McDonald's expanded the sandwich into a line with three additional variants to make them smaller versions of the Angus Burgers, which was renamed the Taste-Crafted Burgers in 2016 in West Coast markets and later expanded to other U.S. markets in January 2017, the latest added being the Signature Sriracha, which was replaced by Sweet Barbecue Bacon by May.
Big N' Tasty/Big Tasty – the Big N' Tasty, introduced in 1997, was a 4-ounce (113 g) beef patty with ketchup, cheese, mayonnaise with a grill diced onions, pickles, leaf lettuce, and tomatoes. It was devised to resemble Burger King's Whopper sandwich.[6] It is also known as the Big Xtra in Slovenia and most of Canada; the McXtra in Quebec, Canada; the McFeast Deluxe in Australia; the Big Tasty (without the 'N') in Brazil, Bulgaria, France, Germany, Italy (without ketchup), Ireland, The Netherlands, Poland, Russia, Sweden, the United Kingdom; the Quarter Pounder Deluxe in South Africa; and the McNifica (a play on Spanish magnifica, 'wonderful') in Mexico and Latin America. The Big Tasty configuration is somewhat different, consisting of a third-pound (150 g) beef patty, sesame seed bun, lettuce, tomatoes, onions, Emmental cheese, and Big Tasty sauce (which has a smoke flavor). The Big Tasty Bacon variant also contains strips of bacon. This variant was sold in the US until 2009; it is now sold internationally only.
Double Cheeseburger – two 1.6-ounce (45 g) ground beef patties, with 0.125 ounces (3.5 g) ketchup, mustard (except in all or much of the New York City area), two slices of dill pickle, re-hydrated onions, and two pieces of cheese on a toasted bun. The double cheeseburger was offered as a promotional item in the 1950s, and was added to the regular menu in 1965. An official variant is offered in the U.S. state of New Mexico, called the Green Chile Double Cheeseburger, topped with roasted green New Mexico chile peppers.





The McDouble



McDouble – similar to a Double Cheeseburger, but with just one slice of cheese. Reintroduced as a permanent dollar-menu item in December 2008 – had been a short-term product in 1997, advertised with "Eddie the Echo." The original McDouble did not have cheese and was garnished with lettuce and tomatoes rather than the pickles and onions on the 2008 version.
Bacon McDouble – a sandwich that is similar to the McDouble, but it has two pieces of Applewood smoked bacon added to it. This sandwich was added to the U.S. "Dollar Menu & More" in November 2013.[7]
Daily Double – similar to the McDouble, however the toppings are slightly different. The Daily Double is made with a little bit of lettuce, tomato, slivered onions, and mayonnaise. It also has only one slice of cheese, like the McDouble, rather than the two slices that are on the double cheeseburger. In 2011 and 2012, the item was test marketed in various regional locations.
McFeast – a hamburger with lettuce, tomato, pickles and mayonnaise, in most markets from April 1977. The name McFeast lives on though in Scandinavian countries, where a McFeast has been served since the mid-1980s in Sweden and was later introduced to the rest of the Nordic countries; the McFeast in Sweden contains a quarter pounder patty, lettuce, modified mayonnaise with lemon juice, onion and tomato. In the rest of the countries, the McFeast also contains ketchup, but not in Sweden. The same burger was sold under the name Mega Feast in New Zealand for several years during the 1990s, but has since been discontinued. The McFeast Deluxe was sold in Australia until the late 1990s and contained: mustard, ketchup, large onions, McFeast Deluxe sauce, lettuce, a tomato slice, regular cheese and a quarter pounder patty served in a Quarter Pounder/McChicken Bun. It returned to the Australian menu in 2009 and in August 2011 using the same ingredients, however contained McChicken sauce in place of the original 'McFeast Deluxe' sauce. The McFeast has been sold in Germany and Austria since the 1990s, named "Hamburger Royal TS" (T for "Tomate" (tomato); S for "Salat", the German word for lettuce). It contains a quarter-pounder patty, lettuce, tomatoes, onions, cheese and the McChicken mayo sauce. For special occasions, it is sold in Germany as a "McFresh" which also contains cucumber slices.
Ranger Burger and Super Ranger[8]
1955 Burger – this burger inspired by 1955 (according to the official site) contains beef, bacon, lettuce, tomatoes, caramelized onions, ketchup and McDonald's smoky sauce (barbecue). Named after the year the fast-food chain was incorporated by Ray Kroc, the burger is popular in European markets, including Spain, Italy and Germany. It was released in 2011 and re-released in 2013 in the UK.[9][10][11]
BBQ Ranch Burger[7] – a very sweet hamburger containing one all-beef patty, cheddar cheese, BBQ Ranch sauce, and tortilla strips,[citation needed] added to the U.S. "Dollar Menu and More" in November 2013.[7]
McSpicy Burger – a very spicy chicken breast, lettuce, cheese and hot sauce-laced mayo, served as the McSpicy Shake Shake Meal, complete with fries.[citation needed]
Bacon Clubhouse – a burger consisting of one quarter-pound patty, lettuce, tomato, and special sauce served on an "artisan roll". This core item was added to the menu the week of March 12, 2014.[7]
Jalapeño Double – similar to the McDouble, except it contains two types of jalapeño peppers, pickled and crispy, plus a slice of white cheddar cheese between the two burger patties, and buttermilk ranch sauce, added to the Dollar Menu in April 2014.[citation needed]
Triple Cheeseburger – similar to the Double Cheeseburger, except it contains three burger patties, with a slice of American cheese between each patty, plus ketchup, mustard (except in all or much of the New York City area), onion, and dill pickle. This was added to the Dollar Menu in December 2014.[citation needed]
ChiTown Classic – a regional offering that was one of two finalist out of 100s of entries in the "Chicagoland Burger Build Off" competition to develop a breakfast-dinner mashup burger in 2015. The burger was placed on the menu on Chicago area locations starting Mid-November until December 27, 2015. The burger adds breakfast's Canadian bacon and applewood smoked bacon.[12]

Chicken[edit]

McChicken – a mildly spicy chicken sandwich, offered in a spicier variant as the Hot n' Spicy in some markets. Made from 100% ground white meat chicken, mayonnaise, and shredded lettuce, on a toasted bun. A full-size version was introduced in 1980, later removed, and reintroduced in 1988. In some markets it is not spicy, and in others a cajun spiced version is also offered. It remains one of the biggest sellers, just behind the Big Mac. The larger sandwich was replaced with the Crispy Chicken Deluxe in 1996, and brought back in 1998 in the current smaller size, and marketed as the Cajun (Style) McChicken. In Australia the average serving size for a McChicken is 185 grams. In Canada, it remains a full-size sandwich, while the US' smaller version is sold as the Junior Chicken.
Premium chicken sandwiches – the Premium line was added in July 2005. The Classic was a rebranding of the Crispy Chicken and Chicken McGrill sandwiches, themselves rebrandings of the Deluxe chicken line in 1998, with mayonnaise, leaf lettuce, and a tomato slice. The Ranch BLT contains ranch sauce instead of mayonnaise and includes bacon. The Club is similar to the Classic with added bacon and a piece of Swiss cheese. In Latin America, the Classic and the Club are sold, but a honey mustard chicken sandwich is sold in place of the BLT. All were served on a whole-grain roll, with either a grilled or crispy chicken breast. On March 20, 2014, the Premium Crispy Chicken Bacon Clubhouse and Premium Grilled Chicken Bacon Clubhouse were added to the lineup (alongside the beef variant of the sandwich) on a new artisan roll. In February 2015 the Ranch BLT and Club were removed from the menu. The standard crispy offering was renamed to the Premium Crispy Chicken Deluxe (later the Buttermilk Crispy Chicken Sandwich in August 2015) and it was upgraded to sit on the artisan roll introduced with the Bacon Clubhouse. In the first week of April 2015, McDonald's replaced the Premium Grilled Chicken sandwich with the Artisan Grilled Chicken.[13] Like the Taste-Crafted Burgers, the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches were introduced in 2016, in West Coast markets, and in all other U.S. markets in January 2017. Signature Sriracha was the latest to be added in June 2016; it was replaced by Sweet Barbecue Bacon in May 2017.
Southern Style Chicken Sandwich – a southern-style fried chicken breast filet, on a steamed bun, dressed with butter and two pickles. Nearly identical to a Chick-fil-A chicken sandwich. Discontinued at many franchises in early 2015.
Snack Wrap – a wrap made with white meat chicken breast (crispy or grilled), lettuce, shredded Cheddar cheese and Monterey Jack cheese, and a sauce (Spicy Buffalo, Ranch, Honey mustard, Chipotle barbecue, or Salsa Roja, the breakfast sauce on the McSkillet), wrapped in a soft flour tortilla. It was launched on July 1, 2006. Chipotle BBQ is the most recent flavor. Available in the United States, The Netherlands, United Kingdom, Canada, Australia and Brazil.[14][15][16] There is also a Mac Snack Wrap which features the fixings of the Big Mac, but without the bun and wrapped in a tortilla shell, and uses one half of a piece of quarter meat.[17]
Premium Chicken Wrap – in 2013, McDonald's in the U.S. introduced a larger wrap that it has had success with in parts of Europe. It comes in three variants: Sweet Chili Chicken, Chicken & Bacon, and Chicken & Ranch.
Chicken Fajita – chicken, cheese, red and green bell peppers, and diced onions in a flour tortilla. Comes with Picante sauce packets on request, which are available in mild and spicy. Available in only a few markets.
Chicken McNuggets – introduced in 1983 as a replacement for the McChicken, these are small chicken chunks served with dipping sauces of barbecue, sweet n' sour, honey, and hot mustard. Available in 4, 6, 10 (originally 9), or 20 pieces. Up until 2003, they were a combination of white and dark meat, now they are made with only white meat. In 2011, five new dipping sauces were introduced and added to the lineup: sweet chili, honey mustard, spicy buffalo, and creamy ranch. With the addition of these new dipping sauces, McDonald's began phasing out the Hot Mustard sauce, and by February 2014, it had been discontinued in most U.S. markets.
McArabia – there are two versions of the McArabia: grilled chicken, and grilled kofta (beef with spices). Both are served with lettuce, tomatoes, onions, and garlic mayonnaise in addition to two small patties of grilled chicken or kofta, all wrapped in an Arabian-style pita bread. McDonald's has performed a rather large advertising campaign for the McArabia since its introduction in 2003, largely focusing on the Arabian-themed nature of the sandwich, and it appears to have worked well. The McArabia has been very well received throughout Southwestern Eurasia. The same product is also introduced in Malaysia with "Chicken Foldover" as an alternative name.
(Premium) Crispy Chicken Deluxe – a sandwich made with a crispy chicken breast, tomato slices, and lettuce. It was first sold in 1996 and had its name changed to the Crispy Chicken Sandwich in 1998. It was replaced with a Premium chicken sandwich in July 2005, and was then brought back in 2015 under the original name with the added prefix Premium. The only other change is that it is now sold on an artisan roll instead of the potato bun that characterized the original Crispy Chicken Deluxe. By August 2015 it was renamed the Buttermilk Crispy Chicken Sandwich. This is part of the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches introduced in 2016.
Grilled Chicken Deluxe – this sandwich has the same ingredients as the Premium Crispy Chicken Deluxe, but has a marinated, grilled chicken breast at its center. It has been sold under various names since 1996, when it was introduced as the Grilled Chicken Deluxe, and had its name changed to the Chicken McGrill in 1998. It was replaced with a Premium chicken sandwich in July 2005, which was in turned replaced with the Artisan Grilled Chicken in 2015. It is also available in India, and has at times been available in Canada.
Artisan Grilled Chicken – in the first week of April 2015, McDonald's introduced a redesigned grilled chicken patty, replacing the Premium Grilled Chicken sandwich, which contains "less ingredients", and those that remain can be found in consumer's "own kitchens".[13] The sandwich sits atop the artisan roll first seen with the Bacon Clubhouse, and is the last of the full-size chicken sandwiches to switch to this bun. It is part of the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches menu introduced in 2016.
Maharaja Mac- In India, McDonald's does not serve beef in its burgers. Instead, it has created a large Big Lac style chicken burger called the "Chicken Maharaja Mac", with a chicken patty and vegetable garnishings.[18]
Chicken McBites - "poppable" pieces of chicken that are made from chicken breasts.[19]
Tasty Basket - Available only in Italy, the Tasty Basket consists of 30 pieces of chicken, which includes the Chicken McNugget, Chicken McBites, and chicken wings.[20]

Fish[edit]

Filet-O-Fish – a fish fillet with tartar sauce and a half slice of cheese, on a steamed bun. It was introduced in Cincinnati in 1962 when it was discovered that many Roman Catholics chose to eat at Frisch's Big Boy on Fridays and during Lent, as it offered a fish sandwich so they could go without meat.[21] This was replaced with the Fish Filet Deluxe in 1996 and brought back in 1998 albeit a larger fish patty. During the Easter period in Hawaii and Guam, a Double Filet-O-Fish meal is offered with two pieces of fish on one bun.
Fish McBites – similar to the Chicken McBites, these are small pieces of flaky whitefish dipped in batter and fried until golden brown, and served with tartar sauce for dipping. They were taken off the menu in the end of March 2013.

Pork[edit]




The McRib



McRib – a sandwich featuring boneless pork with barbecue sauce, slivered onions, and pickles. First seen in test-market stores near interstate highways around Milwaukee and Madison, Wisconsin, in the late 1970s (along with early tests of personal-sized pizza) the McRib was more widely released in 1981, but pulled from menu in 1985. It is released annually in the U.S. as a limited time promotion in some locations. Since 2005, the McRib has reappeared in late October staying on the menu for 10 weeks. The McRib was released in Canada as a promotional sandwich from March 18 through April 8, 2008 and again in summer 2011. The McRib is presently on some European menus (e.g., Germany, where it has been standard since or even before 1990).[22]

Other products[edit]

McDonald's introduced salads to its menu in 1985. Since that time, they have restructured their salad lines several times. In the U.S., the newest salad offerings are part of the McDonald's Premium line. First introduced in 2003, the Premium Salads all are a mixture of iceberg lettuce and a special lettuce assortment (romaine, etc.), with cherry tomatoes and different toppings to differentiate them; additionally all salads can be topped with warm grilled or crispy chicken. All of its salads are part of McDonald's move towards creating a healthier image.
The Happy Meal/Mighty Kids Meal – McDonald's capitalized on Burger Chef's Funmeal concept of a children's meal when it introduced the first Happy Meal in 1979. The meal includes an entrée, a side dish, a beverage and a toy. Happy meals include a tiny order fries (far less than a small order of fries) and fruit, optional sauce for fries, and a choice of nuggets, a single patty burger, or wraps. An additional product, Pasta Zoo was discontinued in 2008. The Mighty Kids Meal contains more food than the Happy Meal, less than the adult meal, and still contains a toy.


The toy is usually a product tie-in with a movie or popular television show.

In mid-February 2012, McDonald's has introduced the Happy Meals/Mighty Kids Meals so that they now come with either a Hamburger, Cheeseburger, 4 piece Chicken McNuggets, McDouble or the 6-piece Chicken McNuggets with a smaller version of the small fry for the Happy Meal or a small fry for a Mighty Kids Meal. All kids meals now come with fries, apple slices and a toy. The apple slices have been reduced from 8 slices to only 4 and no longer come with caramel dipping sauce.



In the U.S., the traditional entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, or a four piece order of Chicken McNuggets (or a double cheeseburger or six piece order of Chicken McNuggets for the Mighty Kids Meals); the sides are fries and sliced apples. Milk, chocolate milk, boxed apple juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks. Some U.S. franchises also include a small cellophane package of McDonaldland cookies. In 2009, McDonald's offered a Happy Meal Wrap, but it was discontinued later that year due to low sales.
In the UK, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four Chicken McNuggets, three fish fingers, or a Chicken wrap; the sides are a choice of fries, carrot sticks or sliced apples and grapes. Organic milk, Tropicana orange juice, apple and blackcurrant Robinsons Fruit Shoot, milkshakes, water and the traditional soda are the choices for drinks.
In New Zealand and Australia, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, three or six piece order of Chicken McNuggets, five or ten Chicken McBites or a crispy or seared Chicken Snack Wrap; the sides are a choice of french fries or apple slices. Thickshake, boxed chocolate milk, apple or water pop tops, orange juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks.
In Canada, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four piece Chicken McNuggets, grilled cheese, or chicken snack wraps; the sides are a choice of fries or apple slices with caramel dip. Milk, chocolate milk, boxed apple juice, orange juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks.







Chicken McNuggets





In Belgium, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four piece order of Chicken McNuggets, McFish or a Ketchup Wrap.




McDonald's line of larger chicken sandwiches (The Classic, Club, Ranch BLT and Southwest), which are part of the McDonald's Premium line were introduced in July 2005 as part of McDonald's menu revamp.

The Classic includes Lettuce, Tomato, and Mayo.
The Club also has Lettuce Tomato and Mayo, but also comes with Swiss cheese and bacon.
The Ranch BLT comes with a creamy ranch sauce, bacon, lettuce and tomato.
The Grand Chicken Burger: Large chicken patty with two layers of cheese, tomatoes, lettuce and sauce
The Southwest comes with a southwest style ancho chili sauce, lettuce, tomato, and spicy pepperjack cheese.


All four can be chosen with either crispy or grilled chicken and all are served on a wheat ciabatta bun.
Deli Choices is a line of deli-style sandwiches that are sold internationally. It is targeted at health-conscious customers and is available in Australia, Austria, Canada, Germany, and Britain, and is testing in the United States. It is similar to the McHero sandwich, sold in parts of the United States.
McDonald's sells French fries as its primary side order. Until 1967, McFries were never frozen, but were cut on-site from potatoes and immediately fried. In some international locations, they sell potato wedges, a type of French fry that is thick cut and wedge shaped and fried onion pieces that are similar to onion rings.





McDonald's McFries.



Many McDonald's locations in discount stores offer freshly popped popcorn and soft pretzels in addition to the normal menu. In PA stores, only soft pretzels are offered as a side option.
Denali Mac – a burger that looks like the Big Mac, but it uses two quarter pound beef patties. Sold only in Alaska, named after Denali (formerly Mount McKinley).





McLobster in 2015.



McLobster – a lobster roll served in a hot dog bun with "lobster sauce" and shredded lettuce, introduced in 1993. The product had supply issues and was not very profitable nationally. Recently, it was only available in Atlantic Canada and New England region in the summer, when lobster is inexpensive.[23] In the 2010s, McDonald's had short term reintroductions in Canada and Italy.
McCrab – in response to the McLobster, McDonald's along the eastern coast of the Delmarva Peninsula (comprising parts of Delaware, Maryland and Virginia) developed the McCrab sandwich, a McDonald's version of the Chesapeake crabcake.
Poutine – originally only to be found in French-Canadian communities, poutine is now found on the menu at most McDonald's' across Canada.[24]
Brownie Melt – similar to a Cinnamelt, it is a rich chocolate brownie with chocolate and white frosting.
McRice – Most McDonald's restaurants in countries in Asia serve the product due to popular demand. It is normal rice.
McSpaghetti – was launched in the late 1970s as a part of McD's dinner menu which included a number of Italian dishes. The dish is still available international where in Philippines it is popular and is generally served with McNuggets.[25]
Angus Snack Wrap – wrap with Angus burger introduced to the U.S. market on August 9, 2010. Angus Snack wraps are available three ways: Deluxe (lettuce, tomato, onions, pickles, American cheese, mayo, mustard); Bacon & Cheese (onions, pickles, American cheese, ketchup, mustard, a strip of bacon); and Mushroom & Swiss (sauteed mushrooms, Swiss cheese, mayo). The Angus Wrap uses 1/2 of a regular Angus burger pattie.[26]
The McVeggie burger – a vegetarian burger on a whole wheat bun. Available in India, Slovenia, Greece and Portugal. A special version is available in Cheung Chau branch in Hong Kong during the Cheung Chau Bun Festival.
Veggie Clubhouse - first sandwich with a quinoa pattie.[27]
The McBean burger – a vegan burger where the patties are made with cannellini beans, kidney beans, onions, carrots and green peppers. Available in Sweden.
The menu in India has numerous unique items, all of which contain neither beef nor pork:

Chicken Maharaja Mac – like a Big Mac, but with two pressed spiced chicken patties instead of beef, served with a mustard sauce
Paneer Salsa Wrap (paneer is an Indian unsalted white cheese).
Chicken Mexican Wrap
McAloo Tikki – breaded potato patty with onion and tomato on a plain bun ("aloo" is "potato"). Available at select stores in India, Greece, and Walt Disney World in Lake Buena Vista, FL.
Chicken McGrill


Georgie Pie — a meat pie sold in New Zealand and Australia. The brand was also the name of a New Zealand-based chain that was bought by McDonald's New Zealand in 1996, and was revived as part of the McDonald's menu in 2013 due to popular demand.
Garlic fries were tested in the San Francisco Bay Area in 2016, using locally grown garlic from Gilroy, California[28]
Veggie Crunch Burger - The vegetarian burger was launched in the Singapore market on 6 September 2016. Its patty is made with a mixture of unto 7 types of vegetables, including green peas, carrots, tomatoes, capsicum, beans etc. However, its dressings contain garlic and eggs. The patty is fried in the same oil used for frying apple pies so it does not come in contact with meat products. The burger has received good reviews
Mc Aaloo Tikki Burger - In India, since Mc Donalds does not serve beef or pork in any of its products, it has created a few vegetarian options to suit the 85% vegetarian populace. Thus, the cheese burger is recast as a vegetarian option and served as an "Aaloo tikki burger" containing a potato patties and a slice of cheese.[29]
Veg Maharaja Mac - A vegetarian version of the Big Mac sold at Mc Donalds India, containing patties made of potato, corn, peas and cheese. Maharaja is a Hindi word meaning emperor. [30]

Breakfast[edit]
McDonald's introduced breakfast foods in 1972.




An Egg McMuffin



McDonald's primary breakfast offerings are breakfast sandwiches.

McMuffins are McDonald's signature breakfast sandwich, first sold at select restaurants in 1972 as the Egg McMuffin, five years before breakfast officially went into effect, it consists of a fried egg, back bacon (called Canadian bacon in the U.S.) and American cheese on a toasted English muffin. Sausage or bacon McMuffins are also available. A Chicken McMuffin is offered in South Africa.
McDonald's offers a line of breakfast sandwiches: bagels, biscuits, and a special type of maple flavored pancake called McGriddles. All can all be ordered with sausage, ham or bacon, with an optional choice of cheese and/or egg. Regional meat offerings include fried chicken, steak, spam and bacon. They are an internationally famous sandwich and as such have been well received, though Morgan Spurlock criticized the item near the end of his 2004 documentary Super-Size Me with the following quote: "McDonald's joined right in, sponsoring events and creating premium salads to show how health conscious they had become. At the same time however, they masterminded one of their fattest sandwiches to date: the McGriddle. A pancake-wrapped cake press that won my heart in Texas, but can pack as much fat as a Big Mac, and contains more sugar than a pack of McDonaldland cookies." His doctor also informed him that consumption of the item could be a risk factor for high blood cholesterol.
The McDonald's Hamdesal is a new breakfast sandwich which consist of a slice of ham on pandesal, which can be ordered plain, with eggs or with cheese. This sandwich is currently available in the Philippines.[31]


There are two styles of breakfast burritos available. The Sausage Burrito, introduced in 1991, is made with a flour tortilla, sausage, American cheese, eggs, onions, and peppers. The new McSkillet wrap burrito adds potatoes and salsa. Chicken and steak variants of the McSkillet exists in limited areas.
Additional breakfast items include hotcakes; several breakfast platters with eggs, hash browns and meats or breads. Biscuits and gravy are available in parts of the southern U.S.
Oatmeal was added to the breakfast menu on December 27, 2010, after it test marketed well in Washington, D.C. and some parts of Maryland. In the test market areas, oatmeal started selling in late January 2010.
A few American regional variations exist, in Hawaii and Guam McDonald's offers local breakfast items such as Spam, Portuguese sausage and fresh cut pineapple. And in New Mexico there is a breakfast burrito on the menu, with both bacon and sausage varieties, called the Green Chile Sunrise Burrito.
In the UK, McDonald's offers the standard McMuffin, Double McMuffin, bacon rolls, toasted bagels with jam or Philadelphia cream cheese, hash browns, Oatso Simple porridge, bagels with egg, cheese and bacon or sausage, and a range of wraps, that consist of sausage & egg, bacon & egg, or cheese & egg, or you have the option to have the full wrap called the Breakfast Wrap which consists of sausage, bacon, egg, hash browns (potato rösti), cheese and an optional sauce, either ketchup or brown sauce.
Since October 2015, McDonald's offers breakfast all day in Australia, Canada, Mexico (Tijuana, Baja California Norte only), New Zealand & USA. However, the full breakfast menu won’t be available at all hours. Only certain items, such as sausage burritos or hot cakes will be available beyond the usual 10:30 A.M. cutoff weekdays or 11 weekends.[32] All US restaurants expanded its all-day menu to add Biscuit sandwiches, Egg McMuffins & McGriddles in late September 2016.
Since February 2016, breakfast bowls were added to the breakfast menu, available in some US restaurants.

Beverages[edit]
Beverages purveyed by McDonald's varies regionally.

McDonald's primary soft drink supplier is the Coca-Cola Company, except in restaurants which fall under an overall contract with PepsiCo. For example: the Detroit Metropolitan Wayne County Airport, Luxor Las Vegas, Staples Center and the University of Maryland, College Park Student Union. In the U.S. and Canada, Cadbury-Schweppes supplies Dr Pepper.
S&D Coffee, Gavina and Kraft supply McDonald's Premium Roast Coffee for McDonald's U.S. restaurants besides the New England area. Green Mountain Coffee Roasters supplies Newman's Own branded coffee for McDonald's New England area restaurants.
Hot and iced tea (supplied by S&D Coffee in the U.S.), hot chocolate, various juices and other regional beverages are available in various markets.
The McCafe is an umbrella term for lattes, espresso, iced coffee, hot chocolate, mocha, malts, smoothies, and other drinks that are sold in several markets worldwide.
Shakes are available in all U.S. McDonald's and many global markets[33] Permanent flavors are vanilla, strawberry, and chocolate; regional or seasonal flavors include Caramel, Coffee, Cherry, Eggnog (during Christmas), Banana, Pumpkin (during Halloween), Strawberry Banana, Lime, Mango Raspberry, Honeycomb, Arctic Orange (sherbet), Orange Cream, Shamrock Shake (a green, spearmint Limited Time Offer shake for St. Patrick's Day), Chocolate Mint, and Rolo (available only in Canada and the UK. This flavoured milkshake was also available in the Republic of Ireland during the summer of 2007 for a limited time only). In June 1975, 13 months before the celebration of the United States Bicentennial, McDonald's introduced a blueberry-flavored shake in order to advertise "Red, White, and Blueberry Shakes" for independence day celebrations, and lasting through August of that year. The run was repeated in summer 1976, but not since. In the U.S., starting in February 2010, "Triple Thick Shakes" were rebranded under the McCafe name, along with the addition of whipped cream, and a cherry on top, and a significant reduction in size. In Canada, McDonald's milkshakes are still sold under the "Triple Thick" name.[34]
Beer of different brands (varies locally) is available at McDonald's in Belgium, Czech Republic, France, Germany, Italy, Lithuania, Portugal, Romania, Slovenia, and Spain.
Irn-Bru is available in some Scottish McDonald's locations.
Inca Kola is available in every Peruvian McDonald's location.
McDonald's also offers 1% milk, 1% chocolate milk, and apple juice, most often as replacements for fountain drinks in Happy Meals.
As of 2009[update], McDonald's Australia and New Zealand began offering Frozen Coke as part of their menu. It is available in small, medium or large sizes or a 'Mini Value-Pick' size.New flavors are introduced occasionally, such as Frozen Fanta Grape and Frozen Sprite. Over summer, flavoured syrups have become available, for use with Frozen Sprite. In the 2013/2014 summer, Bubblegum, Pineapple, Wild Grape, Fairy Floss and Apple were available.

Desserts[edit]




McDonald's apple pies



A soft serve ice cream product is available in several forms, including sundaes, cones (either vanilla or chocolate), and as the primary ingredient in the McFlurry. As with many other formulations of soft serve, cellulose gum is utilized as an extender and thickener.[35]

The McFlurry is a soft-serve ice cream dessert that has pieces of candy or cookies mixed into it.[36] The McFlurry was first integrated in the menu at a Bathurst, New Brunswick, Canada franchisee in 1995. The flavors are crushed Oreo, M&M's Minis, Reese's, or Mars, Incorporated candy bars like Snickers, Twix, Galaxy, etc., Cadbury's candy bars like Twirl, Wispa, Creme Egg, Crunchie etc., Nestlé candy bars like Yorkie, Smarties, Drifter, Rolo, Butterfinger, etc. McDonald's also does limited time only flavors, e.g. for Shrek the Third it released the Ogre-Load flavor. In Australia, they had a special range for their 40 years in Australia celebration. The flavors were double choc fudge, bubblegum squash, strawberry crumble and caramel cookie. Also in Malaysia a unique flavor called FuseofmyLife is offered to customers. The mixing blade for the dessert is actually a specially designed spoon with a hollow handle that attaches to the mixer spindle (except in Australia[37] and New Zealand where the staff mix it by hand). The blade is used once then given to the customer to use as an eating utensil. Originally test marketed in Hawaii in 1997,[38] it is now available in most of its markets.[39]


McDonaldland cookies are traditionally available and are similar to animal crackers, except the shapes of the cookies are of Ronald McDonald, Grimace, Birdie the Early Bird, and the Hamburglar, among other McDonaldland characters. In fact, they are manufactured by Keebler, and are just re-branded animal crackers (Elfin Crackers or Our Family Animal Crackers). In Australia, the McDonaldland Cookies are manufactured by Arnotts and are sold in McDonald's restaurants for $1.
Freshly baked cookies manufactured by Nestlé are available in some markets. Among the cookies offered are sugar, oatmeal raisin, or chocolate chip.
McDonald's pies are actually turnovers, and come in apple or, in some markets, cherry and other seasonal or limited-time-only flavors such as pumpkin pie, smores, sweet potato and Holiday pie, and in Hawaii, taro, haupia, banana, and (introduced in 2017) guava. In Canada, in the 1970s, blueberry was standard, as was the Great Fruit Pie. During some seasonal promotions, cherry and strawberry are an available pie flavor in Canada; also, newly featured is Blueberry Maple and Peach. In Thailand, Hawaii and Guam, taro pie is featured occasionally. Other regional flavors include coconut (also known as haupia in Hawaii) and tuna (all in Guam as limited-time), and corn in Japan. In Mexico, Guatemala, Panama, and Costa Rica, cheese pie is available all year round. In Cyprus, strawberry and custard pies are available all year round also, along with the apple one. In Brazil, banana pies are available. In Russia apricot pies are also available.





McDonald's Cinnamon Melts



Cinnamon Melts – a popular cinnamon roll type item with cream cheese icing.
Brownie melts – Similar to the Cinnamon melt, only chocolate flavored with fudge and cream cheese icing on top. Available only in selected markets.
The Fruit and Yogurt Parfait – a mix of frozen strawberries and blueberries and vanilla yogurt, sold with a package of granola topping.
Smoothies are available in some locations in either Blueberry Pomegranate, Strawberry Banana, or Mango-Pineapple flavors. In the test market areas, smoothies were introduced in 2009.
In 2012, McDonald's Australia and New Zealand began offering a 'McFloat'. It contained Frozen Coke and/or the promotional frozen beverage, a small amount of soft serve and a lot of ice. In Australia, the Frozen Coke 'McSpider' has also been purveyed, which consists of frozen Coke and soft serve ice cream.[40]

Former items[edit]





This section possibly contains original research. Please improve it by verifying the claims made and adding inline citations. Statements consisting only of original research should be removed. (October 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Angus burgers – Four types: the Angus Deluxe (American cheese, sliced red onions and sliced red tomatoes, iceberg lettuce, pickles, mustard, and mayonnaise); Angus Mushroom and Swiss (sautéed mushrooms, Swiss cheese and mayonnaise); Angus Bacon and Cheese (bacon, American cheese, sliced red onions, mustard, ketchup and pickles); and the Angus Chipotle BBQ Bacon (chipotle sauce, red onions, pickles, bacon, and American cheese). In Australia and New Zealand, there are three Angus burgers sold; The Grand Angus (which is a clone of the Angus Deluxe) and the Mighty Angus (which resembles the Angus Cheese and Bacon, but with no pickles and mayonnaise and onion relish replacing the ketchup and mustard). For a limited time only, the Angus The Third, similar to the Grand Angus, but with no mustard and made with a tomato chilli relish and only one slice of cheese. Also, for a limited time, Angus the Great was sold, a clone of the Angus Mushroom and Swiss. In October 2012, an Angus version of the Cheddar Bacon Onion (CBO) Sandwich was made available,[41] consisting of a horseradish-like sauce, grilled caramelized onions, bacon and cheddar cheese. In May 2013, McDonald's stopped selling the Angus burger.[42][43] Two years later the third-pound burgers returned (known as Sirloin Third Pound Burgers), but as a limited-time promotion. It comes in three sandwiches: Bacon & Cheese, Lettuce & Tomato, and Steakhouse. The Angus Burgers are still available in Canada and some markets in Latin America.
Arch Deluxe – An attempt to produce a "luxury" hamburger, promoted by a high-profile advertising campaign (introduced in 1996), today considered one of the most expensive failures in McDonald's history. It featured a honey mustard-type sauce,[44] quarter-pound beef patty on a potato roll, with leaf lettuce, tomato, red onion, and cheese; peppered bacon was also offered for an extra charge. The Arch Deluxe was accompanied with three other burgers at the time, the Crispy Chicken Deluxe (later renamed the Crispy Chicken Sandwich), the Grilled Chicken Deluxe (later renamed the Chicken McGrill), and the Fish Filet Deluxe (since discontinued along with the Arch Deluxe itself).
Barry Burger – A double bacon cheeseburger with onions and barbecue sauce named after football player Barry Sanders, sold mainly in his home state of Kansas.[citation needed]
BBQ Chicken – A toasted bun featuring shredded chicken and zesty BBQ sauce.[citation needed]
Beef Wennington – A burger solely offered in the Chicago area in 1998–99, named after former Chicago Bulls player Bill Wennington. It featured a single patty topped with cheese, onions, barbecue sauce and a slice of Canadian bacon.[45]
Chopped Beefsteak Sandwich – test-marketed in various markets across the United States in 1980 as part of a McDonald's "Dinner Menu", offered only after 4:00 p.m. The Chopped Beefsteak Sandwich was essentially an elongated hamburger of a different quality served on a short French roll, similar to a sub or hero roll. Packets of steak sauce (A1 sauce in Chicago) were available for the sandwich.[citation needed]
Big 33 or McJordan Special – A quarter pound burger with bacon and special barbecue sauce named after basketball players Larry Bird and Michael Jordan, respectively.
Boselli Burger – Jacksonville, Florida, franchises also featured the Triple-Double Burger in 1998, named after Jacksonville Jaguars tackle Tony Boselli.[46]
Bratwurst – For a few years during the 1990s and in 2002, Johnsonville brand bratwurst on a hot dog-like roll was sold in some US markets for a limited time each fall. A few locations in Eastern Wisconsin, which is the major market for the Sheboygan County-based company still offer bratwursts on a seasonal basis.
Buffalo Ranch McChicken (also the Hot 'n Spicy).
Catfish Sandwich – A sandwich made with a catfish patty, lettuce, and tangy sauce and sold on a McRib-style bun. Sold at McDonald's locations in Kentucky, Tennessee, Alabama, Arkansas, and Mississippi for a brief period in March 1991.[47]
Cheddar Melt – a quarter pound beef patty smothered with grilled onions (sauteed in butter and teriyaki), then topped with cheddar cheese sauce on a light rye bun, offered in 1988, the 1990s, 2004, and 2007. They are still available in Brazil under the name Cheddar McMelt.[48]
Chicken Fajitas – The Chicken Fajitas consisted of a small soft tortilla, a grilled vegetable medley, and grilled chicken. The fajita was in the traditional thin wrapping paper. These are still available in British Columbia, Saskatchewan, Nova Scotia, Newfoundland (at certain locations), Alberta (at select locations in the Edmonton area) and at all non-Walmart McDonald's in Ontario.[citation needed]
Chicken McBites – popcorn chicken breast with "home-style seasoning" offered through April 20, 2012 in 3-ounce, 5-ounce and 10-ounce versions. Dipping sauces include Ranch, Sweet n' Sour, Tangy BBQ, Chipotle BBQ, Honey Mustard,[49] Spicy Buffalo, and Sweet Chili.[citation needed]
Chicken Parmesan Sandwich – A chicken breast covered in bread crumbs and topped with tomato sauce and mozzarella on a toasted bun.[citation needed]
Chicken Platter – A grilled chicken burger served with lettuce and tomato on the HotCakes tray.[citation needed]





Chicken Selects



Chicken Selects – McDonald's version of chicken strips. They were introduced in early 1998 and offered again as a permanent part of the menu in late October 2003. They are sold in 3-, 5-, or 10-piece sizes and include choices of spicy buffalo, creamy ranch, honey mustard, and chipotle barbecue dipping sauces; sauce selections in the UK are smokey barbecue, sour cream and sweet chili sauce.[50] Sold in the United States, Canada, Israel and the UK. Available in Australia under the name Chicken McDippers.[51] McDonald's stopped selling Chicken Selects in the United States in February 2013,[52][53] but they returned to the menu on February 25, 2015 for a limited engagement and were renamed Chicken Select Tenders. Chicken Selects are still sold at McDonald's restaurants in the United Kingdom and Ireland.
Corn Dog McNuggets – For a brief time in 1991, McDonald's locations in Richmond, Virginia offered a multi-pack of mini corn dogs without sticks. They were offered again in 2002 as the "Mini Corn Dogs".
Cuban Sandwich – Roast pork and ham sandwich on a long roll with Swiss cheese, mustard, and pickles. One of several Hispanic-inspired menu items briefly sold at South Florida units in 2001.[54]
Derby Burger – A single patty hamburger with American Cheese, lettuce, tomato, ketchup, mayonnaise, and bacon. It was a regional item sold in the mid-1990s in Louisville, Kentucky only during the spring to coincide with the Kentucky Derby. Discontinued in the early 2000s (decade).
Diet Coke Float and Coke Float – In 1991 McDonald's ran a limited time promotion selling a float made with Diet Coke or Coke with low-fat soft-serve frozen yogurt in a collectable Coke bell glass. It sold for $1.59 with 40 cents from every sale donated to Ronald McDonald Children's Charities.[55]
Dinner Menu – After testing pasta in the South in 1989, McDonald's began testing a pasta-based menu at 40 units across Rochester, New York, in September 1991, including lasagna, fettuccine alfredo, and spaghetti with meatballs. In the early 1990s, a new Dinner Menu was tested for 6–12 months at two locations in New York and Tennessee. It consisted of the pizza mentioned below but also included lasagna, spaghetti, fettuccine alfredo, and roasted chicken as entrees. The side dishes included mashed potatoes with gravy and a vegetable medley.[citation needed] For the dessert, it included a brownie à la mode or peanut butter pie.[25][56]
Eggs Benedict McMuffin – Canadian style bacon, egg, special breakfast sauce, and American cheese on a toasted English muffin.
Fried Roast Beef Sandwich – In 1968 this product was launched targeting adults. Sold with a package of McDonald's BBQ sauce on the side using the slogan "McDonald's is my kind of place"; it was inspired by a franchisee's version of an Arby's sandwich. The sandwich failed due to the costs of getting roast beef slicers; no matter how many sandwiches they could sell, it would never turn a profit.[1]
Grilled Cheese Happy Meal – There was a Happy Meal introduced during the early part of the 2000s (decade) that contained a grilled cheese sandwich. It was discontinued the same summer it was released but is still sold in some Canadian markets.
Grilled Chicken Flatbread Sandwich – Grilled chicken strips, lettuce, tomato, grilled onions, pepper jack cheese, and a creamy herb sauce served wrapped in a heated flatbread. Served briefly in June 2002, and again from December 27, 2002 until February 9, 2003.
Happy Meal Breakfast – The Happy Meal Breakfast was a meal that was smaller than the traditional breakfast that lasted from the 1980s to 2009. It was discontinued by advice of the Nutrition department at the Corporate Headquarters in Oak Brook, Illinois, but is still sold in Hong Kong.
Home Fried Chicken – During 1968 McDonald's sold deep fried chicken (similar to KFC). Targeting parents who could not choose between burgers and chicken, McDonald's delivered home fried chicken served with distinct packaging. The white chicken meat was sold in light gold packages (for adults) and catering to the children – the dark chicken meat was sold in dark foil packages. TV slogan was... "so everyone can have just what they want ... McDonald's Strives to Reunite the American Family" (note the US was struggling with domestic civil unrest due to the combined social upheaval of the Vietnam War and the civil rights movement)
Hot dogs – In 1937, hot dogs were the first things sold in McDonald's. Then in CEO Ray Kroc's 1977 autobiography, he prohibited the company from selling hot dogs, regardless of potential demand, as he regarded them as unhygienic; however, hot dogs were reintroduced in 1995 at some Midwestern located stores (at the option of the franchise-holder) as a summer item. UK stores sold hot dogs during 2002 on the McChoice menu (later PoundSaver) and as a seasonal menu item in the summer of 1999. Also, at least one American restaurant offered Oscar Mayer hot dogs at some time, notably in Bethel Park, Pennsylvania, and McDonald's locations at Toronto Metro Zoo and SkyDome in Toronto offered hot dogs until 1999. Starting in the year 2007, a few McDonald's began selling Hot Dogs in central Pennsylvania due to popular demand from local sports fans. They can be found at 12 locations as of 2011[update]. In Tokyo locations, hot dogs were available from 1990 until 2004, and have been reintroduced one more for 2009, dubbed the "McHot Dog". McDonald's locations in Chile also sold hot dogs for a brief period in 2004.
Hot Ham 'N Cheese – Sliced ham, American cheese, lettuce and tomato on a triple split, sesame seed bun with a choice of mayonnaise or honey mustard sauce.
Hulaburger – A Ray Kroc invention, it featured a slice of pineapple instead of meat. Originally intended for Roman Catholics who are not allowed to eat meat on Fridays during Lent. It was test-marketed in 1963 alongside the Filet-O-Fish sandwich, with the highest seller being added to the menu full-time (the Filet-O-Fish, a creation of an Ohio franchiser, won).[57]
Italian Doubles – A limited summer promotion in Canada in 1989. Two regular patties on a hamburger bun with 1 slice of mozzarella cheese & marinara sauce.
Kiwiburger – In the 1990s, New Zealand sold a burger reflecting their national icon the Kiwi. It was a single beef patty hamburger, with egg (identical to the egg in McMuffins), cheese, lettuce, tomato, beetroot, onions, ketchup ("tomato sauce") and American mustard. It came in distinctive packaging with 46 classic kiwi quotes, kiwiana, and kiwi sporting icons, which were also used in promotions of the burger.[58] Complications with the cooking of the egg and the use of certain ingredients, that no other McDonald's burger had, saw the Kiwiburger discontinued. It has occasionally returned to the menu for limited times since.
McChicken LT (McDonald's Chicken Lettuce and Tomato) was the chicken version of the McDLT featuring the same two-sided container as the McDLT except the packaging was yellow instead of white. It was introduced about the same time as the McDLT in the mid-1980s. The chicken was a grilled, unbreaded chicken breast placed on the heel of the bun in one of the compartments. The toppings were shredded lettuce, tomato and mayonnaise assembled on the top half of the bun in the other compartment. Cheese was an optional addition for an extra US$0.10. The grilled chicken breast was then basted with a brushing of melted butter. As with the McDLT, the consumer would finalize preparation of the sandwich by combining the hot and cool sides just prior to eating. The McChicken LT was discontinued in the Fall of 1987.
McDLT – The McDLT (McDonald's Lettuce and Tomato) was sold in a novel form of packaging.[59] The McDLT was introduced in the fall of 1984 as the Lettuce and Tomato Special. The meat and bottom half of the bun were prepared separately from the lettuce, tomato, American cheese, pickles, sauces, and top half of the bun. Both were then packaged into a specially designed two-sided styrofoam container. The consumer was then expected to finalize preparation of the sandwich by combining the hot and cool sides just prior to eating. It was discontinued between December 1990 and January 1991 due to environmental concerns with styrofoam.
McDonald's Own Chocolaty Chip Cookie - mini-chocolate chip cookies which came in a small rectangular box
McDonaldland Cookies - cookies shaped like the McDonald's characters. originally came in a white box with a handle and later smaller rectangular boxes with cartoon images
McDouble Cruncher – two patties with a slice of cheese, chipotle BBQ sauce and crispy onions
McGrilled Chicken Classic – A sandwich featuring a grilled chicken breast portion that was introduced in September 1993 and was produced before being replaced by the Grilled Chicken Deluxe/Chicken McGrill.
McLean Deluxe – A lower-calorie Quarter Pounder-type sandwich (introduced in 1991) containing 90% lean beef and 10% water with carrageenan, a seaweed extract, to hold the water and beef together.[60] This item was otherwise identical to the Big N' Tasty and the McDLT.
McRye – a hamburger on rye bread sold in Finland in late 1990s.
McSoup – Campbell's Soup sold at McDonald's available in Broccoli & Cheese and Chicken Noodle. (This product is only sold in winter months in select markets)
McStuffin – a pocket sandwich available with various fillings. McStuffins were sold for a short time in 1993 and were discontinued that same year due to not having a lot of popularity.
McWraps – Inspired in the Mexican burritos Chicken Caesar, Chicken and Garden Salad wraps served toasted in a thick herb flat bread. McWraps is still offered in some parts of Europe(for instance in Denmark and Croatia).
Mighty Wings – deep-fried spicy chicken wings. McDonald's began selling these in 1990 as an optional item and stopped selling them in 2003. They are still sold in China, Spain, Samoa, and the U.S. Virgin Island of St Croix as of March 6, 2010. Also sold as McWings in Pakistan, they were discontinued for a while but relaunched. On September 9, 2013, McDonald's brought the Mighty Wings back to its menus in all of its American restaurants as a limited time offer available until November 2013. The Mighty Wings did not sell well its second time around in the U.S. The main problems cited with the Mighty Wings was the price point versus the amount purchased. Compared with competitors, the pricing was determined to be too high, but McDonald's stated that due to overruns in purchasing, the company could not sell them at lower prices without losing money. On February 24, 2014, McDonald's decided to put them back on the menu for a limited engagement to liquidate the remaining inventory at a lower price in all U.S. locations.
Mozzarella sticks - 3 fried cheesesticks with marinara sauce on the side. Was on the Dollar Menu & More menu from December 2015 to March 2016.
Onion Nuggets – introduced at the same time as the Beefsteak Sandwich as the side item for the Dinner Menu. Onion Nuggets were chopped onions shaped into small solid pieces, dipped in batter and deep-fried.
Philly Cheesesteak – Slices of steak and Swiss cheese with onions. Served until August 2007 at Australian and American McDonald's. This sandwich is still available in Canada, made with cheese spread and green bell pepper.
Pizza / McPizza – McDonald's has also attempted pizza at various times,[25][56] with an apple-pie–like McPizza and more conventional McDonald's Pizza. A line of personal-sized pizzas was first seen in the late 1970s in test-market stores near interstate highways around Milwaukee and Madison. In Canada (c. 1992–99), the pizza originally began as a family-sized pizza that was brought out to the table by an employee and placed on a raised rack in the centre of the table. Later it was scaled down to a personal-sized pizza. However, variations have found their way into some international markets such as India (the pie-like "Pizza McPuff"). McDonald's also test marketed a 14-inch, round, traditional-style pizza in Evansville, Indiana, and nearby Owensboro, Kentucky, in 1989.[61] By 1991, the McDonald's test markets for pizza had grown to over 500 McDonald's locations before the pizza test was placed on hold.[62] Pizza was discontinued in most restaurants by 2000. The reason for eliminating the pizza from the menu was that the time to cook a pizza took 11 minutes, and McDonald's wanted to keep its reputation for fast service. As of March 2017, two McDonald's locations, one in Pomeroy, Ohio, and the other in Spencer, West Virginia still offer the family style McPizza.[63]
Roast Beef on a Roll – A roast beef sandwich made just like the Arby's roast beef sandwich. Sold in 1968.
Root Beer Float – A combination of vanilla soft-serve ice cream and root beer.
Salad Shakers – A salad of lettuce, croutons and other vegetable in a tall dome shaped plastic container. Salad Shakers were introduced in the spring of 2000 and are still available in the Netherlands.
Son of Mac – Also known as the Mini Mac or Baby Mac, a version with only one patty and no centre roll piece. It sold as a Baby Mac in New Zealand, was sold in Australia, now discontinued. Served by some stores in the United States under the moniker "Mac Jr". It's still sold in places in Canada, known as the "kid's mac".
Southern Fried-Chicken – Was sold in Australia up until mid-1986. This was available as a 2 piece (or 3 piece) pack including French Fries. This was replaced by the current McNugget range, as the nuggets became cheaper to produce and safer to cook.
Spanish Omelet Bagel – existed during the mid to late 2000s, discontinued.
Spicy Chicken – Chicken breast with spicy breading introduced in 2006. (Still offered in some U.S. markets.)
Strawberry Shortcake McFlurry – Vanilla soft-serve ice cream with strawberry topping and Vanilla Cookie pieces mixed together.
Superhero Burger – Featuring 3 patties, yellow American cheese, white American cheese, tomato, lettuce, onion, and mayo all laid out on an elongated bun like a hero sandwich. The burger was released as part of the "Taste of the Month" series that McDonald's ran in 1995 where they had a new burger every month. The Superhero Burger was also tied into the promo campaign for the film Batman Forever and the ads for it featured Batman and the Batmobile.
Torta – In 2000, the company released their own version of tortas, a Mexican sandwich, in southern California on a trial basis.
Triple Ripple – A mixed cone with strawberry, vanilla, and chocolate, topped with a plastic top.[1]
Triple-Double Burger – A burger featuring 3 beef patties and 2 slices of cheese, served on the same 6 inch (15.2 cm) sesame seed roll as the McRib. It was originally marketed as the Superhero Burger to promote the release of the 1995 film Batman Forever. It was also sold under the names of local sports stars in at least five markets in the 1990s and in the Cleveland area in the early 2000s (decade):

The Hockey Hero burger, in Canada.
The Jason Kidd Burger – Downtown Phoenix, Arizona, franchises had a Limited Time Offer burger named after NBA player Jason Kidd, while he played for the Phoenix Suns.
The Michael Dean Perry burger, for the then Cleveland Browns star.
The Rory Sparrow burger was sold in the Sacramento area. It was named after the Sacramento Kings star.
Thome Triple was sold in the Cleveland, Ohio area. It was named after Cleveland Indians first baseman Jim Thome


Upside Down Iced Tea – A new cup tested at select locations in the southeast United States in the late 1990s. It featured an ice compartment at top of the cup to keep the beverage cold. It was quickly discontinued.
Szechuan Sauce, created to promote the Disney film, Mulan (1998 film). It was thrust back into the cultural spotlight after being referenced numerous times in the Season 3 premiere of Adult Swim animated comedy Rick and Morty.

See also[edit]


Food portal



List of Burger King products

References[edit]


^ a b c Love, John F. (1995). McDonald's: Behind the Arches (Revised ed.). New York: Bantam Books. ISBN 0553347594. 
^ a b Buiso, Gary (2012-12-02). "More burning questions about NYC answered | New York Post". Nypost.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Menu: Our Full McDonald's Food Menu | McDonald's". Mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Artz, Matthew (December 31, 2009). "Fremont's 'hamburger king' dead at 81". Oakland Tribune. Retrieved January 12, 2010. 
^ "ACCUEIL". McDonald's France. 
^ AP Newswire (July 2, 1997). "McDonald's hoping new burger a Whopper stopper". The Augusta Chronicle. Archived from the original on October 30, 2007. Retrieved October 23, 2007. 
^ a b c d Wong, Venessa (March 12, 2014). "After Year of Flubs, McDonald's Loses Its Taste for Novelty". Bloomberg Business. Retrieved March 3, 2015. 
^ "麥當勞 意想不到嘅嚐試". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Product Nutrition". McDonalds.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's 1955 Burger Review - Burger Lad - Burger Reviews". Burger Lad. 2013-10-16. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ John Reynolds (2011-08-25). "McDonald's cooks up 'no-nonsense' 1955 burger for the UK". Marketingmagazine.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Little, Katie (November 24, 2015). "McDonald's breakfast burger mashup debuts". CNBC. NBC News. Retrieved November 25, 2015. 
^ a b "McDonalds - Artisan Grilled Chicken". News.mcdonalds.com. 2015-04-06. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ http://www.aef.com/images/diversity/burrell/snack_wrap_case_study.pdf
^ "North County News - San Diego Union Tribune". Nctimes.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ McDonald's Australia reveals new Chicken Menu[permanent dead link]
^ "MacPride.Net - Kaufman Enterprises - Promotions". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Chicken Maharaja Mac". www.mcdonaldsindia.net. Mc Donalds India. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ "Chicken McBites". Mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Tasty Basket 30 pezzi | McDonald's Italia" (in (in Italian)). M.mcdonalds.it. 2012-12-03. Retrieved 2017-07-13. CS1 maint: Unrecognized language (link)
^ Clark, Paul (February 20, 2007). "No fish story: Sandwich saved his McDonald's". USA Today. Retrieved April 17, 2009. 
^ Eisenberg, Daniel (September 25, 2002). "Can McDonald's Shape Up?". Time. 
^ Velasco, Schuyler (August 21, 2013). "10 fast foods that have disappeared: McLobster". Christian Science Monitor. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 
^ Spencer Ross. "A connoisseur's guide to downtown poutine - a & e". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ a b c Velasco, Schuyler (August 21, 2013). "10 fast foods that have disappeared: 4. McSpaghetti". Christian Science Monitor. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 
^ "Forays of a Finance Foodie: McDonald's Steps Up Their Style: New Product Preview Day! [New York]". Financefoodie.com. 2010-06-08. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ [1][dead link]
^ "McDonalds Testing Garlic Fries". Time.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Harding, Luke (28 December 2000). "Give me a Big Mac - but hold the beef". The Guardian. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ "Maharaja Mac - Veg and Chicken options". www.mcdonaldsindia.net. Mc Donalds India. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ mcdonalds.com.ph. "Ourfood". McDonalds. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's: You Deserve A Hash Brown All Day". NPR.org. 2015-09-02. Retrieved 2016-03-07. 
^ snopes (March 7, 2016). "McDonald's Shakes : snopes.com". snopes. Retrieved March 7, 2016. 
^ "Triple Thick MilkshakeÂ®". McDonalds.ca. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's USA – USA Core Menu Items by Ingredients". McDonald's Corporation. Archived from the original on April 26, 2009. Retrieved May 29, 2009. 
^ "McDonald's Nutrition Calculator | McDonald's" (PDF). Nutrition.mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Why don't you mix the mcflurry anymore like you used to?". December 10, 2013. Retrieved June 21, 2014. 
^ "A McFlurry of tasty ideas". Honolulu Star-Bulletin. August 13, 1998. Retrieved June 12, 2012. 
^ "Steve McFlurry USPTO trademark information". United States Patent and Trademark Office. December 19, 1997. Retrieved September 1, 2006. 
^ "Large Frozen McSpider Coke | Drinks Menu | McDonald's AU". Mcdonalds.com.au. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McShakeup". The Huffington Post. March 1, 2013. 
^ Candice Choi, AP. "McDonald's cuts Angus burgers from menu". Usatoday.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "R.I.P. McDonald's Angus Third Pounder". The Huffington Post. May 9, 2013. Retrieved October 18, 2013. 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Elliott Harris. "Beefing up his role – Bulls' Wennington latest burger celebrity". Chicago Sun-Times. March 8, 1998. Sports, 14.
^ Times, The (1998-08-16). "Jaguars: Advertising war games have definitely begun 08/16/98". Jacksonville.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "The Press-Courier". McDonalds testing catfish. 14 February 1991. Retrieved 13 July 2017. 
^ "McD brings back Cheddar Melt | Nation's Restaurant News | Find Articles at BNET". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Unveils Chicken McBites". Los Angeles Times. January 25, 2012. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's USA - USA Core Menu Items by Ingredients". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's chicken snack a hit". Azcentral.com. 2007-01-30. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ February 28, 2013 (2013-02-28). "Bid Adieu To Chicken Selects As McDonald’s Makes Room On The Menu For Newer Items – Consumerist". Consumerist.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's dropping Fruit & Walnut Salad, Chicken Selects in U.S.". Reuters. 
^ "Mcdonald's Tries Adding Hispanic Fare To Fast Food - tribunedigital-orlandosentinel". Articles.orlandosentinel.com. 2001-10-28. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Floats offered at McDonalds". Beaver County Times. 22 May 1991. p. 14. Retrieved 12 July 2017. 
^ a b McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Kiwi Burger television advertisement – New Zealand Film Archive". Archived from the original on July 14, 2011. Retrieved October 15, 2010. 
^ US 4653685 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Chaudhry, Rajan (July 31, 1989). "McPizza? McDonald's widens pizza test: pizza operators gird for assault". Nation's Restaurant News. Findarticles.com. Retrieved November 13, 2009. 
^ Prewitt, Milford (October 7, 1991). "McDonald's developing separate dinner menu, puts pizza test on hold". Nation's Restaurant News. Findarticles.com. Archived from the original on May 1, 2009. Retrieved February 28, 2009. 
^ Pemberton, Becky (2016-03-10). "Ohio and West Virginia McDonald's are still selling MCPIZZA | Daily Mail Online". Dailymail.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 


External links[edit]

 Media related to McDonald's products at Wikimedia Commons
"McPizza! – Tasting the elusive McDonald's Pizza". Science Tortilla (YouTube). March 14, 2015.  – Video on a taste test of a McPizza from one of the two locations still selling it.
McGrath, Jane. "5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items". HowStuffWorks, Inc. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 







v
t
e


McDonald's






History
Advertising

ad programs


Countries with franchises
Legal cases
Product list
International availability





People



Richard and Maurice McDonald
Ray Kroc
Joan Kroc
Ralph Alvarez
Charlie Bell
Al Bernardin
Jim Cantalupo
George Cohon
Dan Coudreaut
Steve Easterbrook
Janice L. Fields
Den Fujita
Don Gorske
Jack M. Greenberg
Eikō Harada
June Martino
Herb Peterson
Michael R. Quinlan
Ed Rensi
Willard Scott
James A. Skinner
Donald N. Smith
Harry J. Sonneborn
Don Thompson
Fred L. Turner





Company



Hamburger University
Leaps and Bounds
McBarge
McCafé
McDonald's #1 Store Museum
McDonald's (Will Rogers Turnpike)
Oldest McDonald's restaurant
Rock N Roll McDonald's
Ronald McDonald House Charities





Products




Beef



Big Mac
Big N' Tasty
Deluxe line
Kiwiburger
Quarter Pounder (McRoyal)





Chicken



Chicken McNuggets
McChicken





Other



Deli Choices
Filet-O-Fish
Georgie Pie
Happy Meal
McArabia
McGriddles
McMuffin
McRib
Premium line
Shamrock Shake





Former



Arch Deluxe
McAfrika








Advertising




Campaigns



Changeables
Global Gladiators
Golden Arches
Mac Tonight
McDonaldland
McDonald's Monopoly
McDonald's Treasure Land Adventure
M.C. Kids
McKids
Ronald McDonald
Teenie Beanies
The Wacky Adventures of Ronald McDonald





Sponsorships



Kyle Larson (NASCAR)
Jamie McMurray (NASCAR)
Graham Rahal (IndyCar Series)
McDonald's All-American Game
McDonald's Championship
McDonald's Championship (golf)
McDonald's Cycle Center
McDonald's Gospelfest
McDonald's Olympic Swim Stadium





Related



Burger wars
Donald Land
Fast food advertising
Mac and Me (1988 film)
McDonald's sign (Pine Bluff, Arkansas)
Supersize








Branches



Canada
Israel
New Zealand





Criticism



Fast Food Nation (film)
McDonaldization
McDonald's Videogame
McJob
McRefugee
McLibel
Maxime, McDuff & McDo
Super Size Me

Don't Eat This Book







Legal cases



Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants
Magee v. McDonald's
McDonald's Restaurants v. Morris & Steel
Sid & Marty Krofft Television Productions Inc. v. McDonald's Corp.





Related



McDelivery
Big Mac Index
Bill Elliott
McDonald's Young Entertainers
McWords
San Ysidro McDonald's massacre
"Seriously McDonalds"
Sydney River McDonald's murders
Taiwan McDonald's bombings
Urban legends
Boom, Like That
The Founder (2016 film)










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=List_of_McDonald%27s_products&oldid=791067944"					
Categories: Lists of brand name foodsMcDonald's foodsHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksArticles with Italian-language external linksCS1 maint: Unrecognized languageArticles with dead external links from July 2017Wikipedia articles needing copy edit from July 2017All articles needing copy editArticles that may contain original research from July 2017All articles that may contain original researchArticles needing additional references from July 2017All articles needing additional referencesWikipedia articles needing page number citations from July 2017All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2014Articles with unsourced statements from December 2014Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2009All articles containing potentially dated statementsArticles that may contain original research from October 2012Articles with unsourced statements from July 2017Articles with unsourced statements from March 2009Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2011 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


日本語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 23:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









List of McDonald's products - Wikipedia





















 






List of McDonald's products

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search







This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article may require copy editing for grammar, style, cohesion, tone, or spelling. You can assist by editing it. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article possibly contains original research. Please improve it by verifying the claims made and adding inline citations. Statements consisting only of original research should be removed. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)





Contents


1 Beef burgers
2 Chicken
3 Fish
4 Pork
5 Other products
6 Breakfast
7 Beverages
8 Desserts
9 Former items
10 See also
11 References
12 External links



Beef burgers[edit]
All beef patties are seasoned, consisting primarily of salt and minced pepper.

Hamburger (formerly known as the Junior Burger in some countries) and cheeseburger – a 1.6-ounce (45 g) ground beef patty, with 0.125 ounces (3.5 g) ketchup, mustard, a single dill pickle, re-hydrated onions, on a toasted bun. At one time early in McDonald's history, the pickle was removed from the sandwich.[1][page needed] In all or much of the New York City area, it is served without mustard.[2] Also sold as a double or triple, adding an extra pickle slice for each beef patty added. A triple burger and a bacon double cheeseburger are optional items and are not always available in all restaurants or markets. In Australia the average serving size for a Cheeseburger is 110 grams. The hamburger and the cheeseburger are the company's original grilled burger offerings, having been served as part of the 1948 menu.[3]
Big Mac – a signature product that was introduced in 1968. Two 1.6-ounce (45 g) (approx. uncooked weight) ground beef patties, special Big Mac sauce (similar to Thousand Island dressing), lettuce, cheese, pickles, and diced onions on a sesame seed bun, with an additional middle bun (called a "club layer") separating the beef patties. The Grand Mac, its bigger-size counterpart, was added in December 2016.
Quarter Pounder – a 4.25-ounce (120.5 g) (originally 4-ounce (113.4 g) until 2015) (approx. uncooked weight) ground beef patty with ketchup, mustard, chopped onions, pickle, and two slices of cheese. As with burgers made with the smaller 1.6-ounce patties, the Quarter Pounder is prepared without mustard in all or a large portion of the New York City region.[2] It was invented by Al Bernardin, a franchise owner and former McDonald's Vice President of product development, at his McDonald's in Fremont, California, in 1971.[4] In some markets unfamiliar with Imperial measurements (such as France), it is known as a Royal Cheese, or variants thereof, such as McRoyale.[5] It is also available as the Double Quarter Pounder with Cheese, which includes another patty of the same proportions. In 2013, McDonald's expanded the sandwich into a line with three additional variants to make them smaller versions of the Angus Burgers, which was renamed the Taste-Crafted Burgers in 2016 in West Coast markets and later expanded to other U.S. markets in January 2017, the latest added being the Signature Sriracha, which was replaced by Sweet Barbecue Bacon by May.
Big N' Tasty/Big Tasty – the Big N' Tasty, introduced in 1997, was a 4-ounce (113 g) beef patty with ketchup, cheese, mayonnaise with a grill diced onions, pickles, leaf lettuce, and tomatoes. It was devised to resemble Burger King's Whopper sandwich.[6] It is also known as the Big Xtra in Slovenia and most of Canada; the McXtra in Quebec, Canada; the McFeast Deluxe in Australia; the Big Tasty (without the 'N') in Brazil, Bulgaria, France, Germany, Italy (without ketchup), Ireland, The Netherlands, Poland, Russia, Sweden, the United Kingdom; the Quarter Pounder Deluxe in South Africa; and the McNifica (a play on Spanish magnifica, 'wonderful') in Mexico and Latin America. The Big Tasty configuration is somewhat different, consisting of a third-pound (150 g) beef patty, sesame seed bun, lettuce, tomatoes, onions, Emmental cheese, and Big Tasty sauce (which has a smoke flavor). The Big Tasty Bacon variant also contains strips of bacon. This variant was sold in the US until 2009; it is now sold internationally only.
Double Cheeseburger – two 1.6-ounce (45 g) ground beef patties, with 0.125 ounces (3.5 g) ketchup, mustard (except in all or much of the New York City area), two slices of dill pickle, re-hydrated onions, and two pieces of cheese on a toasted bun. The double cheeseburger was offered as a promotional item in the 1950s, and was added to the regular menu in 1965. An official variant is offered in the U.S. state of New Mexico, called the Green Chile Double Cheeseburger, topped with roasted green New Mexico chile peppers.





The McDouble



McDouble – similar to a Double Cheeseburger, but with just one slice of cheese. Reintroduced as a permanent dollar-menu item in December 2008 – had been a short-term product in 1997, advertised with "Eddie the Echo." The original McDouble did not have cheese and was garnished with lettuce and tomatoes rather than the pickles and onions on the 2008 version.
Bacon McDouble – a sandwich that is similar to the McDouble, but it has two pieces of Applewood smoked bacon added to it. This sandwich was added to the U.S. "Dollar Menu & More" in November 2013.[7]
Daily Double – similar to the McDouble, however the toppings are slightly different. The Daily Double is made with a little bit of lettuce, tomato, slivered onions, and mayonnaise. It also has only one slice of cheese, like the McDouble, rather than the two slices that are on the double cheeseburger. In 2011 and 2012, the item was test marketed in various regional locations.
McFeast – a hamburger with lettuce, tomato, pickles and mayonnaise, in most markets from April 1977. The name McFeast lives on though in Scandinavian countries, where a McFeast has been served since the mid-1980s in Sweden and was later introduced to the rest of the Nordic countries; the McFeast in Sweden contains a quarter pounder patty, lettuce, modified mayonnaise with lemon juice, onion and tomato. In the rest of the countries, the McFeast also contains ketchup, but not in Sweden. The same burger was sold under the name Mega Feast in New Zealand for several years during the 1990s, but has since been discontinued. The McFeast Deluxe was sold in Australia until the late 1990s and contained: mustard, ketchup, large onions, McFeast Deluxe sauce, lettuce, a tomato slice, regular cheese and a quarter pounder patty served in a Quarter Pounder/McChicken Bun. It returned to the Australian menu in 2009 and in August 2011 using the same ingredients, however contained McChicken sauce in place of the original 'McFeast Deluxe' sauce. The McFeast has been sold in Germany and Austria since the 1990s, named "Hamburger Royal TS" (T for "Tomate" (tomato); S for "Salat", the German word for lettuce). It contains a quarter-pounder patty, lettuce, tomatoes, onions, cheese and the McChicken mayo sauce. For special occasions, it is sold in Germany as a "McFresh" which also contains cucumber slices.
Ranger Burger and Super Ranger[8]
1955 Burger – this burger inspired by 1955 (according to the official site) contains beef, bacon, lettuce, tomatoes, caramelized onions, ketchup and McDonald's smoky sauce (barbecue). Named after the year the fast-food chain was incorporated by Ray Kroc, the burger is popular in European markets, including Spain, Italy and Germany. It was released in 2011 and re-released in 2013 in the UK.[9][10][11]
BBQ Ranch Burger[7] – a very sweet hamburger containing one all-beef patty, cheddar cheese, BBQ Ranch sauce, and tortilla strips,[citation needed] added to the U.S. "Dollar Menu and More" in November 2013.[7]
McSpicy Burger – a very spicy chicken breast, lettuce, cheese and hot sauce-laced mayo, served as the McSpicy Shake Shake Meal, complete with fries.[citation needed]
Bacon Clubhouse – a burger consisting of one quarter-pound patty, lettuce, tomato, and special sauce served on an "artisan roll". This core item was added to the menu the week of March 12, 2014.[7]
Jalapeño Double – similar to the McDouble, except it contains two types of jalapeño peppers, pickled and crispy, plus a slice of white cheddar cheese between the two burger patties, and buttermilk ranch sauce, added to the Dollar Menu in April 2014.[citation needed]
Triple Cheeseburger – similar to the Double Cheeseburger, except it contains three burger patties, with a slice of American cheese between each patty, plus ketchup, mustard (except in all or much of the New York City area), onion, and dill pickle. This was added to the Dollar Menu in December 2014.[citation needed]
ChiTown Classic – a regional offering that was one of two finalist out of 100s of entries in the "Chicagoland Burger Build Off" competition to develop a breakfast-dinner mashup burger in 2015. The burger was placed on the menu on Chicago area locations starting Mid-November until December 27, 2015. The burger adds breakfast's Canadian bacon and applewood smoked bacon.[12]

Chicken[edit]

McChicken – a mildly spicy chicken sandwich, offered in a spicier variant as the Hot n' Spicy in some markets. Made from 100% ground white meat chicken, mayonnaise, and shredded lettuce, on a toasted bun. A full-size version was introduced in 1980, later removed, and reintroduced in 1988. In some markets it is not spicy, and in others a cajun spiced version is also offered. It remains one of the biggest sellers, just behind the Big Mac. The larger sandwich was replaced with the Crispy Chicken Deluxe in 1996, and brought back in 1998 in the current smaller size, and marketed as the Cajun (Style) McChicken. In Australia the average serving size for a McChicken is 185 grams. In Canada, it remains a full-size sandwich, while the US' smaller version is sold as the Junior Chicken.
Premium chicken sandwiches – the Premium line was added in July 2005. The Classic was a rebranding of the Crispy Chicken and Chicken McGrill sandwiches, themselves rebrandings of the Deluxe chicken line in 1998, with mayonnaise, leaf lettuce, and a tomato slice. The Ranch BLT contains ranch sauce instead of mayonnaise and includes bacon. The Club is similar to the Classic with added bacon and a piece of Swiss cheese. In Latin America, the Classic and the Club are sold, but a honey mustard chicken sandwich is sold in place of the BLT. All were served on a whole-grain roll, with either a grilled or crispy chicken breast. On March 20, 2014, the Premium Crispy Chicken Bacon Clubhouse and Premium Grilled Chicken Bacon Clubhouse were added to the lineup (alongside the beef variant of the sandwich) on a new artisan roll. In February 2015 the Ranch BLT and Club were removed from the menu. The standard crispy offering was renamed to the Premium Crispy Chicken Deluxe (later the Buttermilk Crispy Chicken Sandwich in August 2015) and it was upgraded to sit on the artisan roll introduced with the Bacon Clubhouse. In the first week of April 2015, McDonald's replaced the Premium Grilled Chicken sandwich with the Artisan Grilled Chicken.[13] Like the Taste-Crafted Burgers, the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches were introduced in 2016, in West Coast markets, and in all other U.S. markets in January 2017. Signature Sriracha was the latest to be added in June 2016; it was replaced by Sweet Barbecue Bacon in May 2017.
Southern Style Chicken Sandwich – a southern-style fried chicken breast filet, on a steamed bun, dressed with butter and two pickles. Nearly identical to a Chick-fil-A chicken sandwich. Discontinued at many franchises in early 2015.
Snack Wrap – a wrap made with white meat chicken breast (crispy or grilled), lettuce, shredded Cheddar cheese and Monterey Jack cheese, and a sauce (Spicy Buffalo, Ranch, Honey mustard, Chipotle barbecue, or Salsa Roja, the breakfast sauce on the McSkillet), wrapped in a soft flour tortilla. It was launched on July 1, 2006. Chipotle BBQ is the most recent flavor. Available in the United States, The Netherlands, United Kingdom, Canada, Australia and Brazil.[14][15][16] There is also a Mac Snack Wrap which features the fixings of the Big Mac, but without the bun and wrapped in a tortilla shell, and uses one half of a piece of quarter meat.[17]
Premium Chicken Wrap – in 2013, McDonald's in the U.S. introduced a larger wrap that it has had success with in parts of Europe. It comes in three variants: Sweet Chili Chicken, Chicken & Bacon, and Chicken & Ranch.
Chicken Fajita – chicken, cheese, red and green bell peppers, and diced onions in a flour tortilla. Comes with Picante sauce packets on request, which are available in mild and spicy. Available in only a few markets.
Chicken McNuggets – introduced in 1983 as a replacement for the McChicken, these are small chicken chunks served with dipping sauces of barbecue, sweet n' sour, honey, and hot mustard. Available in 4, 6, 10 (originally 9), or 20 pieces. Up until 2003, they were a combination of white and dark meat, now they are made with only white meat. In 2011, five new dipping sauces were introduced and added to the lineup: sweet chili, honey mustard, spicy buffalo, and creamy ranch. With the addition of these new dipping sauces, McDonald's began phasing out the Hot Mustard sauce, and by February 2014, it had been discontinued in most U.S. markets.
McArabia – there are two versions of the McArabia: grilled chicken, and grilled kofta (beef with spices). Both are served with lettuce, tomatoes, onions, and garlic mayonnaise in addition to two small patties of grilled chicken or kofta, all wrapped in an Arabian-style pita bread. McDonald's has performed a rather large advertising campaign for the McArabia since its introduction in 2003, largely focusing on the Arabian-themed nature of the sandwich, and it appears to have worked well. The McArabia has been very well received throughout Southwestern Eurasia. The same product is also introduced in Malaysia with "Chicken Foldover" as an alternative name.
(Premium) Crispy Chicken Deluxe – a sandwich made with a crispy chicken breast, tomato slices, and lettuce. It was first sold in 1996 and had its name changed to the Crispy Chicken Sandwich in 1998. It was replaced with a Premium chicken sandwich in July 2005, and was then brought back in 2015 under the original name with the added prefix Premium. The only other change is that it is now sold on an artisan roll instead of the potato bun that characterized the original Crispy Chicken Deluxe. By August 2015 it was renamed the Buttermilk Crispy Chicken Sandwich. This is part of the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches introduced in 2016.
Grilled Chicken Deluxe – this sandwich has the same ingredients as the Premium Crispy Chicken Deluxe, but has a marinated, grilled chicken breast at its center. It has been sold under various names since 1996, when it was introduced as the Grilled Chicken Deluxe, and had its name changed to the Chicken McGrill in 1998. It was replaced with a Premium chicken sandwich in July 2005, which was in turned replaced with the Artisan Grilled Chicken in 2015. It is also available in India, and has at times been available in Canada.
Artisan Grilled Chicken – in the first week of April 2015, McDonald's introduced a redesigned grilled chicken patty, replacing the Premium Grilled Chicken sandwich, which contains "less ingredients", and those that remain can be found in consumer's "own kitchens".[13] The sandwich sits atop the artisan roll first seen with the Bacon Clubhouse, and is the last of the full-size chicken sandwiches to switch to this bun. It is part of the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches menu introduced in 2016.
Maharaja Mac- In India, McDonald's does not serve beef in its burgers. Instead, it has created a large Big Lac style chicken burger called the "Chicken Maharaja Mac", with a chicken patty and vegetable garnishings.[18]
Chicken McBites - "poppable" pieces of chicken that are made from chicken breasts.[19]
Tasty Basket - Available only in Italy, the Tasty Basket consists of 30 pieces of chicken, which includes the Chicken McNugget, Chicken McBites, and chicken wings.[20]

Fish[edit]

Filet-O-Fish – a fish fillet with tartar sauce and a half slice of cheese, on a steamed bun. It was introduced in Cincinnati in 1962 when it was discovered that many Roman Catholics chose to eat at Frisch's Big Boy on Fridays and during Lent, as it offered a fish sandwich so they could go without meat.[21] This was replaced with the Fish Filet Deluxe in 1996 and brought back in 1998 albeit a larger fish patty. During the Easter period in Hawaii and Guam, a Double Filet-O-Fish meal is offered with two pieces of fish on one bun.
Fish McBites – similar to the Chicken McBites, these are small pieces of flaky whitefish dipped in batter and fried until golden brown, and served with tartar sauce for dipping. They were taken off the menu in the end of March 2013.

Pork[edit]




The McRib



McRib – a sandwich featuring boneless pork with barbecue sauce, slivered onions, and pickles. First seen in test-market stores near interstate highways around Milwaukee and Madison, Wisconsin, in the late 1970s (along with early tests of personal-sized pizza) the McRib was more widely released in 1981, but pulled from menu in 1985. It is released annually in the U.S. as a limited time promotion in some locations. Since 2005, the McRib has reappeared in late October staying on the menu for 10 weeks. The McRib was released in Canada as a promotional sandwich from March 18 through April 8, 2008 and again in summer 2011. The McRib is presently on some European menus (e.g., Germany, where it has been standard since or even before 1990).[22]

Other products[edit]

McDonald's introduced salads to its menu in 1985. Since that time, they have restructured their salad lines several times. In the U.S., the newest salad offerings are part of the McDonald's Premium line. First introduced in 2003, the Premium Salads all are a mixture of iceberg lettuce and a special lettuce assortment (romaine, etc.), with cherry tomatoes and different toppings to differentiate them; additionally all salads can be topped with warm grilled or crispy chicken. All of its salads are part of McDonald's move towards creating a healthier image.
The Happy Meal/Mighty Kids Meal – McDonald's capitalized on Burger Chef's Funmeal concept of a children's meal when it introduced the first Happy Meal in 1979. The meal includes an entrée, a side dish, a beverage and a toy. Happy meals include a tiny order fries (far less than a small order of fries) and fruit, optional sauce for fries, and a choice of nuggets, a single patty burger, or wraps. An additional product, Pasta Zoo was discontinued in 2008. The Mighty Kids Meal contains more food than the Happy Meal, less than the adult meal, and still contains a toy.


The toy is usually a product tie-in with a movie or popular television show.

In mid-February 2012, McDonald's has introduced the Happy Meals/Mighty Kids Meals so that they now come with either a Hamburger, Cheeseburger, 4 piece Chicken McNuggets, McDouble or the 6-piece Chicken McNuggets with a smaller version of the small fry for the Happy Meal or a small fry for a Mighty Kids Meal. All kids meals now come with fries, apple slices and a toy. The apple slices have been reduced from 8 slices to only 4 and no longer come with caramel dipping sauce.



In the U.S., the traditional entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, or a four piece order of Chicken McNuggets (or a double cheeseburger or six piece order of Chicken McNuggets for the Mighty Kids Meals); the sides are fries and sliced apples. Milk, chocolate milk, boxed apple juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks. Some U.S. franchises also include a small cellophane package of McDonaldland cookies. In 2009, McDonald's offered a Happy Meal Wrap, but it was discontinued later that year due to low sales.
In the UK, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four Chicken McNuggets, three fish fingers, or a Chicken wrap; the sides are a choice of fries, carrot sticks or sliced apples and grapes. Organic milk, Tropicana orange juice, apple and blackcurrant Robinsons Fruit Shoot, milkshakes, water and the traditional soda are the choices for drinks.
In New Zealand and Australia, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, three or six piece order of Chicken McNuggets, five or ten Chicken McBites or a crispy or seared Chicken Snack Wrap; the sides are a choice of french fries or apple slices. Thickshake, boxed chocolate milk, apple or water pop tops, orange juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks.
In Canada, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four piece Chicken McNuggets, grilled cheese, or chicken snack wraps; the sides are a choice of fries or apple slices with caramel dip. Milk, chocolate milk, boxed apple juice, orange juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks.







Chicken McNuggets





In Belgium, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four piece order of Chicken McNuggets, McFish or a Ketchup Wrap.




McDonald's line of larger chicken sandwiches (The Classic, Club, Ranch BLT and Southwest), which are part of the McDonald's Premium line were introduced in July 2005 as part of McDonald's menu revamp.

The Classic includes Lettuce, Tomato, and Mayo.
The Club also has Lettuce Tomato and Mayo, but also comes with Swiss cheese and bacon.
The Ranch BLT comes with a creamy ranch sauce, bacon, lettuce and tomato.
The Grand Chicken Burger: Large chicken patty with two layers of cheese, tomatoes, lettuce and sauce
The Southwest comes with a southwest style ancho chili sauce, lettuce, tomato, and spicy pepperjack cheese.


All four can be chosen with either crispy or grilled chicken and all are served on a wheat ciabatta bun.
Deli Choices is a line of deli-style sandwiches that are sold internationally. It is targeted at health-conscious customers and is available in Australia, Austria, Canada, Germany, and Britain, and is testing in the United States. It is similar to the McHero sandwich, sold in parts of the United States.
McDonald's sells French fries as its primary side order. Until 1967, McFries were never frozen, but were cut on-site from potatoes and immediately fried. In some international locations, they sell potato wedges, a type of French fry that is thick cut and wedge shaped and fried onion pieces that are similar to onion rings.





McDonald's McFries.



Many McDonald's locations in discount stores offer freshly popped popcorn and soft pretzels in addition to the normal menu. In PA stores, only soft pretzels are offered as a side option.
Denali Mac – a burger that looks like the Big Mac, but it uses two quarter pound beef patties. Sold only in Alaska, named after Denali (formerly Mount McKinley).





McLobster in 2015.



McLobster – a lobster roll served in a hot dog bun with "lobster sauce" and shredded lettuce, introduced in 1993. The product had supply issues and was not very profitable nationally. Recently, it was only available in Atlantic Canada and New England region in the summer, when lobster is inexpensive.[23] In the 2010s, McDonald's had short term reintroductions in Canada and Italy.
McCrab – in response to the McLobster, McDonald's along the eastern coast of the Delmarva Peninsula (comprising parts of Delaware, Maryland and Virginia) developed the McCrab sandwich, a McDonald's version of the Chesapeake crabcake.
Poutine – originally only to be found in French-Canadian communities, poutine is now found on the menu at most McDonald's' across Canada.[24]
Brownie Melt – similar to a Cinnamelt, it is a rich chocolate brownie with chocolate and white frosting.
McRice – Most McDonald's restaurants in countries in Asia serve the product due to popular demand. It is normal rice.
McSpaghetti – was launched in the late 1970s as a part of McD's dinner menu which included a number of Italian dishes. The dish is still available international where in Philippines it is popular and is generally served with McNuggets.[25]
Angus Snack Wrap – wrap with Angus burger introduced to the U.S. market on August 9, 2010. Angus Snack wraps are available three ways: Deluxe (lettuce, tomato, onions, pickles, American cheese, mayo, mustard); Bacon & Cheese (onions, pickles, American cheese, ketchup, mustard, a strip of bacon); and Mushroom & Swiss (sauteed mushrooms, Swiss cheese, mayo). The Angus Wrap uses 1/2 of a regular Angus burger pattie.[26]
The McVeggie burger – a vegetarian burger on a whole wheat bun. Available in India, Slovenia, Greece and Portugal. A special version is available in Cheung Chau branch in Hong Kong during the Cheung Chau Bun Festival.
Veggie Clubhouse - first sandwich with a quinoa pattie.[27]
The McBean burger – a vegan burger where the patties are made with cannellini beans, kidney beans, onions, carrots and green peppers. Available in Sweden.
The menu in India has numerous unique items, all of which contain neither beef nor pork:

Chicken Maharaja Mac – like a Big Mac, but with two pressed spiced chicken patties instead of beef, served with a mustard sauce
Paneer Salsa Wrap (paneer is an Indian unsalted white cheese).
Chicken Mexican Wrap
McAloo Tikki – breaded potato patty with onion and tomato on a plain bun ("aloo" is "potato"). Available at select stores in India, Greece, and Walt Disney World in Lake Buena Vista, FL.
Chicken McGrill


Georgie Pie — a meat pie sold in New Zealand and Australia. The brand was also the name of a New Zealand-based chain that was bought by McDonald's New Zealand in 1996, and was revived as part of the McDonald's menu in 2013 due to popular demand.
Garlic fries were tested in the San Francisco Bay Area in 2016, using locally grown garlic from Gilroy, California[28]
Veggie Crunch Burger - The vegetarian burger was launched in the Singapore market on 6 September 2016. Its patty is made with a mixture of unto 7 types of vegetables, including green peas, carrots, tomatoes, capsicum, beans etc. However, its dressings contain garlic and eggs. The patty is fried in the same oil used for frying apple pies so it does not come in contact with meat products. The burger has received good reviews
Mc Aaloo Tikki Burger - In India, since Mc Donalds does not serve beef or pork in any of its products, it has created a few vegetarian options to suit the 85% vegetarian populace. Thus, the cheese burger is recast as a vegetarian option and served as an "Aaloo tikki burger" containing a potato patties and a slice of cheese.[29]
Veg Maharaja Mac - A vegetarian version of the Big Mac sold at Mc Donalds India, containing patties made of potato, corn, peas and cheese. Maharaja is a Hindi word meaning emperor. [30]

Breakfast[edit]
McDonald's introduced breakfast foods in 1972.




An Egg McMuffin



McDonald's primary breakfast offerings are breakfast sandwiches.

McMuffins are McDonald's signature breakfast sandwich, first sold at select restaurants in 1972 as the Egg McMuffin, five years before breakfast officially went into effect, it consists of a fried egg, back bacon (called Canadian bacon in the U.S.) and American cheese on a toasted English muffin. Sausage or bacon McMuffins are also available. A Chicken McMuffin is offered in South Africa.
McDonald's offers a line of breakfast sandwiches: bagels, biscuits, and a special type of maple flavored pancake called McGriddles. All can all be ordered with sausage, ham or bacon, with an optional choice of cheese and/or egg. Regional meat offerings include fried chicken, steak, spam and bacon. They are an internationally famous sandwich and as such have been well received, though Morgan Spurlock criticized the item near the end of his 2004 documentary Super-Size Me with the following quote: "McDonald's joined right in, sponsoring events and creating premium salads to show how health conscious they had become. At the same time however, they masterminded one of their fattest sandwiches to date: the McGriddle. A pancake-wrapped cake press that won my heart in Texas, but can pack as much fat as a Big Mac, and contains more sugar than a pack of McDonaldland cookies." His doctor also informed him that consumption of the item could be a risk factor for high blood cholesterol.
The McDonald's Hamdesal is a new breakfast sandwich which consist of a slice of ham on pandesal, which can be ordered plain, with eggs or with cheese. This sandwich is currently available in the Philippines.[31]


There are two styles of breakfast burritos available. The Sausage Burrito, introduced in 1991, is made with a flour tortilla, sausage, American cheese, eggs, onions, and peppers. The new McSkillet wrap burrito adds potatoes and salsa. Chicken and steak variants of the McSkillet exists in limited areas.
Additional breakfast items include hotcakes; several breakfast platters with eggs, hash browns and meats or breads. Biscuits and gravy are available in parts of the southern U.S.
Oatmeal was added to the breakfast menu on December 27, 2010, after it test marketed well in Washington, D.C. and some parts of Maryland. In the test market areas, oatmeal started selling in late January 2010.
A few American regional variations exist, in Hawaii and Guam McDonald's offers local breakfast items such as Spam, Portuguese sausage and fresh cut pineapple. And in New Mexico there is a breakfast burrito on the menu, with both bacon and sausage varieties, called the Green Chile Sunrise Burrito.
In the UK, McDonald's offers the standard McMuffin, Double McMuffin, bacon rolls, toasted bagels with jam or Philadelphia cream cheese, hash browns, Oatso Simple porridge, bagels with egg, cheese and bacon or sausage, and a range of wraps, that consist of sausage & egg, bacon & egg, or cheese & egg, or you have the option to have the full wrap called the Breakfast Wrap which consists of sausage, bacon, egg, hash browns (potato rösti), cheese and an optional sauce, either ketchup or brown sauce.
Since October 2015, McDonald's offers breakfast all day in Australia, Canada, Mexico (Tijuana, Baja California Norte only), New Zealand & USA. However, the full breakfast menu won’t be available at all hours. Only certain items, such as sausage burritos or hot cakes will be available beyond the usual 10:30 A.M. cutoff weekdays or 11 weekends.[32] All US restaurants expanded its all-day menu to add Biscuit sandwiches, Egg McMuffins & McGriddles in late September 2016.
Since February 2016, breakfast bowls were added to the breakfast menu, available in some US restaurants.

Beverages[edit]
Beverages purveyed by McDonald's varies regionally.

McDonald's primary soft drink supplier is the Coca-Cola Company, except in restaurants which fall under an overall contract with PepsiCo. For example: the Detroit Metropolitan Wayne County Airport, Luxor Las Vegas, Staples Center and the University of Maryland, College Park Student Union. In the U.S. and Canada, Cadbury-Schweppes supplies Dr Pepper.
S&D Coffee, Gavina and Kraft supply McDonald's Premium Roast Coffee for McDonald's U.S. restaurants besides the New England area. Green Mountain Coffee Roasters supplies Newman's Own branded coffee for McDonald's New England area restaurants.
Hot and iced tea (supplied by S&D Coffee in the U.S.), hot chocolate, various juices and other regional beverages are available in various markets.
The McCafe is an umbrella term for lattes, espresso, iced coffee, hot chocolate, mocha, malts, smoothies, and other drinks that are sold in several markets worldwide.
Shakes are available in all U.S. McDonald's and many global markets[33] Permanent flavors are vanilla, strawberry, and chocolate; regional or seasonal flavors include Caramel, Coffee, Cherry, Eggnog (during Christmas), Banana, Pumpkin (during Halloween), Strawberry Banana, Lime, Mango Raspberry, Honeycomb, Arctic Orange (sherbet), Orange Cream, Shamrock Shake (a green, spearmint Limited Time Offer shake for St. Patrick's Day), Chocolate Mint, and Rolo (available only in Canada and the UK. This flavoured milkshake was also available in the Republic of Ireland during the summer of 2007 for a limited time only). In June 1975, 13 months before the celebration of the United States Bicentennial, McDonald's introduced a blueberry-flavored shake in order to advertise "Red, White, and Blueberry Shakes" for independence day celebrations, and lasting through August of that year. The run was repeated in summer 1976, but not since. In the U.S., starting in February 2010, "Triple Thick Shakes" were rebranded under the McCafe name, along with the addition of whipped cream, and a cherry on top, and a significant reduction in size. In Canada, McDonald's milkshakes are still sold under the "Triple Thick" name.[34]
Beer of different brands (varies locally) is available at McDonald's in Belgium, Czech Republic, France, Germany, Italy, Lithuania, Portugal, Romania, Slovenia, and Spain.
Irn-Bru is available in some Scottish McDonald's locations.
Inca Kola is available in every Peruvian McDonald's location.
McDonald's also offers 1% milk, 1% chocolate milk, and apple juice, most often as replacements for fountain drinks in Happy Meals.
As of 2009[update], McDonald's Australia and New Zealand began offering Frozen Coke as part of their menu. It is available in small, medium or large sizes or a 'Mini Value-Pick' size.New flavors are introduced occasionally, such as Frozen Fanta Grape and Frozen Sprite. Over summer, flavoured syrups have become available, for use with Frozen Sprite. In the 2013/2014 summer, Bubblegum, Pineapple, Wild Grape, Fairy Floss and Apple were available.

Desserts[edit]




McDonald's apple pies



A soft serve ice cream product is available in several forms, including sundaes, cones (either vanilla or chocolate), and as the primary ingredient in the McFlurry. As with many other formulations of soft serve, cellulose gum is utilized as an extender and thickener.[35]

The McFlurry is a soft-serve ice cream dessert that has pieces of candy or cookies mixed into it.[36] The McFlurry was first integrated in the menu at a Bathurst, New Brunswick, Canada franchisee in 1995. The flavors are crushed Oreo, M&M's Minis, Reese's, or Mars, Incorporated candy bars like Snickers, Twix, Galaxy, etc., Cadbury's candy bars like Twirl, Wispa, Creme Egg, Crunchie etc., Nestlé candy bars like Yorkie, Smarties, Drifter, Rolo, Butterfinger, etc. McDonald's also does limited time only flavors, e.g. for Shrek the Third it released the Ogre-Load flavor. In Australia, they had a special range for their 40 years in Australia celebration. The flavors were double choc fudge, bubblegum squash, strawberry crumble and caramel cookie. Also in Malaysia a unique flavor called FuseofmyLife is offered to customers. The mixing blade for the dessert is actually a specially designed spoon with a hollow handle that attaches to the mixer spindle (except in Australia[37] and New Zealand where the staff mix it by hand). The blade is used once then given to the customer to use as an eating utensil. Originally test marketed in Hawaii in 1997,[38] it is now available in most of its markets.[39]


McDonaldland cookies are traditionally available and are similar to animal crackers, except the shapes of the cookies are of Ronald McDonald, Grimace, Birdie the Early Bird, and the Hamburglar, among other McDonaldland characters. In fact, they are manufactured by Keebler, and are just re-branded animal crackers (Elfin Crackers or Our Family Animal Crackers). In Australia, the McDonaldland Cookies are manufactured by Arnotts and are sold in McDonald's restaurants for $1.
Freshly baked cookies manufactured by Nestlé are available in some markets. Among the cookies offered are sugar, oatmeal raisin, or chocolate chip.
McDonald's pies are actually turnovers, and come in apple or, in some markets, cherry and other seasonal or limited-time-only flavors such as pumpkin pie, smores, sweet potato and Holiday pie, and in Hawaii, taro, haupia, banana, and (introduced in 2017) guava. In Canada, in the 1970s, blueberry was standard, as was the Great Fruit Pie. During some seasonal promotions, cherry and strawberry are an available pie flavor in Canada; also, newly featured is Blueberry Maple and Peach. In Thailand, Hawaii and Guam, taro pie is featured occasionally. Other regional flavors include coconut (also known as haupia in Hawaii) and tuna (all in Guam as limited-time), and corn in Japan. In Mexico, Guatemala, Panama, and Costa Rica, cheese pie is available all year round. In Cyprus, strawberry and custard pies are available all year round also, along with the apple one. In Brazil, banana pies are available. In Russia apricot pies are also available.





McDonald's Cinnamon Melts



Cinnamon Melts – a popular cinnamon roll type item with cream cheese icing.
Brownie melts – Similar to the Cinnamon melt, only chocolate flavored with fudge and cream cheese icing on top. Available only in selected markets.
The Fruit and Yogurt Parfait – a mix of frozen strawberries and blueberries and vanilla yogurt, sold with a package of granola topping.
Smoothies are available in some locations in either Blueberry Pomegranate, Strawberry Banana, or Mango-Pineapple flavors. In the test market areas, smoothies were introduced in 2009.
In 2012, McDonald's Australia and New Zealand began offering a 'McFloat'. It contained Frozen Coke and/or the promotional frozen beverage, a small amount of soft serve and a lot of ice. In Australia, the Frozen Coke 'McSpider' has also been purveyed, which consists of frozen Coke and soft serve ice cream.[40]

Former items[edit]





This section possibly contains original research. Please improve it by verifying the claims made and adding inline citations. Statements consisting only of original research should be removed. (October 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Angus burgers – Four types: the Angus Deluxe (American cheese, sliced red onions and sliced red tomatoes, iceberg lettuce, pickles, mustard, and mayonnaise); Angus Mushroom and Swiss (sautéed mushrooms, Swiss cheese and mayonnaise); Angus Bacon and Cheese (bacon, American cheese, sliced red onions, mustard, ketchup and pickles); and the Angus Chipotle BBQ Bacon (chipotle sauce, red onions, pickles, bacon, and American cheese). In Australia and New Zealand, there are three Angus burgers sold; The Grand Angus (which is a clone of the Angus Deluxe) and the Mighty Angus (which resembles the Angus Cheese and Bacon, but with no pickles and mayonnaise and onion relish replacing the ketchup and mustard). For a limited time only, the Angus The Third, similar to the Grand Angus, but with no mustard and made with a tomato chilli relish and only one slice of cheese. Also, for a limited time, Angus the Great was sold, a clone of the Angus Mushroom and Swiss. In October 2012, an Angus version of the Cheddar Bacon Onion (CBO) Sandwich was made available,[41] consisting of a horseradish-like sauce, grilled caramelized onions, bacon and cheddar cheese. In May 2013, McDonald's stopped selling the Angus burger.[42][43] Two years later the third-pound burgers returned (known as Sirloin Third Pound Burgers), but as a limited-time promotion. It comes in three sandwiches: Bacon & Cheese, Lettuce & Tomato, and Steakhouse. The Angus Burgers are still available in Canada and some markets in Latin America.
Arch Deluxe – An attempt to produce a "luxury" hamburger, promoted by a high-profile advertising campaign (introduced in 1996), today considered one of the most expensive failures in McDonald's history. It featured a honey mustard-type sauce,[44] quarter-pound beef patty on a potato roll, with leaf lettuce, tomato, red onion, and cheese; peppered bacon was also offered for an extra charge. The Arch Deluxe was accompanied with three other burgers at the time, the Crispy Chicken Deluxe (later renamed the Crispy Chicken Sandwich), the Grilled Chicken Deluxe (later renamed the Chicken McGrill), and the Fish Filet Deluxe (since discontinued along with the Arch Deluxe itself).
Barry Burger – A double bacon cheeseburger with onions and barbecue sauce named after football player Barry Sanders, sold mainly in his home state of Kansas.[citation needed]
BBQ Chicken – A toasted bun featuring shredded chicken and zesty BBQ sauce.[citation needed]
Beef Wennington – A burger solely offered in the Chicago area in 1998–99, named after former Chicago Bulls player Bill Wennington. It featured a single patty topped with cheese, onions, barbecue sauce and a slice of Canadian bacon.[45]
Chopped Beefsteak Sandwich – test-marketed in various markets across the United States in 1980 as part of a McDonald's "Dinner Menu", offered only after 4:00 p.m. The Chopped Beefsteak Sandwich was essentially an elongated hamburger of a different quality served on a short French roll, similar to a sub or hero roll. Packets of steak sauce (A1 sauce in Chicago) were available for the sandwich.[citation needed]
Big 33 or McJordan Special – A quarter pound burger with bacon and special barbecue sauce named after basketball players Larry Bird and Michael Jordan, respectively.
Boselli Burger – Jacksonville, Florida, franchises also featured the Triple-Double Burger in 1998, named after Jacksonville Jaguars tackle Tony Boselli.[46]
Bratwurst – For a few years during the 1990s and in 2002, Johnsonville brand bratwurst on a hot dog-like roll was sold in some US markets for a limited time each fall. A few locations in Eastern Wisconsin, which is the major market for the Sheboygan County-based company still offer bratwursts on a seasonal basis.
Buffalo Ranch McChicken (also the Hot 'n Spicy).
Catfish Sandwich – A sandwich made with a catfish patty, lettuce, and tangy sauce and sold on a McRib-style bun. Sold at McDonald's locations in Kentucky, Tennessee, Alabama, Arkansas, and Mississippi for a brief period in March 1991.[47]
Cheddar Melt – a quarter pound beef patty smothered with grilled onions (sauteed in butter and teriyaki), then topped with cheddar cheese sauce on a light rye bun, offered in 1988, the 1990s, 2004, and 2007. They are still available in Brazil under the name Cheddar McMelt.[48]
Chicken Fajitas – The Chicken Fajitas consisted of a small soft tortilla, a grilled vegetable medley, and grilled chicken. The fajita was in the traditional thin wrapping paper. These are still available in British Columbia, Saskatchewan, Nova Scotia, Newfoundland (at certain locations), Alberta (at select locations in the Edmonton area) and at all non-Walmart McDonald's in Ontario.[citation needed]
Chicken McBites – popcorn chicken breast with "home-style seasoning" offered through April 20, 2012 in 3-ounce, 5-ounce and 10-ounce versions. Dipping sauces include Ranch, Sweet n' Sour, Tangy BBQ, Chipotle BBQ, Honey Mustard,[49] Spicy Buffalo, and Sweet Chili.[citation needed]
Chicken Parmesan Sandwich – A chicken breast covered in bread crumbs and topped with tomato sauce and mozzarella on a toasted bun.[citation needed]
Chicken Platter – A grilled chicken burger served with lettuce and tomato on the HotCakes tray.[citation needed]





Chicken Selects



Chicken Selects – McDonald's version of chicken strips. They were introduced in early 1998 and offered again as a permanent part of the menu in late October 2003. They are sold in 3-, 5-, or 10-piece sizes and include choices of spicy buffalo, creamy ranch, honey mustard, and chipotle barbecue dipping sauces; sauce selections in the UK are smokey barbecue, sour cream and sweet chili sauce.[50] Sold in the United States, Canada, Israel and the UK. Available in Australia under the name Chicken McDippers.[51] McDonald's stopped selling Chicken Selects in the United States in February 2013,[52][53] but they returned to the menu on February 25, 2015 for a limited engagement and were renamed Chicken Select Tenders. Chicken Selects are still sold at McDonald's restaurants in the United Kingdom and Ireland.
Corn Dog McNuggets – For a brief time in 1991, McDonald's locations in Richmond, Virginia offered a multi-pack of mini corn dogs without sticks. They were offered again in 2002 as the "Mini Corn Dogs".
Cuban Sandwich – Roast pork and ham sandwich on a long roll with Swiss cheese, mustard, and pickles. One of several Hispanic-inspired menu items briefly sold at South Florida units in 2001.[54]
Derby Burger – A single patty hamburger with American Cheese, lettuce, tomato, ketchup, mayonnaise, and bacon. It was a regional item sold in the mid-1990s in Louisville, Kentucky only during the spring to coincide with the Kentucky Derby. Discontinued in the early 2000s (decade).
Diet Coke Float and Coke Float – In 1991 McDonald's ran a limited time promotion selling a float made with Diet Coke or Coke with low-fat soft-serve frozen yogurt in a collectable Coke bell glass. It sold for $1.59 with 40 cents from every sale donated to Ronald McDonald Children's Charities.[55]
Dinner Menu – After testing pasta in the South in 1989, McDonald's began testing a pasta-based menu at 40 units across Rochester, New York, in September 1991, including lasagna, fettuccine alfredo, and spaghetti with meatballs. In the early 1990s, a new Dinner Menu was tested for 6–12 months at two locations in New York and Tennessee. It consisted of the pizza mentioned below but also included lasagna, spaghetti, fettuccine alfredo, and roasted chicken as entrees. The side dishes included mashed potatoes with gravy and a vegetable medley.[citation needed] For the dessert, it included a brownie à la mode or peanut butter pie.[25][56]
Eggs Benedict McMuffin – Canadian style bacon, egg, special breakfast sauce, and American cheese on a toasted English muffin.
Fried Roast Beef Sandwich – In 1968 this product was launched targeting adults. Sold with a package of McDonald's BBQ sauce on the side using the slogan "McDonald's is my kind of place"; it was inspired by a franchisee's version of an Arby's sandwich. The sandwich failed due to the costs of getting roast beef slicers; no matter how many sandwiches they could sell, it would never turn a profit.[1]
Grilled Cheese Happy Meal – There was a Happy Meal introduced during the early part of the 2000s (decade) that contained a grilled cheese sandwich. It was discontinued the same summer it was released but is still sold in some Canadian markets.
Grilled Chicken Flatbread Sandwich – Grilled chicken strips, lettuce, tomato, grilled onions, pepper jack cheese, and a creamy herb sauce served wrapped in a heated flatbread. Served briefly in June 2002, and again from December 27, 2002 until February 9, 2003.
Happy Meal Breakfast – The Happy Meal Breakfast was a meal that was smaller than the traditional breakfast that lasted from the 1980s to 2009. It was discontinued by advice of the Nutrition department at the Corporate Headquarters in Oak Brook, Illinois, but is still sold in Hong Kong.
Home Fried Chicken – During 1968 McDonald's sold deep fried chicken (similar to KFC). Targeting parents who could not choose between burgers and chicken, McDonald's delivered home fried chicken served with distinct packaging. The white chicken meat was sold in light gold packages (for adults) and catering to the children – the dark chicken meat was sold in dark foil packages. TV slogan was... "so everyone can have just what they want ... McDonald's Strives to Reunite the American Family" (note the US was struggling with domestic civil unrest due to the combined social upheaval of the Vietnam War and the civil rights movement)
Hot dogs – In 1937, hot dogs were the first things sold in McDonald's. Then in CEO Ray Kroc's 1977 autobiography, he prohibited the company from selling hot dogs, regardless of potential demand, as he regarded them as unhygienic; however, hot dogs were reintroduced in 1995 at some Midwestern located stores (at the option of the franchise-holder) as a summer item. UK stores sold hot dogs during 2002 on the McChoice menu (later PoundSaver) and as a seasonal menu item in the summer of 1999. Also, at least one American restaurant offered Oscar Mayer hot dogs at some time, notably in Bethel Park, Pennsylvania, and McDonald's locations at Toronto Metro Zoo and SkyDome in Toronto offered hot dogs until 1999. Starting in the year 2007, a few McDonald's began selling Hot Dogs in central Pennsylvania due to popular demand from local sports fans. They can be found at 12 locations as of 2011[update]. In Tokyo locations, hot dogs were available from 1990 until 2004, and have been reintroduced one more for 2009, dubbed the "McHot Dog". McDonald's locations in Chile also sold hot dogs for a brief period in 2004.
Hot Ham 'N Cheese – Sliced ham, American cheese, lettuce and tomato on a triple split, sesame seed bun with a choice of mayonnaise or honey mustard sauce.
Hulaburger – A Ray Kroc invention, it featured a slice of pineapple instead of meat. Originally intended for Roman Catholics who are not allowed to eat meat on Fridays during Lent. It was test-marketed in 1963 alongside the Filet-O-Fish sandwich, with the highest seller being added to the menu full-time (the Filet-O-Fish, a creation of an Ohio franchiser, won).[57]
Italian Doubles – A limited summer promotion in Canada in 1989. Two regular patties on a hamburger bun with 1 slice of mozzarella cheese & marinara sauce.
Kiwiburger – In the 1990s, New Zealand sold a burger reflecting their national icon the Kiwi. It was a single beef patty hamburger, with egg (identical to the egg in McMuffins), cheese, lettuce, tomato, beetroot, onions, ketchup ("tomato sauce") and American mustard. It came in distinctive packaging with 46 classic kiwi quotes, kiwiana, and kiwi sporting icons, which were also used in promotions of the burger.[58] Complications with the cooking of the egg and the use of certain ingredients, that no other McDonald's burger had, saw the Kiwiburger discontinued. It has occasionally returned to the menu for limited times since.
McChicken LT (McDonald's Chicken Lettuce and Tomato) was the chicken version of the McDLT featuring the same two-sided container as the McDLT except the packaging was yellow instead of white. It was introduced about the same time as the McDLT in the mid-1980s. The chicken was a grilled, unbreaded chicken breast placed on the heel of the bun in one of the compartments. The toppings were shredded lettuce, tomato and mayonnaise assembled on the top half of the bun in the other compartment. Cheese was an optional addition for an extra US$0.10. The grilled chicken breast was then basted with a brushing of melted butter. As with the McDLT, the consumer would finalize preparation of the sandwich by combining the hot and cool sides just prior to eating. The McChicken LT was discontinued in the Fall of 1987.
McDLT – The McDLT (McDonald's Lettuce and Tomato) was sold in a novel form of packaging.[59] The McDLT was introduced in the fall of 1984 as the Lettuce and Tomato Special. The meat and bottom half of the bun were prepared separately from the lettuce, tomato, American cheese, pickles, sauces, and top half of the bun. Both were then packaged into a specially designed two-sided styrofoam container. The consumer was then expected to finalize preparation of the sandwich by combining the hot and cool sides just prior to eating. It was discontinued between December 1990 and January 1991 due to environmental concerns with styrofoam.
McDonald's Own Chocolaty Chip Cookie - mini-chocolate chip cookies which came in a small rectangular box
McDonaldland Cookies - cookies shaped like the McDonald's characters. originally came in a white box with a handle and later smaller rectangular boxes with cartoon images
McDouble Cruncher – two patties with a slice of cheese, chipotle BBQ sauce and crispy onions
McGrilled Chicken Classic – A sandwich featuring a grilled chicken breast portion that was introduced in September 1993 and was produced before being replaced by the Grilled Chicken Deluxe/Chicken McGrill.
McLean Deluxe – A lower-calorie Quarter Pounder-type sandwich (introduced in 1991) containing 90% lean beef and 10% water with carrageenan, a seaweed extract, to hold the water and beef together.[60] This item was otherwise identical to the Big N' Tasty and the McDLT.
McRye – a hamburger on rye bread sold in Finland in late 1990s.
McSoup – Campbell's Soup sold at McDonald's available in Broccoli & Cheese and Chicken Noodle. (This product is only sold in winter months in select markets)
McStuffin – a pocket sandwich available with various fillings. McStuffins were sold for a short time in 1993 and were discontinued that same year due to not having a lot of popularity.
McWraps – Inspired in the Mexican burritos Chicken Caesar, Chicken and Garden Salad wraps served toasted in a thick herb flat bread. McWraps is still offered in some parts of Europe(for instance in Denmark and Croatia).
Mighty Wings – deep-fried spicy chicken wings. McDonald's began selling these in 1990 as an optional item and stopped selling them in 2003. They are still sold in China, Spain, Samoa, and the U.S. Virgin Island of St Croix as of March 6, 2010. Also sold as McWings in Pakistan, they were discontinued for a while but relaunched. On September 9, 2013, McDonald's brought the Mighty Wings back to its menus in all of its American restaurants as a limited time offer available until November 2013. The Mighty Wings did not sell well its second time around in the U.S. The main problems cited with the Mighty Wings was the price point versus the amount purchased. Compared with competitors, the pricing was determined to be too high, but McDonald's stated that due to overruns in purchasing, the company could not sell them at lower prices without losing money. On February 24, 2014, McDonald's decided to put them back on the menu for a limited engagement to liquidate the remaining inventory at a lower price in all U.S. locations.
Mozzarella sticks - 3 fried cheesesticks with marinara sauce on the side. Was on the Dollar Menu & More menu from December 2015 to March 2016.
Onion Nuggets – introduced at the same time as the Beefsteak Sandwich as the side item for the Dinner Menu. Onion Nuggets were chopped onions shaped into small solid pieces, dipped in batter and deep-fried.
Philly Cheesesteak – Slices of steak and Swiss cheese with onions. Served until August 2007 at Australian and American McDonald's. This sandwich is still available in Canada, made with cheese spread and green bell pepper.
Pizza / McPizza – McDonald's has also attempted pizza at various times,[25][56] with an apple-pie–like McPizza and more conventional McDonald's Pizza. A line of personal-sized pizzas was first seen in the late 1970s in test-market stores near interstate highways around Milwaukee and Madison. In Canada (c. 1992–99), the pizza originally began as a family-sized pizza that was brought out to the table by an employee and placed on a raised rack in the centre of the table. Later it was scaled down to a personal-sized pizza. However, variations have found their way into some international markets such as India (the pie-like "Pizza McPuff"). McDonald's also test marketed a 14-inch, round, traditional-style pizza in Evansville, Indiana, and nearby Owensboro, Kentucky, in 1989.[61] By 1991, the McDonald's test markets for pizza had grown to over 500 McDonald's locations before the pizza test was placed on hold.[62] Pizza was discontinued in most restaurants by 2000. The reason for eliminating the pizza from the menu was that the time to cook a pizza took 11 minutes, and McDonald's wanted to keep its reputation for fast service. As of March 2017, two McDonald's locations, one in Pomeroy, Ohio, and the other in Spencer, West Virginia still offer the family style McPizza.[63]
Roast Beef on a Roll – A roast beef sandwich made just like the Arby's roast beef sandwich. Sold in 1968.
Root Beer Float – A combination of vanilla soft-serve ice cream and root beer.
Salad Shakers – A salad of lettuce, croutons and other vegetable in a tall dome shaped plastic container. Salad Shakers were introduced in the spring of 2000 and are still available in the Netherlands.
Son of Mac – Also known as the Mini Mac or Baby Mac, a version with only one patty and no centre roll piece. It sold as a Baby Mac in New Zealand, was sold in Australia, now discontinued. Served by some stores in the United States under the moniker "Mac Jr". It's still sold in places in Canada, known as the "kid's mac".
Southern Fried-Chicken – Was sold in Australia up until mid-1986. This was available as a 2 piece (or 3 piece) pack including French Fries. This was replaced by the current McNugget range, as the nuggets became cheaper to produce and safer to cook.
Spanish Omelet Bagel – existed during the mid to late 2000s, discontinued.
Spicy Chicken – Chicken breast with spicy breading introduced in 2006. (Still offered in some U.S. markets.)
Strawberry Shortcake McFlurry – Vanilla soft-serve ice cream with strawberry topping and Vanilla Cookie pieces mixed together.
Superhero Burger – Featuring 3 patties, yellow American cheese, white American cheese, tomato, lettuce, onion, and mayo all laid out on an elongated bun like a hero sandwich. The burger was released as part of the "Taste of the Month" series that McDonald's ran in 1995 where they had a new burger every month. The Superhero Burger was also tied into the promo campaign for the film Batman Forever and the ads for it featured Batman and the Batmobile.
Torta – In 2000, the company released their own version of tortas, a Mexican sandwich, in southern California on a trial basis.
Triple Ripple – A mixed cone with strawberry, vanilla, and chocolate, topped with a plastic top.[1]
Triple-Double Burger – A burger featuring 3 beef patties and 2 slices of cheese, served on the same 6 inch (15.2 cm) sesame seed roll as the McRib. It was originally marketed as the Superhero Burger to promote the release of the 1995 film Batman Forever. It was also sold under the names of local sports stars in at least five markets in the 1990s and in the Cleveland area in the early 2000s (decade):

The Hockey Hero burger, in Canada.
The Jason Kidd Burger – Downtown Phoenix, Arizona, franchises had a Limited Time Offer burger named after NBA player Jason Kidd, while he played for the Phoenix Suns.
The Michael Dean Perry burger, for the then Cleveland Browns star.
The Rory Sparrow burger was sold in the Sacramento area. It was named after the Sacramento Kings star.
Thome Triple was sold in the Cleveland, Ohio area. It was named after Cleveland Indians first baseman Jim Thome


Upside Down Iced Tea – A new cup tested at select locations in the southeast United States in the late 1990s. It featured an ice compartment at top of the cup to keep the beverage cold. It was quickly discontinued.
Szechuan Sauce, created to promote the Disney film, Mulan (1998 film). It was thrust back into the cultural spotlight after being referenced numerous times in the Season 3 premiere of Adult Swim animated comedy Rick and Morty.

See also[edit]


Food portal



List of Burger King products

References[edit]


^ a b c Love, John F. (1995). McDonald's: Behind the Arches (Revised ed.). New York: Bantam Books. ISBN 0553347594. 
^ a b Buiso, Gary (2012-12-02). "More burning questions about NYC answered | New York Post". Nypost.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Menu: Our Full McDonald's Food Menu | McDonald's". Mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Artz, Matthew (December 31, 2009). "Fremont's 'hamburger king' dead at 81". Oakland Tribune. Retrieved January 12, 2010. 
^ "ACCUEIL". McDonald's France. 
^ AP Newswire (July 2, 1997). "McDonald's hoping new burger a Whopper stopper". The Augusta Chronicle. Archived from the original on October 30, 2007. Retrieved October 23, 2007. 
^ a b c d Wong, Venessa (March 12, 2014). "After Year of Flubs, McDonald's Loses Its Taste for Novelty". Bloomberg Business. Retrieved March 3, 2015. 
^ "麥當勞 意想不到嘅嚐試". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Product Nutrition". McDonalds.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's 1955 Burger Review - Burger Lad - Burger Reviews". Burger Lad. 2013-10-16. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ John Reynolds (2011-08-25). "McDonald's cooks up 'no-nonsense' 1955 burger for the UK". Marketingmagazine.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Little, Katie (November 24, 2015). "McDonald's breakfast burger mashup debuts". CNBC. NBC News. Retrieved November 25, 2015. 
^ a b "McDonalds - Artisan Grilled Chicken". News.mcdonalds.com. 2015-04-06. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ http://www.aef.com/images/diversity/burrell/snack_wrap_case_study.pdf
^ "North County News - San Diego Union Tribune". Nctimes.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ McDonald's Australia reveals new Chicken Menu[permanent dead link]
^ "MacPride.Net - Kaufman Enterprises - Promotions". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Chicken Maharaja Mac". www.mcdonaldsindia.net. Mc Donalds India. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ "Chicken McBites". Mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Tasty Basket 30 pezzi | McDonald's Italia" (in (in Italian)). M.mcdonalds.it. 2012-12-03. Retrieved 2017-07-13. CS1 maint: Unrecognized language (link)
^ Clark, Paul (February 20, 2007). "No fish story: Sandwich saved his McDonald's". USA Today. Retrieved April 17, 2009. 
^ Eisenberg, Daniel (September 25, 2002). "Can McDonald's Shape Up?". Time. 
^ Velasco, Schuyler (August 21, 2013). "10 fast foods that have disappeared: McLobster". Christian Science Monitor. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 
^ Spencer Ross. "A connoisseur's guide to downtown poutine - a & e". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ a b c Velasco, Schuyler (August 21, 2013). "10 fast foods that have disappeared: 4. McSpaghetti". Christian Science Monitor. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 
^ "Forays of a Finance Foodie: McDonald's Steps Up Their Style: New Product Preview Day! [New York]". Financefoodie.com. 2010-06-08. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ [1][dead link]
^ "McDonalds Testing Garlic Fries". Time.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Harding, Luke (28 December 2000). "Give me a Big Mac - but hold the beef". The Guardian. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ "Maharaja Mac - Veg and Chicken options". www.mcdonaldsindia.net. Mc Donalds India. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ mcdonalds.com.ph. "Ourfood". McDonalds. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's: You Deserve A Hash Brown All Day". NPR.org. 2015-09-02. Retrieved 2016-03-07. 
^ snopes (March 7, 2016). "McDonald's Shakes : snopes.com". snopes. Retrieved March 7, 2016. 
^ "Triple Thick MilkshakeÂ®". McDonalds.ca. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's USA – USA Core Menu Items by Ingredients". McDonald's Corporation. Archived from the original on April 26, 2009. Retrieved May 29, 2009. 
^ "McDonald's Nutrition Calculator | McDonald's" (PDF). Nutrition.mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Why don't you mix the mcflurry anymore like you used to?". December 10, 2013. Retrieved June 21, 2014. 
^ "A McFlurry of tasty ideas". Honolulu Star-Bulletin. August 13, 1998. Retrieved June 12, 2012. 
^ "Steve McFlurry USPTO trademark information". United States Patent and Trademark Office. December 19, 1997. Retrieved September 1, 2006. 
^ "Large Frozen McSpider Coke | Drinks Menu | McDonald's AU". Mcdonalds.com.au. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McShakeup". The Huffington Post. March 1, 2013. 
^ Candice Choi, AP. "McDonald's cuts Angus burgers from menu". Usatoday.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "R.I.P. McDonald's Angus Third Pounder". The Huffington Post. May 9, 2013. Retrieved October 18, 2013. 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Elliott Harris. "Beefing up his role – Bulls' Wennington latest burger celebrity". Chicago Sun-Times. March 8, 1998. Sports, 14.
^ Times, The (1998-08-16). "Jaguars: Advertising war games have definitely begun 08/16/98". Jacksonville.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "The Press-Courier". McDonalds testing catfish. 14 February 1991. Retrieved 13 July 2017. 
^ "McD brings back Cheddar Melt | Nation's Restaurant News | Find Articles at BNET". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Unveils Chicken McBites". Los Angeles Times. January 25, 2012. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's USA - USA Core Menu Items by Ingredients". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's chicken snack a hit". Azcentral.com. 2007-01-30. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ February 28, 2013 (2013-02-28). "Bid Adieu To Chicken Selects As McDonald’s Makes Room On The Menu For Newer Items – Consumerist". Consumerist.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's dropping Fruit & Walnut Salad, Chicken Selects in U.S.". Reuters. 
^ "Mcdonald's Tries Adding Hispanic Fare To Fast Food - tribunedigital-orlandosentinel". Articles.orlandosentinel.com. 2001-10-28. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Floats offered at McDonalds". Beaver County Times. 22 May 1991. p. 14. Retrieved 12 July 2017. 
^ a b McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Kiwi Burger television advertisement – New Zealand Film Archive". Archived from the original on July 14, 2011. Retrieved October 15, 2010. 
^ US 4653685 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Chaudhry, Rajan (July 31, 1989). "McPizza? McDonald's widens pizza test: pizza operators gird for assault". Nation's Restaurant News. Findarticles.com. Retrieved November 13, 2009. 
^ Prewitt, Milford (October 7, 1991). "McDonald's developing separate dinner menu, puts pizza test on hold". Nation's Restaurant News. Findarticles.com. Archived from the original on May 1, 2009. Retrieved February 28, 2009. 
^ Pemberton, Becky (2016-03-10). "Ohio and West Virginia McDonald's are still selling MCPIZZA | Daily Mail Online". Dailymail.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 


External links[edit]

 Media related to McDonald's products at Wikimedia Commons
"McPizza! – Tasting the elusive McDonald's Pizza". Science Tortilla (YouTube). March 14, 2015.  – Video on a taste test of a McPizza from one of the two locations still selling it.
McGrath, Jane. "5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items". HowStuffWorks, Inc. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 







v
t
e


McDonald's






History
Advertising

ad programs


Countries with franchises
Legal cases
Product list
International availability





People



Richard and Maurice McDonald
Ray Kroc
Joan Kroc
Ralph Alvarez
Charlie Bell
Al Bernardin
Jim Cantalupo
George Cohon
Dan Coudreaut
Steve Easterbrook
Janice L. Fields
Den Fujita
Don Gorske
Jack M. Greenberg
Eikō Harada
June Martino
Herb Peterson
Michael R. Quinlan
Ed Rensi
Willard Scott
James A. Skinner
Donald N. Smith
Harry J. Sonneborn
Don Thompson
Fred L. Turner





Company



Hamburger University
Leaps and Bounds
McBarge
McCafé
McDonald's #1 Store Museum
McDonald's (Will Rogers Turnpike)
Oldest McDonald's restaurant
Rock N Roll McDonald's
Ronald McDonald House Charities





Products




Beef



Big Mac
Big N' Tasty
Deluxe line
Kiwiburger
Quarter Pounder (McRoyal)





Chicken



Chicken McNuggets
McChicken





Other



Deli Choices
Filet-O-Fish
Georgie Pie
Happy Meal
McArabia
McGriddles
McMuffin
McRib
Premium line
Shamrock Shake





Former



Arch Deluxe
McAfrika








Advertising




Campaigns



Changeables
Global Gladiators
Golden Arches
Mac Tonight
McDonaldland
McDonald's Monopoly
McDonald's Treasure Land Adventure
M.C. Kids
McKids
Ronald McDonald
Teenie Beanies
The Wacky Adventures of Ronald McDonald





Sponsorships



Kyle Larson (NASCAR)
Jamie McMurray (NASCAR)
Graham Rahal (IndyCar Series)
McDonald's All-American Game
McDonald's Championship
McDonald's Championship (golf)
McDonald's Cycle Center
McDonald's Gospelfest
McDonald's Olympic Swim Stadium





Related



Burger wars
Donald Land
Fast food advertising
Mac and Me (1988 film)
McDonald's sign (Pine Bluff, Arkansas)
Supersize








Branches



Canada
Israel
New Zealand





Criticism



Fast Food Nation (film)
McDonaldization
McDonald's Videogame
McJob
McRefugee
McLibel
Maxime, McDuff & McDo
Super Size Me

Don't Eat This Book







Legal cases



Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants
Magee v. McDonald's
McDonald's Restaurants v. Morris & Steel
Sid & Marty Krofft Television Productions Inc. v. McDonald's Corp.





Related



McDelivery
Big Mac Index
Bill Elliott
McDonald's Young Entertainers
McWords
San Ysidro McDonald's massacre
"Seriously McDonalds"
Sydney River McDonald's murders
Taiwan McDonald's bombings
Urban legends
Boom, Like That
The Founder (2016 film)










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=List_of_McDonald%27s_products&oldid=791067944"					
Categories: Lists of brand name foodsMcDonald's foodsHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksArticles with Italian-language external linksCS1 maint: Unrecognized languageArticles with dead external links from July 2017Wikipedia articles needing copy edit from July 2017All articles needing copy editArticles that may contain original research from July 2017All articles that may contain original researchArticles needing additional references from July 2017All articles needing additional referencesWikipedia articles needing page number citations from July 2017All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2014Articles with unsourced statements from December 2014Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2009All articles containing potentially dated statementsArticles that may contain original research from October 2012Articles with unsourced statements from July 2017Articles with unsourced statements from March 2009Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2011 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


日本語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 23:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









List of McDonald's products - Wikipedia





















 






List of McDonald's products

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search







This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article may require copy editing for grammar, style, cohesion, tone, or spelling. You can assist by editing it. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article possibly contains original research. Please improve it by verifying the claims made and adding inline citations. Statements consisting only of original research should be removed. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)





Contents


1 Beef burgers
2 Chicken
3 Fish
4 Pork
5 Other products
6 Breakfast
7 Beverages
8 Desserts
9 Former items
10 See also
11 References
12 External links



Beef burgers[edit]
All beef patties are seasoned, consisting primarily of salt and minced pepper.

Hamburger (formerly known as the Junior Burger in some countries) and cheeseburger – a 1.6-ounce (45 g) ground beef patty, with 0.125 ounces (3.5 g) ketchup, mustard, a single dill pickle, re-hydrated onions, on a toasted bun. At one time early in McDonald's history, the pickle was removed from the sandwich.[1][page needed] In all or much of the New York City area, it is served without mustard.[2] Also sold as a double or triple, adding an extra pickle slice for each beef patty added. A triple burger and a bacon double cheeseburger are optional items and are not always available in all restaurants or markets. In Australia the average serving size for a Cheeseburger is 110 grams. The hamburger and the cheeseburger are the company's original grilled burger offerings, having been served as part of the 1948 menu.[3]
Big Mac – a signature product that was introduced in 1968. Two 1.6-ounce (45 g) (approx. uncooked weight) ground beef patties, special Big Mac sauce (similar to Thousand Island dressing), lettuce, cheese, pickles, and diced onions on a sesame seed bun, with an additional middle bun (called a "club layer") separating the beef patties. The Grand Mac, its bigger-size counterpart, was added in December 2016.
Quarter Pounder – a 4.25-ounce (120.5 g) (originally 4-ounce (113.4 g) until 2015) (approx. uncooked weight) ground beef patty with ketchup, mustard, chopped onions, pickle, and two slices of cheese. As with burgers made with the smaller 1.6-ounce patties, the Quarter Pounder is prepared without mustard in all or a large portion of the New York City region.[2] It was invented by Al Bernardin, a franchise owner and former McDonald's Vice President of product development, at his McDonald's in Fremont, California, in 1971.[4] In some markets unfamiliar with Imperial measurements (such as France), it is known as a Royal Cheese, or variants thereof, such as McRoyale.[5] It is also available as the Double Quarter Pounder with Cheese, which includes another patty of the same proportions. In 2013, McDonald's expanded the sandwich into a line with three additional variants to make them smaller versions of the Angus Burgers, which was renamed the Taste-Crafted Burgers in 2016 in West Coast markets and later expanded to other U.S. markets in January 2017, the latest added being the Signature Sriracha, which was replaced by Sweet Barbecue Bacon by May.
Big N' Tasty/Big Tasty – the Big N' Tasty, introduced in 1997, was a 4-ounce (113 g) beef patty with ketchup, cheese, mayonnaise with a grill diced onions, pickles, leaf lettuce, and tomatoes. It was devised to resemble Burger King's Whopper sandwich.[6] It is also known as the Big Xtra in Slovenia and most of Canada; the McXtra in Quebec, Canada; the McFeast Deluxe in Australia; the Big Tasty (without the 'N') in Brazil, Bulgaria, France, Germany, Italy (without ketchup), Ireland, The Netherlands, Poland, Russia, Sweden, the United Kingdom; the Quarter Pounder Deluxe in South Africa; and the McNifica (a play on Spanish magnifica, 'wonderful') in Mexico and Latin America. The Big Tasty configuration is somewhat different, consisting of a third-pound (150 g) beef patty, sesame seed bun, lettuce, tomatoes, onions, Emmental cheese, and Big Tasty sauce (which has a smoke flavor). The Big Tasty Bacon variant also contains strips of bacon. This variant was sold in the US until 2009; it is now sold internationally only.
Double Cheeseburger – two 1.6-ounce (45 g) ground beef patties, with 0.125 ounces (3.5 g) ketchup, mustard (except in all or much of the New York City area), two slices of dill pickle, re-hydrated onions, and two pieces of cheese on a toasted bun. The double cheeseburger was offered as a promotional item in the 1950s, and was added to the regular menu in 1965. An official variant is offered in the U.S. state of New Mexico, called the Green Chile Double Cheeseburger, topped with roasted green New Mexico chile peppers.





The McDouble



McDouble – similar to a Double Cheeseburger, but with just one slice of cheese. Reintroduced as a permanent dollar-menu item in December 2008 – had been a short-term product in 1997, advertised with "Eddie the Echo." The original McDouble did not have cheese and was garnished with lettuce and tomatoes rather than the pickles and onions on the 2008 version.
Bacon McDouble – a sandwich that is similar to the McDouble, but it has two pieces of Applewood smoked bacon added to it. This sandwich was added to the U.S. "Dollar Menu & More" in November 2013.[7]
Daily Double – similar to the McDouble, however the toppings are slightly different. The Daily Double is made with a little bit of lettuce, tomato, slivered onions, and mayonnaise. It also has only one slice of cheese, like the McDouble, rather than the two slices that are on the double cheeseburger. In 2011 and 2012, the item was test marketed in various regional locations.
McFeast – a hamburger with lettuce, tomato, pickles and mayonnaise, in most markets from April 1977. The name McFeast lives on though in Scandinavian countries, where a McFeast has been served since the mid-1980s in Sweden and was later introduced to the rest of the Nordic countries; the McFeast in Sweden contains a quarter pounder patty, lettuce, modified mayonnaise with lemon juice, onion and tomato. In the rest of the countries, the McFeast also contains ketchup, but not in Sweden. The same burger was sold under the name Mega Feast in New Zealand for several years during the 1990s, but has since been discontinued. The McFeast Deluxe was sold in Australia until the late 1990s and contained: mustard, ketchup, large onions, McFeast Deluxe sauce, lettuce, a tomato slice, regular cheese and a quarter pounder patty served in a Quarter Pounder/McChicken Bun. It returned to the Australian menu in 2009 and in August 2011 using the same ingredients, however contained McChicken sauce in place of the original 'McFeast Deluxe' sauce. The McFeast has been sold in Germany and Austria since the 1990s, named "Hamburger Royal TS" (T for "Tomate" (tomato); S for "Salat", the German word for lettuce). It contains a quarter-pounder patty, lettuce, tomatoes, onions, cheese and the McChicken mayo sauce. For special occasions, it is sold in Germany as a "McFresh" which also contains cucumber slices.
Ranger Burger and Super Ranger[8]
1955 Burger – this burger inspired by 1955 (according to the official site) contains beef, bacon, lettuce, tomatoes, caramelized onions, ketchup and McDonald's smoky sauce (barbecue). Named after the year the fast-food chain was incorporated by Ray Kroc, the burger is popular in European markets, including Spain, Italy and Germany. It was released in 2011 and re-released in 2013 in the UK.[9][10][11]
BBQ Ranch Burger[7] – a very sweet hamburger containing one all-beef patty, cheddar cheese, BBQ Ranch sauce, and tortilla strips,[citation needed] added to the U.S. "Dollar Menu and More" in November 2013.[7]
McSpicy Burger – a very spicy chicken breast, lettuce, cheese and hot sauce-laced mayo, served as the McSpicy Shake Shake Meal, complete with fries.[citation needed]
Bacon Clubhouse – a burger consisting of one quarter-pound patty, lettuce, tomato, and special sauce served on an "artisan roll". This core item was added to the menu the week of March 12, 2014.[7]
Jalapeño Double – similar to the McDouble, except it contains two types of jalapeño peppers, pickled and crispy, plus a slice of white cheddar cheese between the two burger patties, and buttermilk ranch sauce, added to the Dollar Menu in April 2014.[citation needed]
Triple Cheeseburger – similar to the Double Cheeseburger, except it contains three burger patties, with a slice of American cheese between each patty, plus ketchup, mustard (except in all or much of the New York City area), onion, and dill pickle. This was added to the Dollar Menu in December 2014.[citation needed]
ChiTown Classic – a regional offering that was one of two finalist out of 100s of entries in the "Chicagoland Burger Build Off" competition to develop a breakfast-dinner mashup burger in 2015. The burger was placed on the menu on Chicago area locations starting Mid-November until December 27, 2015. The burger adds breakfast's Canadian bacon and applewood smoked bacon.[12]

Chicken[edit]

McChicken – a mildly spicy chicken sandwich, offered in a spicier variant as the Hot n' Spicy in some markets. Made from 100% ground white meat chicken, mayonnaise, and shredded lettuce, on a toasted bun. A full-size version was introduced in 1980, later removed, and reintroduced in 1988. In some markets it is not spicy, and in others a cajun spiced version is also offered. It remains one of the biggest sellers, just behind the Big Mac. The larger sandwich was replaced with the Crispy Chicken Deluxe in 1996, and brought back in 1998 in the current smaller size, and marketed as the Cajun (Style) McChicken. In Australia the average serving size for a McChicken is 185 grams. In Canada, it remains a full-size sandwich, while the US' smaller version is sold as the Junior Chicken.
Premium chicken sandwiches – the Premium line was added in July 2005. The Classic was a rebranding of the Crispy Chicken and Chicken McGrill sandwiches, themselves rebrandings of the Deluxe chicken line in 1998, with mayonnaise, leaf lettuce, and a tomato slice. The Ranch BLT contains ranch sauce instead of mayonnaise and includes bacon. The Club is similar to the Classic with added bacon and a piece of Swiss cheese. In Latin America, the Classic and the Club are sold, but a honey mustard chicken sandwich is sold in place of the BLT. All were served on a whole-grain roll, with either a grilled or crispy chicken breast. On March 20, 2014, the Premium Crispy Chicken Bacon Clubhouse and Premium Grilled Chicken Bacon Clubhouse were added to the lineup (alongside the beef variant of the sandwich) on a new artisan roll. In February 2015 the Ranch BLT and Club were removed from the menu. The standard crispy offering was renamed to the Premium Crispy Chicken Deluxe (later the Buttermilk Crispy Chicken Sandwich in August 2015) and it was upgraded to sit on the artisan roll introduced with the Bacon Clubhouse. In the first week of April 2015, McDonald's replaced the Premium Grilled Chicken sandwich with the Artisan Grilled Chicken.[13] Like the Taste-Crafted Burgers, the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches were introduced in 2016, in West Coast markets, and in all other U.S. markets in January 2017. Signature Sriracha was the latest to be added in June 2016; it was replaced by Sweet Barbecue Bacon in May 2017.
Southern Style Chicken Sandwich – a southern-style fried chicken breast filet, on a steamed bun, dressed with butter and two pickles. Nearly identical to a Chick-fil-A chicken sandwich. Discontinued at many franchises in early 2015.
Snack Wrap – a wrap made with white meat chicken breast (crispy or grilled), lettuce, shredded Cheddar cheese and Monterey Jack cheese, and a sauce (Spicy Buffalo, Ranch, Honey mustard, Chipotle barbecue, or Salsa Roja, the breakfast sauce on the McSkillet), wrapped in a soft flour tortilla. It was launched on July 1, 2006. Chipotle BBQ is the most recent flavor. Available in the United States, The Netherlands, United Kingdom, Canada, Australia and Brazil.[14][15][16] There is also a Mac Snack Wrap which features the fixings of the Big Mac, but without the bun and wrapped in a tortilla shell, and uses one half of a piece of quarter meat.[17]
Premium Chicken Wrap – in 2013, McDonald's in the U.S. introduced a larger wrap that it has had success with in parts of Europe. It comes in three variants: Sweet Chili Chicken, Chicken & Bacon, and Chicken & Ranch.
Chicken Fajita – chicken, cheese, red and green bell peppers, and diced onions in a flour tortilla. Comes with Picante sauce packets on request, which are available in mild and spicy. Available in only a few markets.
Chicken McNuggets – introduced in 1983 as a replacement for the McChicken, these are small chicken chunks served with dipping sauces of barbecue, sweet n' sour, honey, and hot mustard. Available in 4, 6, 10 (originally 9), or 20 pieces. Up until 2003, they were a combination of white and dark meat, now they are made with only white meat. In 2011, five new dipping sauces were introduced and added to the lineup: sweet chili, honey mustard, spicy buffalo, and creamy ranch. With the addition of these new dipping sauces, McDonald's began phasing out the Hot Mustard sauce, and by February 2014, it had been discontinued in most U.S. markets.
McArabia – there are two versions of the McArabia: grilled chicken, and grilled kofta (beef with spices). Both are served with lettuce, tomatoes, onions, and garlic mayonnaise in addition to two small patties of grilled chicken or kofta, all wrapped in an Arabian-style pita bread. McDonald's has performed a rather large advertising campaign for the McArabia since its introduction in 2003, largely focusing on the Arabian-themed nature of the sandwich, and it appears to have worked well. The McArabia has been very well received throughout Southwestern Eurasia. The same product is also introduced in Malaysia with "Chicken Foldover" as an alternative name.
(Premium) Crispy Chicken Deluxe – a sandwich made with a crispy chicken breast, tomato slices, and lettuce. It was first sold in 1996 and had its name changed to the Crispy Chicken Sandwich in 1998. It was replaced with a Premium chicken sandwich in July 2005, and was then brought back in 2015 under the original name with the added prefix Premium. The only other change is that it is now sold on an artisan roll instead of the potato bun that characterized the original Crispy Chicken Deluxe. By August 2015 it was renamed the Buttermilk Crispy Chicken Sandwich. This is part of the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches introduced in 2016.
Grilled Chicken Deluxe – this sandwich has the same ingredients as the Premium Crispy Chicken Deluxe, but has a marinated, grilled chicken breast at its center. It has been sold under various names since 1996, when it was introduced as the Grilled Chicken Deluxe, and had its name changed to the Chicken McGrill in 1998. It was replaced with a Premium chicken sandwich in July 2005, which was in turned replaced with the Artisan Grilled Chicken in 2015. It is also available in India, and has at times been available in Canada.
Artisan Grilled Chicken – in the first week of April 2015, McDonald's introduced a redesigned grilled chicken patty, replacing the Premium Grilled Chicken sandwich, which contains "less ingredients", and those that remain can be found in consumer's "own kitchens".[13] The sandwich sits atop the artisan roll first seen with the Bacon Clubhouse, and is the last of the full-size chicken sandwiches to switch to this bun. It is part of the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches menu introduced in 2016.
Maharaja Mac- In India, McDonald's does not serve beef in its burgers. Instead, it has created a large Big Lac style chicken burger called the "Chicken Maharaja Mac", with a chicken patty and vegetable garnishings.[18]
Chicken McBites - "poppable" pieces of chicken that are made from chicken breasts.[19]
Tasty Basket - Available only in Italy, the Tasty Basket consists of 30 pieces of chicken, which includes the Chicken McNugget, Chicken McBites, and chicken wings.[20]

Fish[edit]

Filet-O-Fish – a fish fillet with tartar sauce and a half slice of cheese, on a steamed bun. It was introduced in Cincinnati in 1962 when it was discovered that many Roman Catholics chose to eat at Frisch's Big Boy on Fridays and during Lent, as it offered a fish sandwich so they could go without meat.[21] This was replaced with the Fish Filet Deluxe in 1996 and brought back in 1998 albeit a larger fish patty. During the Easter period in Hawaii and Guam, a Double Filet-O-Fish meal is offered with two pieces of fish on one bun.
Fish McBites – similar to the Chicken McBites, these are small pieces of flaky whitefish dipped in batter and fried until golden brown, and served with tartar sauce for dipping. They were taken off the menu in the end of March 2013.

Pork[edit]




The McRib



McRib – a sandwich featuring boneless pork with barbecue sauce, slivered onions, and pickles. First seen in test-market stores near interstate highways around Milwaukee and Madison, Wisconsin, in the late 1970s (along with early tests of personal-sized pizza) the McRib was more widely released in 1981, but pulled from menu in 1985. It is released annually in the U.S. as a limited time promotion in some locations. Since 2005, the McRib has reappeared in late October staying on the menu for 10 weeks. The McRib was released in Canada as a promotional sandwich from March 18 through April 8, 2008 and again in summer 2011. The McRib is presently on some European menus (e.g., Germany, where it has been standard since or even before 1990).[22]

Other products[edit]

McDonald's introduced salads to its menu in 1985. Since that time, they have restructured their salad lines several times. In the U.S., the newest salad offerings are part of the McDonald's Premium line. First introduced in 2003, the Premium Salads all are a mixture of iceberg lettuce and a special lettuce assortment (romaine, etc.), with cherry tomatoes and different toppings to differentiate them; additionally all salads can be topped with warm grilled or crispy chicken. All of its salads are part of McDonald's move towards creating a healthier image.
The Happy Meal/Mighty Kids Meal – McDonald's capitalized on Burger Chef's Funmeal concept of a children's meal when it introduced the first Happy Meal in 1979. The meal includes an entrée, a side dish, a beverage and a toy. Happy meals include a tiny order fries (far less than a small order of fries) and fruit, optional sauce for fries, and a choice of nuggets, a single patty burger, or wraps. An additional product, Pasta Zoo was discontinued in 2008. The Mighty Kids Meal contains more food than the Happy Meal, less than the adult meal, and still contains a toy.


The toy is usually a product tie-in with a movie or popular television show.

In mid-February 2012, McDonald's has introduced the Happy Meals/Mighty Kids Meals so that they now come with either a Hamburger, Cheeseburger, 4 piece Chicken McNuggets, McDouble or the 6-piece Chicken McNuggets with a smaller version of the small fry for the Happy Meal or a small fry for a Mighty Kids Meal. All kids meals now come with fries, apple slices and a toy. The apple slices have been reduced from 8 slices to only 4 and no longer come with caramel dipping sauce.



In the U.S., the traditional entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, or a four piece order of Chicken McNuggets (or a double cheeseburger or six piece order of Chicken McNuggets for the Mighty Kids Meals); the sides are fries and sliced apples. Milk, chocolate milk, boxed apple juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks. Some U.S. franchises also include a small cellophane package of McDonaldland cookies. In 2009, McDonald's offered a Happy Meal Wrap, but it was discontinued later that year due to low sales.
In the UK, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four Chicken McNuggets, three fish fingers, or a Chicken wrap; the sides are a choice of fries, carrot sticks or sliced apples and grapes. Organic milk, Tropicana orange juice, apple and blackcurrant Robinsons Fruit Shoot, milkshakes, water and the traditional soda are the choices for drinks.
In New Zealand and Australia, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, three or six piece order of Chicken McNuggets, five or ten Chicken McBites or a crispy or seared Chicken Snack Wrap; the sides are a choice of french fries or apple slices. Thickshake, boxed chocolate milk, apple or water pop tops, orange juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks.
In Canada, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four piece Chicken McNuggets, grilled cheese, or chicken snack wraps; the sides are a choice of fries or apple slices with caramel dip. Milk, chocolate milk, boxed apple juice, orange juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks.







Chicken McNuggets





In Belgium, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four piece order of Chicken McNuggets, McFish or a Ketchup Wrap.




McDonald's line of larger chicken sandwiches (The Classic, Club, Ranch BLT and Southwest), which are part of the McDonald's Premium line were introduced in July 2005 as part of McDonald's menu revamp.

The Classic includes Lettuce, Tomato, and Mayo.
The Club also has Lettuce Tomato and Mayo, but also comes with Swiss cheese and bacon.
The Ranch BLT comes with a creamy ranch sauce, bacon, lettuce and tomato.
The Grand Chicken Burger: Large chicken patty with two layers of cheese, tomatoes, lettuce and sauce
The Southwest comes with a southwest style ancho chili sauce, lettuce, tomato, and spicy pepperjack cheese.


All four can be chosen with either crispy or grilled chicken and all are served on a wheat ciabatta bun.
Deli Choices is a line of deli-style sandwiches that are sold internationally. It is targeted at health-conscious customers and is available in Australia, Austria, Canada, Germany, and Britain, and is testing in the United States. It is similar to the McHero sandwich, sold in parts of the United States.
McDonald's sells French fries as its primary side order. Until 1967, McFries were never frozen, but were cut on-site from potatoes and immediately fried. In some international locations, they sell potato wedges, a type of French fry that is thick cut and wedge shaped and fried onion pieces that are similar to onion rings.





McDonald's McFries.



Many McDonald's locations in discount stores offer freshly popped popcorn and soft pretzels in addition to the normal menu. In PA stores, only soft pretzels are offered as a side option.
Denali Mac – a burger that looks like the Big Mac, but it uses two quarter pound beef patties. Sold only in Alaska, named after Denali (formerly Mount McKinley).





McLobster in 2015.



McLobster – a lobster roll served in a hot dog bun with "lobster sauce" and shredded lettuce, introduced in 1993. The product had supply issues and was not very profitable nationally. Recently, it was only available in Atlantic Canada and New England region in the summer, when lobster is inexpensive.[23] In the 2010s, McDonald's had short term reintroductions in Canada and Italy.
McCrab – in response to the McLobster, McDonald's along the eastern coast of the Delmarva Peninsula (comprising parts of Delaware, Maryland and Virginia) developed the McCrab sandwich, a McDonald's version of the Chesapeake crabcake.
Poutine – originally only to be found in French-Canadian communities, poutine is now found on the menu at most McDonald's' across Canada.[24]
Brownie Melt – similar to a Cinnamelt, it is a rich chocolate brownie with chocolate and white frosting.
McRice – Most McDonald's restaurants in countries in Asia serve the product due to popular demand. It is normal rice.
McSpaghetti – was launched in the late 1970s as a part of McD's dinner menu which included a number of Italian dishes. The dish is still available international where in Philippines it is popular and is generally served with McNuggets.[25]
Angus Snack Wrap – wrap with Angus burger introduced to the U.S. market on August 9, 2010. Angus Snack wraps are available three ways: Deluxe (lettuce, tomato, onions, pickles, American cheese, mayo, mustard); Bacon & Cheese (onions, pickles, American cheese, ketchup, mustard, a strip of bacon); and Mushroom & Swiss (sauteed mushrooms, Swiss cheese, mayo). The Angus Wrap uses 1/2 of a regular Angus burger pattie.[26]
The McVeggie burger – a vegetarian burger on a whole wheat bun. Available in India, Slovenia, Greece and Portugal. A special version is available in Cheung Chau branch in Hong Kong during the Cheung Chau Bun Festival.
Veggie Clubhouse - first sandwich with a quinoa pattie.[27]
The McBean burger – a vegan burger where the patties are made with cannellini beans, kidney beans, onions, carrots and green peppers. Available in Sweden.
The menu in India has numerous unique items, all of which contain neither beef nor pork:

Chicken Maharaja Mac – like a Big Mac, but with two pressed spiced chicken patties instead of beef, served with a mustard sauce
Paneer Salsa Wrap (paneer is an Indian unsalted white cheese).
Chicken Mexican Wrap
McAloo Tikki – breaded potato patty with onion and tomato on a plain bun ("aloo" is "potato"). Available at select stores in India, Greece, and Walt Disney World in Lake Buena Vista, FL.
Chicken McGrill


Georgie Pie — a meat pie sold in New Zealand and Australia. The brand was also the name of a New Zealand-based chain that was bought by McDonald's New Zealand in 1996, and was revived as part of the McDonald's menu in 2013 due to popular demand.
Garlic fries were tested in the San Francisco Bay Area in 2016, using locally grown garlic from Gilroy, California[28]
Veggie Crunch Burger - The vegetarian burger was launched in the Singapore market on 6 September 2016. Its patty is made with a mixture of unto 7 types of vegetables, including green peas, carrots, tomatoes, capsicum, beans etc. However, its dressings contain garlic and eggs. The patty is fried in the same oil used for frying apple pies so it does not come in contact with meat products. The burger has received good reviews
Mc Aaloo Tikki Burger - In India, since Mc Donalds does not serve beef or pork in any of its products, it has created a few vegetarian options to suit the 85% vegetarian populace. Thus, the cheese burger is recast as a vegetarian option and served as an "Aaloo tikki burger" containing a potato patties and a slice of cheese.[29]
Veg Maharaja Mac - A vegetarian version of the Big Mac sold at Mc Donalds India, containing patties made of potato, corn, peas and cheese. Maharaja is a Hindi word meaning emperor. [30]

Breakfast[edit]
McDonald's introduced breakfast foods in 1972.




An Egg McMuffin



McDonald's primary breakfast offerings are breakfast sandwiches.

McMuffins are McDonald's signature breakfast sandwich, first sold at select restaurants in 1972 as the Egg McMuffin, five years before breakfast officially went into effect, it consists of a fried egg, back bacon (called Canadian bacon in the U.S.) and American cheese on a toasted English muffin. Sausage or bacon McMuffins are also available. A Chicken McMuffin is offered in South Africa.
McDonald's offers a line of breakfast sandwiches: bagels, biscuits, and a special type of maple flavored pancake called McGriddles. All can all be ordered with sausage, ham or bacon, with an optional choice of cheese and/or egg. Regional meat offerings include fried chicken, steak, spam and bacon. They are an internationally famous sandwich and as such have been well received, though Morgan Spurlock criticized the item near the end of his 2004 documentary Super-Size Me with the following quote: "McDonald's joined right in, sponsoring events and creating premium salads to show how health conscious they had become. At the same time however, they masterminded one of their fattest sandwiches to date: the McGriddle. A pancake-wrapped cake press that won my heart in Texas, but can pack as much fat as a Big Mac, and contains more sugar than a pack of McDonaldland cookies." His doctor also informed him that consumption of the item could be a risk factor for high blood cholesterol.
The McDonald's Hamdesal is a new breakfast sandwich which consist of a slice of ham on pandesal, which can be ordered plain, with eggs or with cheese. This sandwich is currently available in the Philippines.[31]


There are two styles of breakfast burritos available. The Sausage Burrito, introduced in 1991, is made with a flour tortilla, sausage, American cheese, eggs, onions, and peppers. The new McSkillet wrap burrito adds potatoes and salsa. Chicken and steak variants of the McSkillet exists in limited areas.
Additional breakfast items include hotcakes; several breakfast platters with eggs, hash browns and meats or breads. Biscuits and gravy are available in parts of the southern U.S.
Oatmeal was added to the breakfast menu on December 27, 2010, after it test marketed well in Washington, D.C. and some parts of Maryland. In the test market areas, oatmeal started selling in late January 2010.
A few American regional variations exist, in Hawaii and Guam McDonald's offers local breakfast items such as Spam, Portuguese sausage and fresh cut pineapple. And in New Mexico there is a breakfast burrito on the menu, with both bacon and sausage varieties, called the Green Chile Sunrise Burrito.
In the UK, McDonald's offers the standard McMuffin, Double McMuffin, bacon rolls, toasted bagels with jam or Philadelphia cream cheese, hash browns, Oatso Simple porridge, bagels with egg, cheese and bacon or sausage, and a range of wraps, that consist of sausage & egg, bacon & egg, or cheese & egg, or you have the option to have the full wrap called the Breakfast Wrap which consists of sausage, bacon, egg, hash browns (potato rösti), cheese and an optional sauce, either ketchup or brown sauce.
Since October 2015, McDonald's offers breakfast all day in Australia, Canada, Mexico (Tijuana, Baja California Norte only), New Zealand & USA. However, the full breakfast menu won’t be available at all hours. Only certain items, such as sausage burritos or hot cakes will be available beyond the usual 10:30 A.M. cutoff weekdays or 11 weekends.[32] All US restaurants expanded its all-day menu to add Biscuit sandwiches, Egg McMuffins & McGriddles in late September 2016.
Since February 2016, breakfast bowls were added to the breakfast menu, available in some US restaurants.

Beverages[edit]
Beverages purveyed by McDonald's varies regionally.

McDonald's primary soft drink supplier is the Coca-Cola Company, except in restaurants which fall under an overall contract with PepsiCo. For example: the Detroit Metropolitan Wayne County Airport, Luxor Las Vegas, Staples Center and the University of Maryland, College Park Student Union. In the U.S. and Canada, Cadbury-Schweppes supplies Dr Pepper.
S&D Coffee, Gavina and Kraft supply McDonald's Premium Roast Coffee for McDonald's U.S. restaurants besides the New England area. Green Mountain Coffee Roasters supplies Newman's Own branded coffee for McDonald's New England area restaurants.
Hot and iced tea (supplied by S&D Coffee in the U.S.), hot chocolate, various juices and other regional beverages are available in various markets.
The McCafe is an umbrella term for lattes, espresso, iced coffee, hot chocolate, mocha, malts, smoothies, and other drinks that are sold in several markets worldwide.
Shakes are available in all U.S. McDonald's and many global markets[33] Permanent flavors are vanilla, strawberry, and chocolate; regional or seasonal flavors include Caramel, Coffee, Cherry, Eggnog (during Christmas), Banana, Pumpkin (during Halloween), Strawberry Banana, Lime, Mango Raspberry, Honeycomb, Arctic Orange (sherbet), Orange Cream, Shamrock Shake (a green, spearmint Limited Time Offer shake for St. Patrick's Day), Chocolate Mint, and Rolo (available only in Canada and the UK. This flavoured milkshake was also available in the Republic of Ireland during the summer of 2007 for a limited time only). In June 1975, 13 months before the celebration of the United States Bicentennial, McDonald's introduced a blueberry-flavored shake in order to advertise "Red, White, and Blueberry Shakes" for independence day celebrations, and lasting through August of that year. The run was repeated in summer 1976, but not since. In the U.S., starting in February 2010, "Triple Thick Shakes" were rebranded under the McCafe name, along with the addition of whipped cream, and a cherry on top, and a significant reduction in size. In Canada, McDonald's milkshakes are still sold under the "Triple Thick" name.[34]
Beer of different brands (varies locally) is available at McDonald's in Belgium, Czech Republic, France, Germany, Italy, Lithuania, Portugal, Romania, Slovenia, and Spain.
Irn-Bru is available in some Scottish McDonald's locations.
Inca Kola is available in every Peruvian McDonald's location.
McDonald's also offers 1% milk, 1% chocolate milk, and apple juice, most often as replacements for fountain drinks in Happy Meals.
As of 2009[update], McDonald's Australia and New Zealand began offering Frozen Coke as part of their menu. It is available in small, medium or large sizes or a 'Mini Value-Pick' size.New flavors are introduced occasionally, such as Frozen Fanta Grape and Frozen Sprite. Over summer, flavoured syrups have become available, for use with Frozen Sprite. In the 2013/2014 summer, Bubblegum, Pineapple, Wild Grape, Fairy Floss and Apple were available.

Desserts[edit]




McDonald's apple pies



A soft serve ice cream product is available in several forms, including sundaes, cones (either vanilla or chocolate), and as the primary ingredient in the McFlurry. As with many other formulations of soft serve, cellulose gum is utilized as an extender and thickener.[35]

The McFlurry is a soft-serve ice cream dessert that has pieces of candy or cookies mixed into it.[36] The McFlurry was first integrated in the menu at a Bathurst, New Brunswick, Canada franchisee in 1995. The flavors are crushed Oreo, M&M's Minis, Reese's, or Mars, Incorporated candy bars like Snickers, Twix, Galaxy, etc., Cadbury's candy bars like Twirl, Wispa, Creme Egg, Crunchie etc., Nestlé candy bars like Yorkie, Smarties, Drifter, Rolo, Butterfinger, etc. McDonald's also does limited time only flavors, e.g. for Shrek the Third it released the Ogre-Load flavor. In Australia, they had a special range for their 40 years in Australia celebration. The flavors were double choc fudge, bubblegum squash, strawberry crumble and caramel cookie. Also in Malaysia a unique flavor called FuseofmyLife is offered to customers. The mixing blade for the dessert is actually a specially designed spoon with a hollow handle that attaches to the mixer spindle (except in Australia[37] and New Zealand where the staff mix it by hand). The blade is used once then given to the customer to use as an eating utensil. Originally test marketed in Hawaii in 1997,[38] it is now available in most of its markets.[39]


McDonaldland cookies are traditionally available and are similar to animal crackers, except the shapes of the cookies are of Ronald McDonald, Grimace, Birdie the Early Bird, and the Hamburglar, among other McDonaldland characters. In fact, they are manufactured by Keebler, and are just re-branded animal crackers (Elfin Crackers or Our Family Animal Crackers). In Australia, the McDonaldland Cookies are manufactured by Arnotts and are sold in McDonald's restaurants for $1.
Freshly baked cookies manufactured by Nestlé are available in some markets. Among the cookies offered are sugar, oatmeal raisin, or chocolate chip.
McDonald's pies are actually turnovers, and come in apple or, in some markets, cherry and other seasonal or limited-time-only flavors such as pumpkin pie, smores, sweet potato and Holiday pie, and in Hawaii, taro, haupia, banana, and (introduced in 2017) guava. In Canada, in the 1970s, blueberry was standard, as was the Great Fruit Pie. During some seasonal promotions, cherry and strawberry are an available pie flavor in Canada; also, newly featured is Blueberry Maple and Peach. In Thailand, Hawaii and Guam, taro pie is featured occasionally. Other regional flavors include coconut (also known as haupia in Hawaii) and tuna (all in Guam as limited-time), and corn in Japan. In Mexico, Guatemala, Panama, and Costa Rica, cheese pie is available all year round. In Cyprus, strawberry and custard pies are available all year round also, along with the apple one. In Brazil, banana pies are available. In Russia apricot pies are also available.





McDonald's Cinnamon Melts



Cinnamon Melts – a popular cinnamon roll type item with cream cheese icing.
Brownie melts – Similar to the Cinnamon melt, only chocolate flavored with fudge and cream cheese icing on top. Available only in selected markets.
The Fruit and Yogurt Parfait – a mix of frozen strawberries and blueberries and vanilla yogurt, sold with a package of granola topping.
Smoothies are available in some locations in either Blueberry Pomegranate, Strawberry Banana, or Mango-Pineapple flavors. In the test market areas, smoothies were introduced in 2009.
In 2012, McDonald's Australia and New Zealand began offering a 'McFloat'. It contained Frozen Coke and/or the promotional frozen beverage, a small amount of soft serve and a lot of ice. In Australia, the Frozen Coke 'McSpider' has also been purveyed, which consists of frozen Coke and soft serve ice cream.[40]

Former items[edit]





This section possibly contains original research. Please improve it by verifying the claims made and adding inline citations. Statements consisting only of original research should be removed. (October 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Angus burgers – Four types: the Angus Deluxe (American cheese, sliced red onions and sliced red tomatoes, iceberg lettuce, pickles, mustard, and mayonnaise); Angus Mushroom and Swiss (sautéed mushrooms, Swiss cheese and mayonnaise); Angus Bacon and Cheese (bacon, American cheese, sliced red onions, mustard, ketchup and pickles); and the Angus Chipotle BBQ Bacon (chipotle sauce, red onions, pickles, bacon, and American cheese). In Australia and New Zealand, there are three Angus burgers sold; The Grand Angus (which is a clone of the Angus Deluxe) and the Mighty Angus (which resembles the Angus Cheese and Bacon, but with no pickles and mayonnaise and onion relish replacing the ketchup and mustard). For a limited time only, the Angus The Third, similar to the Grand Angus, but with no mustard and made with a tomato chilli relish and only one slice of cheese. Also, for a limited time, Angus the Great was sold, a clone of the Angus Mushroom and Swiss. In October 2012, an Angus version of the Cheddar Bacon Onion (CBO) Sandwich was made available,[41] consisting of a horseradish-like sauce, grilled caramelized onions, bacon and cheddar cheese. In May 2013, McDonald's stopped selling the Angus burger.[42][43] Two years later the third-pound burgers returned (known as Sirloin Third Pound Burgers), but as a limited-time promotion. It comes in three sandwiches: Bacon & Cheese, Lettuce & Tomato, and Steakhouse. The Angus Burgers are still available in Canada and some markets in Latin America.
Arch Deluxe – An attempt to produce a "luxury" hamburger, promoted by a high-profile advertising campaign (introduced in 1996), today considered one of the most expensive failures in McDonald's history. It featured a honey mustard-type sauce,[44] quarter-pound beef patty on a potato roll, with leaf lettuce, tomato, red onion, and cheese; peppered bacon was also offered for an extra charge. The Arch Deluxe was accompanied with three other burgers at the time, the Crispy Chicken Deluxe (later renamed the Crispy Chicken Sandwich), the Grilled Chicken Deluxe (later renamed the Chicken McGrill), and the Fish Filet Deluxe (since discontinued along with the Arch Deluxe itself).
Barry Burger – A double bacon cheeseburger with onions and barbecue sauce named after football player Barry Sanders, sold mainly in his home state of Kansas.[citation needed]
BBQ Chicken – A toasted bun featuring shredded chicken and zesty BBQ sauce.[citation needed]
Beef Wennington – A burger solely offered in the Chicago area in 1998–99, named after former Chicago Bulls player Bill Wennington. It featured a single patty topped with cheese, onions, barbecue sauce and a slice of Canadian bacon.[45]
Chopped Beefsteak Sandwich – test-marketed in various markets across the United States in 1980 as part of a McDonald's "Dinner Menu", offered only after 4:00 p.m. The Chopped Beefsteak Sandwich was essentially an elongated hamburger of a different quality served on a short French roll, similar to a sub or hero roll. Packets of steak sauce (A1 sauce in Chicago) were available for the sandwich.[citation needed]
Big 33 or McJordan Special – A quarter pound burger with bacon and special barbecue sauce named after basketball players Larry Bird and Michael Jordan, respectively.
Boselli Burger – Jacksonville, Florida, franchises also featured the Triple-Double Burger in 1998, named after Jacksonville Jaguars tackle Tony Boselli.[46]
Bratwurst – For a few years during the 1990s and in 2002, Johnsonville brand bratwurst on a hot dog-like roll was sold in some US markets for a limited time each fall. A few locations in Eastern Wisconsin, which is the major market for the Sheboygan County-based company still offer bratwursts on a seasonal basis.
Buffalo Ranch McChicken (also the Hot 'n Spicy).
Catfish Sandwich – A sandwich made with a catfish patty, lettuce, and tangy sauce and sold on a McRib-style bun. Sold at McDonald's locations in Kentucky, Tennessee, Alabama, Arkansas, and Mississippi for a brief period in March 1991.[47]
Cheddar Melt – a quarter pound beef patty smothered with grilled onions (sauteed in butter and teriyaki), then topped with cheddar cheese sauce on a light rye bun, offered in 1988, the 1990s, 2004, and 2007. They are still available in Brazil under the name Cheddar McMelt.[48]
Chicken Fajitas – The Chicken Fajitas consisted of a small soft tortilla, a grilled vegetable medley, and grilled chicken. The fajita was in the traditional thin wrapping paper. These are still available in British Columbia, Saskatchewan, Nova Scotia, Newfoundland (at certain locations), Alberta (at select locations in the Edmonton area) and at all non-Walmart McDonald's in Ontario.[citation needed]
Chicken McBites – popcorn chicken breast with "home-style seasoning" offered through April 20, 2012 in 3-ounce, 5-ounce and 10-ounce versions. Dipping sauces include Ranch, Sweet n' Sour, Tangy BBQ, Chipotle BBQ, Honey Mustard,[49] Spicy Buffalo, and Sweet Chili.[citation needed]
Chicken Parmesan Sandwich – A chicken breast covered in bread crumbs and topped with tomato sauce and mozzarella on a toasted bun.[citation needed]
Chicken Platter – A grilled chicken burger served with lettuce and tomato on the HotCakes tray.[citation needed]





Chicken Selects



Chicken Selects – McDonald's version of chicken strips. They were introduced in early 1998 and offered again as a permanent part of the menu in late October 2003. They are sold in 3-, 5-, or 10-piece sizes and include choices of spicy buffalo, creamy ranch, honey mustard, and chipotle barbecue dipping sauces; sauce selections in the UK are smokey barbecue, sour cream and sweet chili sauce.[50] Sold in the United States, Canada, Israel and the UK. Available in Australia under the name Chicken McDippers.[51] McDonald's stopped selling Chicken Selects in the United States in February 2013,[52][53] but they returned to the menu on February 25, 2015 for a limited engagement and were renamed Chicken Select Tenders. Chicken Selects are still sold at McDonald's restaurants in the United Kingdom and Ireland.
Corn Dog McNuggets – For a brief time in 1991, McDonald's locations in Richmond, Virginia offered a multi-pack of mini corn dogs without sticks. They were offered again in 2002 as the "Mini Corn Dogs".
Cuban Sandwich – Roast pork and ham sandwich on a long roll with Swiss cheese, mustard, and pickles. One of several Hispanic-inspired menu items briefly sold at South Florida units in 2001.[54]
Derby Burger – A single patty hamburger with American Cheese, lettuce, tomato, ketchup, mayonnaise, and bacon. It was a regional item sold in the mid-1990s in Louisville, Kentucky only during the spring to coincide with the Kentucky Derby. Discontinued in the early 2000s (decade).
Diet Coke Float and Coke Float – In 1991 McDonald's ran a limited time promotion selling a float made with Diet Coke or Coke with low-fat soft-serve frozen yogurt in a collectable Coke bell glass. It sold for $1.59 with 40 cents from every sale donated to Ronald McDonald Children's Charities.[55]
Dinner Menu – After testing pasta in the South in 1989, McDonald's began testing a pasta-based menu at 40 units across Rochester, New York, in September 1991, including lasagna, fettuccine alfredo, and spaghetti with meatballs. In the early 1990s, a new Dinner Menu was tested for 6–12 months at two locations in New York and Tennessee. It consisted of the pizza mentioned below but also included lasagna, spaghetti, fettuccine alfredo, and roasted chicken as entrees. The side dishes included mashed potatoes with gravy and a vegetable medley.[citation needed] For the dessert, it included a brownie à la mode or peanut butter pie.[25][56]
Eggs Benedict McMuffin – Canadian style bacon, egg, special breakfast sauce, and American cheese on a toasted English muffin.
Fried Roast Beef Sandwich – In 1968 this product was launched targeting adults. Sold with a package of McDonald's BBQ sauce on the side using the slogan "McDonald's is my kind of place"; it was inspired by a franchisee's version of an Arby's sandwich. The sandwich failed due to the costs of getting roast beef slicers; no matter how many sandwiches they could sell, it would never turn a profit.[1]
Grilled Cheese Happy Meal – There was a Happy Meal introduced during the early part of the 2000s (decade) that contained a grilled cheese sandwich. It was discontinued the same summer it was released but is still sold in some Canadian markets.
Grilled Chicken Flatbread Sandwich – Grilled chicken strips, lettuce, tomato, grilled onions, pepper jack cheese, and a creamy herb sauce served wrapped in a heated flatbread. Served briefly in June 2002, and again from December 27, 2002 until February 9, 2003.
Happy Meal Breakfast – The Happy Meal Breakfast was a meal that was smaller than the traditional breakfast that lasted from the 1980s to 2009. It was discontinued by advice of the Nutrition department at the Corporate Headquarters in Oak Brook, Illinois, but is still sold in Hong Kong.
Home Fried Chicken – During 1968 McDonald's sold deep fried chicken (similar to KFC). Targeting parents who could not choose between burgers and chicken, McDonald's delivered home fried chicken served with distinct packaging. The white chicken meat was sold in light gold packages (for adults) and catering to the children – the dark chicken meat was sold in dark foil packages. TV slogan was... "so everyone can have just what they want ... McDonald's Strives to Reunite the American Family" (note the US was struggling with domestic civil unrest due to the combined social upheaval of the Vietnam War and the civil rights movement)
Hot dogs – In 1937, hot dogs were the first things sold in McDonald's. Then in CEO Ray Kroc's 1977 autobiography, he prohibited the company from selling hot dogs, regardless of potential demand, as he regarded them as unhygienic; however, hot dogs were reintroduced in 1995 at some Midwestern located stores (at the option of the franchise-holder) as a summer item. UK stores sold hot dogs during 2002 on the McChoice menu (later PoundSaver) and as a seasonal menu item in the summer of 1999. Also, at least one American restaurant offered Oscar Mayer hot dogs at some time, notably in Bethel Park, Pennsylvania, and McDonald's locations at Toronto Metro Zoo and SkyDome in Toronto offered hot dogs until 1999. Starting in the year 2007, a few McDonald's began selling Hot Dogs in central Pennsylvania due to popular demand from local sports fans. They can be found at 12 locations as of 2011[update]. In Tokyo locations, hot dogs were available from 1990 until 2004, and have been reintroduced one more for 2009, dubbed the "McHot Dog". McDonald's locations in Chile also sold hot dogs for a brief period in 2004.
Hot Ham 'N Cheese – Sliced ham, American cheese, lettuce and tomato on a triple split, sesame seed bun with a choice of mayonnaise or honey mustard sauce.
Hulaburger – A Ray Kroc invention, it featured a slice of pineapple instead of meat. Originally intended for Roman Catholics who are not allowed to eat meat on Fridays during Lent. It was test-marketed in 1963 alongside the Filet-O-Fish sandwich, with the highest seller being added to the menu full-time (the Filet-O-Fish, a creation of an Ohio franchiser, won).[57]
Italian Doubles – A limited summer promotion in Canada in 1989. Two regular patties on a hamburger bun with 1 slice of mozzarella cheese & marinara sauce.
Kiwiburger – In the 1990s, New Zealand sold a burger reflecting their national icon the Kiwi. It was a single beef patty hamburger, with egg (identical to the egg in McMuffins), cheese, lettuce, tomato, beetroot, onions, ketchup ("tomato sauce") and American mustard. It came in distinctive packaging with 46 classic kiwi quotes, kiwiana, and kiwi sporting icons, which were also used in promotions of the burger.[58] Complications with the cooking of the egg and the use of certain ingredients, that no other McDonald's burger had, saw the Kiwiburger discontinued. It has occasionally returned to the menu for limited times since.
McChicken LT (McDonald's Chicken Lettuce and Tomato) was the chicken version of the McDLT featuring the same two-sided container as the McDLT except the packaging was yellow instead of white. It was introduced about the same time as the McDLT in the mid-1980s. The chicken was a grilled, unbreaded chicken breast placed on the heel of the bun in one of the compartments. The toppings were shredded lettuce, tomato and mayonnaise assembled on the top half of the bun in the other compartment. Cheese was an optional addition for an extra US$0.10. The grilled chicken breast was then basted with a brushing of melted butter. As with the McDLT, the consumer would finalize preparation of the sandwich by combining the hot and cool sides just prior to eating. The McChicken LT was discontinued in the Fall of 1987.
McDLT – The McDLT (McDonald's Lettuce and Tomato) was sold in a novel form of packaging.[59] The McDLT was introduced in the fall of 1984 as the Lettuce and Tomato Special. The meat and bottom half of the bun were prepared separately from the lettuce, tomato, American cheese, pickles, sauces, and top half of the bun. Both were then packaged into a specially designed two-sided styrofoam container. The consumer was then expected to finalize preparation of the sandwich by combining the hot and cool sides just prior to eating. It was discontinued between December 1990 and January 1991 due to environmental concerns with styrofoam.
McDonald's Own Chocolaty Chip Cookie - mini-chocolate chip cookies which came in a small rectangular box
McDonaldland Cookies - cookies shaped like the McDonald's characters. originally came in a white box with a handle and later smaller rectangular boxes with cartoon images
McDouble Cruncher – two patties with a slice of cheese, chipotle BBQ sauce and crispy onions
McGrilled Chicken Classic – A sandwich featuring a grilled chicken breast portion that was introduced in September 1993 and was produced before being replaced by the Grilled Chicken Deluxe/Chicken McGrill.
McLean Deluxe – A lower-calorie Quarter Pounder-type sandwich (introduced in 1991) containing 90% lean beef and 10% water with carrageenan, a seaweed extract, to hold the water and beef together.[60] This item was otherwise identical to the Big N' Tasty and the McDLT.
McRye – a hamburger on rye bread sold in Finland in late 1990s.
McSoup – Campbell's Soup sold at McDonald's available in Broccoli & Cheese and Chicken Noodle. (This product is only sold in winter months in select markets)
McStuffin – a pocket sandwich available with various fillings. McStuffins were sold for a short time in 1993 and were discontinued that same year due to not having a lot of popularity.
McWraps – Inspired in the Mexican burritos Chicken Caesar, Chicken and Garden Salad wraps served toasted in a thick herb flat bread. McWraps is still offered in some parts of Europe(for instance in Denmark and Croatia).
Mighty Wings – deep-fried spicy chicken wings. McDonald's began selling these in 1990 as an optional item and stopped selling them in 2003. They are still sold in China, Spain, Samoa, and the U.S. Virgin Island of St Croix as of March 6, 2010. Also sold as McWings in Pakistan, they were discontinued for a while but relaunched. On September 9, 2013, McDonald's brought the Mighty Wings back to its menus in all of its American restaurants as a limited time offer available until November 2013. The Mighty Wings did not sell well its second time around in the U.S. The main problems cited with the Mighty Wings was the price point versus the amount purchased. Compared with competitors, the pricing was determined to be too high, but McDonald's stated that due to overruns in purchasing, the company could not sell them at lower prices without losing money. On February 24, 2014, McDonald's decided to put them back on the menu for a limited engagement to liquidate the remaining inventory at a lower price in all U.S. locations.
Mozzarella sticks - 3 fried cheesesticks with marinara sauce on the side. Was on the Dollar Menu & More menu from December 2015 to March 2016.
Onion Nuggets – introduced at the same time as the Beefsteak Sandwich as the side item for the Dinner Menu. Onion Nuggets were chopped onions shaped into small solid pieces, dipped in batter and deep-fried.
Philly Cheesesteak – Slices of steak and Swiss cheese with onions. Served until August 2007 at Australian and American McDonald's. This sandwich is still available in Canada, made with cheese spread and green bell pepper.
Pizza / McPizza – McDonald's has also attempted pizza at various times,[25][56] with an apple-pie–like McPizza and more conventional McDonald's Pizza. A line of personal-sized pizzas was first seen in the late 1970s in test-market stores near interstate highways around Milwaukee and Madison. In Canada (c. 1992–99), the pizza originally began as a family-sized pizza that was brought out to the table by an employee and placed on a raised rack in the centre of the table. Later it was scaled down to a personal-sized pizza. However, variations have found their way into some international markets such as India (the pie-like "Pizza McPuff"). McDonald's also test marketed a 14-inch, round, traditional-style pizza in Evansville, Indiana, and nearby Owensboro, Kentucky, in 1989.[61] By 1991, the McDonald's test markets for pizza had grown to over 500 McDonald's locations before the pizza test was placed on hold.[62] Pizza was discontinued in most restaurants by 2000. The reason for eliminating the pizza from the menu was that the time to cook a pizza took 11 minutes, and McDonald's wanted to keep its reputation for fast service. As of March 2017, two McDonald's locations, one in Pomeroy, Ohio, and the other in Spencer, West Virginia still offer the family style McPizza.[63]
Roast Beef on a Roll – A roast beef sandwich made just like the Arby's roast beef sandwich. Sold in 1968.
Root Beer Float – A combination of vanilla soft-serve ice cream and root beer.
Salad Shakers – A salad of lettuce, croutons and other vegetable in a tall dome shaped plastic container. Salad Shakers were introduced in the spring of 2000 and are still available in the Netherlands.
Son of Mac – Also known as the Mini Mac or Baby Mac, a version with only one patty and no centre roll piece. It sold as a Baby Mac in New Zealand, was sold in Australia, now discontinued. Served by some stores in the United States under the moniker "Mac Jr". It's still sold in places in Canada, known as the "kid's mac".
Southern Fried-Chicken – Was sold in Australia up until mid-1986. This was available as a 2 piece (or 3 piece) pack including French Fries. This was replaced by the current McNugget range, as the nuggets became cheaper to produce and safer to cook.
Spanish Omelet Bagel – existed during the mid to late 2000s, discontinued.
Spicy Chicken – Chicken breast with spicy breading introduced in 2006. (Still offered in some U.S. markets.)
Strawberry Shortcake McFlurry – Vanilla soft-serve ice cream with strawberry topping and Vanilla Cookie pieces mixed together.
Superhero Burger – Featuring 3 patties, yellow American cheese, white American cheese, tomato, lettuce, onion, and mayo all laid out on an elongated bun like a hero sandwich. The burger was released as part of the "Taste of the Month" series that McDonald's ran in 1995 where they had a new burger every month. The Superhero Burger was also tied into the promo campaign for the film Batman Forever and the ads for it featured Batman and the Batmobile.
Torta – In 2000, the company released their own version of tortas, a Mexican sandwich, in southern California on a trial basis.
Triple Ripple – A mixed cone with strawberry, vanilla, and chocolate, topped with a plastic top.[1]
Triple-Double Burger – A burger featuring 3 beef patties and 2 slices of cheese, served on the same 6 inch (15.2 cm) sesame seed roll as the McRib. It was originally marketed as the Superhero Burger to promote the release of the 1995 film Batman Forever. It was also sold under the names of local sports stars in at least five markets in the 1990s and in the Cleveland area in the early 2000s (decade):

The Hockey Hero burger, in Canada.
The Jason Kidd Burger – Downtown Phoenix, Arizona, franchises had a Limited Time Offer burger named after NBA player Jason Kidd, while he played for the Phoenix Suns.
The Michael Dean Perry burger, for the then Cleveland Browns star.
The Rory Sparrow burger was sold in the Sacramento area. It was named after the Sacramento Kings star.
Thome Triple was sold in the Cleveland, Ohio area. It was named after Cleveland Indians first baseman Jim Thome


Upside Down Iced Tea – A new cup tested at select locations in the southeast United States in the late 1990s. It featured an ice compartment at top of the cup to keep the beverage cold. It was quickly discontinued.
Szechuan Sauce, created to promote the Disney film, Mulan (1998 film). It was thrust back into the cultural spotlight after being referenced numerous times in the Season 3 premiere of Adult Swim animated comedy Rick and Morty.

See also[edit]


Food portal



List of Burger King products

References[edit]


^ a b c Love, John F. (1995). McDonald's: Behind the Arches (Revised ed.). New York: Bantam Books. ISBN 0553347594. 
^ a b Buiso, Gary (2012-12-02). "More burning questions about NYC answered | New York Post". Nypost.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Menu: Our Full McDonald's Food Menu | McDonald's". Mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Artz, Matthew (December 31, 2009). "Fremont's 'hamburger king' dead at 81". Oakland Tribune. Retrieved January 12, 2010. 
^ "ACCUEIL". McDonald's France. 
^ AP Newswire (July 2, 1997). "McDonald's hoping new burger a Whopper stopper". The Augusta Chronicle. Archived from the original on October 30, 2007. Retrieved October 23, 2007. 
^ a b c d Wong, Venessa (March 12, 2014). "After Year of Flubs, McDonald's Loses Its Taste for Novelty". Bloomberg Business. Retrieved March 3, 2015. 
^ "麥當勞 意想不到嘅嚐試". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Product Nutrition". McDonalds.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's 1955 Burger Review - Burger Lad - Burger Reviews". Burger Lad. 2013-10-16. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ John Reynolds (2011-08-25). "McDonald's cooks up 'no-nonsense' 1955 burger for the UK". Marketingmagazine.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Little, Katie (November 24, 2015). "McDonald's breakfast burger mashup debuts". CNBC. NBC News. Retrieved November 25, 2015. 
^ a b "McDonalds - Artisan Grilled Chicken". News.mcdonalds.com. 2015-04-06. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ http://www.aef.com/images/diversity/burrell/snack_wrap_case_study.pdf
^ "North County News - San Diego Union Tribune". Nctimes.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ McDonald's Australia reveals new Chicken Menu[permanent dead link]
^ "MacPride.Net - Kaufman Enterprises - Promotions". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Chicken Maharaja Mac". www.mcdonaldsindia.net. Mc Donalds India. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ "Chicken McBites". Mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Tasty Basket 30 pezzi | McDonald's Italia" (in (in Italian)). M.mcdonalds.it. 2012-12-03. Retrieved 2017-07-13. CS1 maint: Unrecognized language (link)
^ Clark, Paul (February 20, 2007). "No fish story: Sandwich saved his McDonald's". USA Today. Retrieved April 17, 2009. 
^ Eisenberg, Daniel (September 25, 2002). "Can McDonald's Shape Up?". Time. 
^ Velasco, Schuyler (August 21, 2013). "10 fast foods that have disappeared: McLobster". Christian Science Monitor. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 
^ Spencer Ross. "A connoisseur's guide to downtown poutine - a & e". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ a b c Velasco, Schuyler (August 21, 2013). "10 fast foods that have disappeared: 4. McSpaghetti". Christian Science Monitor. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 
^ "Forays of a Finance Foodie: McDonald's Steps Up Their Style: New Product Preview Day! [New York]". Financefoodie.com. 2010-06-08. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ [1][dead link]
^ "McDonalds Testing Garlic Fries". Time.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Harding, Luke (28 December 2000). "Give me a Big Mac - but hold the beef". The Guardian. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ "Maharaja Mac - Veg and Chicken options". www.mcdonaldsindia.net. Mc Donalds India. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ mcdonalds.com.ph. "Ourfood". McDonalds. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's: You Deserve A Hash Brown All Day". NPR.org. 2015-09-02. Retrieved 2016-03-07. 
^ snopes (March 7, 2016). "McDonald's Shakes : snopes.com". snopes. Retrieved March 7, 2016. 
^ "Triple Thick MilkshakeÂ®". McDonalds.ca. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's USA – USA Core Menu Items by Ingredients". McDonald's Corporation. Archived from the original on April 26, 2009. Retrieved May 29, 2009. 
^ "McDonald's Nutrition Calculator | McDonald's" (PDF). Nutrition.mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Why don't you mix the mcflurry anymore like you used to?". December 10, 2013. Retrieved June 21, 2014. 
^ "A McFlurry of tasty ideas". Honolulu Star-Bulletin. August 13, 1998. Retrieved June 12, 2012. 
^ "Steve McFlurry USPTO trademark information". United States Patent and Trademark Office. December 19, 1997. Retrieved September 1, 2006. 
^ "Large Frozen McSpider Coke | Drinks Menu | McDonald's AU". Mcdonalds.com.au. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McShakeup". The Huffington Post. March 1, 2013. 
^ Candice Choi, AP. "McDonald's cuts Angus burgers from menu". Usatoday.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "R.I.P. McDonald's Angus Third Pounder". The Huffington Post. May 9, 2013. Retrieved October 18, 2013. 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Elliott Harris. "Beefing up his role – Bulls' Wennington latest burger celebrity". Chicago Sun-Times. March 8, 1998. Sports, 14.
^ Times, The (1998-08-16). "Jaguars: Advertising war games have definitely begun 08/16/98". Jacksonville.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "The Press-Courier". McDonalds testing catfish. 14 February 1991. Retrieved 13 July 2017. 
^ "McD brings back Cheddar Melt | Nation's Restaurant News | Find Articles at BNET". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Unveils Chicken McBites". Los Angeles Times. January 25, 2012. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's USA - USA Core Menu Items by Ingredients". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's chicken snack a hit". Azcentral.com. 2007-01-30. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ February 28, 2013 (2013-02-28). "Bid Adieu To Chicken Selects As McDonald’s Makes Room On The Menu For Newer Items – Consumerist". Consumerist.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's dropping Fruit & Walnut Salad, Chicken Selects in U.S.". Reuters. 
^ "Mcdonald's Tries Adding Hispanic Fare To Fast Food - tribunedigital-orlandosentinel". Articles.orlandosentinel.com. 2001-10-28. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Floats offered at McDonalds". Beaver County Times. 22 May 1991. p. 14. Retrieved 12 July 2017. 
^ a b McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Kiwi Burger television advertisement – New Zealand Film Archive". Archived from the original on July 14, 2011. Retrieved October 15, 2010. 
^ US 4653685 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Chaudhry, Rajan (July 31, 1989). "McPizza? McDonald's widens pizza test: pizza operators gird for assault". Nation's Restaurant News. Findarticles.com. Retrieved November 13, 2009. 
^ Prewitt, Milford (October 7, 1991). "McDonald's developing separate dinner menu, puts pizza test on hold". Nation's Restaurant News. Findarticles.com. Archived from the original on May 1, 2009. Retrieved February 28, 2009. 
^ Pemberton, Becky (2016-03-10). "Ohio and West Virginia McDonald's are still selling MCPIZZA | Daily Mail Online". Dailymail.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 


External links[edit]

 Media related to McDonald's products at Wikimedia Commons
"McPizza! – Tasting the elusive McDonald's Pizza". Science Tortilla (YouTube). March 14, 2015.  – Video on a taste test of a McPizza from one of the two locations still selling it.
McGrath, Jane. "5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items". HowStuffWorks, Inc. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 







v
t
e


McDonald's






History
Advertising

ad programs


Countries with franchises
Legal cases
Product list
International availability





People



Richard and Maurice McDonald
Ray Kroc
Joan Kroc
Ralph Alvarez
Charlie Bell
Al Bernardin
Jim Cantalupo
George Cohon
Dan Coudreaut
Steve Easterbrook
Janice L. Fields
Den Fujita
Don Gorske
Jack M. Greenberg
Eikō Harada
June Martino
Herb Peterson
Michael R. Quinlan
Ed Rensi
Willard Scott
James A. Skinner
Donald N. Smith
Harry J. Sonneborn
Don Thompson
Fred L. Turner





Company



Hamburger University
Leaps and Bounds
McBarge
McCafé
McDonald's #1 Store Museum
McDonald's (Will Rogers Turnpike)
Oldest McDonald's restaurant
Rock N Roll McDonald's
Ronald McDonald House Charities





Products




Beef



Big Mac
Big N' Tasty
Deluxe line
Kiwiburger
Quarter Pounder (McRoyal)





Chicken



Chicken McNuggets
McChicken





Other



Deli Choices
Filet-O-Fish
Georgie Pie
Happy Meal
McArabia
McGriddles
McMuffin
McRib
Premium line
Shamrock Shake





Former



Arch Deluxe
McAfrika








Advertising




Campaigns



Changeables
Global Gladiators
Golden Arches
Mac Tonight
McDonaldland
McDonald's Monopoly
McDonald's Treasure Land Adventure
M.C. Kids
McKids
Ronald McDonald
Teenie Beanies
The Wacky Adventures of Ronald McDonald





Sponsorships



Kyle Larson (NASCAR)
Jamie McMurray (NASCAR)
Graham Rahal (IndyCar Series)
McDonald's All-American Game
McDonald's Championship
McDonald's Championship (golf)
McDonald's Cycle Center
McDonald's Gospelfest
McDonald's Olympic Swim Stadium





Related



Burger wars
Donald Land
Fast food advertising
Mac and Me (1988 film)
McDonald's sign (Pine Bluff, Arkansas)
Supersize








Branches



Canada
Israel
New Zealand





Criticism



Fast Food Nation (film)
McDonaldization
McDonald's Videogame
McJob
McRefugee
McLibel
Maxime, McDuff & McDo
Super Size Me

Don't Eat This Book







Legal cases



Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants
Magee v. McDonald's
McDonald's Restaurants v. Morris & Steel
Sid & Marty Krofft Television Productions Inc. v. McDonald's Corp.





Related



McDelivery
Big Mac Index
Bill Elliott
McDonald's Young Entertainers
McWords
San Ysidro McDonald's massacre
"Seriously McDonalds"
Sydney River McDonald's murders
Taiwan McDonald's bombings
Urban legends
Boom, Like That
The Founder (2016 film)










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=List_of_McDonald%27s_products&oldid=791067944"					
Categories: Lists of brand name foodsMcDonald's foodsHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksArticles with Italian-language external linksCS1 maint: Unrecognized languageArticles with dead external links from July 2017Wikipedia articles needing copy edit from July 2017All articles needing copy editArticles that may contain original research from July 2017All articles that may contain original researchArticles needing additional references from July 2017All articles needing additional referencesWikipedia articles needing page number citations from July 2017All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2014Articles with unsourced statements from December 2014Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2009All articles containing potentially dated statementsArticles that may contain original research from October 2012Articles with unsourced statements from July 2017Articles with unsourced statements from March 2009Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2011 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


日本語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 23:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









List of McDonald's products - Wikipedia





















 






List of McDonald's products

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search







This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article may require copy editing for grammar, style, cohesion, tone, or spelling. You can assist by editing it. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article possibly contains original research. Please improve it by verifying the claims made and adding inline citations. Statements consisting only of original research should be removed. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)





Contents


1 Beef burgers
2 Chicken
3 Fish
4 Pork
5 Other products
6 Breakfast
7 Beverages
8 Desserts
9 Former items
10 See also
11 References
12 External links



Beef burgers[edit]
All beef patties are seasoned, consisting primarily of salt and minced pepper.

Hamburger (formerly known as the Junior Burger in some countries) and cheeseburger – a 1.6-ounce (45 g) ground beef patty, with 0.125 ounces (3.5 g) ketchup, mustard, a single dill pickle, re-hydrated onions, on a toasted bun. At one time early in McDonald's history, the pickle was removed from the sandwich.[1][page needed] In all or much of the New York City area, it is served without mustard.[2] Also sold as a double or triple, adding an extra pickle slice for each beef patty added. A triple burger and a bacon double cheeseburger are optional items and are not always available in all restaurants or markets. In Australia the average serving size for a Cheeseburger is 110 grams. The hamburger and the cheeseburger are the company's original grilled burger offerings, having been served as part of the 1948 menu.[3]
Big Mac – a signature product that was introduced in 1968. Two 1.6-ounce (45 g) (approx. uncooked weight) ground beef patties, special Big Mac sauce (similar to Thousand Island dressing), lettuce, cheese, pickles, and diced onions on a sesame seed bun, with an additional middle bun (called a "club layer") separating the beef patties. The Grand Mac, its bigger-size counterpart, was added in December 2016.
Quarter Pounder – a 4.25-ounce (120.5 g) (originally 4-ounce (113.4 g) until 2015) (approx. uncooked weight) ground beef patty with ketchup, mustard, chopped onions, pickle, and two slices of cheese. As with burgers made with the smaller 1.6-ounce patties, the Quarter Pounder is prepared without mustard in all or a large portion of the New York City region.[2] It was invented by Al Bernardin, a franchise owner and former McDonald's Vice President of product development, at his McDonald's in Fremont, California, in 1971.[4] In some markets unfamiliar with Imperial measurements (such as France), it is known as a Royal Cheese, or variants thereof, such as McRoyale.[5] It is also available as the Double Quarter Pounder with Cheese, which includes another patty of the same proportions. In 2013, McDonald's expanded the sandwich into a line with three additional variants to make them smaller versions of the Angus Burgers, which was renamed the Taste-Crafted Burgers in 2016 in West Coast markets and later expanded to other U.S. markets in January 2017, the latest added being the Signature Sriracha, which was replaced by Sweet Barbecue Bacon by May.
Big N' Tasty/Big Tasty – the Big N' Tasty, introduced in 1997, was a 4-ounce (113 g) beef patty with ketchup, cheese, mayonnaise with a grill diced onions, pickles, leaf lettuce, and tomatoes. It was devised to resemble Burger King's Whopper sandwich.[6] It is also known as the Big Xtra in Slovenia and most of Canada; the McXtra in Quebec, Canada; the McFeast Deluxe in Australia; the Big Tasty (without the 'N') in Brazil, Bulgaria, France, Germany, Italy (without ketchup), Ireland, The Netherlands, Poland, Russia, Sweden, the United Kingdom; the Quarter Pounder Deluxe in South Africa; and the McNifica (a play on Spanish magnifica, 'wonderful') in Mexico and Latin America. The Big Tasty configuration is somewhat different, consisting of a third-pound (150 g) beef patty, sesame seed bun, lettuce, tomatoes, onions, Emmental cheese, and Big Tasty sauce (which has a smoke flavor). The Big Tasty Bacon variant also contains strips of bacon. This variant was sold in the US until 2009; it is now sold internationally only.
Double Cheeseburger – two 1.6-ounce (45 g) ground beef patties, with 0.125 ounces (3.5 g) ketchup, mustard (except in all or much of the New York City area), two slices of dill pickle, re-hydrated onions, and two pieces of cheese on a toasted bun. The double cheeseburger was offered as a promotional item in the 1950s, and was added to the regular menu in 1965. An official variant is offered in the U.S. state of New Mexico, called the Green Chile Double Cheeseburger, topped with roasted green New Mexico chile peppers.





The McDouble



McDouble – similar to a Double Cheeseburger, but with just one slice of cheese. Reintroduced as a permanent dollar-menu item in December 2008 – had been a short-term product in 1997, advertised with "Eddie the Echo." The original McDouble did not have cheese and was garnished with lettuce and tomatoes rather than the pickles and onions on the 2008 version.
Bacon McDouble – a sandwich that is similar to the McDouble, but it has two pieces of Applewood smoked bacon added to it. This sandwich was added to the U.S. "Dollar Menu & More" in November 2013.[7]
Daily Double – similar to the McDouble, however the toppings are slightly different. The Daily Double is made with a little bit of lettuce, tomato, slivered onions, and mayonnaise. It also has only one slice of cheese, like the McDouble, rather than the two slices that are on the double cheeseburger. In 2011 and 2012, the item was test marketed in various regional locations.
McFeast – a hamburger with lettuce, tomato, pickles and mayonnaise, in most markets from April 1977. The name McFeast lives on though in Scandinavian countries, where a McFeast has been served since the mid-1980s in Sweden and was later introduced to the rest of the Nordic countries; the McFeast in Sweden contains a quarter pounder patty, lettuce, modified mayonnaise with lemon juice, onion and tomato. In the rest of the countries, the McFeast also contains ketchup, but not in Sweden. The same burger was sold under the name Mega Feast in New Zealand for several years during the 1990s, but has since been discontinued. The McFeast Deluxe was sold in Australia until the late 1990s and contained: mustard, ketchup, large onions, McFeast Deluxe sauce, lettuce, a tomato slice, regular cheese and a quarter pounder patty served in a Quarter Pounder/McChicken Bun. It returned to the Australian menu in 2009 and in August 2011 using the same ingredients, however contained McChicken sauce in place of the original 'McFeast Deluxe' sauce. The McFeast has been sold in Germany and Austria since the 1990s, named "Hamburger Royal TS" (T for "Tomate" (tomato); S for "Salat", the German word for lettuce). It contains a quarter-pounder patty, lettuce, tomatoes, onions, cheese and the McChicken mayo sauce. For special occasions, it is sold in Germany as a "McFresh" which also contains cucumber slices.
Ranger Burger and Super Ranger[8]
1955 Burger – this burger inspired by 1955 (according to the official site) contains beef, bacon, lettuce, tomatoes, caramelized onions, ketchup and McDonald's smoky sauce (barbecue). Named after the year the fast-food chain was incorporated by Ray Kroc, the burger is popular in European markets, including Spain, Italy and Germany. It was released in 2011 and re-released in 2013 in the UK.[9][10][11]
BBQ Ranch Burger[7] – a very sweet hamburger containing one all-beef patty, cheddar cheese, BBQ Ranch sauce, and tortilla strips,[citation needed] added to the U.S. "Dollar Menu and More" in November 2013.[7]
McSpicy Burger – a very spicy chicken breast, lettuce, cheese and hot sauce-laced mayo, served as the McSpicy Shake Shake Meal, complete with fries.[citation needed]
Bacon Clubhouse – a burger consisting of one quarter-pound patty, lettuce, tomato, and special sauce served on an "artisan roll". This core item was added to the menu the week of March 12, 2014.[7]
Jalapeño Double – similar to the McDouble, except it contains two types of jalapeño peppers, pickled and crispy, plus a slice of white cheddar cheese between the two burger patties, and buttermilk ranch sauce, added to the Dollar Menu in April 2014.[citation needed]
Triple Cheeseburger – similar to the Double Cheeseburger, except it contains three burger patties, with a slice of American cheese between each patty, plus ketchup, mustard (except in all or much of the New York City area), onion, and dill pickle. This was added to the Dollar Menu in December 2014.[citation needed]
ChiTown Classic – a regional offering that was one of two finalist out of 100s of entries in the "Chicagoland Burger Build Off" competition to develop a breakfast-dinner mashup burger in 2015. The burger was placed on the menu on Chicago area locations starting Mid-November until December 27, 2015. The burger adds breakfast's Canadian bacon and applewood smoked bacon.[12]

Chicken[edit]

McChicken – a mildly spicy chicken sandwich, offered in a spicier variant as the Hot n' Spicy in some markets. Made from 100% ground white meat chicken, mayonnaise, and shredded lettuce, on a toasted bun. A full-size version was introduced in 1980, later removed, and reintroduced in 1988. In some markets it is not spicy, and in others a cajun spiced version is also offered. It remains one of the biggest sellers, just behind the Big Mac. The larger sandwich was replaced with the Crispy Chicken Deluxe in 1996, and brought back in 1998 in the current smaller size, and marketed as the Cajun (Style) McChicken. In Australia the average serving size for a McChicken is 185 grams. In Canada, it remains a full-size sandwich, while the US' smaller version is sold as the Junior Chicken.
Premium chicken sandwiches – the Premium line was added in July 2005. The Classic was a rebranding of the Crispy Chicken and Chicken McGrill sandwiches, themselves rebrandings of the Deluxe chicken line in 1998, with mayonnaise, leaf lettuce, and a tomato slice. The Ranch BLT contains ranch sauce instead of mayonnaise and includes bacon. The Club is similar to the Classic with added bacon and a piece of Swiss cheese. In Latin America, the Classic and the Club are sold, but a honey mustard chicken sandwich is sold in place of the BLT. All were served on a whole-grain roll, with either a grilled or crispy chicken breast. On March 20, 2014, the Premium Crispy Chicken Bacon Clubhouse and Premium Grilled Chicken Bacon Clubhouse were added to the lineup (alongside the beef variant of the sandwich) on a new artisan roll. In February 2015 the Ranch BLT and Club were removed from the menu. The standard crispy offering was renamed to the Premium Crispy Chicken Deluxe (later the Buttermilk Crispy Chicken Sandwich in August 2015) and it was upgraded to sit on the artisan roll introduced with the Bacon Clubhouse. In the first week of April 2015, McDonald's replaced the Premium Grilled Chicken sandwich with the Artisan Grilled Chicken.[13] Like the Taste-Crafted Burgers, the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches were introduced in 2016, in West Coast markets, and in all other U.S. markets in January 2017. Signature Sriracha was the latest to be added in June 2016; it was replaced by Sweet Barbecue Bacon in May 2017.
Southern Style Chicken Sandwich – a southern-style fried chicken breast filet, on a steamed bun, dressed with butter and two pickles. Nearly identical to a Chick-fil-A chicken sandwich. Discontinued at many franchises in early 2015.
Snack Wrap – a wrap made with white meat chicken breast (crispy or grilled), lettuce, shredded Cheddar cheese and Monterey Jack cheese, and a sauce (Spicy Buffalo, Ranch, Honey mustard, Chipotle barbecue, or Salsa Roja, the breakfast sauce on the McSkillet), wrapped in a soft flour tortilla. It was launched on July 1, 2006. Chipotle BBQ is the most recent flavor. Available in the United States, The Netherlands, United Kingdom, Canada, Australia and Brazil.[14][15][16] There is also a Mac Snack Wrap which features the fixings of the Big Mac, but without the bun and wrapped in a tortilla shell, and uses one half of a piece of quarter meat.[17]
Premium Chicken Wrap – in 2013, McDonald's in the U.S. introduced a larger wrap that it has had success with in parts of Europe. It comes in three variants: Sweet Chili Chicken, Chicken & Bacon, and Chicken & Ranch.
Chicken Fajita – chicken, cheese, red and green bell peppers, and diced onions in a flour tortilla. Comes with Picante sauce packets on request, which are available in mild and spicy. Available in only a few markets.
Chicken McNuggets – introduced in 1983 as a replacement for the McChicken, these are small chicken chunks served with dipping sauces of barbecue, sweet n' sour, honey, and hot mustard. Available in 4, 6, 10 (originally 9), or 20 pieces. Up until 2003, they were a combination of white and dark meat, now they are made with only white meat. In 2011, five new dipping sauces were introduced and added to the lineup: sweet chili, honey mustard, spicy buffalo, and creamy ranch. With the addition of these new dipping sauces, McDonald's began phasing out the Hot Mustard sauce, and by February 2014, it had been discontinued in most U.S. markets.
McArabia – there are two versions of the McArabia: grilled chicken, and grilled kofta (beef with spices). Both are served with lettuce, tomatoes, onions, and garlic mayonnaise in addition to two small patties of grilled chicken or kofta, all wrapped in an Arabian-style pita bread. McDonald's has performed a rather large advertising campaign for the McArabia since its introduction in 2003, largely focusing on the Arabian-themed nature of the sandwich, and it appears to have worked well. The McArabia has been very well received throughout Southwestern Eurasia. The same product is also introduced in Malaysia with "Chicken Foldover" as an alternative name.
(Premium) Crispy Chicken Deluxe – a sandwich made with a crispy chicken breast, tomato slices, and lettuce. It was first sold in 1996 and had its name changed to the Crispy Chicken Sandwich in 1998. It was replaced with a Premium chicken sandwich in July 2005, and was then brought back in 2015 under the original name with the added prefix Premium. The only other change is that it is now sold on an artisan roll instead of the potato bun that characterized the original Crispy Chicken Deluxe. By August 2015 it was renamed the Buttermilk Crispy Chicken Sandwich. This is part of the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches introduced in 2016.
Grilled Chicken Deluxe – this sandwich has the same ingredients as the Premium Crispy Chicken Deluxe, but has a marinated, grilled chicken breast at its center. It has been sold under various names since 1996, when it was introduced as the Grilled Chicken Deluxe, and had its name changed to the Chicken McGrill in 1998. It was replaced with a Premium chicken sandwich in July 2005, which was in turned replaced with the Artisan Grilled Chicken in 2015. It is also available in India, and has at times been available in Canada.
Artisan Grilled Chicken – in the first week of April 2015, McDonald's introduced a redesigned grilled chicken patty, replacing the Premium Grilled Chicken sandwich, which contains "less ingredients", and those that remain can be found in consumer's "own kitchens".[13] The sandwich sits atop the artisan roll first seen with the Bacon Clubhouse, and is the last of the full-size chicken sandwiches to switch to this bun. It is part of the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches menu introduced in 2016.
Maharaja Mac- In India, McDonald's does not serve beef in its burgers. Instead, it has created a large Big Lac style chicken burger called the "Chicken Maharaja Mac", with a chicken patty and vegetable garnishings.[18]
Chicken McBites - "poppable" pieces of chicken that are made from chicken breasts.[19]
Tasty Basket - Available only in Italy, the Tasty Basket consists of 30 pieces of chicken, which includes the Chicken McNugget, Chicken McBites, and chicken wings.[20]

Fish[edit]

Filet-O-Fish – a fish fillet with tartar sauce and a half slice of cheese, on a steamed bun. It was introduced in Cincinnati in 1962 when it was discovered that many Roman Catholics chose to eat at Frisch's Big Boy on Fridays and during Lent, as it offered a fish sandwich so they could go without meat.[21] This was replaced with the Fish Filet Deluxe in 1996 and brought back in 1998 albeit a larger fish patty. During the Easter period in Hawaii and Guam, a Double Filet-O-Fish meal is offered with two pieces of fish on one bun.
Fish McBites – similar to the Chicken McBites, these are small pieces of flaky whitefish dipped in batter and fried until golden brown, and served with tartar sauce for dipping. They were taken off the menu in the end of March 2013.

Pork[edit]




The McRib



McRib – a sandwich featuring boneless pork with barbecue sauce, slivered onions, and pickles. First seen in test-market stores near interstate highways around Milwaukee and Madison, Wisconsin, in the late 1970s (along with early tests of personal-sized pizza) the McRib was more widely released in 1981, but pulled from menu in 1985. It is released annually in the U.S. as a limited time promotion in some locations. Since 2005, the McRib has reappeared in late October staying on the menu for 10 weeks. The McRib was released in Canada as a promotional sandwich from March 18 through April 8, 2008 and again in summer 2011. The McRib is presently on some European menus (e.g., Germany, where it has been standard since or even before 1990).[22]

Other products[edit]

McDonald's introduced salads to its menu in 1985. Since that time, they have restructured their salad lines several times. In the U.S., the newest salad offerings are part of the McDonald's Premium line. First introduced in 2003, the Premium Salads all are a mixture of iceberg lettuce and a special lettuce assortment (romaine, etc.), with cherry tomatoes and different toppings to differentiate them; additionally all salads can be topped with warm grilled or crispy chicken. All of its salads are part of McDonald's move towards creating a healthier image.
The Happy Meal/Mighty Kids Meal – McDonald's capitalized on Burger Chef's Funmeal concept of a children's meal when it introduced the first Happy Meal in 1979. The meal includes an entrée, a side dish, a beverage and a toy. Happy meals include a tiny order fries (far less than a small order of fries) and fruit, optional sauce for fries, and a choice of nuggets, a single patty burger, or wraps. An additional product, Pasta Zoo was discontinued in 2008. The Mighty Kids Meal contains more food than the Happy Meal, less than the adult meal, and still contains a toy.


The toy is usually a product tie-in with a movie or popular television show.

In mid-February 2012, McDonald's has introduced the Happy Meals/Mighty Kids Meals so that they now come with either a Hamburger, Cheeseburger, 4 piece Chicken McNuggets, McDouble or the 6-piece Chicken McNuggets with a smaller version of the small fry for the Happy Meal or a small fry for a Mighty Kids Meal. All kids meals now come with fries, apple slices and a toy. The apple slices have been reduced from 8 slices to only 4 and no longer come with caramel dipping sauce.



In the U.S., the traditional entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, or a four piece order of Chicken McNuggets (or a double cheeseburger or six piece order of Chicken McNuggets for the Mighty Kids Meals); the sides are fries and sliced apples. Milk, chocolate milk, boxed apple juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks. Some U.S. franchises also include a small cellophane package of McDonaldland cookies. In 2009, McDonald's offered a Happy Meal Wrap, but it was discontinued later that year due to low sales.
In the UK, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four Chicken McNuggets, three fish fingers, or a Chicken wrap; the sides are a choice of fries, carrot sticks or sliced apples and grapes. Organic milk, Tropicana orange juice, apple and blackcurrant Robinsons Fruit Shoot, milkshakes, water and the traditional soda are the choices for drinks.
In New Zealand and Australia, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, three or six piece order of Chicken McNuggets, five or ten Chicken McBites or a crispy or seared Chicken Snack Wrap; the sides are a choice of french fries or apple slices. Thickshake, boxed chocolate milk, apple or water pop tops, orange juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks.
In Canada, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four piece Chicken McNuggets, grilled cheese, or chicken snack wraps; the sides are a choice of fries or apple slices with caramel dip. Milk, chocolate milk, boxed apple juice, orange juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks.







Chicken McNuggets





In Belgium, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four piece order of Chicken McNuggets, McFish or a Ketchup Wrap.




McDonald's line of larger chicken sandwiches (The Classic, Club, Ranch BLT and Southwest), which are part of the McDonald's Premium line were introduced in July 2005 as part of McDonald's menu revamp.

The Classic includes Lettuce, Tomato, and Mayo.
The Club also has Lettuce Tomato and Mayo, but also comes with Swiss cheese and bacon.
The Ranch BLT comes with a creamy ranch sauce, bacon, lettuce and tomato.
The Grand Chicken Burger: Large chicken patty with two layers of cheese, tomatoes, lettuce and sauce
The Southwest comes with a southwest style ancho chili sauce, lettuce, tomato, and spicy pepperjack cheese.


All four can be chosen with either crispy or grilled chicken and all are served on a wheat ciabatta bun.
Deli Choices is a line of deli-style sandwiches that are sold internationally. It is targeted at health-conscious customers and is available in Australia, Austria, Canada, Germany, and Britain, and is testing in the United States. It is similar to the McHero sandwich, sold in parts of the United States.
McDonald's sells French fries as its primary side order. Until 1967, McFries were never frozen, but were cut on-site from potatoes and immediately fried. In some international locations, they sell potato wedges, a type of French fry that is thick cut and wedge shaped and fried onion pieces that are similar to onion rings.





McDonald's McFries.



Many McDonald's locations in discount stores offer freshly popped popcorn and soft pretzels in addition to the normal menu. In PA stores, only soft pretzels are offered as a side option.
Denali Mac – a burger that looks like the Big Mac, but it uses two quarter pound beef patties. Sold only in Alaska, named after Denali (formerly Mount McKinley).





McLobster in 2015.



McLobster – a lobster roll served in a hot dog bun with "lobster sauce" and shredded lettuce, introduced in 1993. The product had supply issues and was not very profitable nationally. Recently, it was only available in Atlantic Canada and New England region in the summer, when lobster is inexpensive.[23] In the 2010s, McDonald's had short term reintroductions in Canada and Italy.
McCrab – in response to the McLobster, McDonald's along the eastern coast of the Delmarva Peninsula (comprising parts of Delaware, Maryland and Virginia) developed the McCrab sandwich, a McDonald's version of the Chesapeake crabcake.
Poutine – originally only to be found in French-Canadian communities, poutine is now found on the menu at most McDonald's' across Canada.[24]
Brownie Melt – similar to a Cinnamelt, it is a rich chocolate brownie with chocolate and white frosting.
McRice – Most McDonald's restaurants in countries in Asia serve the product due to popular demand. It is normal rice.
McSpaghetti – was launched in the late 1970s as a part of McD's dinner menu which included a number of Italian dishes. The dish is still available international where in Philippines it is popular and is generally served with McNuggets.[25]
Angus Snack Wrap – wrap with Angus burger introduced to the U.S. market on August 9, 2010. Angus Snack wraps are available three ways: Deluxe (lettuce, tomato, onions, pickles, American cheese, mayo, mustard); Bacon & Cheese (onions, pickles, American cheese, ketchup, mustard, a strip of bacon); and Mushroom & Swiss (sauteed mushrooms, Swiss cheese, mayo). The Angus Wrap uses 1/2 of a regular Angus burger pattie.[26]
The McVeggie burger – a vegetarian burger on a whole wheat bun. Available in India, Slovenia, Greece and Portugal. A special version is available in Cheung Chau branch in Hong Kong during the Cheung Chau Bun Festival.
Veggie Clubhouse - first sandwich with a quinoa pattie.[27]
The McBean burger – a vegan burger where the patties are made with cannellini beans, kidney beans, onions, carrots and green peppers. Available in Sweden.
The menu in India has numerous unique items, all of which contain neither beef nor pork:

Chicken Maharaja Mac – like a Big Mac, but with two pressed spiced chicken patties instead of beef, served with a mustard sauce
Paneer Salsa Wrap (paneer is an Indian unsalted white cheese).
Chicken Mexican Wrap
McAloo Tikki – breaded potato patty with onion and tomato on a plain bun ("aloo" is "potato"). Available at select stores in India, Greece, and Walt Disney World in Lake Buena Vista, FL.
Chicken McGrill


Georgie Pie — a meat pie sold in New Zealand and Australia. The brand was also the name of a New Zealand-based chain that was bought by McDonald's New Zealand in 1996, and was revived as part of the McDonald's menu in 2013 due to popular demand.
Garlic fries were tested in the San Francisco Bay Area in 2016, using locally grown garlic from Gilroy, California[28]
Veggie Crunch Burger - The vegetarian burger was launched in the Singapore market on 6 September 2016. Its patty is made with a mixture of unto 7 types of vegetables, including green peas, carrots, tomatoes, capsicum, beans etc. However, its dressings contain garlic and eggs. The patty is fried in the same oil used for frying apple pies so it does not come in contact with meat products. The burger has received good reviews
Mc Aaloo Tikki Burger - In India, since Mc Donalds does not serve beef or pork in any of its products, it has created a few vegetarian options to suit the 85% vegetarian populace. Thus, the cheese burger is recast as a vegetarian option and served as an "Aaloo tikki burger" containing a potato patties and a slice of cheese.[29]
Veg Maharaja Mac - A vegetarian version of the Big Mac sold at Mc Donalds India, containing patties made of potato, corn, peas and cheese. Maharaja is a Hindi word meaning emperor. [30]

Breakfast[edit]
McDonald's introduced breakfast foods in 1972.




An Egg McMuffin



McDonald's primary breakfast offerings are breakfast sandwiches.

McMuffins are McDonald's signature breakfast sandwich, first sold at select restaurants in 1972 as the Egg McMuffin, five years before breakfast officially went into effect, it consists of a fried egg, back bacon (called Canadian bacon in the U.S.) and American cheese on a toasted English muffin. Sausage or bacon McMuffins are also available. A Chicken McMuffin is offered in South Africa.
McDonald's offers a line of breakfast sandwiches: bagels, biscuits, and a special type of maple flavored pancake called McGriddles. All can all be ordered with sausage, ham or bacon, with an optional choice of cheese and/or egg. Regional meat offerings include fried chicken, steak, spam and bacon. They are an internationally famous sandwich and as such have been well received, though Morgan Spurlock criticized the item near the end of his 2004 documentary Super-Size Me with the following quote: "McDonald's joined right in, sponsoring events and creating premium salads to show how health conscious they had become. At the same time however, they masterminded one of their fattest sandwiches to date: the McGriddle. A pancake-wrapped cake press that won my heart in Texas, but can pack as much fat as a Big Mac, and contains more sugar than a pack of McDonaldland cookies." His doctor also informed him that consumption of the item could be a risk factor for high blood cholesterol.
The McDonald's Hamdesal is a new breakfast sandwich which consist of a slice of ham on pandesal, which can be ordered plain, with eggs or with cheese. This sandwich is currently available in the Philippines.[31]


There are two styles of breakfast burritos available. The Sausage Burrito, introduced in 1991, is made with a flour tortilla, sausage, American cheese, eggs, onions, and peppers. The new McSkillet wrap burrito adds potatoes and salsa. Chicken and steak variants of the McSkillet exists in limited areas.
Additional breakfast items include hotcakes; several breakfast platters with eggs, hash browns and meats or breads. Biscuits and gravy are available in parts of the southern U.S.
Oatmeal was added to the breakfast menu on December 27, 2010, after it test marketed well in Washington, D.C. and some parts of Maryland. In the test market areas, oatmeal started selling in late January 2010.
A few American regional variations exist, in Hawaii and Guam McDonald's offers local breakfast items such as Spam, Portuguese sausage and fresh cut pineapple. And in New Mexico there is a breakfast burrito on the menu, with both bacon and sausage varieties, called the Green Chile Sunrise Burrito.
In the UK, McDonald's offers the standard McMuffin, Double McMuffin, bacon rolls, toasted bagels with jam or Philadelphia cream cheese, hash browns, Oatso Simple porridge, bagels with egg, cheese and bacon or sausage, and a range of wraps, that consist of sausage & egg, bacon & egg, or cheese & egg, or you have the option to have the full wrap called the Breakfast Wrap which consists of sausage, bacon, egg, hash browns (potato rösti), cheese and an optional sauce, either ketchup or brown sauce.
Since October 2015, McDonald's offers breakfast all day in Australia, Canada, Mexico (Tijuana, Baja California Norte only), New Zealand & USA. However, the full breakfast menu won’t be available at all hours. Only certain items, such as sausage burritos or hot cakes will be available beyond the usual 10:30 A.M. cutoff weekdays or 11 weekends.[32] All US restaurants expanded its all-day menu to add Biscuit sandwiches, Egg McMuffins & McGriddles in late September 2016.
Since February 2016, breakfast bowls were added to the breakfast menu, available in some US restaurants.

Beverages[edit]
Beverages purveyed by McDonald's varies regionally.

McDonald's primary soft drink supplier is the Coca-Cola Company, except in restaurants which fall under an overall contract with PepsiCo. For example: the Detroit Metropolitan Wayne County Airport, Luxor Las Vegas, Staples Center and the University of Maryland, College Park Student Union. In the U.S. and Canada, Cadbury-Schweppes supplies Dr Pepper.
S&D Coffee, Gavina and Kraft supply McDonald's Premium Roast Coffee for McDonald's U.S. restaurants besides the New England area. Green Mountain Coffee Roasters supplies Newman's Own branded coffee for McDonald's New England area restaurants.
Hot and iced tea (supplied by S&D Coffee in the U.S.), hot chocolate, various juices and other regional beverages are available in various markets.
The McCafe is an umbrella term for lattes, espresso, iced coffee, hot chocolate, mocha, malts, smoothies, and other drinks that are sold in several markets worldwide.
Shakes are available in all U.S. McDonald's and many global markets[33] Permanent flavors are vanilla, strawberry, and chocolate; regional or seasonal flavors include Caramel, Coffee, Cherry, Eggnog (during Christmas), Banana, Pumpkin (during Halloween), Strawberry Banana, Lime, Mango Raspberry, Honeycomb, Arctic Orange (sherbet), Orange Cream, Shamrock Shake (a green, spearmint Limited Time Offer shake for St. Patrick's Day), Chocolate Mint, and Rolo (available only in Canada and the UK. This flavoured milkshake was also available in the Republic of Ireland during the summer of 2007 for a limited time only). In June 1975, 13 months before the celebration of the United States Bicentennial, McDonald's introduced a blueberry-flavored shake in order to advertise "Red, White, and Blueberry Shakes" for independence day celebrations, and lasting through August of that year. The run was repeated in summer 1976, but not since. In the U.S., starting in February 2010, "Triple Thick Shakes" were rebranded under the McCafe name, along with the addition of whipped cream, and a cherry on top, and a significant reduction in size. In Canada, McDonald's milkshakes are still sold under the "Triple Thick" name.[34]
Beer of different brands (varies locally) is available at McDonald's in Belgium, Czech Republic, France, Germany, Italy, Lithuania, Portugal, Romania, Slovenia, and Spain.
Irn-Bru is available in some Scottish McDonald's locations.
Inca Kola is available in every Peruvian McDonald's location.
McDonald's also offers 1% milk, 1% chocolate milk, and apple juice, most often as replacements for fountain drinks in Happy Meals.
As of 2009[update], McDonald's Australia and New Zealand began offering Frozen Coke as part of their menu. It is available in small, medium or large sizes or a 'Mini Value-Pick' size.New flavors are introduced occasionally, such as Frozen Fanta Grape and Frozen Sprite. Over summer, flavoured syrups have become available, for use with Frozen Sprite. In the 2013/2014 summer, Bubblegum, Pineapple, Wild Grape, Fairy Floss and Apple were available.

Desserts[edit]




McDonald's apple pies



A soft serve ice cream product is available in several forms, including sundaes, cones (either vanilla or chocolate), and as the primary ingredient in the McFlurry. As with many other formulations of soft serve, cellulose gum is utilized as an extender and thickener.[35]

The McFlurry is a soft-serve ice cream dessert that has pieces of candy or cookies mixed into it.[36] The McFlurry was first integrated in the menu at a Bathurst, New Brunswick, Canada franchisee in 1995. The flavors are crushed Oreo, M&M's Minis, Reese's, or Mars, Incorporated candy bars like Snickers, Twix, Galaxy, etc., Cadbury's candy bars like Twirl, Wispa, Creme Egg, Crunchie etc., Nestlé candy bars like Yorkie, Smarties, Drifter, Rolo, Butterfinger, etc. McDonald's also does limited time only flavors, e.g. for Shrek the Third it released the Ogre-Load flavor. In Australia, they had a special range for their 40 years in Australia celebration. The flavors were double choc fudge, bubblegum squash, strawberry crumble and caramel cookie. Also in Malaysia a unique flavor called FuseofmyLife is offered to customers. The mixing blade for the dessert is actually a specially designed spoon with a hollow handle that attaches to the mixer spindle (except in Australia[37] and New Zealand where the staff mix it by hand). The blade is used once then given to the customer to use as an eating utensil. Originally test marketed in Hawaii in 1997,[38] it is now available in most of its markets.[39]


McDonaldland cookies are traditionally available and are similar to animal crackers, except the shapes of the cookies are of Ronald McDonald, Grimace, Birdie the Early Bird, and the Hamburglar, among other McDonaldland characters. In fact, they are manufactured by Keebler, and are just re-branded animal crackers (Elfin Crackers or Our Family Animal Crackers). In Australia, the McDonaldland Cookies are manufactured by Arnotts and are sold in McDonald's restaurants for $1.
Freshly baked cookies manufactured by Nestlé are available in some markets. Among the cookies offered are sugar, oatmeal raisin, or chocolate chip.
McDonald's pies are actually turnovers, and come in apple or, in some markets, cherry and other seasonal or limited-time-only flavors such as pumpkin pie, smores, sweet potato and Holiday pie, and in Hawaii, taro, haupia, banana, and (introduced in 2017) guava. In Canada, in the 1970s, blueberry was standard, as was the Great Fruit Pie. During some seasonal promotions, cherry and strawberry are an available pie flavor in Canada; also, newly featured is Blueberry Maple and Peach. In Thailand, Hawaii and Guam, taro pie is featured occasionally. Other regional flavors include coconut (also known as haupia in Hawaii) and tuna (all in Guam as limited-time), and corn in Japan. In Mexico, Guatemala, Panama, and Costa Rica, cheese pie is available all year round. In Cyprus, strawberry and custard pies are available all year round also, along with the apple one. In Brazil, banana pies are available. In Russia apricot pies are also available.





McDonald's Cinnamon Melts



Cinnamon Melts – a popular cinnamon roll type item with cream cheese icing.
Brownie melts – Similar to the Cinnamon melt, only chocolate flavored with fudge and cream cheese icing on top. Available only in selected markets.
The Fruit and Yogurt Parfait – a mix of frozen strawberries and blueberries and vanilla yogurt, sold with a package of granola topping.
Smoothies are available in some locations in either Blueberry Pomegranate, Strawberry Banana, or Mango-Pineapple flavors. In the test market areas, smoothies were introduced in 2009.
In 2012, McDonald's Australia and New Zealand began offering a 'McFloat'. It contained Frozen Coke and/or the promotional frozen beverage, a small amount of soft serve and a lot of ice. In Australia, the Frozen Coke 'McSpider' has also been purveyed, which consists of frozen Coke and soft serve ice cream.[40]

Former items[edit]





This section possibly contains original research. Please improve it by verifying the claims made and adding inline citations. Statements consisting only of original research should be removed. (October 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Angus burgers – Four types: the Angus Deluxe (American cheese, sliced red onions and sliced red tomatoes, iceberg lettuce, pickles, mustard, and mayonnaise); Angus Mushroom and Swiss (sautéed mushrooms, Swiss cheese and mayonnaise); Angus Bacon and Cheese (bacon, American cheese, sliced red onions, mustard, ketchup and pickles); and the Angus Chipotle BBQ Bacon (chipotle sauce, red onions, pickles, bacon, and American cheese). In Australia and New Zealand, there are three Angus burgers sold; The Grand Angus (which is a clone of the Angus Deluxe) and the Mighty Angus (which resembles the Angus Cheese and Bacon, but with no pickles and mayonnaise and onion relish replacing the ketchup and mustard). For a limited time only, the Angus The Third, similar to the Grand Angus, but with no mustard and made with a tomato chilli relish and only one slice of cheese. Also, for a limited time, Angus the Great was sold, a clone of the Angus Mushroom and Swiss. In October 2012, an Angus version of the Cheddar Bacon Onion (CBO) Sandwich was made available,[41] consisting of a horseradish-like sauce, grilled caramelized onions, bacon and cheddar cheese. In May 2013, McDonald's stopped selling the Angus burger.[42][43] Two years later the third-pound burgers returned (known as Sirloin Third Pound Burgers), but as a limited-time promotion. It comes in three sandwiches: Bacon & Cheese, Lettuce & Tomato, and Steakhouse. The Angus Burgers are still available in Canada and some markets in Latin America.
Arch Deluxe – An attempt to produce a "luxury" hamburger, promoted by a high-profile advertising campaign (introduced in 1996), today considered one of the most expensive failures in McDonald's history. It featured a honey mustard-type sauce,[44] quarter-pound beef patty on a potato roll, with leaf lettuce, tomato, red onion, and cheese; peppered bacon was also offered for an extra charge. The Arch Deluxe was accompanied with three other burgers at the time, the Crispy Chicken Deluxe (later renamed the Crispy Chicken Sandwich), the Grilled Chicken Deluxe (later renamed the Chicken McGrill), and the Fish Filet Deluxe (since discontinued along with the Arch Deluxe itself).
Barry Burger – A double bacon cheeseburger with onions and barbecue sauce named after football player Barry Sanders, sold mainly in his home state of Kansas.[citation needed]
BBQ Chicken – A toasted bun featuring shredded chicken and zesty BBQ sauce.[citation needed]
Beef Wennington – A burger solely offered in the Chicago area in 1998–99, named after former Chicago Bulls player Bill Wennington. It featured a single patty topped with cheese, onions, barbecue sauce and a slice of Canadian bacon.[45]
Chopped Beefsteak Sandwich – test-marketed in various markets across the United States in 1980 as part of a McDonald's "Dinner Menu", offered only after 4:00 p.m. The Chopped Beefsteak Sandwich was essentially an elongated hamburger of a different quality served on a short French roll, similar to a sub or hero roll. Packets of steak sauce (A1 sauce in Chicago) were available for the sandwich.[citation needed]
Big 33 or McJordan Special – A quarter pound burger with bacon and special barbecue sauce named after basketball players Larry Bird and Michael Jordan, respectively.
Boselli Burger – Jacksonville, Florida, franchises also featured the Triple-Double Burger in 1998, named after Jacksonville Jaguars tackle Tony Boselli.[46]
Bratwurst – For a few years during the 1990s and in 2002, Johnsonville brand bratwurst on a hot dog-like roll was sold in some US markets for a limited time each fall. A few locations in Eastern Wisconsin, which is the major market for the Sheboygan County-based company still offer bratwursts on a seasonal basis.
Buffalo Ranch McChicken (also the Hot 'n Spicy).
Catfish Sandwich – A sandwich made with a catfish patty, lettuce, and tangy sauce and sold on a McRib-style bun. Sold at McDonald's locations in Kentucky, Tennessee, Alabama, Arkansas, and Mississippi for a brief period in March 1991.[47]
Cheddar Melt – a quarter pound beef patty smothered with grilled onions (sauteed in butter and teriyaki), then topped with cheddar cheese sauce on a light rye bun, offered in 1988, the 1990s, 2004, and 2007. They are still available in Brazil under the name Cheddar McMelt.[48]
Chicken Fajitas – The Chicken Fajitas consisted of a small soft tortilla, a grilled vegetable medley, and grilled chicken. The fajita was in the traditional thin wrapping paper. These are still available in British Columbia, Saskatchewan, Nova Scotia, Newfoundland (at certain locations), Alberta (at select locations in the Edmonton area) and at all non-Walmart McDonald's in Ontario.[citation needed]
Chicken McBites – popcorn chicken breast with "home-style seasoning" offered through April 20, 2012 in 3-ounce, 5-ounce and 10-ounce versions. Dipping sauces include Ranch, Sweet n' Sour, Tangy BBQ, Chipotle BBQ, Honey Mustard,[49] Spicy Buffalo, and Sweet Chili.[citation needed]
Chicken Parmesan Sandwich – A chicken breast covered in bread crumbs and topped with tomato sauce and mozzarella on a toasted bun.[citation needed]
Chicken Platter – A grilled chicken burger served with lettuce and tomato on the HotCakes tray.[citation needed]





Chicken Selects



Chicken Selects – McDonald's version of chicken strips. They were introduced in early 1998 and offered again as a permanent part of the menu in late October 2003. They are sold in 3-, 5-, or 10-piece sizes and include choices of spicy buffalo, creamy ranch, honey mustard, and chipotle barbecue dipping sauces; sauce selections in the UK are smokey barbecue, sour cream and sweet chili sauce.[50] Sold in the United States, Canada, Israel and the UK. Available in Australia under the name Chicken McDippers.[51] McDonald's stopped selling Chicken Selects in the United States in February 2013,[52][53] but they returned to the menu on February 25, 2015 for a limited engagement and were renamed Chicken Select Tenders. Chicken Selects are still sold at McDonald's restaurants in the United Kingdom and Ireland.
Corn Dog McNuggets – For a brief time in 1991, McDonald's locations in Richmond, Virginia offered a multi-pack of mini corn dogs without sticks. They were offered again in 2002 as the "Mini Corn Dogs".
Cuban Sandwich – Roast pork and ham sandwich on a long roll with Swiss cheese, mustard, and pickles. One of several Hispanic-inspired menu items briefly sold at South Florida units in 2001.[54]
Derby Burger – A single patty hamburger with American Cheese, lettuce, tomato, ketchup, mayonnaise, and bacon. It was a regional item sold in the mid-1990s in Louisville, Kentucky only during the spring to coincide with the Kentucky Derby. Discontinued in the early 2000s (decade).
Diet Coke Float and Coke Float – In 1991 McDonald's ran a limited time promotion selling a float made with Diet Coke or Coke with low-fat soft-serve frozen yogurt in a collectable Coke bell glass. It sold for $1.59 with 40 cents from every sale donated to Ronald McDonald Children's Charities.[55]
Dinner Menu – After testing pasta in the South in 1989, McDonald's began testing a pasta-based menu at 40 units across Rochester, New York, in September 1991, including lasagna, fettuccine alfredo, and spaghetti with meatballs. In the early 1990s, a new Dinner Menu was tested for 6–12 months at two locations in New York and Tennessee. It consisted of the pizza mentioned below but also included lasagna, spaghetti, fettuccine alfredo, and roasted chicken as entrees. The side dishes included mashed potatoes with gravy and a vegetable medley.[citation needed] For the dessert, it included a brownie à la mode or peanut butter pie.[25][56]
Eggs Benedict McMuffin – Canadian style bacon, egg, special breakfast sauce, and American cheese on a toasted English muffin.
Fried Roast Beef Sandwich – In 1968 this product was launched targeting adults. Sold with a package of McDonald's BBQ sauce on the side using the slogan "McDonald's is my kind of place"; it was inspired by a franchisee's version of an Arby's sandwich. The sandwich failed due to the costs of getting roast beef slicers; no matter how many sandwiches they could sell, it would never turn a profit.[1]
Grilled Cheese Happy Meal – There was a Happy Meal introduced during the early part of the 2000s (decade) that contained a grilled cheese sandwich. It was discontinued the same summer it was released but is still sold in some Canadian markets.
Grilled Chicken Flatbread Sandwich – Grilled chicken strips, lettuce, tomato, grilled onions, pepper jack cheese, and a creamy herb sauce served wrapped in a heated flatbread. Served briefly in June 2002, and again from December 27, 2002 until February 9, 2003.
Happy Meal Breakfast – The Happy Meal Breakfast was a meal that was smaller than the traditional breakfast that lasted from the 1980s to 2009. It was discontinued by advice of the Nutrition department at the Corporate Headquarters in Oak Brook, Illinois, but is still sold in Hong Kong.
Home Fried Chicken – During 1968 McDonald's sold deep fried chicken (similar to KFC). Targeting parents who could not choose between burgers and chicken, McDonald's delivered home fried chicken served with distinct packaging. The white chicken meat was sold in light gold packages (for adults) and catering to the children – the dark chicken meat was sold in dark foil packages. TV slogan was... "so everyone can have just what they want ... McDonald's Strives to Reunite the American Family" (note the US was struggling with domestic civil unrest due to the combined social upheaval of the Vietnam War and the civil rights movement)
Hot dogs – In 1937, hot dogs were the first things sold in McDonald's. Then in CEO Ray Kroc's 1977 autobiography, he prohibited the company from selling hot dogs, regardless of potential demand, as he regarded them as unhygienic; however, hot dogs were reintroduced in 1995 at some Midwestern located stores (at the option of the franchise-holder) as a summer item. UK stores sold hot dogs during 2002 on the McChoice menu (later PoundSaver) and as a seasonal menu item in the summer of 1999. Also, at least one American restaurant offered Oscar Mayer hot dogs at some time, notably in Bethel Park, Pennsylvania, and McDonald's locations at Toronto Metro Zoo and SkyDome in Toronto offered hot dogs until 1999. Starting in the year 2007, a few McDonald's began selling Hot Dogs in central Pennsylvania due to popular demand from local sports fans. They can be found at 12 locations as of 2011[update]. In Tokyo locations, hot dogs were available from 1990 until 2004, and have been reintroduced one more for 2009, dubbed the "McHot Dog". McDonald's locations in Chile also sold hot dogs for a brief period in 2004.
Hot Ham 'N Cheese – Sliced ham, American cheese, lettuce and tomato on a triple split, sesame seed bun with a choice of mayonnaise or honey mustard sauce.
Hulaburger – A Ray Kroc invention, it featured a slice of pineapple instead of meat. Originally intended for Roman Catholics who are not allowed to eat meat on Fridays during Lent. It was test-marketed in 1963 alongside the Filet-O-Fish sandwich, with the highest seller being added to the menu full-time (the Filet-O-Fish, a creation of an Ohio franchiser, won).[57]
Italian Doubles – A limited summer promotion in Canada in 1989. Two regular patties on a hamburger bun with 1 slice of mozzarella cheese & marinara sauce.
Kiwiburger – In the 1990s, New Zealand sold a burger reflecting their national icon the Kiwi. It was a single beef patty hamburger, with egg (identical to the egg in McMuffins), cheese, lettuce, tomato, beetroot, onions, ketchup ("tomato sauce") and American mustard. It came in distinctive packaging with 46 classic kiwi quotes, kiwiana, and kiwi sporting icons, which were also used in promotions of the burger.[58] Complications with the cooking of the egg and the use of certain ingredients, that no other McDonald's burger had, saw the Kiwiburger discontinued. It has occasionally returned to the menu for limited times since.
McChicken LT (McDonald's Chicken Lettuce and Tomato) was the chicken version of the McDLT featuring the same two-sided container as the McDLT except the packaging was yellow instead of white. It was introduced about the same time as the McDLT in the mid-1980s. The chicken was a grilled, unbreaded chicken breast placed on the heel of the bun in one of the compartments. The toppings were shredded lettuce, tomato and mayonnaise assembled on the top half of the bun in the other compartment. Cheese was an optional addition for an extra US$0.10. The grilled chicken breast was then basted with a brushing of melted butter. As with the McDLT, the consumer would finalize preparation of the sandwich by combining the hot and cool sides just prior to eating. The McChicken LT was discontinued in the Fall of 1987.
McDLT – The McDLT (McDonald's Lettuce and Tomato) was sold in a novel form of packaging.[59] The McDLT was introduced in the fall of 1984 as the Lettuce and Tomato Special. The meat and bottom half of the bun were prepared separately from the lettuce, tomato, American cheese, pickles, sauces, and top half of the bun. Both were then packaged into a specially designed two-sided styrofoam container. The consumer was then expected to finalize preparation of the sandwich by combining the hot and cool sides just prior to eating. It was discontinued between December 1990 and January 1991 due to environmental concerns with styrofoam.
McDonald's Own Chocolaty Chip Cookie - mini-chocolate chip cookies which came in a small rectangular box
McDonaldland Cookies - cookies shaped like the McDonald's characters. originally came in a white box with a handle and later smaller rectangular boxes with cartoon images
McDouble Cruncher – two patties with a slice of cheese, chipotle BBQ sauce and crispy onions
McGrilled Chicken Classic – A sandwich featuring a grilled chicken breast portion that was introduced in September 1993 and was produced before being replaced by the Grilled Chicken Deluxe/Chicken McGrill.
McLean Deluxe – A lower-calorie Quarter Pounder-type sandwich (introduced in 1991) containing 90% lean beef and 10% water with carrageenan, a seaweed extract, to hold the water and beef together.[60] This item was otherwise identical to the Big N' Tasty and the McDLT.
McRye – a hamburger on rye bread sold in Finland in late 1990s.
McSoup – Campbell's Soup sold at McDonald's available in Broccoli & Cheese and Chicken Noodle. (This product is only sold in winter months in select markets)
McStuffin – a pocket sandwich available with various fillings. McStuffins were sold for a short time in 1993 and were discontinued that same year due to not having a lot of popularity.
McWraps – Inspired in the Mexican burritos Chicken Caesar, Chicken and Garden Salad wraps served toasted in a thick herb flat bread. McWraps is still offered in some parts of Europe(for instance in Denmark and Croatia).
Mighty Wings – deep-fried spicy chicken wings. McDonald's began selling these in 1990 as an optional item and stopped selling them in 2003. They are still sold in China, Spain, Samoa, and the U.S. Virgin Island of St Croix as of March 6, 2010. Also sold as McWings in Pakistan, they were discontinued for a while but relaunched. On September 9, 2013, McDonald's brought the Mighty Wings back to its menus in all of its American restaurants as a limited time offer available until November 2013. The Mighty Wings did not sell well its second time around in the U.S. The main problems cited with the Mighty Wings was the price point versus the amount purchased. Compared with competitors, the pricing was determined to be too high, but McDonald's stated that due to overruns in purchasing, the company could not sell them at lower prices without losing money. On February 24, 2014, McDonald's decided to put them back on the menu for a limited engagement to liquidate the remaining inventory at a lower price in all U.S. locations.
Mozzarella sticks - 3 fried cheesesticks with marinara sauce on the side. Was on the Dollar Menu & More menu from December 2015 to March 2016.
Onion Nuggets – introduced at the same time as the Beefsteak Sandwich as the side item for the Dinner Menu. Onion Nuggets were chopped onions shaped into small solid pieces, dipped in batter and deep-fried.
Philly Cheesesteak – Slices of steak and Swiss cheese with onions. Served until August 2007 at Australian and American McDonald's. This sandwich is still available in Canada, made with cheese spread and green bell pepper.
Pizza / McPizza – McDonald's has also attempted pizza at various times,[25][56] with an apple-pie–like McPizza and more conventional McDonald's Pizza. A line of personal-sized pizzas was first seen in the late 1970s in test-market stores near interstate highways around Milwaukee and Madison. In Canada (c. 1992–99), the pizza originally began as a family-sized pizza that was brought out to the table by an employee and placed on a raised rack in the centre of the table. Later it was scaled down to a personal-sized pizza. However, variations have found their way into some international markets such as India (the pie-like "Pizza McPuff"). McDonald's also test marketed a 14-inch, round, traditional-style pizza in Evansville, Indiana, and nearby Owensboro, Kentucky, in 1989.[61] By 1991, the McDonald's test markets for pizza had grown to over 500 McDonald's locations before the pizza test was placed on hold.[62] Pizza was discontinued in most restaurants by 2000. The reason for eliminating the pizza from the menu was that the time to cook a pizza took 11 minutes, and McDonald's wanted to keep its reputation for fast service. As of March 2017, two McDonald's locations, one in Pomeroy, Ohio, and the other in Spencer, West Virginia still offer the family style McPizza.[63]
Roast Beef on a Roll – A roast beef sandwich made just like the Arby's roast beef sandwich. Sold in 1968.
Root Beer Float – A combination of vanilla soft-serve ice cream and root beer.
Salad Shakers – A salad of lettuce, croutons and other vegetable in a tall dome shaped plastic container. Salad Shakers were introduced in the spring of 2000 and are still available in the Netherlands.
Son of Mac – Also known as the Mini Mac or Baby Mac, a version with only one patty and no centre roll piece. It sold as a Baby Mac in New Zealand, was sold in Australia, now discontinued. Served by some stores in the United States under the moniker "Mac Jr". It's still sold in places in Canada, known as the "kid's mac".
Southern Fried-Chicken – Was sold in Australia up until mid-1986. This was available as a 2 piece (or 3 piece) pack including French Fries. This was replaced by the current McNugget range, as the nuggets became cheaper to produce and safer to cook.
Spanish Omelet Bagel – existed during the mid to late 2000s, discontinued.
Spicy Chicken – Chicken breast with spicy breading introduced in 2006. (Still offered in some U.S. markets.)
Strawberry Shortcake McFlurry – Vanilla soft-serve ice cream with strawberry topping and Vanilla Cookie pieces mixed together.
Superhero Burger – Featuring 3 patties, yellow American cheese, white American cheese, tomato, lettuce, onion, and mayo all laid out on an elongated bun like a hero sandwich. The burger was released as part of the "Taste of the Month" series that McDonald's ran in 1995 where they had a new burger every month. The Superhero Burger was also tied into the promo campaign for the film Batman Forever and the ads for it featured Batman and the Batmobile.
Torta – In 2000, the company released their own version of tortas, a Mexican sandwich, in southern California on a trial basis.
Triple Ripple – A mixed cone with strawberry, vanilla, and chocolate, topped with a plastic top.[1]
Triple-Double Burger – A burger featuring 3 beef patties and 2 slices of cheese, served on the same 6 inch (15.2 cm) sesame seed roll as the McRib. It was originally marketed as the Superhero Burger to promote the release of the 1995 film Batman Forever. It was also sold under the names of local sports stars in at least five markets in the 1990s and in the Cleveland area in the early 2000s (decade):

The Hockey Hero burger, in Canada.
The Jason Kidd Burger – Downtown Phoenix, Arizona, franchises had a Limited Time Offer burger named after NBA player Jason Kidd, while he played for the Phoenix Suns.
The Michael Dean Perry burger, for the then Cleveland Browns star.
The Rory Sparrow burger was sold in the Sacramento area. It was named after the Sacramento Kings star.
Thome Triple was sold in the Cleveland, Ohio area. It was named after Cleveland Indians first baseman Jim Thome


Upside Down Iced Tea – A new cup tested at select locations in the southeast United States in the late 1990s. It featured an ice compartment at top of the cup to keep the beverage cold. It was quickly discontinued.
Szechuan Sauce, created to promote the Disney film, Mulan (1998 film). It was thrust back into the cultural spotlight after being referenced numerous times in the Season 3 premiere of Adult Swim animated comedy Rick and Morty.

See also[edit]


Food portal



List of Burger King products

References[edit]


^ a b c Love, John F. (1995). McDonald's: Behind the Arches (Revised ed.). New York: Bantam Books. ISBN 0553347594. 
^ a b Buiso, Gary (2012-12-02). "More burning questions about NYC answered | New York Post". Nypost.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Menu: Our Full McDonald's Food Menu | McDonald's". Mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Artz, Matthew (December 31, 2009). "Fremont's 'hamburger king' dead at 81". Oakland Tribune. Retrieved January 12, 2010. 
^ "ACCUEIL". McDonald's France. 
^ AP Newswire (July 2, 1997). "McDonald's hoping new burger a Whopper stopper". The Augusta Chronicle. Archived from the original on October 30, 2007. Retrieved October 23, 2007. 
^ a b c d Wong, Venessa (March 12, 2014). "After Year of Flubs, McDonald's Loses Its Taste for Novelty". Bloomberg Business. Retrieved March 3, 2015. 
^ "麥當勞 意想不到嘅嚐試". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Product Nutrition". McDonalds.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's 1955 Burger Review - Burger Lad - Burger Reviews". Burger Lad. 2013-10-16. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ John Reynolds (2011-08-25). "McDonald's cooks up 'no-nonsense' 1955 burger for the UK". Marketingmagazine.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Little, Katie (November 24, 2015). "McDonald's breakfast burger mashup debuts". CNBC. NBC News. Retrieved November 25, 2015. 
^ a b "McDonalds - Artisan Grilled Chicken". News.mcdonalds.com. 2015-04-06. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ http://www.aef.com/images/diversity/burrell/snack_wrap_case_study.pdf
^ "North County News - San Diego Union Tribune". Nctimes.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ McDonald's Australia reveals new Chicken Menu[permanent dead link]
^ "MacPride.Net - Kaufman Enterprises - Promotions". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Chicken Maharaja Mac". www.mcdonaldsindia.net. Mc Donalds India. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ "Chicken McBites". Mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Tasty Basket 30 pezzi | McDonald's Italia" (in (in Italian)). M.mcdonalds.it. 2012-12-03. Retrieved 2017-07-13. CS1 maint: Unrecognized language (link)
^ Clark, Paul (February 20, 2007). "No fish story: Sandwich saved his McDonald's". USA Today. Retrieved April 17, 2009. 
^ Eisenberg, Daniel (September 25, 2002). "Can McDonald's Shape Up?". Time. 
^ Velasco, Schuyler (August 21, 2013). "10 fast foods that have disappeared: McLobster". Christian Science Monitor. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 
^ Spencer Ross. "A connoisseur's guide to downtown poutine - a & e". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ a b c Velasco, Schuyler (August 21, 2013). "10 fast foods that have disappeared: 4. McSpaghetti". Christian Science Monitor. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 
^ "Forays of a Finance Foodie: McDonald's Steps Up Their Style: New Product Preview Day! [New York]". Financefoodie.com. 2010-06-08. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ [1][dead link]
^ "McDonalds Testing Garlic Fries". Time.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Harding, Luke (28 December 2000). "Give me a Big Mac - but hold the beef". The Guardian. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ "Maharaja Mac - Veg and Chicken options". www.mcdonaldsindia.net. Mc Donalds India. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ mcdonalds.com.ph. "Ourfood". McDonalds. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's: You Deserve A Hash Brown All Day". NPR.org. 2015-09-02. Retrieved 2016-03-07. 
^ snopes (March 7, 2016). "McDonald's Shakes : snopes.com". snopes. Retrieved March 7, 2016. 
^ "Triple Thick MilkshakeÂ®". McDonalds.ca. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's USA – USA Core Menu Items by Ingredients". McDonald's Corporation. Archived from the original on April 26, 2009. Retrieved May 29, 2009. 
^ "McDonald's Nutrition Calculator | McDonald's" (PDF). Nutrition.mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Why don't you mix the mcflurry anymore like you used to?". December 10, 2013. Retrieved June 21, 2014. 
^ "A McFlurry of tasty ideas". Honolulu Star-Bulletin. August 13, 1998. Retrieved June 12, 2012. 
^ "Steve McFlurry USPTO trademark information". United States Patent and Trademark Office. December 19, 1997. Retrieved September 1, 2006. 
^ "Large Frozen McSpider Coke | Drinks Menu | McDonald's AU". Mcdonalds.com.au. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McShakeup". The Huffington Post. March 1, 2013. 
^ Candice Choi, AP. "McDonald's cuts Angus burgers from menu". Usatoday.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "R.I.P. McDonald's Angus Third Pounder". The Huffington Post. May 9, 2013. Retrieved October 18, 2013. 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Elliott Harris. "Beefing up his role – Bulls' Wennington latest burger celebrity". Chicago Sun-Times. March 8, 1998. Sports, 14.
^ Times, The (1998-08-16). "Jaguars: Advertising war games have definitely begun 08/16/98". Jacksonville.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "The Press-Courier". McDonalds testing catfish. 14 February 1991. Retrieved 13 July 2017. 
^ "McD brings back Cheddar Melt | Nation's Restaurant News | Find Articles at BNET". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Unveils Chicken McBites". Los Angeles Times. January 25, 2012. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's USA - USA Core Menu Items by Ingredients". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's chicken snack a hit". Azcentral.com. 2007-01-30. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ February 28, 2013 (2013-02-28). "Bid Adieu To Chicken Selects As McDonald’s Makes Room On The Menu For Newer Items – Consumerist". Consumerist.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's dropping Fruit & Walnut Salad, Chicken Selects in U.S.". Reuters. 
^ "Mcdonald's Tries Adding Hispanic Fare To Fast Food - tribunedigital-orlandosentinel". Articles.orlandosentinel.com. 2001-10-28. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Floats offered at McDonalds". Beaver County Times. 22 May 1991. p. 14. Retrieved 12 July 2017. 
^ a b McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Kiwi Burger television advertisement – New Zealand Film Archive". Archived from the original on July 14, 2011. Retrieved October 15, 2010. 
^ US 4653685 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Chaudhry, Rajan (July 31, 1989). "McPizza? McDonald's widens pizza test: pizza operators gird for assault". Nation's Restaurant News. Findarticles.com. Retrieved November 13, 2009. 
^ Prewitt, Milford (October 7, 1991). "McDonald's developing separate dinner menu, puts pizza test on hold". Nation's Restaurant News. Findarticles.com. Archived from the original on May 1, 2009. Retrieved February 28, 2009. 
^ Pemberton, Becky (2016-03-10). "Ohio and West Virginia McDonald's are still selling MCPIZZA | Daily Mail Online". Dailymail.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 


External links[edit]

 Media related to McDonald's products at Wikimedia Commons
"McPizza! – Tasting the elusive McDonald's Pizza". Science Tortilla (YouTube). March 14, 2015.  – Video on a taste test of a McPizza from one of the two locations still selling it.
McGrath, Jane. "5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items". HowStuffWorks, Inc. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 







v
t
e


McDonald's






History
Advertising

ad programs


Countries with franchises
Legal cases
Product list
International availability





People



Richard and Maurice McDonald
Ray Kroc
Joan Kroc
Ralph Alvarez
Charlie Bell
Al Bernardin
Jim Cantalupo
George Cohon
Dan Coudreaut
Steve Easterbrook
Janice L. Fields
Den Fujita
Don Gorske
Jack M. Greenberg
Eikō Harada
June Martino
Herb Peterson
Michael R. Quinlan
Ed Rensi
Willard Scott
James A. Skinner
Donald N. Smith
Harry J. Sonneborn
Don Thompson
Fred L. Turner





Company



Hamburger University
Leaps and Bounds
McBarge
McCafé
McDonald's #1 Store Museum
McDonald's (Will Rogers Turnpike)
Oldest McDonald's restaurant
Rock N Roll McDonald's
Ronald McDonald House Charities





Products




Beef



Big Mac
Big N' Tasty
Deluxe line
Kiwiburger
Quarter Pounder (McRoyal)





Chicken



Chicken McNuggets
McChicken





Other



Deli Choices
Filet-O-Fish
Georgie Pie
Happy Meal
McArabia
McGriddles
McMuffin
McRib
Premium line
Shamrock Shake





Former



Arch Deluxe
McAfrika








Advertising




Campaigns



Changeables
Global Gladiators
Golden Arches
Mac Tonight
McDonaldland
McDonald's Monopoly
McDonald's Treasure Land Adventure
M.C. Kids
McKids
Ronald McDonald
Teenie Beanies
The Wacky Adventures of Ronald McDonald





Sponsorships



Kyle Larson (NASCAR)
Jamie McMurray (NASCAR)
Graham Rahal (IndyCar Series)
McDonald's All-American Game
McDonald's Championship
McDonald's Championship (golf)
McDonald's Cycle Center
McDonald's Gospelfest
McDonald's Olympic Swim Stadium





Related



Burger wars
Donald Land
Fast food advertising
Mac and Me (1988 film)
McDonald's sign (Pine Bluff, Arkansas)
Supersize








Branches



Canada
Israel
New Zealand





Criticism



Fast Food Nation (film)
McDonaldization
McDonald's Videogame
McJob
McRefugee
McLibel
Maxime, McDuff & McDo
Super Size Me

Don't Eat This Book







Legal cases



Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants
Magee v. McDonald's
McDonald's Restaurants v. Morris & Steel
Sid & Marty Krofft Television Productions Inc. v. McDonald's Corp.





Related



McDelivery
Big Mac Index
Bill Elliott
McDonald's Young Entertainers
McWords
San Ysidro McDonald's massacre
"Seriously McDonalds"
Sydney River McDonald's murders
Taiwan McDonald's bombings
Urban legends
Boom, Like That
The Founder (2016 film)










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=List_of_McDonald%27s_products&oldid=791067944"					
Categories: Lists of brand name foodsMcDonald's foodsHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksArticles with Italian-language external linksCS1 maint: Unrecognized languageArticles with dead external links from July 2017Wikipedia articles needing copy edit from July 2017All articles needing copy editArticles that may contain original research from July 2017All articles that may contain original researchArticles needing additional references from July 2017All articles needing additional referencesWikipedia articles needing page number citations from July 2017All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2014Articles with unsourced statements from December 2014Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2009All articles containing potentially dated statementsArticles that may contain original research from October 2012Articles with unsourced statements from July 2017Articles with unsourced statements from March 2009Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2011 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


日本語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 23:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









List of McDonald's products - Wikipedia





















 






List of McDonald's products

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search







This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article may require copy editing for grammar, style, cohesion, tone, or spelling. You can assist by editing it. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article possibly contains original research. Please improve it by verifying the claims made and adding inline citations. Statements consisting only of original research should be removed. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)





Contents


1 Beef burgers
2 Chicken
3 Fish
4 Pork
5 Other products
6 Breakfast
7 Beverages
8 Desserts
9 Former items
10 See also
11 References
12 External links



Beef burgers[edit]
All beef patties are seasoned, consisting primarily of salt and minced pepper.

Hamburger (formerly known as the Junior Burger in some countries) and cheeseburger – a 1.6-ounce (45 g) ground beef patty, with 0.125 ounces (3.5 g) ketchup, mustard, a single dill pickle, re-hydrated onions, on a toasted bun. At one time early in McDonald's history, the pickle was removed from the sandwich.[1][page needed] In all or much of the New York City area, it is served without mustard.[2] Also sold as a double or triple, adding an extra pickle slice for each beef patty added. A triple burger and a bacon double cheeseburger are optional items and are not always available in all restaurants or markets. In Australia the average serving size for a Cheeseburger is 110 grams. The hamburger and the cheeseburger are the company's original grilled burger offerings, having been served as part of the 1948 menu.[3]
Big Mac – a signature product that was introduced in 1968. Two 1.6-ounce (45 g) (approx. uncooked weight) ground beef patties, special Big Mac sauce (similar to Thousand Island dressing), lettuce, cheese, pickles, and diced onions on a sesame seed bun, with an additional middle bun (called a "club layer") separating the beef patties. The Grand Mac, its bigger-size counterpart, was added in December 2016.
Quarter Pounder – a 4.25-ounce (120.5 g) (originally 4-ounce (113.4 g) until 2015) (approx. uncooked weight) ground beef patty with ketchup, mustard, chopped onions, pickle, and two slices of cheese. As with burgers made with the smaller 1.6-ounce patties, the Quarter Pounder is prepared without mustard in all or a large portion of the New York City region.[2] It was invented by Al Bernardin, a franchise owner and former McDonald's Vice President of product development, at his McDonald's in Fremont, California, in 1971.[4] In some markets unfamiliar with Imperial measurements (such as France), it is known as a Royal Cheese, or variants thereof, such as McRoyale.[5] It is also available as the Double Quarter Pounder with Cheese, which includes another patty of the same proportions. In 2013, McDonald's expanded the sandwich into a line with three additional variants to make them smaller versions of the Angus Burgers, which was renamed the Taste-Crafted Burgers in 2016 in West Coast markets and later expanded to other U.S. markets in January 2017, the latest added being the Signature Sriracha, which was replaced by Sweet Barbecue Bacon by May.
Big N' Tasty/Big Tasty – the Big N' Tasty, introduced in 1997, was a 4-ounce (113 g) beef patty with ketchup, cheese, mayonnaise with a grill diced onions, pickles, leaf lettuce, and tomatoes. It was devised to resemble Burger King's Whopper sandwich.[6] It is also known as the Big Xtra in Slovenia and most of Canada; the McXtra in Quebec, Canada; the McFeast Deluxe in Australia; the Big Tasty (without the 'N') in Brazil, Bulgaria, France, Germany, Italy (without ketchup), Ireland, The Netherlands, Poland, Russia, Sweden, the United Kingdom; the Quarter Pounder Deluxe in South Africa; and the McNifica (a play on Spanish magnifica, 'wonderful') in Mexico and Latin America. The Big Tasty configuration is somewhat different, consisting of a third-pound (150 g) beef patty, sesame seed bun, lettuce, tomatoes, onions, Emmental cheese, and Big Tasty sauce (which has a smoke flavor). The Big Tasty Bacon variant also contains strips of bacon. This variant was sold in the US until 2009; it is now sold internationally only.
Double Cheeseburger – two 1.6-ounce (45 g) ground beef patties, with 0.125 ounces (3.5 g) ketchup, mustard (except in all or much of the New York City area), two slices of dill pickle, re-hydrated onions, and two pieces of cheese on a toasted bun. The double cheeseburger was offered as a promotional item in the 1950s, and was added to the regular menu in 1965. An official variant is offered in the U.S. state of New Mexico, called the Green Chile Double Cheeseburger, topped with roasted green New Mexico chile peppers.





The McDouble



McDouble – similar to a Double Cheeseburger, but with just one slice of cheese. Reintroduced as a permanent dollar-menu item in December 2008 – had been a short-term product in 1997, advertised with "Eddie the Echo." The original McDouble did not have cheese and was garnished with lettuce and tomatoes rather than the pickles and onions on the 2008 version.
Bacon McDouble – a sandwich that is similar to the McDouble, but it has two pieces of Applewood smoked bacon added to it. This sandwich was added to the U.S. "Dollar Menu & More" in November 2013.[7]
Daily Double – similar to the McDouble, however the toppings are slightly different. The Daily Double is made with a little bit of lettuce, tomato, slivered onions, and mayonnaise. It also has only one slice of cheese, like the McDouble, rather than the two slices that are on the double cheeseburger. In 2011 and 2012, the item was test marketed in various regional locations.
McFeast – a hamburger with lettuce, tomato, pickles and mayonnaise, in most markets from April 1977. The name McFeast lives on though in Scandinavian countries, where a McFeast has been served since the mid-1980s in Sweden and was later introduced to the rest of the Nordic countries; the McFeast in Sweden contains a quarter pounder patty, lettuce, modified mayonnaise with lemon juice, onion and tomato. In the rest of the countries, the McFeast also contains ketchup, but not in Sweden. The same burger was sold under the name Mega Feast in New Zealand for several years during the 1990s, but has since been discontinued. The McFeast Deluxe was sold in Australia until the late 1990s and contained: mustard, ketchup, large onions, McFeast Deluxe sauce, lettuce, a tomato slice, regular cheese and a quarter pounder patty served in a Quarter Pounder/McChicken Bun. It returned to the Australian menu in 2009 and in August 2011 using the same ingredients, however contained McChicken sauce in place of the original 'McFeast Deluxe' sauce. The McFeast has been sold in Germany and Austria since the 1990s, named "Hamburger Royal TS" (T for "Tomate" (tomato); S for "Salat", the German word for lettuce). It contains a quarter-pounder patty, lettuce, tomatoes, onions, cheese and the McChicken mayo sauce. For special occasions, it is sold in Germany as a "McFresh" which also contains cucumber slices.
Ranger Burger and Super Ranger[8]
1955 Burger – this burger inspired by 1955 (according to the official site) contains beef, bacon, lettuce, tomatoes, caramelized onions, ketchup and McDonald's smoky sauce (barbecue). Named after the year the fast-food chain was incorporated by Ray Kroc, the burger is popular in European markets, including Spain, Italy and Germany. It was released in 2011 and re-released in 2013 in the UK.[9][10][11]
BBQ Ranch Burger[7] – a very sweet hamburger containing one all-beef patty, cheddar cheese, BBQ Ranch sauce, and tortilla strips,[citation needed] added to the U.S. "Dollar Menu and More" in November 2013.[7]
McSpicy Burger – a very spicy chicken breast, lettuce, cheese and hot sauce-laced mayo, served as the McSpicy Shake Shake Meal, complete with fries.[citation needed]
Bacon Clubhouse – a burger consisting of one quarter-pound patty, lettuce, tomato, and special sauce served on an "artisan roll". This core item was added to the menu the week of March 12, 2014.[7]
Jalapeño Double – similar to the McDouble, except it contains two types of jalapeño peppers, pickled and crispy, plus a slice of white cheddar cheese between the two burger patties, and buttermilk ranch sauce, added to the Dollar Menu in April 2014.[citation needed]
Triple Cheeseburger – similar to the Double Cheeseburger, except it contains three burger patties, with a slice of American cheese between each patty, plus ketchup, mustard (except in all or much of the New York City area), onion, and dill pickle. This was added to the Dollar Menu in December 2014.[citation needed]
ChiTown Classic – a regional offering that was one of two finalist out of 100s of entries in the "Chicagoland Burger Build Off" competition to develop a breakfast-dinner mashup burger in 2015. The burger was placed on the menu on Chicago area locations starting Mid-November until December 27, 2015. The burger adds breakfast's Canadian bacon and applewood smoked bacon.[12]

Chicken[edit]

McChicken – a mildly spicy chicken sandwich, offered in a spicier variant as the Hot n' Spicy in some markets. Made from 100% ground white meat chicken, mayonnaise, and shredded lettuce, on a toasted bun. A full-size version was introduced in 1980, later removed, and reintroduced in 1988. In some markets it is not spicy, and in others a cajun spiced version is also offered. It remains one of the biggest sellers, just behind the Big Mac. The larger sandwich was replaced with the Crispy Chicken Deluxe in 1996, and brought back in 1998 in the current smaller size, and marketed as the Cajun (Style) McChicken. In Australia the average serving size for a McChicken is 185 grams. In Canada, it remains a full-size sandwich, while the US' smaller version is sold as the Junior Chicken.
Premium chicken sandwiches – the Premium line was added in July 2005. The Classic was a rebranding of the Crispy Chicken and Chicken McGrill sandwiches, themselves rebrandings of the Deluxe chicken line in 1998, with mayonnaise, leaf lettuce, and a tomato slice. The Ranch BLT contains ranch sauce instead of mayonnaise and includes bacon. The Club is similar to the Classic with added bacon and a piece of Swiss cheese. In Latin America, the Classic and the Club are sold, but a honey mustard chicken sandwich is sold in place of the BLT. All were served on a whole-grain roll, with either a grilled or crispy chicken breast. On March 20, 2014, the Premium Crispy Chicken Bacon Clubhouse and Premium Grilled Chicken Bacon Clubhouse were added to the lineup (alongside the beef variant of the sandwich) on a new artisan roll. In February 2015 the Ranch BLT and Club were removed from the menu. The standard crispy offering was renamed to the Premium Crispy Chicken Deluxe (later the Buttermilk Crispy Chicken Sandwich in August 2015) and it was upgraded to sit on the artisan roll introduced with the Bacon Clubhouse. In the first week of April 2015, McDonald's replaced the Premium Grilled Chicken sandwich with the Artisan Grilled Chicken.[13] Like the Taste-Crafted Burgers, the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches were introduced in 2016, in West Coast markets, and in all other U.S. markets in January 2017. Signature Sriracha was the latest to be added in June 2016; it was replaced by Sweet Barbecue Bacon in May 2017.
Southern Style Chicken Sandwich – a southern-style fried chicken breast filet, on a steamed bun, dressed with butter and two pickles. Nearly identical to a Chick-fil-A chicken sandwich. Discontinued at many franchises in early 2015.
Snack Wrap – a wrap made with white meat chicken breast (crispy or grilled), lettuce, shredded Cheddar cheese and Monterey Jack cheese, and a sauce (Spicy Buffalo, Ranch, Honey mustard, Chipotle barbecue, or Salsa Roja, the breakfast sauce on the McSkillet), wrapped in a soft flour tortilla. It was launched on July 1, 2006. Chipotle BBQ is the most recent flavor. Available in the United States, The Netherlands, United Kingdom, Canada, Australia and Brazil.[14][15][16] There is also a Mac Snack Wrap which features the fixings of the Big Mac, but without the bun and wrapped in a tortilla shell, and uses one half of a piece of quarter meat.[17]
Premium Chicken Wrap – in 2013, McDonald's in the U.S. introduced a larger wrap that it has had success with in parts of Europe. It comes in three variants: Sweet Chili Chicken, Chicken & Bacon, and Chicken & Ranch.
Chicken Fajita – chicken, cheese, red and green bell peppers, and diced onions in a flour tortilla. Comes with Picante sauce packets on request, which are available in mild and spicy. Available in only a few markets.
Chicken McNuggets – introduced in 1983 as a replacement for the McChicken, these are small chicken chunks served with dipping sauces of barbecue, sweet n' sour, honey, and hot mustard. Available in 4, 6, 10 (originally 9), or 20 pieces. Up until 2003, they were a combination of white and dark meat, now they are made with only white meat. In 2011, five new dipping sauces were introduced and added to the lineup: sweet chili, honey mustard, spicy buffalo, and creamy ranch. With the addition of these new dipping sauces, McDonald's began phasing out the Hot Mustard sauce, and by February 2014, it had been discontinued in most U.S. markets.
McArabia – there are two versions of the McArabia: grilled chicken, and grilled kofta (beef with spices). Both are served with lettuce, tomatoes, onions, and garlic mayonnaise in addition to two small patties of grilled chicken or kofta, all wrapped in an Arabian-style pita bread. McDonald's has performed a rather large advertising campaign for the McArabia since its introduction in 2003, largely focusing on the Arabian-themed nature of the sandwich, and it appears to have worked well. The McArabia has been very well received throughout Southwestern Eurasia. The same product is also introduced in Malaysia with "Chicken Foldover" as an alternative name.
(Premium) Crispy Chicken Deluxe – a sandwich made with a crispy chicken breast, tomato slices, and lettuce. It was first sold in 1996 and had its name changed to the Crispy Chicken Sandwich in 1998. It was replaced with a Premium chicken sandwich in July 2005, and was then brought back in 2015 under the original name with the added prefix Premium. The only other change is that it is now sold on an artisan roll instead of the potato bun that characterized the original Crispy Chicken Deluxe. By August 2015 it was renamed the Buttermilk Crispy Chicken Sandwich. This is part of the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches introduced in 2016.
Grilled Chicken Deluxe – this sandwich has the same ingredients as the Premium Crispy Chicken Deluxe, but has a marinated, grilled chicken breast at its center. It has been sold under various names since 1996, when it was introduced as the Grilled Chicken Deluxe, and had its name changed to the Chicken McGrill in 1998. It was replaced with a Premium chicken sandwich in July 2005, which was in turned replaced with the Artisan Grilled Chicken in 2015. It is also available in India, and has at times been available in Canada.
Artisan Grilled Chicken – in the first week of April 2015, McDonald's introduced a redesigned grilled chicken patty, replacing the Premium Grilled Chicken sandwich, which contains "less ingredients", and those that remain can be found in consumer's "own kitchens".[13] The sandwich sits atop the artisan roll first seen with the Bacon Clubhouse, and is the last of the full-size chicken sandwiches to switch to this bun. It is part of the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches menu introduced in 2016.
Maharaja Mac- In India, McDonald's does not serve beef in its burgers. Instead, it has created a large Big Lac style chicken burger called the "Chicken Maharaja Mac", with a chicken patty and vegetable garnishings.[18]
Chicken McBites - "poppable" pieces of chicken that are made from chicken breasts.[19]
Tasty Basket - Available only in Italy, the Tasty Basket consists of 30 pieces of chicken, which includes the Chicken McNugget, Chicken McBites, and chicken wings.[20]

Fish[edit]

Filet-O-Fish – a fish fillet with tartar sauce and a half slice of cheese, on a steamed bun. It was introduced in Cincinnati in 1962 when it was discovered that many Roman Catholics chose to eat at Frisch's Big Boy on Fridays and during Lent, as it offered a fish sandwich so they could go without meat.[21] This was replaced with the Fish Filet Deluxe in 1996 and brought back in 1998 albeit a larger fish patty. During the Easter period in Hawaii and Guam, a Double Filet-O-Fish meal is offered with two pieces of fish on one bun.
Fish McBites – similar to the Chicken McBites, these are small pieces of flaky whitefish dipped in batter and fried until golden brown, and served with tartar sauce for dipping. They were taken off the menu in the end of March 2013.

Pork[edit]




The McRib



McRib – a sandwich featuring boneless pork with barbecue sauce, slivered onions, and pickles. First seen in test-market stores near interstate highways around Milwaukee and Madison, Wisconsin, in the late 1970s (along with early tests of personal-sized pizza) the McRib was more widely released in 1981, but pulled from menu in 1985. It is released annually in the U.S. as a limited time promotion in some locations. Since 2005, the McRib has reappeared in late October staying on the menu for 10 weeks. The McRib was released in Canada as a promotional sandwich from March 18 through April 8, 2008 and again in summer 2011. The McRib is presently on some European menus (e.g., Germany, where it has been standard since or even before 1990).[22]

Other products[edit]

McDonald's introduced salads to its menu in 1985. Since that time, they have restructured their salad lines several times. In the U.S., the newest salad offerings are part of the McDonald's Premium line. First introduced in 2003, the Premium Salads all are a mixture of iceberg lettuce and a special lettuce assortment (romaine, etc.), with cherry tomatoes and different toppings to differentiate them; additionally all salads can be topped with warm grilled or crispy chicken. All of its salads are part of McDonald's move towards creating a healthier image.
The Happy Meal/Mighty Kids Meal – McDonald's capitalized on Burger Chef's Funmeal concept of a children's meal when it introduced the first Happy Meal in 1979. The meal includes an entrée, a side dish, a beverage and a toy. Happy meals include a tiny order fries (far less than a small order of fries) and fruit, optional sauce for fries, and a choice of nuggets, a single patty burger, or wraps. An additional product, Pasta Zoo was discontinued in 2008. The Mighty Kids Meal contains more food than the Happy Meal, less than the adult meal, and still contains a toy.


The toy is usually a product tie-in with a movie or popular television show.

In mid-February 2012, McDonald's has introduced the Happy Meals/Mighty Kids Meals so that they now come with either a Hamburger, Cheeseburger, 4 piece Chicken McNuggets, McDouble or the 6-piece Chicken McNuggets with a smaller version of the small fry for the Happy Meal or a small fry for a Mighty Kids Meal. All kids meals now come with fries, apple slices and a toy. The apple slices have been reduced from 8 slices to only 4 and no longer come with caramel dipping sauce.



In the U.S., the traditional entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, or a four piece order of Chicken McNuggets (or a double cheeseburger or six piece order of Chicken McNuggets for the Mighty Kids Meals); the sides are fries and sliced apples. Milk, chocolate milk, boxed apple juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks. Some U.S. franchises also include a small cellophane package of McDonaldland cookies. In 2009, McDonald's offered a Happy Meal Wrap, but it was discontinued later that year due to low sales.
In the UK, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four Chicken McNuggets, three fish fingers, or a Chicken wrap; the sides are a choice of fries, carrot sticks or sliced apples and grapes. Organic milk, Tropicana orange juice, apple and blackcurrant Robinsons Fruit Shoot, milkshakes, water and the traditional soda are the choices for drinks.
In New Zealand and Australia, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, three or six piece order of Chicken McNuggets, five or ten Chicken McBites or a crispy or seared Chicken Snack Wrap; the sides are a choice of french fries or apple slices. Thickshake, boxed chocolate milk, apple or water pop tops, orange juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks.
In Canada, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four piece Chicken McNuggets, grilled cheese, or chicken snack wraps; the sides are a choice of fries or apple slices with caramel dip. Milk, chocolate milk, boxed apple juice, orange juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks.







Chicken McNuggets





In Belgium, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four piece order of Chicken McNuggets, McFish or a Ketchup Wrap.




McDonald's line of larger chicken sandwiches (The Classic, Club, Ranch BLT and Southwest), which are part of the McDonald's Premium line were introduced in July 2005 as part of McDonald's menu revamp.

The Classic includes Lettuce, Tomato, and Mayo.
The Club also has Lettuce Tomato and Mayo, but also comes with Swiss cheese and bacon.
The Ranch BLT comes with a creamy ranch sauce, bacon, lettuce and tomato.
The Grand Chicken Burger: Large chicken patty with two layers of cheese, tomatoes, lettuce and sauce
The Southwest comes with a southwest style ancho chili sauce, lettuce, tomato, and spicy pepperjack cheese.


All four can be chosen with either crispy or grilled chicken and all are served on a wheat ciabatta bun.
Deli Choices is a line of deli-style sandwiches that are sold internationally. It is targeted at health-conscious customers and is available in Australia, Austria, Canada, Germany, and Britain, and is testing in the United States. It is similar to the McHero sandwich, sold in parts of the United States.
McDonald's sells French fries as its primary side order. Until 1967, McFries were never frozen, but were cut on-site from potatoes and immediately fried. In some international locations, they sell potato wedges, a type of French fry that is thick cut and wedge shaped and fried onion pieces that are similar to onion rings.





McDonald's McFries.



Many McDonald's locations in discount stores offer freshly popped popcorn and soft pretzels in addition to the normal menu. In PA stores, only soft pretzels are offered as a side option.
Denali Mac – a burger that looks like the Big Mac, but it uses two quarter pound beef patties. Sold only in Alaska, named after Denali (formerly Mount McKinley).





McLobster in 2015.



McLobster – a lobster roll served in a hot dog bun with "lobster sauce" and shredded lettuce, introduced in 1993. The product had supply issues and was not very profitable nationally. Recently, it was only available in Atlantic Canada and New England region in the summer, when lobster is inexpensive.[23] In the 2010s, McDonald's had short term reintroductions in Canada and Italy.
McCrab – in response to the McLobster, McDonald's along the eastern coast of the Delmarva Peninsula (comprising parts of Delaware, Maryland and Virginia) developed the McCrab sandwich, a McDonald's version of the Chesapeake crabcake.
Poutine – originally only to be found in French-Canadian communities, poutine is now found on the menu at most McDonald's' across Canada.[24]
Brownie Melt – similar to a Cinnamelt, it is a rich chocolate brownie with chocolate and white frosting.
McRice – Most McDonald's restaurants in countries in Asia serve the product due to popular demand. It is normal rice.
McSpaghetti – was launched in the late 1970s as a part of McD's dinner menu which included a number of Italian dishes. The dish is still available international where in Philippines it is popular and is generally served with McNuggets.[25]
Angus Snack Wrap – wrap with Angus burger introduced to the U.S. market on August 9, 2010. Angus Snack wraps are available three ways: Deluxe (lettuce, tomato, onions, pickles, American cheese, mayo, mustard); Bacon & Cheese (onions, pickles, American cheese, ketchup, mustard, a strip of bacon); and Mushroom & Swiss (sauteed mushrooms, Swiss cheese, mayo). The Angus Wrap uses 1/2 of a regular Angus burger pattie.[26]
The McVeggie burger – a vegetarian burger on a whole wheat bun. Available in India, Slovenia, Greece and Portugal. A special version is available in Cheung Chau branch in Hong Kong during the Cheung Chau Bun Festival.
Veggie Clubhouse - first sandwich with a quinoa pattie.[27]
The McBean burger – a vegan burger where the patties are made with cannellini beans, kidney beans, onions, carrots and green peppers. Available in Sweden.
The menu in India has numerous unique items, all of which contain neither beef nor pork:

Chicken Maharaja Mac – like a Big Mac, but with two pressed spiced chicken patties instead of beef, served with a mustard sauce
Paneer Salsa Wrap (paneer is an Indian unsalted white cheese).
Chicken Mexican Wrap
McAloo Tikki – breaded potato patty with onion and tomato on a plain bun ("aloo" is "potato"). Available at select stores in India, Greece, and Walt Disney World in Lake Buena Vista, FL.
Chicken McGrill


Georgie Pie — a meat pie sold in New Zealand and Australia. The brand was also the name of a New Zealand-based chain that was bought by McDonald's New Zealand in 1996, and was revived as part of the McDonald's menu in 2013 due to popular demand.
Garlic fries were tested in the San Francisco Bay Area in 2016, using locally grown garlic from Gilroy, California[28]
Veggie Crunch Burger - The vegetarian burger was launched in the Singapore market on 6 September 2016. Its patty is made with a mixture of unto 7 types of vegetables, including green peas, carrots, tomatoes, capsicum, beans etc. However, its dressings contain garlic and eggs. The patty is fried in the same oil used for frying apple pies so it does not come in contact with meat products. The burger has received good reviews
Mc Aaloo Tikki Burger - In India, since Mc Donalds does not serve beef or pork in any of its products, it has created a few vegetarian options to suit the 85% vegetarian populace. Thus, the cheese burger is recast as a vegetarian option and served as an "Aaloo tikki burger" containing a potato patties and a slice of cheese.[29]
Veg Maharaja Mac - A vegetarian version of the Big Mac sold at Mc Donalds India, containing patties made of potato, corn, peas and cheese. Maharaja is a Hindi word meaning emperor. [30]

Breakfast[edit]
McDonald's introduced breakfast foods in 1972.




An Egg McMuffin



McDonald's primary breakfast offerings are breakfast sandwiches.

McMuffins are McDonald's signature breakfast sandwich, first sold at select restaurants in 1972 as the Egg McMuffin, five years before breakfast officially went into effect, it consists of a fried egg, back bacon (called Canadian bacon in the U.S.) and American cheese on a toasted English muffin. Sausage or bacon McMuffins are also available. A Chicken McMuffin is offered in South Africa.
McDonald's offers a line of breakfast sandwiches: bagels, biscuits, and a special type of maple flavored pancake called McGriddles. All can all be ordered with sausage, ham or bacon, with an optional choice of cheese and/or egg. Regional meat offerings include fried chicken, steak, spam and bacon. They are an internationally famous sandwich and as such have been well received, though Morgan Spurlock criticized the item near the end of his 2004 documentary Super-Size Me with the following quote: "McDonald's joined right in, sponsoring events and creating premium salads to show how health conscious they had become. At the same time however, they masterminded one of their fattest sandwiches to date: the McGriddle. A pancake-wrapped cake press that won my heart in Texas, but can pack as much fat as a Big Mac, and contains more sugar than a pack of McDonaldland cookies." His doctor also informed him that consumption of the item could be a risk factor for high blood cholesterol.
The McDonald's Hamdesal is a new breakfast sandwich which consist of a slice of ham on pandesal, which can be ordered plain, with eggs or with cheese. This sandwich is currently available in the Philippines.[31]


There are two styles of breakfast burritos available. The Sausage Burrito, introduced in 1991, is made with a flour tortilla, sausage, American cheese, eggs, onions, and peppers. The new McSkillet wrap burrito adds potatoes and salsa. Chicken and steak variants of the McSkillet exists in limited areas.
Additional breakfast items include hotcakes; several breakfast platters with eggs, hash browns and meats or breads. Biscuits and gravy are available in parts of the southern U.S.
Oatmeal was added to the breakfast menu on December 27, 2010, after it test marketed well in Washington, D.C. and some parts of Maryland. In the test market areas, oatmeal started selling in late January 2010.
A few American regional variations exist, in Hawaii and Guam McDonald's offers local breakfast items such as Spam, Portuguese sausage and fresh cut pineapple. And in New Mexico there is a breakfast burrito on the menu, with both bacon and sausage varieties, called the Green Chile Sunrise Burrito.
In the UK, McDonald's offers the standard McMuffin, Double McMuffin, bacon rolls, toasted bagels with jam or Philadelphia cream cheese, hash browns, Oatso Simple porridge, bagels with egg, cheese and bacon or sausage, and a range of wraps, that consist of sausage & egg, bacon & egg, or cheese & egg, or you have the option to have the full wrap called the Breakfast Wrap which consists of sausage, bacon, egg, hash browns (potato rösti), cheese and an optional sauce, either ketchup or brown sauce.
Since October 2015, McDonald's offers breakfast all day in Australia, Canada, Mexico (Tijuana, Baja California Norte only), New Zealand & USA. However, the full breakfast menu won’t be available at all hours. Only certain items, such as sausage burritos or hot cakes will be available beyond the usual 10:30 A.M. cutoff weekdays or 11 weekends.[32] All US restaurants expanded its all-day menu to add Biscuit sandwiches, Egg McMuffins & McGriddles in late September 2016.
Since February 2016, breakfast bowls were added to the breakfast menu, available in some US restaurants.

Beverages[edit]
Beverages purveyed by McDonald's varies regionally.

McDonald's primary soft drink supplier is the Coca-Cola Company, except in restaurants which fall under an overall contract with PepsiCo. For example: the Detroit Metropolitan Wayne County Airport, Luxor Las Vegas, Staples Center and the University of Maryland, College Park Student Union. In the U.S. and Canada, Cadbury-Schweppes supplies Dr Pepper.
S&D Coffee, Gavina and Kraft supply McDonald's Premium Roast Coffee for McDonald's U.S. restaurants besides the New England area. Green Mountain Coffee Roasters supplies Newman's Own branded coffee for McDonald's New England area restaurants.
Hot and iced tea (supplied by S&D Coffee in the U.S.), hot chocolate, various juices and other regional beverages are available in various markets.
The McCafe is an umbrella term for lattes, espresso, iced coffee, hot chocolate, mocha, malts, smoothies, and other drinks that are sold in several markets worldwide.
Shakes are available in all U.S. McDonald's and many global markets[33] Permanent flavors are vanilla, strawberry, and chocolate; regional or seasonal flavors include Caramel, Coffee, Cherry, Eggnog (during Christmas), Banana, Pumpkin (during Halloween), Strawberry Banana, Lime, Mango Raspberry, Honeycomb, Arctic Orange (sherbet), Orange Cream, Shamrock Shake (a green, spearmint Limited Time Offer shake for St. Patrick's Day), Chocolate Mint, and Rolo (available only in Canada and the UK. This flavoured milkshake was also available in the Republic of Ireland during the summer of 2007 for a limited time only). In June 1975, 13 months before the celebration of the United States Bicentennial, McDonald's introduced a blueberry-flavored shake in order to advertise "Red, White, and Blueberry Shakes" for independence day celebrations, and lasting through August of that year. The run was repeated in summer 1976, but not since. In the U.S., starting in February 2010, "Triple Thick Shakes" were rebranded under the McCafe name, along with the addition of whipped cream, and a cherry on top, and a significant reduction in size. In Canada, McDonald's milkshakes are still sold under the "Triple Thick" name.[34]
Beer of different brands (varies locally) is available at McDonald's in Belgium, Czech Republic, France, Germany, Italy, Lithuania, Portugal, Romania, Slovenia, and Spain.
Irn-Bru is available in some Scottish McDonald's locations.
Inca Kola is available in every Peruvian McDonald's location.
McDonald's also offers 1% milk, 1% chocolate milk, and apple juice, most often as replacements for fountain drinks in Happy Meals.
As of 2009[update], McDonald's Australia and New Zealand began offering Frozen Coke as part of their menu. It is available in small, medium or large sizes or a 'Mini Value-Pick' size.New flavors are introduced occasionally, such as Frozen Fanta Grape and Frozen Sprite. Over summer, flavoured syrups have become available, for use with Frozen Sprite. In the 2013/2014 summer, Bubblegum, Pineapple, Wild Grape, Fairy Floss and Apple were available.

Desserts[edit]




McDonald's apple pies



A soft serve ice cream product is available in several forms, including sundaes, cones (either vanilla or chocolate), and as the primary ingredient in the McFlurry. As with many other formulations of soft serve, cellulose gum is utilized as an extender and thickener.[35]

The McFlurry is a soft-serve ice cream dessert that has pieces of candy or cookies mixed into it.[36] The McFlurry was first integrated in the menu at a Bathurst, New Brunswick, Canada franchisee in 1995. The flavors are crushed Oreo, M&M's Minis, Reese's, or Mars, Incorporated candy bars like Snickers, Twix, Galaxy, etc., Cadbury's candy bars like Twirl, Wispa, Creme Egg, Crunchie etc., Nestlé candy bars like Yorkie, Smarties, Drifter, Rolo, Butterfinger, etc. McDonald's also does limited time only flavors, e.g. for Shrek the Third it released the Ogre-Load flavor. In Australia, they had a special range for their 40 years in Australia celebration. The flavors were double choc fudge, bubblegum squash, strawberry crumble and caramel cookie. Also in Malaysia a unique flavor called FuseofmyLife is offered to customers. The mixing blade for the dessert is actually a specially designed spoon with a hollow handle that attaches to the mixer spindle (except in Australia[37] and New Zealand where the staff mix it by hand). The blade is used once then given to the customer to use as an eating utensil. Originally test marketed in Hawaii in 1997,[38] it is now available in most of its markets.[39]


McDonaldland cookies are traditionally available and are similar to animal crackers, except the shapes of the cookies are of Ronald McDonald, Grimace, Birdie the Early Bird, and the Hamburglar, among other McDonaldland characters. In fact, they are manufactured by Keebler, and are just re-branded animal crackers (Elfin Crackers or Our Family Animal Crackers). In Australia, the McDonaldland Cookies are manufactured by Arnotts and are sold in McDonald's restaurants for $1.
Freshly baked cookies manufactured by Nestlé are available in some markets. Among the cookies offered are sugar, oatmeal raisin, or chocolate chip.
McDonald's pies are actually turnovers, and come in apple or, in some markets, cherry and other seasonal or limited-time-only flavors such as pumpkin pie, smores, sweet potato and Holiday pie, and in Hawaii, taro, haupia, banana, and (introduced in 2017) guava. In Canada, in the 1970s, blueberry was standard, as was the Great Fruit Pie. During some seasonal promotions, cherry and strawberry are an available pie flavor in Canada; also, newly featured is Blueberry Maple and Peach. In Thailand, Hawaii and Guam, taro pie is featured occasionally. Other regional flavors include coconut (also known as haupia in Hawaii) and tuna (all in Guam as limited-time), and corn in Japan. In Mexico, Guatemala, Panama, and Costa Rica, cheese pie is available all year round. In Cyprus, strawberry and custard pies are available all year round also, along with the apple one. In Brazil, banana pies are available. In Russia apricot pies are also available.





McDonald's Cinnamon Melts



Cinnamon Melts – a popular cinnamon roll type item with cream cheese icing.
Brownie melts – Similar to the Cinnamon melt, only chocolate flavored with fudge and cream cheese icing on top. Available only in selected markets.
The Fruit and Yogurt Parfait – a mix of frozen strawberries and blueberries and vanilla yogurt, sold with a package of granola topping.
Smoothies are available in some locations in either Blueberry Pomegranate, Strawberry Banana, or Mango-Pineapple flavors. In the test market areas, smoothies were introduced in 2009.
In 2012, McDonald's Australia and New Zealand began offering a 'McFloat'. It contained Frozen Coke and/or the promotional frozen beverage, a small amount of soft serve and a lot of ice. In Australia, the Frozen Coke 'McSpider' has also been purveyed, which consists of frozen Coke and soft serve ice cream.[40]

Former items[edit]





This section possibly contains original research. Please improve it by verifying the claims made and adding inline citations. Statements consisting only of original research should be removed. (October 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Angus burgers – Four types: the Angus Deluxe (American cheese, sliced red onions and sliced red tomatoes, iceberg lettuce, pickles, mustard, and mayonnaise); Angus Mushroom and Swiss (sautéed mushrooms, Swiss cheese and mayonnaise); Angus Bacon and Cheese (bacon, American cheese, sliced red onions, mustard, ketchup and pickles); and the Angus Chipotle BBQ Bacon (chipotle sauce, red onions, pickles, bacon, and American cheese). In Australia and New Zealand, there are three Angus burgers sold; The Grand Angus (which is a clone of the Angus Deluxe) and the Mighty Angus (which resembles the Angus Cheese and Bacon, but with no pickles and mayonnaise and onion relish replacing the ketchup and mustard). For a limited time only, the Angus The Third, similar to the Grand Angus, but with no mustard and made with a tomato chilli relish and only one slice of cheese. Also, for a limited time, Angus the Great was sold, a clone of the Angus Mushroom and Swiss. In October 2012, an Angus version of the Cheddar Bacon Onion (CBO) Sandwich was made available,[41] consisting of a horseradish-like sauce, grilled caramelized onions, bacon and cheddar cheese. In May 2013, McDonald's stopped selling the Angus burger.[42][43] Two years later the third-pound burgers returned (known as Sirloin Third Pound Burgers), but as a limited-time promotion. It comes in three sandwiches: Bacon & Cheese, Lettuce & Tomato, and Steakhouse. The Angus Burgers are still available in Canada and some markets in Latin America.
Arch Deluxe – An attempt to produce a "luxury" hamburger, promoted by a high-profile advertising campaign (introduced in 1996), today considered one of the most expensive failures in McDonald's history. It featured a honey mustard-type sauce,[44] quarter-pound beef patty on a potato roll, with leaf lettuce, tomato, red onion, and cheese; peppered bacon was also offered for an extra charge. The Arch Deluxe was accompanied with three other burgers at the time, the Crispy Chicken Deluxe (later renamed the Crispy Chicken Sandwich), the Grilled Chicken Deluxe (later renamed the Chicken McGrill), and the Fish Filet Deluxe (since discontinued along with the Arch Deluxe itself).
Barry Burger – A double bacon cheeseburger with onions and barbecue sauce named after football player Barry Sanders, sold mainly in his home state of Kansas.[citation needed]
BBQ Chicken – A toasted bun featuring shredded chicken and zesty BBQ sauce.[citation needed]
Beef Wennington – A burger solely offered in the Chicago area in 1998–99, named after former Chicago Bulls player Bill Wennington. It featured a single patty topped with cheese, onions, barbecue sauce and a slice of Canadian bacon.[45]
Chopped Beefsteak Sandwich – test-marketed in various markets across the United States in 1980 as part of a McDonald's "Dinner Menu", offered only after 4:00 p.m. The Chopped Beefsteak Sandwich was essentially an elongated hamburger of a different quality served on a short French roll, similar to a sub or hero roll. Packets of steak sauce (A1 sauce in Chicago) were available for the sandwich.[citation needed]
Big 33 or McJordan Special – A quarter pound burger with bacon and special barbecue sauce named after basketball players Larry Bird and Michael Jordan, respectively.
Boselli Burger – Jacksonville, Florida, franchises also featured the Triple-Double Burger in 1998, named after Jacksonville Jaguars tackle Tony Boselli.[46]
Bratwurst – For a few years during the 1990s and in 2002, Johnsonville brand bratwurst on a hot dog-like roll was sold in some US markets for a limited time each fall. A few locations in Eastern Wisconsin, which is the major market for the Sheboygan County-based company still offer bratwursts on a seasonal basis.
Buffalo Ranch McChicken (also the Hot 'n Spicy).
Catfish Sandwich – A sandwich made with a catfish patty, lettuce, and tangy sauce and sold on a McRib-style bun. Sold at McDonald's locations in Kentucky, Tennessee, Alabama, Arkansas, and Mississippi for a brief period in March 1991.[47]
Cheddar Melt – a quarter pound beef patty smothered with grilled onions (sauteed in butter and teriyaki), then topped with cheddar cheese sauce on a light rye bun, offered in 1988, the 1990s, 2004, and 2007. They are still available in Brazil under the name Cheddar McMelt.[48]
Chicken Fajitas – The Chicken Fajitas consisted of a small soft tortilla, a grilled vegetable medley, and grilled chicken. The fajita was in the traditional thin wrapping paper. These are still available in British Columbia, Saskatchewan, Nova Scotia, Newfoundland (at certain locations), Alberta (at select locations in the Edmonton area) and at all non-Walmart McDonald's in Ontario.[citation needed]
Chicken McBites – popcorn chicken breast with "home-style seasoning" offered through April 20, 2012 in 3-ounce, 5-ounce and 10-ounce versions. Dipping sauces include Ranch, Sweet n' Sour, Tangy BBQ, Chipotle BBQ, Honey Mustard,[49] Spicy Buffalo, and Sweet Chili.[citation needed]
Chicken Parmesan Sandwich – A chicken breast covered in bread crumbs and topped with tomato sauce and mozzarella on a toasted bun.[citation needed]
Chicken Platter – A grilled chicken burger served with lettuce and tomato on the HotCakes tray.[citation needed]





Chicken Selects



Chicken Selects – McDonald's version of chicken strips. They were introduced in early 1998 and offered again as a permanent part of the menu in late October 2003. They are sold in 3-, 5-, or 10-piece sizes and include choices of spicy buffalo, creamy ranch, honey mustard, and chipotle barbecue dipping sauces; sauce selections in the UK are smokey barbecue, sour cream and sweet chili sauce.[50] Sold in the United States, Canada, Israel and the UK. Available in Australia under the name Chicken McDippers.[51] McDonald's stopped selling Chicken Selects in the United States in February 2013,[52][53] but they returned to the menu on February 25, 2015 for a limited engagement and were renamed Chicken Select Tenders. Chicken Selects are still sold at McDonald's restaurants in the United Kingdom and Ireland.
Corn Dog McNuggets – For a brief time in 1991, McDonald's locations in Richmond, Virginia offered a multi-pack of mini corn dogs without sticks. They were offered again in 2002 as the "Mini Corn Dogs".
Cuban Sandwich – Roast pork and ham sandwich on a long roll with Swiss cheese, mustard, and pickles. One of several Hispanic-inspired menu items briefly sold at South Florida units in 2001.[54]
Derby Burger – A single patty hamburger with American Cheese, lettuce, tomato, ketchup, mayonnaise, and bacon. It was a regional item sold in the mid-1990s in Louisville, Kentucky only during the spring to coincide with the Kentucky Derby. Discontinued in the early 2000s (decade).
Diet Coke Float and Coke Float – In 1991 McDonald's ran a limited time promotion selling a float made with Diet Coke or Coke with low-fat soft-serve frozen yogurt in a collectable Coke bell glass. It sold for $1.59 with 40 cents from every sale donated to Ronald McDonald Children's Charities.[55]
Dinner Menu – After testing pasta in the South in 1989, McDonald's began testing a pasta-based menu at 40 units across Rochester, New York, in September 1991, including lasagna, fettuccine alfredo, and spaghetti with meatballs. In the early 1990s, a new Dinner Menu was tested for 6–12 months at two locations in New York and Tennessee. It consisted of the pizza mentioned below but also included lasagna, spaghetti, fettuccine alfredo, and roasted chicken as entrees. The side dishes included mashed potatoes with gravy and a vegetable medley.[citation needed] For the dessert, it included a brownie à la mode or peanut butter pie.[25][56]
Eggs Benedict McMuffin – Canadian style bacon, egg, special breakfast sauce, and American cheese on a toasted English muffin.
Fried Roast Beef Sandwich – In 1968 this product was launched targeting adults. Sold with a package of McDonald's BBQ sauce on the side using the slogan "McDonald's is my kind of place"; it was inspired by a franchisee's version of an Arby's sandwich. The sandwich failed due to the costs of getting roast beef slicers; no matter how many sandwiches they could sell, it would never turn a profit.[1]
Grilled Cheese Happy Meal – There was a Happy Meal introduced during the early part of the 2000s (decade) that contained a grilled cheese sandwich. It was discontinued the same summer it was released but is still sold in some Canadian markets.
Grilled Chicken Flatbread Sandwich – Grilled chicken strips, lettuce, tomato, grilled onions, pepper jack cheese, and a creamy herb sauce served wrapped in a heated flatbread. Served briefly in June 2002, and again from December 27, 2002 until February 9, 2003.
Happy Meal Breakfast – The Happy Meal Breakfast was a meal that was smaller than the traditional breakfast that lasted from the 1980s to 2009. It was discontinued by advice of the Nutrition department at the Corporate Headquarters in Oak Brook, Illinois, but is still sold in Hong Kong.
Home Fried Chicken – During 1968 McDonald's sold deep fried chicken (similar to KFC). Targeting parents who could not choose between burgers and chicken, McDonald's delivered home fried chicken served with distinct packaging. The white chicken meat was sold in light gold packages (for adults) and catering to the children – the dark chicken meat was sold in dark foil packages. TV slogan was... "so everyone can have just what they want ... McDonald's Strives to Reunite the American Family" (note the US was struggling with domestic civil unrest due to the combined social upheaval of the Vietnam War and the civil rights movement)
Hot dogs – In 1937, hot dogs were the first things sold in McDonald's. Then in CEO Ray Kroc's 1977 autobiography, he prohibited the company from selling hot dogs, regardless of potential demand, as he regarded them as unhygienic; however, hot dogs were reintroduced in 1995 at some Midwestern located stores (at the option of the franchise-holder) as a summer item. UK stores sold hot dogs during 2002 on the McChoice menu (later PoundSaver) and as a seasonal menu item in the summer of 1999. Also, at least one American restaurant offered Oscar Mayer hot dogs at some time, notably in Bethel Park, Pennsylvania, and McDonald's locations at Toronto Metro Zoo and SkyDome in Toronto offered hot dogs until 1999. Starting in the year 2007, a few McDonald's began selling Hot Dogs in central Pennsylvania due to popular demand from local sports fans. They can be found at 12 locations as of 2011[update]. In Tokyo locations, hot dogs were available from 1990 until 2004, and have been reintroduced one more for 2009, dubbed the "McHot Dog". McDonald's locations in Chile also sold hot dogs for a brief period in 2004.
Hot Ham 'N Cheese – Sliced ham, American cheese, lettuce and tomato on a triple split, sesame seed bun with a choice of mayonnaise or honey mustard sauce.
Hulaburger – A Ray Kroc invention, it featured a slice of pineapple instead of meat. Originally intended for Roman Catholics who are not allowed to eat meat on Fridays during Lent. It was test-marketed in 1963 alongside the Filet-O-Fish sandwich, with the highest seller being added to the menu full-time (the Filet-O-Fish, a creation of an Ohio franchiser, won).[57]
Italian Doubles – A limited summer promotion in Canada in 1989. Two regular patties on a hamburger bun with 1 slice of mozzarella cheese & marinara sauce.
Kiwiburger – In the 1990s, New Zealand sold a burger reflecting their national icon the Kiwi. It was a single beef patty hamburger, with egg (identical to the egg in McMuffins), cheese, lettuce, tomato, beetroot, onions, ketchup ("tomato sauce") and American mustard. It came in distinctive packaging with 46 classic kiwi quotes, kiwiana, and kiwi sporting icons, which were also used in promotions of the burger.[58] Complications with the cooking of the egg and the use of certain ingredients, that no other McDonald's burger had, saw the Kiwiburger discontinued. It has occasionally returned to the menu for limited times since.
McChicken LT (McDonald's Chicken Lettuce and Tomato) was the chicken version of the McDLT featuring the same two-sided container as the McDLT except the packaging was yellow instead of white. It was introduced about the same time as the McDLT in the mid-1980s. The chicken was a grilled, unbreaded chicken breast placed on the heel of the bun in one of the compartments. The toppings were shredded lettuce, tomato and mayonnaise assembled on the top half of the bun in the other compartment. Cheese was an optional addition for an extra US$0.10. The grilled chicken breast was then basted with a brushing of melted butter. As with the McDLT, the consumer would finalize preparation of the sandwich by combining the hot and cool sides just prior to eating. The McChicken LT was discontinued in the Fall of 1987.
McDLT – The McDLT (McDonald's Lettuce and Tomato) was sold in a novel form of packaging.[59] The McDLT was introduced in the fall of 1984 as the Lettuce and Tomato Special. The meat and bottom half of the bun were prepared separately from the lettuce, tomato, American cheese, pickles, sauces, and top half of the bun. Both were then packaged into a specially designed two-sided styrofoam container. The consumer was then expected to finalize preparation of the sandwich by combining the hot and cool sides just prior to eating. It was discontinued between December 1990 and January 1991 due to environmental concerns with styrofoam.
McDonald's Own Chocolaty Chip Cookie - mini-chocolate chip cookies which came in a small rectangular box
McDonaldland Cookies - cookies shaped like the McDonald's characters. originally came in a white box with a handle and later smaller rectangular boxes with cartoon images
McDouble Cruncher – two patties with a slice of cheese, chipotle BBQ sauce and crispy onions
McGrilled Chicken Classic – A sandwich featuring a grilled chicken breast portion that was introduced in September 1993 and was produced before being replaced by the Grilled Chicken Deluxe/Chicken McGrill.
McLean Deluxe – A lower-calorie Quarter Pounder-type sandwich (introduced in 1991) containing 90% lean beef and 10% water with carrageenan, a seaweed extract, to hold the water and beef together.[60] This item was otherwise identical to the Big N' Tasty and the McDLT.
McRye – a hamburger on rye bread sold in Finland in late 1990s.
McSoup – Campbell's Soup sold at McDonald's available in Broccoli & Cheese and Chicken Noodle. (This product is only sold in winter months in select markets)
McStuffin – a pocket sandwich available with various fillings. McStuffins were sold for a short time in 1993 and were discontinued that same year due to not having a lot of popularity.
McWraps – Inspired in the Mexican burritos Chicken Caesar, Chicken and Garden Salad wraps served toasted in a thick herb flat bread. McWraps is still offered in some parts of Europe(for instance in Denmark and Croatia).
Mighty Wings – deep-fried spicy chicken wings. McDonald's began selling these in 1990 as an optional item and stopped selling them in 2003. They are still sold in China, Spain, Samoa, and the U.S. Virgin Island of St Croix as of March 6, 2010. Also sold as McWings in Pakistan, they were discontinued for a while but relaunched. On September 9, 2013, McDonald's brought the Mighty Wings back to its menus in all of its American restaurants as a limited time offer available until November 2013. The Mighty Wings did not sell well its second time around in the U.S. The main problems cited with the Mighty Wings was the price point versus the amount purchased. Compared with competitors, the pricing was determined to be too high, but McDonald's stated that due to overruns in purchasing, the company could not sell them at lower prices without losing money. On February 24, 2014, McDonald's decided to put them back on the menu for a limited engagement to liquidate the remaining inventory at a lower price in all U.S. locations.
Mozzarella sticks - 3 fried cheesesticks with marinara sauce on the side. Was on the Dollar Menu & More menu from December 2015 to March 2016.
Onion Nuggets – introduced at the same time as the Beefsteak Sandwich as the side item for the Dinner Menu. Onion Nuggets were chopped onions shaped into small solid pieces, dipped in batter and deep-fried.
Philly Cheesesteak – Slices of steak and Swiss cheese with onions. Served until August 2007 at Australian and American McDonald's. This sandwich is still available in Canada, made with cheese spread and green bell pepper.
Pizza / McPizza – McDonald's has also attempted pizza at various times,[25][56] with an apple-pie–like McPizza and more conventional McDonald's Pizza. A line of personal-sized pizzas was first seen in the late 1970s in test-market stores near interstate highways around Milwaukee and Madison. In Canada (c. 1992–99), the pizza originally began as a family-sized pizza that was brought out to the table by an employee and placed on a raised rack in the centre of the table. Later it was scaled down to a personal-sized pizza. However, variations have found their way into some international markets such as India (the pie-like "Pizza McPuff"). McDonald's also test marketed a 14-inch, round, traditional-style pizza in Evansville, Indiana, and nearby Owensboro, Kentucky, in 1989.[61] By 1991, the McDonald's test markets for pizza had grown to over 500 McDonald's locations before the pizza test was placed on hold.[62] Pizza was discontinued in most restaurants by 2000. The reason for eliminating the pizza from the menu was that the time to cook a pizza took 11 minutes, and McDonald's wanted to keep its reputation for fast service. As of March 2017, two McDonald's locations, one in Pomeroy, Ohio, and the other in Spencer, West Virginia still offer the family style McPizza.[63]
Roast Beef on a Roll – A roast beef sandwich made just like the Arby's roast beef sandwich. Sold in 1968.
Root Beer Float – A combination of vanilla soft-serve ice cream and root beer.
Salad Shakers – A salad of lettuce, croutons and other vegetable in a tall dome shaped plastic container. Salad Shakers were introduced in the spring of 2000 and are still available in the Netherlands.
Son of Mac – Also known as the Mini Mac or Baby Mac, a version with only one patty and no centre roll piece. It sold as a Baby Mac in New Zealand, was sold in Australia, now discontinued. Served by some stores in the United States under the moniker "Mac Jr". It's still sold in places in Canada, known as the "kid's mac".
Southern Fried-Chicken – Was sold in Australia up until mid-1986. This was available as a 2 piece (or 3 piece) pack including French Fries. This was replaced by the current McNugget range, as the nuggets became cheaper to produce and safer to cook.
Spanish Omelet Bagel – existed during the mid to late 2000s, discontinued.
Spicy Chicken – Chicken breast with spicy breading introduced in 2006. (Still offered in some U.S. markets.)
Strawberry Shortcake McFlurry – Vanilla soft-serve ice cream with strawberry topping and Vanilla Cookie pieces mixed together.
Superhero Burger – Featuring 3 patties, yellow American cheese, white American cheese, tomato, lettuce, onion, and mayo all laid out on an elongated bun like a hero sandwich. The burger was released as part of the "Taste of the Month" series that McDonald's ran in 1995 where they had a new burger every month. The Superhero Burger was also tied into the promo campaign for the film Batman Forever and the ads for it featured Batman and the Batmobile.
Torta – In 2000, the company released their own version of tortas, a Mexican sandwich, in southern California on a trial basis.
Triple Ripple – A mixed cone with strawberry, vanilla, and chocolate, topped with a plastic top.[1]
Triple-Double Burger – A burger featuring 3 beef patties and 2 slices of cheese, served on the same 6 inch (15.2 cm) sesame seed roll as the McRib. It was originally marketed as the Superhero Burger to promote the release of the 1995 film Batman Forever. It was also sold under the names of local sports stars in at least five markets in the 1990s and in the Cleveland area in the early 2000s (decade):

The Hockey Hero burger, in Canada.
The Jason Kidd Burger – Downtown Phoenix, Arizona, franchises had a Limited Time Offer burger named after NBA player Jason Kidd, while he played for the Phoenix Suns.
The Michael Dean Perry burger, for the then Cleveland Browns star.
The Rory Sparrow burger was sold in the Sacramento area. It was named after the Sacramento Kings star.
Thome Triple was sold in the Cleveland, Ohio area. It was named after Cleveland Indians first baseman Jim Thome


Upside Down Iced Tea – A new cup tested at select locations in the southeast United States in the late 1990s. It featured an ice compartment at top of the cup to keep the beverage cold. It was quickly discontinued.
Szechuan Sauce, created to promote the Disney film, Mulan (1998 film). It was thrust back into the cultural spotlight after being referenced numerous times in the Season 3 premiere of Adult Swim animated comedy Rick and Morty.

See also[edit]


Food portal



List of Burger King products

References[edit]


^ a b c Love, John F. (1995). McDonald's: Behind the Arches (Revised ed.). New York: Bantam Books. ISBN 0553347594. 
^ a b Buiso, Gary (2012-12-02). "More burning questions about NYC answered | New York Post". Nypost.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Menu: Our Full McDonald's Food Menu | McDonald's". Mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Artz, Matthew (December 31, 2009). "Fremont's 'hamburger king' dead at 81". Oakland Tribune. Retrieved January 12, 2010. 
^ "ACCUEIL". McDonald's France. 
^ AP Newswire (July 2, 1997). "McDonald's hoping new burger a Whopper stopper". The Augusta Chronicle. Archived from the original on October 30, 2007. Retrieved October 23, 2007. 
^ a b c d Wong, Venessa (March 12, 2014). "After Year of Flubs, McDonald's Loses Its Taste for Novelty". Bloomberg Business. Retrieved March 3, 2015. 
^ "麥當勞 意想不到嘅嚐試". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Product Nutrition". McDonalds.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's 1955 Burger Review - Burger Lad - Burger Reviews". Burger Lad. 2013-10-16. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ John Reynolds (2011-08-25). "McDonald's cooks up 'no-nonsense' 1955 burger for the UK". Marketingmagazine.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Little, Katie (November 24, 2015). "McDonald's breakfast burger mashup debuts". CNBC. NBC News. Retrieved November 25, 2015. 
^ a b "McDonalds - Artisan Grilled Chicken". News.mcdonalds.com. 2015-04-06. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ http://www.aef.com/images/diversity/burrell/snack_wrap_case_study.pdf
^ "North County News - San Diego Union Tribune". Nctimes.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ McDonald's Australia reveals new Chicken Menu[permanent dead link]
^ "MacPride.Net - Kaufman Enterprises - Promotions". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Chicken Maharaja Mac". www.mcdonaldsindia.net. Mc Donalds India. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ "Chicken McBites". Mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Tasty Basket 30 pezzi | McDonald's Italia" (in (in Italian)). M.mcdonalds.it. 2012-12-03. Retrieved 2017-07-13. CS1 maint: Unrecognized language (link)
^ Clark, Paul (February 20, 2007). "No fish story: Sandwich saved his McDonald's". USA Today. Retrieved April 17, 2009. 
^ Eisenberg, Daniel (September 25, 2002). "Can McDonald's Shape Up?". Time. 
^ Velasco, Schuyler (August 21, 2013). "10 fast foods that have disappeared: McLobster". Christian Science Monitor. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 
^ Spencer Ross. "A connoisseur's guide to downtown poutine - a & e". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ a b c Velasco, Schuyler (August 21, 2013). "10 fast foods that have disappeared: 4. McSpaghetti". Christian Science Monitor. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 
^ "Forays of a Finance Foodie: McDonald's Steps Up Their Style: New Product Preview Day! [New York]". Financefoodie.com. 2010-06-08. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ [1][dead link]
^ "McDonalds Testing Garlic Fries". Time.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Harding, Luke (28 December 2000). "Give me a Big Mac - but hold the beef". The Guardian. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ "Maharaja Mac - Veg and Chicken options". www.mcdonaldsindia.net. Mc Donalds India. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ mcdonalds.com.ph. "Ourfood". McDonalds. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's: You Deserve A Hash Brown All Day". NPR.org. 2015-09-02. Retrieved 2016-03-07. 
^ snopes (March 7, 2016). "McDonald's Shakes : snopes.com". snopes. Retrieved March 7, 2016. 
^ "Triple Thick MilkshakeÂ®". McDonalds.ca. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's USA – USA Core Menu Items by Ingredients". McDonald's Corporation. Archived from the original on April 26, 2009. Retrieved May 29, 2009. 
^ "McDonald's Nutrition Calculator | McDonald's" (PDF). Nutrition.mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Why don't you mix the mcflurry anymore like you used to?". December 10, 2013. Retrieved June 21, 2014. 
^ "A McFlurry of tasty ideas". Honolulu Star-Bulletin. August 13, 1998. Retrieved June 12, 2012. 
^ "Steve McFlurry USPTO trademark information". United States Patent and Trademark Office. December 19, 1997. Retrieved September 1, 2006. 
^ "Large Frozen McSpider Coke | Drinks Menu | McDonald's AU". Mcdonalds.com.au. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McShakeup". The Huffington Post. March 1, 2013. 
^ Candice Choi, AP. "McDonald's cuts Angus burgers from menu". Usatoday.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "R.I.P. McDonald's Angus Third Pounder". The Huffington Post. May 9, 2013. Retrieved October 18, 2013. 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Elliott Harris. "Beefing up his role – Bulls' Wennington latest burger celebrity". Chicago Sun-Times. March 8, 1998. Sports, 14.
^ Times, The (1998-08-16). "Jaguars: Advertising war games have definitely begun 08/16/98". Jacksonville.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "The Press-Courier". McDonalds testing catfish. 14 February 1991. Retrieved 13 July 2017. 
^ "McD brings back Cheddar Melt | Nation's Restaurant News | Find Articles at BNET". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Unveils Chicken McBites". Los Angeles Times. January 25, 2012. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's USA - USA Core Menu Items by Ingredients". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's chicken snack a hit". Azcentral.com. 2007-01-30. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ February 28, 2013 (2013-02-28). "Bid Adieu To Chicken Selects As McDonald’s Makes Room On The Menu For Newer Items – Consumerist". Consumerist.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's dropping Fruit & Walnut Salad, Chicken Selects in U.S.". Reuters. 
^ "Mcdonald's Tries Adding Hispanic Fare To Fast Food - tribunedigital-orlandosentinel". Articles.orlandosentinel.com. 2001-10-28. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Floats offered at McDonalds". Beaver County Times. 22 May 1991. p. 14. Retrieved 12 July 2017. 
^ a b McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Kiwi Burger television advertisement – New Zealand Film Archive". Archived from the original on July 14, 2011. Retrieved October 15, 2010. 
^ US 4653685 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Chaudhry, Rajan (July 31, 1989). "McPizza? McDonald's widens pizza test: pizza operators gird for assault". Nation's Restaurant News. Findarticles.com. Retrieved November 13, 2009. 
^ Prewitt, Milford (October 7, 1991). "McDonald's developing separate dinner menu, puts pizza test on hold". Nation's Restaurant News. Findarticles.com. Archived from the original on May 1, 2009. Retrieved February 28, 2009. 
^ Pemberton, Becky (2016-03-10). "Ohio and West Virginia McDonald's are still selling MCPIZZA | Daily Mail Online". Dailymail.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 


External links[edit]

 Media related to McDonald's products at Wikimedia Commons
"McPizza! – Tasting the elusive McDonald's Pizza". Science Tortilla (YouTube). March 14, 2015.  – Video on a taste test of a McPizza from one of the two locations still selling it.
McGrath, Jane. "5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items". HowStuffWorks, Inc. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 







v
t
e


McDonald's






History
Advertising

ad programs


Countries with franchises
Legal cases
Product list
International availability





People



Richard and Maurice McDonald
Ray Kroc
Joan Kroc
Ralph Alvarez
Charlie Bell
Al Bernardin
Jim Cantalupo
George Cohon
Dan Coudreaut
Steve Easterbrook
Janice L. Fields
Den Fujita
Don Gorske
Jack M. Greenberg
Eikō Harada
June Martino
Herb Peterson
Michael R. Quinlan
Ed Rensi
Willard Scott
James A. Skinner
Donald N. Smith
Harry J. Sonneborn
Don Thompson
Fred L. Turner





Company



Hamburger University
Leaps and Bounds
McBarge
McCafé
McDonald's #1 Store Museum
McDonald's (Will Rogers Turnpike)
Oldest McDonald's restaurant
Rock N Roll McDonald's
Ronald McDonald House Charities





Products




Beef



Big Mac
Big N' Tasty
Deluxe line
Kiwiburger
Quarter Pounder (McRoyal)





Chicken



Chicken McNuggets
McChicken





Other



Deli Choices
Filet-O-Fish
Georgie Pie
Happy Meal
McArabia
McGriddles
McMuffin
McRib
Premium line
Shamrock Shake





Former



Arch Deluxe
McAfrika








Advertising




Campaigns



Changeables
Global Gladiators
Golden Arches
Mac Tonight
McDonaldland
McDonald's Monopoly
McDonald's Treasure Land Adventure
M.C. Kids
McKids
Ronald McDonald
Teenie Beanies
The Wacky Adventures of Ronald McDonald





Sponsorships



Kyle Larson (NASCAR)
Jamie McMurray (NASCAR)
Graham Rahal (IndyCar Series)
McDonald's All-American Game
McDonald's Championship
McDonald's Championship (golf)
McDonald's Cycle Center
McDonald's Gospelfest
McDonald's Olympic Swim Stadium





Related



Burger wars
Donald Land
Fast food advertising
Mac and Me (1988 film)
McDonald's sign (Pine Bluff, Arkansas)
Supersize








Branches



Canada
Israel
New Zealand





Criticism



Fast Food Nation (film)
McDonaldization
McDonald's Videogame
McJob
McRefugee
McLibel
Maxime, McDuff & McDo
Super Size Me

Don't Eat This Book







Legal cases



Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants
Magee v. McDonald's
McDonald's Restaurants v. Morris & Steel
Sid & Marty Krofft Television Productions Inc. v. McDonald's Corp.





Related



McDelivery
Big Mac Index
Bill Elliott
McDonald's Young Entertainers
McWords
San Ysidro McDonald's massacre
"Seriously McDonalds"
Sydney River McDonald's murders
Taiwan McDonald's bombings
Urban legends
Boom, Like That
The Founder (2016 film)










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=List_of_McDonald%27s_products&oldid=791067944"					
Categories: Lists of brand name foodsMcDonald's foodsHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksArticles with Italian-language external linksCS1 maint: Unrecognized languageArticles with dead external links from July 2017Wikipedia articles needing copy edit from July 2017All articles needing copy editArticles that may contain original research from July 2017All articles that may contain original researchArticles needing additional references from July 2017All articles needing additional referencesWikipedia articles needing page number citations from July 2017All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2014Articles with unsourced statements from December 2014Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2009All articles containing potentially dated statementsArticles that may contain original research from October 2012Articles with unsourced statements from July 2017Articles with unsourced statements from March 2009Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2011 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


日本語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 23:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









List of McDonald's products - Wikipedia





















 






List of McDonald's products

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search







This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article may require copy editing for grammar, style, cohesion, tone, or spelling. You can assist by editing it. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article possibly contains original research. Please improve it by verifying the claims made and adding inline citations. Statements consisting only of original research should be removed. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)





Contents


1 Beef burgers
2 Chicken
3 Fish
4 Pork
5 Other products
6 Breakfast
7 Beverages
8 Desserts
9 Former items
10 See also
11 References
12 External links



Beef burgers[edit]
All beef patties are seasoned, consisting primarily of salt and minced pepper.

Hamburger (formerly known as the Junior Burger in some countries) and cheeseburger – a 1.6-ounce (45 g) ground beef patty, with 0.125 ounces (3.5 g) ketchup, mustard, a single dill pickle, re-hydrated onions, on a toasted bun. At one time early in McDonald's history, the pickle was removed from the sandwich.[1][page needed] In all or much of the New York City area, it is served without mustard.[2] Also sold as a double or triple, adding an extra pickle slice for each beef patty added. A triple burger and a bacon double cheeseburger are optional items and are not always available in all restaurants or markets. In Australia the average serving size for a Cheeseburger is 110 grams. The hamburger and the cheeseburger are the company's original grilled burger offerings, having been served as part of the 1948 menu.[3]
Big Mac – a signature product that was introduced in 1968. Two 1.6-ounce (45 g) (approx. uncooked weight) ground beef patties, special Big Mac sauce (similar to Thousand Island dressing), lettuce, cheese, pickles, and diced onions on a sesame seed bun, with an additional middle bun (called a "club layer") separating the beef patties. The Grand Mac, its bigger-size counterpart, was added in December 2016.
Quarter Pounder – a 4.25-ounce (120.5 g) (originally 4-ounce (113.4 g) until 2015) (approx. uncooked weight) ground beef patty with ketchup, mustard, chopped onions, pickle, and two slices of cheese. As with burgers made with the smaller 1.6-ounce patties, the Quarter Pounder is prepared without mustard in all or a large portion of the New York City region.[2] It was invented by Al Bernardin, a franchise owner and former McDonald's Vice President of product development, at his McDonald's in Fremont, California, in 1971.[4] In some markets unfamiliar with Imperial measurements (such as France), it is known as a Royal Cheese, or variants thereof, such as McRoyale.[5] It is also available as the Double Quarter Pounder with Cheese, which includes another patty of the same proportions. In 2013, McDonald's expanded the sandwich into a line with three additional variants to make them smaller versions of the Angus Burgers, which was renamed the Taste-Crafted Burgers in 2016 in West Coast markets and later expanded to other U.S. markets in January 2017, the latest added being the Signature Sriracha, which was replaced by Sweet Barbecue Bacon by May.
Big N' Tasty/Big Tasty – the Big N' Tasty, introduced in 1997, was a 4-ounce (113 g) beef patty with ketchup, cheese, mayonnaise with a grill diced onions, pickles, leaf lettuce, and tomatoes. It was devised to resemble Burger King's Whopper sandwich.[6] It is also known as the Big Xtra in Slovenia and most of Canada; the McXtra in Quebec, Canada; the McFeast Deluxe in Australia; the Big Tasty (without the 'N') in Brazil, Bulgaria, France, Germany, Italy (without ketchup), Ireland, The Netherlands, Poland, Russia, Sweden, the United Kingdom; the Quarter Pounder Deluxe in South Africa; and the McNifica (a play on Spanish magnifica, 'wonderful') in Mexico and Latin America. The Big Tasty configuration is somewhat different, consisting of a third-pound (150 g) beef patty, sesame seed bun, lettuce, tomatoes, onions, Emmental cheese, and Big Tasty sauce (which has a smoke flavor). The Big Tasty Bacon variant also contains strips of bacon. This variant was sold in the US until 2009; it is now sold internationally only.
Double Cheeseburger – two 1.6-ounce (45 g) ground beef patties, with 0.125 ounces (3.5 g) ketchup, mustard (except in all or much of the New York City area), two slices of dill pickle, re-hydrated onions, and two pieces of cheese on a toasted bun. The double cheeseburger was offered as a promotional item in the 1950s, and was added to the regular menu in 1965. An official variant is offered in the U.S. state of New Mexico, called the Green Chile Double Cheeseburger, topped with roasted green New Mexico chile peppers.





The McDouble



McDouble – similar to a Double Cheeseburger, but with just one slice of cheese. Reintroduced as a permanent dollar-menu item in December 2008 – had been a short-term product in 1997, advertised with "Eddie the Echo." The original McDouble did not have cheese and was garnished with lettuce and tomatoes rather than the pickles and onions on the 2008 version.
Bacon McDouble – a sandwich that is similar to the McDouble, but it has two pieces of Applewood smoked bacon added to it. This sandwich was added to the U.S. "Dollar Menu & More" in November 2013.[7]
Daily Double – similar to the McDouble, however the toppings are slightly different. The Daily Double is made with a little bit of lettuce, tomato, slivered onions, and mayonnaise. It also has only one slice of cheese, like the McDouble, rather than the two slices that are on the double cheeseburger. In 2011 and 2012, the item was test marketed in various regional locations.
McFeast – a hamburger with lettuce, tomato, pickles and mayonnaise, in most markets from April 1977. The name McFeast lives on though in Scandinavian countries, where a McFeast has been served since the mid-1980s in Sweden and was later introduced to the rest of the Nordic countries; the McFeast in Sweden contains a quarter pounder patty, lettuce, modified mayonnaise with lemon juice, onion and tomato. In the rest of the countries, the McFeast also contains ketchup, but not in Sweden. The same burger was sold under the name Mega Feast in New Zealand for several years during the 1990s, but has since been discontinued. The McFeast Deluxe was sold in Australia until the late 1990s and contained: mustard, ketchup, large onions, McFeast Deluxe sauce, lettuce, a tomato slice, regular cheese and a quarter pounder patty served in a Quarter Pounder/McChicken Bun. It returned to the Australian menu in 2009 and in August 2011 using the same ingredients, however contained McChicken sauce in place of the original 'McFeast Deluxe' sauce. The McFeast has been sold in Germany and Austria since the 1990s, named "Hamburger Royal TS" (T for "Tomate" (tomato); S for "Salat", the German word for lettuce). It contains a quarter-pounder patty, lettuce, tomatoes, onions, cheese and the McChicken mayo sauce. For special occasions, it is sold in Germany as a "McFresh" which also contains cucumber slices.
Ranger Burger and Super Ranger[8]
1955 Burger – this burger inspired by 1955 (according to the official site) contains beef, bacon, lettuce, tomatoes, caramelized onions, ketchup and McDonald's smoky sauce (barbecue). Named after the year the fast-food chain was incorporated by Ray Kroc, the burger is popular in European markets, including Spain, Italy and Germany. It was released in 2011 and re-released in 2013 in the UK.[9][10][11]
BBQ Ranch Burger[7] – a very sweet hamburger containing one all-beef patty, cheddar cheese, BBQ Ranch sauce, and tortilla strips,[citation needed] added to the U.S. "Dollar Menu and More" in November 2013.[7]
McSpicy Burger – a very spicy chicken breast, lettuce, cheese and hot sauce-laced mayo, served as the McSpicy Shake Shake Meal, complete with fries.[citation needed]
Bacon Clubhouse – a burger consisting of one quarter-pound patty, lettuce, tomato, and special sauce served on an "artisan roll". This core item was added to the menu the week of March 12, 2014.[7]
Jalapeño Double – similar to the McDouble, except it contains two types of jalapeño peppers, pickled and crispy, plus a slice of white cheddar cheese between the two burger patties, and buttermilk ranch sauce, added to the Dollar Menu in April 2014.[citation needed]
Triple Cheeseburger – similar to the Double Cheeseburger, except it contains three burger patties, with a slice of American cheese between each patty, plus ketchup, mustard (except in all or much of the New York City area), onion, and dill pickle. This was added to the Dollar Menu in December 2014.[citation needed]
ChiTown Classic – a regional offering that was one of two finalist out of 100s of entries in the "Chicagoland Burger Build Off" competition to develop a breakfast-dinner mashup burger in 2015. The burger was placed on the menu on Chicago area locations starting Mid-November until December 27, 2015. The burger adds breakfast's Canadian bacon and applewood smoked bacon.[12]

Chicken[edit]

McChicken – a mildly spicy chicken sandwich, offered in a spicier variant as the Hot n' Spicy in some markets. Made from 100% ground white meat chicken, mayonnaise, and shredded lettuce, on a toasted bun. A full-size version was introduced in 1980, later removed, and reintroduced in 1988. In some markets it is not spicy, and in others a cajun spiced version is also offered. It remains one of the biggest sellers, just behind the Big Mac. The larger sandwich was replaced with the Crispy Chicken Deluxe in 1996, and brought back in 1998 in the current smaller size, and marketed as the Cajun (Style) McChicken. In Australia the average serving size for a McChicken is 185 grams. In Canada, it remains a full-size sandwich, while the US' smaller version is sold as the Junior Chicken.
Premium chicken sandwiches – the Premium line was added in July 2005. The Classic was a rebranding of the Crispy Chicken and Chicken McGrill sandwiches, themselves rebrandings of the Deluxe chicken line in 1998, with mayonnaise, leaf lettuce, and a tomato slice. The Ranch BLT contains ranch sauce instead of mayonnaise and includes bacon. The Club is similar to the Classic with added bacon and a piece of Swiss cheese. In Latin America, the Classic and the Club are sold, but a honey mustard chicken sandwich is sold in place of the BLT. All were served on a whole-grain roll, with either a grilled or crispy chicken breast. On March 20, 2014, the Premium Crispy Chicken Bacon Clubhouse and Premium Grilled Chicken Bacon Clubhouse were added to the lineup (alongside the beef variant of the sandwich) on a new artisan roll. In February 2015 the Ranch BLT and Club were removed from the menu. The standard crispy offering was renamed to the Premium Crispy Chicken Deluxe (later the Buttermilk Crispy Chicken Sandwich in August 2015) and it was upgraded to sit on the artisan roll introduced with the Bacon Clubhouse. In the first week of April 2015, McDonald's replaced the Premium Grilled Chicken sandwich with the Artisan Grilled Chicken.[13] Like the Taste-Crafted Burgers, the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches were introduced in 2016, in West Coast markets, and in all other U.S. markets in January 2017. Signature Sriracha was the latest to be added in June 2016; it was replaced by Sweet Barbecue Bacon in May 2017.
Southern Style Chicken Sandwich – a southern-style fried chicken breast filet, on a steamed bun, dressed with butter and two pickles. Nearly identical to a Chick-fil-A chicken sandwich. Discontinued at many franchises in early 2015.
Snack Wrap – a wrap made with white meat chicken breast (crispy or grilled), lettuce, shredded Cheddar cheese and Monterey Jack cheese, and a sauce (Spicy Buffalo, Ranch, Honey mustard, Chipotle barbecue, or Salsa Roja, the breakfast sauce on the McSkillet), wrapped in a soft flour tortilla. It was launched on July 1, 2006. Chipotle BBQ is the most recent flavor. Available in the United States, The Netherlands, United Kingdom, Canada, Australia and Brazil.[14][15][16] There is also a Mac Snack Wrap which features the fixings of the Big Mac, but without the bun and wrapped in a tortilla shell, and uses one half of a piece of quarter meat.[17]
Premium Chicken Wrap – in 2013, McDonald's in the U.S. introduced a larger wrap that it has had success with in parts of Europe. It comes in three variants: Sweet Chili Chicken, Chicken & Bacon, and Chicken & Ranch.
Chicken Fajita – chicken, cheese, red and green bell peppers, and diced onions in a flour tortilla. Comes with Picante sauce packets on request, which are available in mild and spicy. Available in only a few markets.
Chicken McNuggets – introduced in 1983 as a replacement for the McChicken, these are small chicken chunks served with dipping sauces of barbecue, sweet n' sour, honey, and hot mustard. Available in 4, 6, 10 (originally 9), or 20 pieces. Up until 2003, they were a combination of white and dark meat, now they are made with only white meat. In 2011, five new dipping sauces were introduced and added to the lineup: sweet chili, honey mustard, spicy buffalo, and creamy ranch. With the addition of these new dipping sauces, McDonald's began phasing out the Hot Mustard sauce, and by February 2014, it had been discontinued in most U.S. markets.
McArabia – there are two versions of the McArabia: grilled chicken, and grilled kofta (beef with spices). Both are served with lettuce, tomatoes, onions, and garlic mayonnaise in addition to two small patties of grilled chicken or kofta, all wrapped in an Arabian-style pita bread. McDonald's has performed a rather large advertising campaign for the McArabia since its introduction in 2003, largely focusing on the Arabian-themed nature of the sandwich, and it appears to have worked well. The McArabia has been very well received throughout Southwestern Eurasia. The same product is also introduced in Malaysia with "Chicken Foldover" as an alternative name.
(Premium) Crispy Chicken Deluxe – a sandwich made with a crispy chicken breast, tomato slices, and lettuce. It was first sold in 1996 and had its name changed to the Crispy Chicken Sandwich in 1998. It was replaced with a Premium chicken sandwich in July 2005, and was then brought back in 2015 under the original name with the added prefix Premium. The only other change is that it is now sold on an artisan roll instead of the potato bun that characterized the original Crispy Chicken Deluxe. By August 2015 it was renamed the Buttermilk Crispy Chicken Sandwich. This is part of the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches introduced in 2016.
Grilled Chicken Deluxe – this sandwich has the same ingredients as the Premium Crispy Chicken Deluxe, but has a marinated, grilled chicken breast at its center. It has been sold under various names since 1996, when it was introduced as the Grilled Chicken Deluxe, and had its name changed to the Chicken McGrill in 1998. It was replaced with a Premium chicken sandwich in July 2005, which was in turned replaced with the Artisan Grilled Chicken in 2015. It is also available in India, and has at times been available in Canada.
Artisan Grilled Chicken – in the first week of April 2015, McDonald's introduced a redesigned grilled chicken patty, replacing the Premium Grilled Chicken sandwich, which contains "less ingredients", and those that remain can be found in consumer's "own kitchens".[13] The sandwich sits atop the artisan roll first seen with the Bacon Clubhouse, and is the last of the full-size chicken sandwiches to switch to this bun. It is part of the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches menu introduced in 2016.
Maharaja Mac- In India, McDonald's does not serve beef in its burgers. Instead, it has created a large Big Lac style chicken burger called the "Chicken Maharaja Mac", with a chicken patty and vegetable garnishings.[18]
Chicken McBites - "poppable" pieces of chicken that are made from chicken breasts.[19]
Tasty Basket - Available only in Italy, the Tasty Basket consists of 30 pieces of chicken, which includes the Chicken McNugget, Chicken McBites, and chicken wings.[20]

Fish[edit]

Filet-O-Fish – a fish fillet with tartar sauce and a half slice of cheese, on a steamed bun. It was introduced in Cincinnati in 1962 when it was discovered that many Roman Catholics chose to eat at Frisch's Big Boy on Fridays and during Lent, as it offered a fish sandwich so they could go without meat.[21] This was replaced with the Fish Filet Deluxe in 1996 and brought back in 1998 albeit a larger fish patty. During the Easter period in Hawaii and Guam, a Double Filet-O-Fish meal is offered with two pieces of fish on one bun.
Fish McBites – similar to the Chicken McBites, these are small pieces of flaky whitefish dipped in batter and fried until golden brown, and served with tartar sauce for dipping. They were taken off the menu in the end of March 2013.

Pork[edit]




The McRib



McRib – a sandwich featuring boneless pork with barbecue sauce, slivered onions, and pickles. First seen in test-market stores near interstate highways around Milwaukee and Madison, Wisconsin, in the late 1970s (along with early tests of personal-sized pizza) the McRib was more widely released in 1981, but pulled from menu in 1985. It is released annually in the U.S. as a limited time promotion in some locations. Since 2005, the McRib has reappeared in late October staying on the menu for 10 weeks. The McRib was released in Canada as a promotional sandwich from March 18 through April 8, 2008 and again in summer 2011. The McRib is presently on some European menus (e.g., Germany, where it has been standard since or even before 1990).[22]

Other products[edit]

McDonald's introduced salads to its menu in 1985. Since that time, they have restructured their salad lines several times. In the U.S., the newest salad offerings are part of the McDonald's Premium line. First introduced in 2003, the Premium Salads all are a mixture of iceberg lettuce and a special lettuce assortment (romaine, etc.), with cherry tomatoes and different toppings to differentiate them; additionally all salads can be topped with warm grilled or crispy chicken. All of its salads are part of McDonald's move towards creating a healthier image.
The Happy Meal/Mighty Kids Meal – McDonald's capitalized on Burger Chef's Funmeal concept of a children's meal when it introduced the first Happy Meal in 1979. The meal includes an entrée, a side dish, a beverage and a toy. Happy meals include a tiny order fries (far less than a small order of fries) and fruit, optional sauce for fries, and a choice of nuggets, a single patty burger, or wraps. An additional product, Pasta Zoo was discontinued in 2008. The Mighty Kids Meal contains more food than the Happy Meal, less than the adult meal, and still contains a toy.


The toy is usually a product tie-in with a movie or popular television show.

In mid-February 2012, McDonald's has introduced the Happy Meals/Mighty Kids Meals so that they now come with either a Hamburger, Cheeseburger, 4 piece Chicken McNuggets, McDouble or the 6-piece Chicken McNuggets with a smaller version of the small fry for the Happy Meal or a small fry for a Mighty Kids Meal. All kids meals now come with fries, apple slices and a toy. The apple slices have been reduced from 8 slices to only 4 and no longer come with caramel dipping sauce.



In the U.S., the traditional entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, or a four piece order of Chicken McNuggets (or a double cheeseburger or six piece order of Chicken McNuggets for the Mighty Kids Meals); the sides are fries and sliced apples. Milk, chocolate milk, boxed apple juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks. Some U.S. franchises also include a small cellophane package of McDonaldland cookies. In 2009, McDonald's offered a Happy Meal Wrap, but it was discontinued later that year due to low sales.
In the UK, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four Chicken McNuggets, three fish fingers, or a Chicken wrap; the sides are a choice of fries, carrot sticks or sliced apples and grapes. Organic milk, Tropicana orange juice, apple and blackcurrant Robinsons Fruit Shoot, milkshakes, water and the traditional soda are the choices for drinks.
In New Zealand and Australia, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, three or six piece order of Chicken McNuggets, five or ten Chicken McBites or a crispy or seared Chicken Snack Wrap; the sides are a choice of french fries or apple slices. Thickshake, boxed chocolate milk, apple or water pop tops, orange juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks.
In Canada, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four piece Chicken McNuggets, grilled cheese, or chicken snack wraps; the sides are a choice of fries or apple slices with caramel dip. Milk, chocolate milk, boxed apple juice, orange juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks.







Chicken McNuggets





In Belgium, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four piece order of Chicken McNuggets, McFish or a Ketchup Wrap.




McDonald's line of larger chicken sandwiches (The Classic, Club, Ranch BLT and Southwest), which are part of the McDonald's Premium line were introduced in July 2005 as part of McDonald's menu revamp.

The Classic includes Lettuce, Tomato, and Mayo.
The Club also has Lettuce Tomato and Mayo, but also comes with Swiss cheese and bacon.
The Ranch BLT comes with a creamy ranch sauce, bacon, lettuce and tomato.
The Grand Chicken Burger: Large chicken patty with two layers of cheese, tomatoes, lettuce and sauce
The Southwest comes with a southwest style ancho chili sauce, lettuce, tomato, and spicy pepperjack cheese.


All four can be chosen with either crispy or grilled chicken and all are served on a wheat ciabatta bun.
Deli Choices is a line of deli-style sandwiches that are sold internationally. It is targeted at health-conscious customers and is available in Australia, Austria, Canada, Germany, and Britain, and is testing in the United States. It is similar to the McHero sandwich, sold in parts of the United States.
McDonald's sells French fries as its primary side order. Until 1967, McFries were never frozen, but were cut on-site from potatoes and immediately fried. In some international locations, they sell potato wedges, a type of French fry that is thick cut and wedge shaped and fried onion pieces that are similar to onion rings.





McDonald's McFries.



Many McDonald's locations in discount stores offer freshly popped popcorn and soft pretzels in addition to the normal menu. In PA stores, only soft pretzels are offered as a side option.
Denali Mac – a burger that looks like the Big Mac, but it uses two quarter pound beef patties. Sold only in Alaska, named after Denali (formerly Mount McKinley).





McLobster in 2015.



McLobster – a lobster roll served in a hot dog bun with "lobster sauce" and shredded lettuce, introduced in 1993. The product had supply issues and was not very profitable nationally. Recently, it was only available in Atlantic Canada and New England region in the summer, when lobster is inexpensive.[23] In the 2010s, McDonald's had short term reintroductions in Canada and Italy.
McCrab – in response to the McLobster, McDonald's along the eastern coast of the Delmarva Peninsula (comprising parts of Delaware, Maryland and Virginia) developed the McCrab sandwich, a McDonald's version of the Chesapeake crabcake.
Poutine – originally only to be found in French-Canadian communities, poutine is now found on the menu at most McDonald's' across Canada.[24]
Brownie Melt – similar to a Cinnamelt, it is a rich chocolate brownie with chocolate and white frosting.
McRice – Most McDonald's restaurants in countries in Asia serve the product due to popular demand. It is normal rice.
McSpaghetti – was launched in the late 1970s as a part of McD's dinner menu which included a number of Italian dishes. The dish is still available international where in Philippines it is popular and is generally served with McNuggets.[25]
Angus Snack Wrap – wrap with Angus burger introduced to the U.S. market on August 9, 2010. Angus Snack wraps are available three ways: Deluxe (lettuce, tomato, onions, pickles, American cheese, mayo, mustard); Bacon & Cheese (onions, pickles, American cheese, ketchup, mustard, a strip of bacon); and Mushroom & Swiss (sauteed mushrooms, Swiss cheese, mayo). The Angus Wrap uses 1/2 of a regular Angus burger pattie.[26]
The McVeggie burger – a vegetarian burger on a whole wheat bun. Available in India, Slovenia, Greece and Portugal. A special version is available in Cheung Chau branch in Hong Kong during the Cheung Chau Bun Festival.
Veggie Clubhouse - first sandwich with a quinoa pattie.[27]
The McBean burger – a vegan burger where the patties are made with cannellini beans, kidney beans, onions, carrots and green peppers. Available in Sweden.
The menu in India has numerous unique items, all of which contain neither beef nor pork:

Chicken Maharaja Mac – like a Big Mac, but with two pressed spiced chicken patties instead of beef, served with a mustard sauce
Paneer Salsa Wrap (paneer is an Indian unsalted white cheese).
Chicken Mexican Wrap
McAloo Tikki – breaded potato patty with onion and tomato on a plain bun ("aloo" is "potato"). Available at select stores in India, Greece, and Walt Disney World in Lake Buena Vista, FL.
Chicken McGrill


Georgie Pie — a meat pie sold in New Zealand and Australia. The brand was also the name of a New Zealand-based chain that was bought by McDonald's New Zealand in 1996, and was revived as part of the McDonald's menu in 2013 due to popular demand.
Garlic fries were tested in the San Francisco Bay Area in 2016, using locally grown garlic from Gilroy, California[28]
Veggie Crunch Burger - The vegetarian burger was launched in the Singapore market on 6 September 2016. Its patty is made with a mixture of unto 7 types of vegetables, including green peas, carrots, tomatoes, capsicum, beans etc. However, its dressings contain garlic and eggs. The patty is fried in the same oil used for frying apple pies so it does not come in contact with meat products. The burger has received good reviews
Mc Aaloo Tikki Burger - In India, since Mc Donalds does not serve beef or pork in any of its products, it has created a few vegetarian options to suit the 85% vegetarian populace. Thus, the cheese burger is recast as a vegetarian option and served as an "Aaloo tikki burger" containing a potato patties and a slice of cheese.[29]
Veg Maharaja Mac - A vegetarian version of the Big Mac sold at Mc Donalds India, containing patties made of potato, corn, peas and cheese. Maharaja is a Hindi word meaning emperor. [30]

Breakfast[edit]
McDonald's introduced breakfast foods in 1972.




An Egg McMuffin



McDonald's primary breakfast offerings are breakfast sandwiches.

McMuffins are McDonald's signature breakfast sandwich, first sold at select restaurants in 1972 as the Egg McMuffin, five years before breakfast officially went into effect, it consists of a fried egg, back bacon (called Canadian bacon in the U.S.) and American cheese on a toasted English muffin. Sausage or bacon McMuffins are also available. A Chicken McMuffin is offered in South Africa.
McDonald's offers a line of breakfast sandwiches: bagels, biscuits, and a special type of maple flavored pancake called McGriddles. All can all be ordered with sausage, ham or bacon, with an optional choice of cheese and/or egg. Regional meat offerings include fried chicken, steak, spam and bacon. They are an internationally famous sandwich and as such have been well received, though Morgan Spurlock criticized the item near the end of his 2004 documentary Super-Size Me with the following quote: "McDonald's joined right in, sponsoring events and creating premium salads to show how health conscious they had become. At the same time however, they masterminded one of their fattest sandwiches to date: the McGriddle. A pancake-wrapped cake press that won my heart in Texas, but can pack as much fat as a Big Mac, and contains more sugar than a pack of McDonaldland cookies." His doctor also informed him that consumption of the item could be a risk factor for high blood cholesterol.
The McDonald's Hamdesal is a new breakfast sandwich which consist of a slice of ham on pandesal, which can be ordered plain, with eggs or with cheese. This sandwich is currently available in the Philippines.[31]


There are two styles of breakfast burritos available. The Sausage Burrito, introduced in 1991, is made with a flour tortilla, sausage, American cheese, eggs, onions, and peppers. The new McSkillet wrap burrito adds potatoes and salsa. Chicken and steak variants of the McSkillet exists in limited areas.
Additional breakfast items include hotcakes; several breakfast platters with eggs, hash browns and meats or breads. Biscuits and gravy are available in parts of the southern U.S.
Oatmeal was added to the breakfast menu on December 27, 2010, after it test marketed well in Washington, D.C. and some parts of Maryland. In the test market areas, oatmeal started selling in late January 2010.
A few American regional variations exist, in Hawaii and Guam McDonald's offers local breakfast items such as Spam, Portuguese sausage and fresh cut pineapple. And in New Mexico there is a breakfast burrito on the menu, with both bacon and sausage varieties, called the Green Chile Sunrise Burrito.
In the UK, McDonald's offers the standard McMuffin, Double McMuffin, bacon rolls, toasted bagels with jam or Philadelphia cream cheese, hash browns, Oatso Simple porridge, bagels with egg, cheese and bacon or sausage, and a range of wraps, that consist of sausage & egg, bacon & egg, or cheese & egg, or you have the option to have the full wrap called the Breakfast Wrap which consists of sausage, bacon, egg, hash browns (potato rösti), cheese and an optional sauce, either ketchup or brown sauce.
Since October 2015, McDonald's offers breakfast all day in Australia, Canada, Mexico (Tijuana, Baja California Norte only), New Zealand & USA. However, the full breakfast menu won’t be available at all hours. Only certain items, such as sausage burritos or hot cakes will be available beyond the usual 10:30 A.M. cutoff weekdays or 11 weekends.[32] All US restaurants expanded its all-day menu to add Biscuit sandwiches, Egg McMuffins & McGriddles in late September 2016.
Since February 2016, breakfast bowls were added to the breakfast menu, available in some US restaurants.

Beverages[edit]
Beverages purveyed by McDonald's varies regionally.

McDonald's primary soft drink supplier is the Coca-Cola Company, except in restaurants which fall under an overall contract with PepsiCo. For example: the Detroit Metropolitan Wayne County Airport, Luxor Las Vegas, Staples Center and the University of Maryland, College Park Student Union. In the U.S. and Canada, Cadbury-Schweppes supplies Dr Pepper.
S&D Coffee, Gavina and Kraft supply McDonald's Premium Roast Coffee for McDonald's U.S. restaurants besides the New England area. Green Mountain Coffee Roasters supplies Newman's Own branded coffee for McDonald's New England area restaurants.
Hot and iced tea (supplied by S&D Coffee in the U.S.), hot chocolate, various juices and other regional beverages are available in various markets.
The McCafe is an umbrella term for lattes, espresso, iced coffee, hot chocolate, mocha, malts, smoothies, and other drinks that are sold in several markets worldwide.
Shakes are available in all U.S. McDonald's and many global markets[33] Permanent flavors are vanilla, strawberry, and chocolate; regional or seasonal flavors include Caramel, Coffee, Cherry, Eggnog (during Christmas), Banana, Pumpkin (during Halloween), Strawberry Banana, Lime, Mango Raspberry, Honeycomb, Arctic Orange (sherbet), Orange Cream, Shamrock Shake (a green, spearmint Limited Time Offer shake for St. Patrick's Day), Chocolate Mint, and Rolo (available only in Canada and the UK. This flavoured milkshake was also available in the Republic of Ireland during the summer of 2007 for a limited time only). In June 1975, 13 months before the celebration of the United States Bicentennial, McDonald's introduced a blueberry-flavored shake in order to advertise "Red, White, and Blueberry Shakes" for independence day celebrations, and lasting through August of that year. The run was repeated in summer 1976, but not since. In the U.S., starting in February 2010, "Triple Thick Shakes" were rebranded under the McCafe name, along with the addition of whipped cream, and a cherry on top, and a significant reduction in size. In Canada, McDonald's milkshakes are still sold under the "Triple Thick" name.[34]
Beer of different brands (varies locally) is available at McDonald's in Belgium, Czech Republic, France, Germany, Italy, Lithuania, Portugal, Romania, Slovenia, and Spain.
Irn-Bru is available in some Scottish McDonald's locations.
Inca Kola is available in every Peruvian McDonald's location.
McDonald's also offers 1% milk, 1% chocolate milk, and apple juice, most often as replacements for fountain drinks in Happy Meals.
As of 2009[update], McDonald's Australia and New Zealand began offering Frozen Coke as part of their menu. It is available in small, medium or large sizes or a 'Mini Value-Pick' size.New flavors are introduced occasionally, such as Frozen Fanta Grape and Frozen Sprite. Over summer, flavoured syrups have become available, for use with Frozen Sprite. In the 2013/2014 summer, Bubblegum, Pineapple, Wild Grape, Fairy Floss and Apple were available.

Desserts[edit]




McDonald's apple pies



A soft serve ice cream product is available in several forms, including sundaes, cones (either vanilla or chocolate), and as the primary ingredient in the McFlurry. As with many other formulations of soft serve, cellulose gum is utilized as an extender and thickener.[35]

The McFlurry is a soft-serve ice cream dessert that has pieces of candy or cookies mixed into it.[36] The McFlurry was first integrated in the menu at a Bathurst, New Brunswick, Canada franchisee in 1995. The flavors are crushed Oreo, M&M's Minis, Reese's, or Mars, Incorporated candy bars like Snickers, Twix, Galaxy, etc., Cadbury's candy bars like Twirl, Wispa, Creme Egg, Crunchie etc., Nestlé candy bars like Yorkie, Smarties, Drifter, Rolo, Butterfinger, etc. McDonald's also does limited time only flavors, e.g. for Shrek the Third it released the Ogre-Load flavor. In Australia, they had a special range for their 40 years in Australia celebration. The flavors were double choc fudge, bubblegum squash, strawberry crumble and caramel cookie. Also in Malaysia a unique flavor called FuseofmyLife is offered to customers. The mixing blade for the dessert is actually a specially designed spoon with a hollow handle that attaches to the mixer spindle (except in Australia[37] and New Zealand where the staff mix it by hand). The blade is used once then given to the customer to use as an eating utensil. Originally test marketed in Hawaii in 1997,[38] it is now available in most of its markets.[39]


McDonaldland cookies are traditionally available and are similar to animal crackers, except the shapes of the cookies are of Ronald McDonald, Grimace, Birdie the Early Bird, and the Hamburglar, among other McDonaldland characters. In fact, they are manufactured by Keebler, and are just re-branded animal crackers (Elfin Crackers or Our Family Animal Crackers). In Australia, the McDonaldland Cookies are manufactured by Arnotts and are sold in McDonald's restaurants for $1.
Freshly baked cookies manufactured by Nestlé are available in some markets. Among the cookies offered are sugar, oatmeal raisin, or chocolate chip.
McDonald's pies are actually turnovers, and come in apple or, in some markets, cherry and other seasonal or limited-time-only flavors such as pumpkin pie, smores, sweet potato and Holiday pie, and in Hawaii, taro, haupia, banana, and (introduced in 2017) guava. In Canada, in the 1970s, blueberry was standard, as was the Great Fruit Pie. During some seasonal promotions, cherry and strawberry are an available pie flavor in Canada; also, newly featured is Blueberry Maple and Peach. In Thailand, Hawaii and Guam, taro pie is featured occasionally. Other regional flavors include coconut (also known as haupia in Hawaii) and tuna (all in Guam as limited-time), and corn in Japan. In Mexico, Guatemala, Panama, and Costa Rica, cheese pie is available all year round. In Cyprus, strawberry and custard pies are available all year round also, along with the apple one. In Brazil, banana pies are available. In Russia apricot pies are also available.





McDonald's Cinnamon Melts



Cinnamon Melts – a popular cinnamon roll type item with cream cheese icing.
Brownie melts – Similar to the Cinnamon melt, only chocolate flavored with fudge and cream cheese icing on top. Available only in selected markets.
The Fruit and Yogurt Parfait – a mix of frozen strawberries and blueberries and vanilla yogurt, sold with a package of granola topping.
Smoothies are available in some locations in either Blueberry Pomegranate, Strawberry Banana, or Mango-Pineapple flavors. In the test market areas, smoothies were introduced in 2009.
In 2012, McDonald's Australia and New Zealand began offering a 'McFloat'. It contained Frozen Coke and/or the promotional frozen beverage, a small amount of soft serve and a lot of ice. In Australia, the Frozen Coke 'McSpider' has also been purveyed, which consists of frozen Coke and soft serve ice cream.[40]

Former items[edit]





This section possibly contains original research. Please improve it by verifying the claims made and adding inline citations. Statements consisting only of original research should be removed. (October 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Angus burgers – Four types: the Angus Deluxe (American cheese, sliced red onions and sliced red tomatoes, iceberg lettuce, pickles, mustard, and mayonnaise); Angus Mushroom and Swiss (sautéed mushrooms, Swiss cheese and mayonnaise); Angus Bacon and Cheese (bacon, American cheese, sliced red onions, mustard, ketchup and pickles); and the Angus Chipotle BBQ Bacon (chipotle sauce, red onions, pickles, bacon, and American cheese). In Australia and New Zealand, there are three Angus burgers sold; The Grand Angus (which is a clone of the Angus Deluxe) and the Mighty Angus (which resembles the Angus Cheese and Bacon, but with no pickles and mayonnaise and onion relish replacing the ketchup and mustard). For a limited time only, the Angus The Third, similar to the Grand Angus, but with no mustard and made with a tomato chilli relish and only one slice of cheese. Also, for a limited time, Angus the Great was sold, a clone of the Angus Mushroom and Swiss. In October 2012, an Angus version of the Cheddar Bacon Onion (CBO) Sandwich was made available,[41] consisting of a horseradish-like sauce, grilled caramelized onions, bacon and cheddar cheese. In May 2013, McDonald's stopped selling the Angus burger.[42][43] Two years later the third-pound burgers returned (known as Sirloin Third Pound Burgers), but as a limited-time promotion. It comes in three sandwiches: Bacon & Cheese, Lettuce & Tomato, and Steakhouse. The Angus Burgers are still available in Canada and some markets in Latin America.
Arch Deluxe – An attempt to produce a "luxury" hamburger, promoted by a high-profile advertising campaign (introduced in 1996), today considered one of the most expensive failures in McDonald's history. It featured a honey mustard-type sauce,[44] quarter-pound beef patty on a potato roll, with leaf lettuce, tomato, red onion, and cheese; peppered bacon was also offered for an extra charge. The Arch Deluxe was accompanied with three other burgers at the time, the Crispy Chicken Deluxe (later renamed the Crispy Chicken Sandwich), the Grilled Chicken Deluxe (later renamed the Chicken McGrill), and the Fish Filet Deluxe (since discontinued along with the Arch Deluxe itself).
Barry Burger – A double bacon cheeseburger with onions and barbecue sauce named after football player Barry Sanders, sold mainly in his home state of Kansas.[citation needed]
BBQ Chicken – A toasted bun featuring shredded chicken and zesty BBQ sauce.[citation needed]
Beef Wennington – A burger solely offered in the Chicago area in 1998–99, named after former Chicago Bulls player Bill Wennington. It featured a single patty topped with cheese, onions, barbecue sauce and a slice of Canadian bacon.[45]
Chopped Beefsteak Sandwich – test-marketed in various markets across the United States in 1980 as part of a McDonald's "Dinner Menu", offered only after 4:00 p.m. The Chopped Beefsteak Sandwich was essentially an elongated hamburger of a different quality served on a short French roll, similar to a sub or hero roll. Packets of steak sauce (A1 sauce in Chicago) were available for the sandwich.[citation needed]
Big 33 or McJordan Special – A quarter pound burger with bacon and special barbecue sauce named after basketball players Larry Bird and Michael Jordan, respectively.
Boselli Burger – Jacksonville, Florida, franchises also featured the Triple-Double Burger in 1998, named after Jacksonville Jaguars tackle Tony Boselli.[46]
Bratwurst – For a few years during the 1990s and in 2002, Johnsonville brand bratwurst on a hot dog-like roll was sold in some US markets for a limited time each fall. A few locations in Eastern Wisconsin, which is the major market for the Sheboygan County-based company still offer bratwursts on a seasonal basis.
Buffalo Ranch McChicken (also the Hot 'n Spicy).
Catfish Sandwich – A sandwich made with a catfish patty, lettuce, and tangy sauce and sold on a McRib-style bun. Sold at McDonald's locations in Kentucky, Tennessee, Alabama, Arkansas, and Mississippi for a brief period in March 1991.[47]
Cheddar Melt – a quarter pound beef patty smothered with grilled onions (sauteed in butter and teriyaki), then topped with cheddar cheese sauce on a light rye bun, offered in 1988, the 1990s, 2004, and 2007. They are still available in Brazil under the name Cheddar McMelt.[48]
Chicken Fajitas – The Chicken Fajitas consisted of a small soft tortilla, a grilled vegetable medley, and grilled chicken. The fajita was in the traditional thin wrapping paper. These are still available in British Columbia, Saskatchewan, Nova Scotia, Newfoundland (at certain locations), Alberta (at select locations in the Edmonton area) and at all non-Walmart McDonald's in Ontario.[citation needed]
Chicken McBites – popcorn chicken breast with "home-style seasoning" offered through April 20, 2012 in 3-ounce, 5-ounce and 10-ounce versions. Dipping sauces include Ranch, Sweet n' Sour, Tangy BBQ, Chipotle BBQ, Honey Mustard,[49] Spicy Buffalo, and Sweet Chili.[citation needed]
Chicken Parmesan Sandwich – A chicken breast covered in bread crumbs and topped with tomato sauce and mozzarella on a toasted bun.[citation needed]
Chicken Platter – A grilled chicken burger served with lettuce and tomato on the HotCakes tray.[citation needed]





Chicken Selects



Chicken Selects – McDonald's version of chicken strips. They were introduced in early 1998 and offered again as a permanent part of the menu in late October 2003. They are sold in 3-, 5-, or 10-piece sizes and include choices of spicy buffalo, creamy ranch, honey mustard, and chipotle barbecue dipping sauces; sauce selections in the UK are smokey barbecue, sour cream and sweet chili sauce.[50] Sold in the United States, Canada, Israel and the UK. Available in Australia under the name Chicken McDippers.[51] McDonald's stopped selling Chicken Selects in the United States in February 2013,[52][53] but they returned to the menu on February 25, 2015 for a limited engagement and were renamed Chicken Select Tenders. Chicken Selects are still sold at McDonald's restaurants in the United Kingdom and Ireland.
Corn Dog McNuggets – For a brief time in 1991, McDonald's locations in Richmond, Virginia offered a multi-pack of mini corn dogs without sticks. They were offered again in 2002 as the "Mini Corn Dogs".
Cuban Sandwich – Roast pork and ham sandwich on a long roll with Swiss cheese, mustard, and pickles. One of several Hispanic-inspired menu items briefly sold at South Florida units in 2001.[54]
Derby Burger – A single patty hamburger with American Cheese, lettuce, tomato, ketchup, mayonnaise, and bacon. It was a regional item sold in the mid-1990s in Louisville, Kentucky only during the spring to coincide with the Kentucky Derby. Discontinued in the early 2000s (decade).
Diet Coke Float and Coke Float – In 1991 McDonald's ran a limited time promotion selling a float made with Diet Coke or Coke with low-fat soft-serve frozen yogurt in a collectable Coke bell glass. It sold for $1.59 with 40 cents from every sale donated to Ronald McDonald Children's Charities.[55]
Dinner Menu – After testing pasta in the South in 1989, McDonald's began testing a pasta-based menu at 40 units across Rochester, New York, in September 1991, including lasagna, fettuccine alfredo, and spaghetti with meatballs. In the early 1990s, a new Dinner Menu was tested for 6–12 months at two locations in New York and Tennessee. It consisted of the pizza mentioned below but also included lasagna, spaghetti, fettuccine alfredo, and roasted chicken as entrees. The side dishes included mashed potatoes with gravy and a vegetable medley.[citation needed] For the dessert, it included a brownie à la mode or peanut butter pie.[25][56]
Eggs Benedict McMuffin – Canadian style bacon, egg, special breakfast sauce, and American cheese on a toasted English muffin.
Fried Roast Beef Sandwich – In 1968 this product was launched targeting adults. Sold with a package of McDonald's BBQ sauce on the side using the slogan "McDonald's is my kind of place"; it was inspired by a franchisee's version of an Arby's sandwich. The sandwich failed due to the costs of getting roast beef slicers; no matter how many sandwiches they could sell, it would never turn a profit.[1]
Grilled Cheese Happy Meal – There was a Happy Meal introduced during the early part of the 2000s (decade) that contained a grilled cheese sandwich. It was discontinued the same summer it was released but is still sold in some Canadian markets.
Grilled Chicken Flatbread Sandwich – Grilled chicken strips, lettuce, tomato, grilled onions, pepper jack cheese, and a creamy herb sauce served wrapped in a heated flatbread. Served briefly in June 2002, and again from December 27, 2002 until February 9, 2003.
Happy Meal Breakfast – The Happy Meal Breakfast was a meal that was smaller than the traditional breakfast that lasted from the 1980s to 2009. It was discontinued by advice of the Nutrition department at the Corporate Headquarters in Oak Brook, Illinois, but is still sold in Hong Kong.
Home Fried Chicken – During 1968 McDonald's sold deep fried chicken (similar to KFC). Targeting parents who could not choose between burgers and chicken, McDonald's delivered home fried chicken served with distinct packaging. The white chicken meat was sold in light gold packages (for adults) and catering to the children – the dark chicken meat was sold in dark foil packages. TV slogan was... "so everyone can have just what they want ... McDonald's Strives to Reunite the American Family" (note the US was struggling with domestic civil unrest due to the combined social upheaval of the Vietnam War and the civil rights movement)
Hot dogs – In 1937, hot dogs were the first things sold in McDonald's. Then in CEO Ray Kroc's 1977 autobiography, he prohibited the company from selling hot dogs, regardless of potential demand, as he regarded them as unhygienic; however, hot dogs were reintroduced in 1995 at some Midwestern located stores (at the option of the franchise-holder) as a summer item. UK stores sold hot dogs during 2002 on the McChoice menu (later PoundSaver) and as a seasonal menu item in the summer of 1999. Also, at least one American restaurant offered Oscar Mayer hot dogs at some time, notably in Bethel Park, Pennsylvania, and McDonald's locations at Toronto Metro Zoo and SkyDome in Toronto offered hot dogs until 1999. Starting in the year 2007, a few McDonald's began selling Hot Dogs in central Pennsylvania due to popular demand from local sports fans. They can be found at 12 locations as of 2011[update]. In Tokyo locations, hot dogs were available from 1990 until 2004, and have been reintroduced one more for 2009, dubbed the "McHot Dog". McDonald's locations in Chile also sold hot dogs for a brief period in 2004.
Hot Ham 'N Cheese – Sliced ham, American cheese, lettuce and tomato on a triple split, sesame seed bun with a choice of mayonnaise or honey mustard sauce.
Hulaburger – A Ray Kroc invention, it featured a slice of pineapple instead of meat. Originally intended for Roman Catholics who are not allowed to eat meat on Fridays during Lent. It was test-marketed in 1963 alongside the Filet-O-Fish sandwich, with the highest seller being added to the menu full-time (the Filet-O-Fish, a creation of an Ohio franchiser, won).[57]
Italian Doubles – A limited summer promotion in Canada in 1989. Two regular patties on a hamburger bun with 1 slice of mozzarella cheese & marinara sauce.
Kiwiburger – In the 1990s, New Zealand sold a burger reflecting their national icon the Kiwi. It was a single beef patty hamburger, with egg (identical to the egg in McMuffins), cheese, lettuce, tomato, beetroot, onions, ketchup ("tomato sauce") and American mustard. It came in distinctive packaging with 46 classic kiwi quotes, kiwiana, and kiwi sporting icons, which were also used in promotions of the burger.[58] Complications with the cooking of the egg and the use of certain ingredients, that no other McDonald's burger had, saw the Kiwiburger discontinued. It has occasionally returned to the menu for limited times since.
McChicken LT (McDonald's Chicken Lettuce and Tomato) was the chicken version of the McDLT featuring the same two-sided container as the McDLT except the packaging was yellow instead of white. It was introduced about the same time as the McDLT in the mid-1980s. The chicken was a grilled, unbreaded chicken breast placed on the heel of the bun in one of the compartments. The toppings were shredded lettuce, tomato and mayonnaise assembled on the top half of the bun in the other compartment. Cheese was an optional addition for an extra US$0.10. The grilled chicken breast was then basted with a brushing of melted butter. As with the McDLT, the consumer would finalize preparation of the sandwich by combining the hot and cool sides just prior to eating. The McChicken LT was discontinued in the Fall of 1987.
McDLT – The McDLT (McDonald's Lettuce and Tomato) was sold in a novel form of packaging.[59] The McDLT was introduced in the fall of 1984 as the Lettuce and Tomato Special. The meat and bottom half of the bun were prepared separately from the lettuce, tomato, American cheese, pickles, sauces, and top half of the bun. Both were then packaged into a specially designed two-sided styrofoam container. The consumer was then expected to finalize preparation of the sandwich by combining the hot and cool sides just prior to eating. It was discontinued between December 1990 and January 1991 due to environmental concerns with styrofoam.
McDonald's Own Chocolaty Chip Cookie - mini-chocolate chip cookies which came in a small rectangular box
McDonaldland Cookies - cookies shaped like the McDonald's characters. originally came in a white box with a handle and later smaller rectangular boxes with cartoon images
McDouble Cruncher – two patties with a slice of cheese, chipotle BBQ sauce and crispy onions
McGrilled Chicken Classic – A sandwich featuring a grilled chicken breast portion that was introduced in September 1993 and was produced before being replaced by the Grilled Chicken Deluxe/Chicken McGrill.
McLean Deluxe – A lower-calorie Quarter Pounder-type sandwich (introduced in 1991) containing 90% lean beef and 10% water with carrageenan, a seaweed extract, to hold the water and beef together.[60] This item was otherwise identical to the Big N' Tasty and the McDLT.
McRye – a hamburger on rye bread sold in Finland in late 1990s.
McSoup – Campbell's Soup sold at McDonald's available in Broccoli & Cheese and Chicken Noodle. (This product is only sold in winter months in select markets)
McStuffin – a pocket sandwich available with various fillings. McStuffins were sold for a short time in 1993 and were discontinued that same year due to not having a lot of popularity.
McWraps – Inspired in the Mexican burritos Chicken Caesar, Chicken and Garden Salad wraps served toasted in a thick herb flat bread. McWraps is still offered in some parts of Europe(for instance in Denmark and Croatia).
Mighty Wings – deep-fried spicy chicken wings. McDonald's began selling these in 1990 as an optional item and stopped selling them in 2003. They are still sold in China, Spain, Samoa, and the U.S. Virgin Island of St Croix as of March 6, 2010. Also sold as McWings in Pakistan, they were discontinued for a while but relaunched. On September 9, 2013, McDonald's brought the Mighty Wings back to its menus in all of its American restaurants as a limited time offer available until November 2013. The Mighty Wings did not sell well its second time around in the U.S. The main problems cited with the Mighty Wings was the price point versus the amount purchased. Compared with competitors, the pricing was determined to be too high, but McDonald's stated that due to overruns in purchasing, the company could not sell them at lower prices without losing money. On February 24, 2014, McDonald's decided to put them back on the menu for a limited engagement to liquidate the remaining inventory at a lower price in all U.S. locations.
Mozzarella sticks - 3 fried cheesesticks with marinara sauce on the side. Was on the Dollar Menu & More menu from December 2015 to March 2016.
Onion Nuggets – introduced at the same time as the Beefsteak Sandwich as the side item for the Dinner Menu. Onion Nuggets were chopped onions shaped into small solid pieces, dipped in batter and deep-fried.
Philly Cheesesteak – Slices of steak and Swiss cheese with onions. Served until August 2007 at Australian and American McDonald's. This sandwich is still available in Canada, made with cheese spread and green bell pepper.
Pizza / McPizza – McDonald's has also attempted pizza at various times,[25][56] with an apple-pie–like McPizza and more conventional McDonald's Pizza. A line of personal-sized pizzas was first seen in the late 1970s in test-market stores near interstate highways around Milwaukee and Madison. In Canada (c. 1992–99), the pizza originally began as a family-sized pizza that was brought out to the table by an employee and placed on a raised rack in the centre of the table. Later it was scaled down to a personal-sized pizza. However, variations have found their way into some international markets such as India (the pie-like "Pizza McPuff"). McDonald's also test marketed a 14-inch, round, traditional-style pizza in Evansville, Indiana, and nearby Owensboro, Kentucky, in 1989.[61] By 1991, the McDonald's test markets for pizza had grown to over 500 McDonald's locations before the pizza test was placed on hold.[62] Pizza was discontinued in most restaurants by 2000. The reason for eliminating the pizza from the menu was that the time to cook a pizza took 11 minutes, and McDonald's wanted to keep its reputation for fast service. As of March 2017, two McDonald's locations, one in Pomeroy, Ohio, and the other in Spencer, West Virginia still offer the family style McPizza.[63]
Roast Beef on a Roll – A roast beef sandwich made just like the Arby's roast beef sandwich. Sold in 1968.
Root Beer Float – A combination of vanilla soft-serve ice cream and root beer.
Salad Shakers – A salad of lettuce, croutons and other vegetable in a tall dome shaped plastic container. Salad Shakers were introduced in the spring of 2000 and are still available in the Netherlands.
Son of Mac – Also known as the Mini Mac or Baby Mac, a version with only one patty and no centre roll piece. It sold as a Baby Mac in New Zealand, was sold in Australia, now discontinued. Served by some stores in the United States under the moniker "Mac Jr". It's still sold in places in Canada, known as the "kid's mac".
Southern Fried-Chicken – Was sold in Australia up until mid-1986. This was available as a 2 piece (or 3 piece) pack including French Fries. This was replaced by the current McNugget range, as the nuggets became cheaper to produce and safer to cook.
Spanish Omelet Bagel – existed during the mid to late 2000s, discontinued.
Spicy Chicken – Chicken breast with spicy breading introduced in 2006. (Still offered in some U.S. markets.)
Strawberry Shortcake McFlurry – Vanilla soft-serve ice cream with strawberry topping and Vanilla Cookie pieces mixed together.
Superhero Burger – Featuring 3 patties, yellow American cheese, white American cheese, tomato, lettuce, onion, and mayo all laid out on an elongated bun like a hero sandwich. The burger was released as part of the "Taste of the Month" series that McDonald's ran in 1995 where they had a new burger every month. The Superhero Burger was also tied into the promo campaign for the film Batman Forever and the ads for it featured Batman and the Batmobile.
Torta – In 2000, the company released their own version of tortas, a Mexican sandwich, in southern California on a trial basis.
Triple Ripple – A mixed cone with strawberry, vanilla, and chocolate, topped with a plastic top.[1]
Triple-Double Burger – A burger featuring 3 beef patties and 2 slices of cheese, served on the same 6 inch (15.2 cm) sesame seed roll as the McRib. It was originally marketed as the Superhero Burger to promote the release of the 1995 film Batman Forever. It was also sold under the names of local sports stars in at least five markets in the 1990s and in the Cleveland area in the early 2000s (decade):

The Hockey Hero burger, in Canada.
The Jason Kidd Burger – Downtown Phoenix, Arizona, franchises had a Limited Time Offer burger named after NBA player Jason Kidd, while he played for the Phoenix Suns.
The Michael Dean Perry burger, for the then Cleveland Browns star.
The Rory Sparrow burger was sold in the Sacramento area. It was named after the Sacramento Kings star.
Thome Triple was sold in the Cleveland, Ohio area. It was named after Cleveland Indians first baseman Jim Thome


Upside Down Iced Tea – A new cup tested at select locations in the southeast United States in the late 1990s. It featured an ice compartment at top of the cup to keep the beverage cold. It was quickly discontinued.
Szechuan Sauce, created to promote the Disney film, Mulan (1998 film). It was thrust back into the cultural spotlight after being referenced numerous times in the Season 3 premiere of Adult Swim animated comedy Rick and Morty.

See also[edit]


Food portal



List of Burger King products

References[edit]


^ a b c Love, John F. (1995). McDonald's: Behind the Arches (Revised ed.). New York: Bantam Books. ISBN 0553347594. 
^ a b Buiso, Gary (2012-12-02). "More burning questions about NYC answered | New York Post". Nypost.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Menu: Our Full McDonald's Food Menu | McDonald's". Mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Artz, Matthew (December 31, 2009). "Fremont's 'hamburger king' dead at 81". Oakland Tribune. Retrieved January 12, 2010. 
^ "ACCUEIL". McDonald's France. 
^ AP Newswire (July 2, 1997). "McDonald's hoping new burger a Whopper stopper". The Augusta Chronicle. Archived from the original on October 30, 2007. Retrieved October 23, 2007. 
^ a b c d Wong, Venessa (March 12, 2014). "After Year of Flubs, McDonald's Loses Its Taste for Novelty". Bloomberg Business. Retrieved March 3, 2015. 
^ "麥當勞 意想不到嘅嚐試". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Product Nutrition". McDonalds.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's 1955 Burger Review - Burger Lad - Burger Reviews". Burger Lad. 2013-10-16. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ John Reynolds (2011-08-25). "McDonald's cooks up 'no-nonsense' 1955 burger for the UK". Marketingmagazine.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Little, Katie (November 24, 2015). "McDonald's breakfast burger mashup debuts". CNBC. NBC News. Retrieved November 25, 2015. 
^ a b "McDonalds - Artisan Grilled Chicken". News.mcdonalds.com. 2015-04-06. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ http://www.aef.com/images/diversity/burrell/snack_wrap_case_study.pdf
^ "North County News - San Diego Union Tribune". Nctimes.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ McDonald's Australia reveals new Chicken Menu[permanent dead link]
^ "MacPride.Net - Kaufman Enterprises - Promotions". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Chicken Maharaja Mac". www.mcdonaldsindia.net. Mc Donalds India. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ "Chicken McBites". Mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Tasty Basket 30 pezzi | McDonald's Italia" (in (in Italian)). M.mcdonalds.it. 2012-12-03. Retrieved 2017-07-13. CS1 maint: Unrecognized language (link)
^ Clark, Paul (February 20, 2007). "No fish story: Sandwich saved his McDonald's". USA Today. Retrieved April 17, 2009. 
^ Eisenberg, Daniel (September 25, 2002). "Can McDonald's Shape Up?". Time. 
^ Velasco, Schuyler (August 21, 2013). "10 fast foods that have disappeared: McLobster". Christian Science Monitor. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 
^ Spencer Ross. "A connoisseur's guide to downtown poutine - a & e". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ a b c Velasco, Schuyler (August 21, 2013). "10 fast foods that have disappeared: 4. McSpaghetti". Christian Science Monitor. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 
^ "Forays of a Finance Foodie: McDonald's Steps Up Their Style: New Product Preview Day! [New York]". Financefoodie.com. 2010-06-08. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ [1][dead link]
^ "McDonalds Testing Garlic Fries". Time.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Harding, Luke (28 December 2000). "Give me a Big Mac - but hold the beef". The Guardian. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ "Maharaja Mac - Veg and Chicken options". www.mcdonaldsindia.net. Mc Donalds India. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ mcdonalds.com.ph. "Ourfood". McDonalds. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's: You Deserve A Hash Brown All Day". NPR.org. 2015-09-02. Retrieved 2016-03-07. 
^ snopes (March 7, 2016). "McDonald's Shakes : snopes.com". snopes. Retrieved March 7, 2016. 
^ "Triple Thick MilkshakeÂ®". McDonalds.ca. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's USA – USA Core Menu Items by Ingredients". McDonald's Corporation. Archived from the original on April 26, 2009. Retrieved May 29, 2009. 
^ "McDonald's Nutrition Calculator | McDonald's" (PDF). Nutrition.mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Why don't you mix the mcflurry anymore like you used to?". December 10, 2013. Retrieved June 21, 2014. 
^ "A McFlurry of tasty ideas". Honolulu Star-Bulletin. August 13, 1998. Retrieved June 12, 2012. 
^ "Steve McFlurry USPTO trademark information". United States Patent and Trademark Office. December 19, 1997. Retrieved September 1, 2006. 
^ "Large Frozen McSpider Coke | Drinks Menu | McDonald's AU". Mcdonalds.com.au. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McShakeup". The Huffington Post. March 1, 2013. 
^ Candice Choi, AP. "McDonald's cuts Angus burgers from menu". Usatoday.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "R.I.P. McDonald's Angus Third Pounder". The Huffington Post. May 9, 2013. Retrieved October 18, 2013. 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Elliott Harris. "Beefing up his role – Bulls' Wennington latest burger celebrity". Chicago Sun-Times. March 8, 1998. Sports, 14.
^ Times, The (1998-08-16). "Jaguars: Advertising war games have definitely begun 08/16/98". Jacksonville.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "The Press-Courier". McDonalds testing catfish. 14 February 1991. Retrieved 13 July 2017. 
^ "McD brings back Cheddar Melt | Nation's Restaurant News | Find Articles at BNET". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Unveils Chicken McBites". Los Angeles Times. January 25, 2012. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's USA - USA Core Menu Items by Ingredients". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's chicken snack a hit". Azcentral.com. 2007-01-30. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ February 28, 2013 (2013-02-28). "Bid Adieu To Chicken Selects As McDonald’s Makes Room On The Menu For Newer Items – Consumerist". Consumerist.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's dropping Fruit & Walnut Salad, Chicken Selects in U.S.". Reuters. 
^ "Mcdonald's Tries Adding Hispanic Fare To Fast Food - tribunedigital-orlandosentinel". Articles.orlandosentinel.com. 2001-10-28. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Floats offered at McDonalds". Beaver County Times. 22 May 1991. p. 14. Retrieved 12 July 2017. 
^ a b McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Kiwi Burger television advertisement – New Zealand Film Archive". Archived from the original on July 14, 2011. Retrieved October 15, 2010. 
^ US 4653685 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Chaudhry, Rajan (July 31, 1989). "McPizza? McDonald's widens pizza test: pizza operators gird for assault". Nation's Restaurant News. Findarticles.com. Retrieved November 13, 2009. 
^ Prewitt, Milford (October 7, 1991). "McDonald's developing separate dinner menu, puts pizza test on hold". Nation's Restaurant News. Findarticles.com. Archived from the original on May 1, 2009. Retrieved February 28, 2009. 
^ Pemberton, Becky (2016-03-10). "Ohio and West Virginia McDonald's are still selling MCPIZZA | Daily Mail Online". Dailymail.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 


External links[edit]

 Media related to McDonald's products at Wikimedia Commons
"McPizza! – Tasting the elusive McDonald's Pizza". Science Tortilla (YouTube). March 14, 2015.  – Video on a taste test of a McPizza from one of the two locations still selling it.
McGrath, Jane. "5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items". HowStuffWorks, Inc. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 







v
t
e


McDonald's






History
Advertising

ad programs


Countries with franchises
Legal cases
Product list
International availability





People



Richard and Maurice McDonald
Ray Kroc
Joan Kroc
Ralph Alvarez
Charlie Bell
Al Bernardin
Jim Cantalupo
George Cohon
Dan Coudreaut
Steve Easterbrook
Janice L. Fields
Den Fujita
Don Gorske
Jack M. Greenberg
Eikō Harada
June Martino
Herb Peterson
Michael R. Quinlan
Ed Rensi
Willard Scott
James A. Skinner
Donald N. Smith
Harry J. Sonneborn
Don Thompson
Fred L. Turner





Company



Hamburger University
Leaps and Bounds
McBarge
McCafé
McDonald's #1 Store Museum
McDonald's (Will Rogers Turnpike)
Oldest McDonald's restaurant
Rock N Roll McDonald's
Ronald McDonald House Charities





Products




Beef



Big Mac
Big N' Tasty
Deluxe line
Kiwiburger
Quarter Pounder (McRoyal)





Chicken



Chicken McNuggets
McChicken





Other



Deli Choices
Filet-O-Fish
Georgie Pie
Happy Meal
McArabia
McGriddles
McMuffin
McRib
Premium line
Shamrock Shake





Former



Arch Deluxe
McAfrika








Advertising




Campaigns



Changeables
Global Gladiators
Golden Arches
Mac Tonight
McDonaldland
McDonald's Monopoly
McDonald's Treasure Land Adventure
M.C. Kids
McKids
Ronald McDonald
Teenie Beanies
The Wacky Adventures of Ronald McDonald





Sponsorships



Kyle Larson (NASCAR)
Jamie McMurray (NASCAR)
Graham Rahal (IndyCar Series)
McDonald's All-American Game
McDonald's Championship
McDonald's Championship (golf)
McDonald's Cycle Center
McDonald's Gospelfest
McDonald's Olympic Swim Stadium





Related



Burger wars
Donald Land
Fast food advertising
Mac and Me (1988 film)
McDonald's sign (Pine Bluff, Arkansas)
Supersize








Branches



Canada
Israel
New Zealand





Criticism



Fast Food Nation (film)
McDonaldization
McDonald's Videogame
McJob
McRefugee
McLibel
Maxime, McDuff & McDo
Super Size Me

Don't Eat This Book







Legal cases



Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants
Magee v. McDonald's
McDonald's Restaurants v. Morris & Steel
Sid & Marty Krofft Television Productions Inc. v. McDonald's Corp.





Related



McDelivery
Big Mac Index
Bill Elliott
McDonald's Young Entertainers
McWords
San Ysidro McDonald's massacre
"Seriously McDonalds"
Sydney River McDonald's murders
Taiwan McDonald's bombings
Urban legends
Boom, Like That
The Founder (2016 film)










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=List_of_McDonald%27s_products&oldid=791067944"					
Categories: Lists of brand name foodsMcDonald's foodsHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksArticles with Italian-language external linksCS1 maint: Unrecognized languageArticles with dead external links from July 2017Wikipedia articles needing copy edit from July 2017All articles needing copy editArticles that may contain original research from July 2017All articles that may contain original researchArticles needing additional references from July 2017All articles needing additional referencesWikipedia articles needing page number citations from July 2017All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2014Articles with unsourced statements from December 2014Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2009All articles containing potentially dated statementsArticles that may contain original research from October 2012Articles with unsourced statements from July 2017Articles with unsourced statements from March 2009Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2011 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


日本語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 23:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









List of McDonald's products - Wikipedia





















 






List of McDonald's products

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search







This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article may require copy editing for grammar, style, cohesion, tone, or spelling. You can assist by editing it. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article possibly contains original research. Please improve it by verifying the claims made and adding inline citations. Statements consisting only of original research should be removed. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)





Contents


1 Beef burgers
2 Chicken
3 Fish
4 Pork
5 Other products
6 Breakfast
7 Beverages
8 Desserts
9 Former items
10 See also
11 References
12 External links



Beef burgers[edit]
All beef patties are seasoned, consisting primarily of salt and minced pepper.

Hamburger (formerly known as the Junior Burger in some countries) and cheeseburger – a 1.6-ounce (45 g) ground beef patty, with 0.125 ounces (3.5 g) ketchup, mustard, a single dill pickle, re-hydrated onions, on a toasted bun. At one time early in McDonald's history, the pickle was removed from the sandwich.[1][page needed] In all or much of the New York City area, it is served without mustard.[2] Also sold as a double or triple, adding an extra pickle slice for each beef patty added. A triple burger and a bacon double cheeseburger are optional items and are not always available in all restaurants or markets. In Australia the average serving size for a Cheeseburger is 110 grams. The hamburger and the cheeseburger are the company's original grilled burger offerings, having been served as part of the 1948 menu.[3]
Big Mac – a signature product that was introduced in 1968. Two 1.6-ounce (45 g) (approx. uncooked weight) ground beef patties, special Big Mac sauce (similar to Thousand Island dressing), lettuce, cheese, pickles, and diced onions on a sesame seed bun, with an additional middle bun (called a "club layer") separating the beef patties. The Grand Mac, its bigger-size counterpart, was added in December 2016.
Quarter Pounder – a 4.25-ounce (120.5 g) (originally 4-ounce (113.4 g) until 2015) (approx. uncooked weight) ground beef patty with ketchup, mustard, chopped onions, pickle, and two slices of cheese. As with burgers made with the smaller 1.6-ounce patties, the Quarter Pounder is prepared without mustard in all or a large portion of the New York City region.[2] It was invented by Al Bernardin, a franchise owner and former McDonald's Vice President of product development, at his McDonald's in Fremont, California, in 1971.[4] In some markets unfamiliar with Imperial measurements (such as France), it is known as a Royal Cheese, or variants thereof, such as McRoyale.[5] It is also available as the Double Quarter Pounder with Cheese, which includes another patty of the same proportions. In 2013, McDonald's expanded the sandwich into a line with three additional variants to make them smaller versions of the Angus Burgers, which was renamed the Taste-Crafted Burgers in 2016 in West Coast markets and later expanded to other U.S. markets in January 2017, the latest added being the Signature Sriracha, which was replaced by Sweet Barbecue Bacon by May.
Big N' Tasty/Big Tasty – the Big N' Tasty, introduced in 1997, was a 4-ounce (113 g) beef patty with ketchup, cheese, mayonnaise with a grill diced onions, pickles, leaf lettuce, and tomatoes. It was devised to resemble Burger King's Whopper sandwich.[6] It is also known as the Big Xtra in Slovenia and most of Canada; the McXtra in Quebec, Canada; the McFeast Deluxe in Australia; the Big Tasty (without the 'N') in Brazil, Bulgaria, France, Germany, Italy (without ketchup), Ireland, The Netherlands, Poland, Russia, Sweden, the United Kingdom; the Quarter Pounder Deluxe in South Africa; and the McNifica (a play on Spanish magnifica, 'wonderful') in Mexico and Latin America. The Big Tasty configuration is somewhat different, consisting of a third-pound (150 g) beef patty, sesame seed bun, lettuce, tomatoes, onions, Emmental cheese, and Big Tasty sauce (which has a smoke flavor). The Big Tasty Bacon variant also contains strips of bacon. This variant was sold in the US until 2009; it is now sold internationally only.
Double Cheeseburger – two 1.6-ounce (45 g) ground beef patties, with 0.125 ounces (3.5 g) ketchup, mustard (except in all or much of the New York City area), two slices of dill pickle, re-hydrated onions, and two pieces of cheese on a toasted bun. The double cheeseburger was offered as a promotional item in the 1950s, and was added to the regular menu in 1965. An official variant is offered in the U.S. state of New Mexico, called the Green Chile Double Cheeseburger, topped with roasted green New Mexico chile peppers.





The McDouble



McDouble – similar to a Double Cheeseburger, but with just one slice of cheese. Reintroduced as a permanent dollar-menu item in December 2008 – had been a short-term product in 1997, advertised with "Eddie the Echo." The original McDouble did not have cheese and was garnished with lettuce and tomatoes rather than the pickles and onions on the 2008 version.
Bacon McDouble – a sandwich that is similar to the McDouble, but it has two pieces of Applewood smoked bacon added to it. This sandwich was added to the U.S. "Dollar Menu & More" in November 2013.[7]
Daily Double – similar to the McDouble, however the toppings are slightly different. The Daily Double is made with a little bit of lettuce, tomato, slivered onions, and mayonnaise. It also has only one slice of cheese, like the McDouble, rather than the two slices that are on the double cheeseburger. In 2011 and 2012, the item was test marketed in various regional locations.
McFeast – a hamburger with lettuce, tomato, pickles and mayonnaise, in most markets from April 1977. The name McFeast lives on though in Scandinavian countries, where a McFeast has been served since the mid-1980s in Sweden and was later introduced to the rest of the Nordic countries; the McFeast in Sweden contains a quarter pounder patty, lettuce, modified mayonnaise with lemon juice, onion and tomato. In the rest of the countries, the McFeast also contains ketchup, but not in Sweden. The same burger was sold under the name Mega Feast in New Zealand for several years during the 1990s, but has since been discontinued. The McFeast Deluxe was sold in Australia until the late 1990s and contained: mustard, ketchup, large onions, McFeast Deluxe sauce, lettuce, a tomato slice, regular cheese and a quarter pounder patty served in a Quarter Pounder/McChicken Bun. It returned to the Australian menu in 2009 and in August 2011 using the same ingredients, however contained McChicken sauce in place of the original 'McFeast Deluxe' sauce. The McFeast has been sold in Germany and Austria since the 1990s, named "Hamburger Royal TS" (T for "Tomate" (tomato); S for "Salat", the German word for lettuce). It contains a quarter-pounder patty, lettuce, tomatoes, onions, cheese and the McChicken mayo sauce. For special occasions, it is sold in Germany as a "McFresh" which also contains cucumber slices.
Ranger Burger and Super Ranger[8]
1955 Burger – this burger inspired by 1955 (according to the official site) contains beef, bacon, lettuce, tomatoes, caramelized onions, ketchup and McDonald's smoky sauce (barbecue). Named after the year the fast-food chain was incorporated by Ray Kroc, the burger is popular in European markets, including Spain, Italy and Germany. It was released in 2011 and re-released in 2013 in the UK.[9][10][11]
BBQ Ranch Burger[7] – a very sweet hamburger containing one all-beef patty, cheddar cheese, BBQ Ranch sauce, and tortilla strips,[citation needed] added to the U.S. "Dollar Menu and More" in November 2013.[7]
McSpicy Burger – a very spicy chicken breast, lettuce, cheese and hot sauce-laced mayo, served as the McSpicy Shake Shake Meal, complete with fries.[citation needed]
Bacon Clubhouse – a burger consisting of one quarter-pound patty, lettuce, tomato, and special sauce served on an "artisan roll". This core item was added to the menu the week of March 12, 2014.[7]
Jalapeño Double – similar to the McDouble, except it contains two types of jalapeño peppers, pickled and crispy, plus a slice of white cheddar cheese between the two burger patties, and buttermilk ranch sauce, added to the Dollar Menu in April 2014.[citation needed]
Triple Cheeseburger – similar to the Double Cheeseburger, except it contains three burger patties, with a slice of American cheese between each patty, plus ketchup, mustard (except in all or much of the New York City area), onion, and dill pickle. This was added to the Dollar Menu in December 2014.[citation needed]
ChiTown Classic – a regional offering that was one of two finalist out of 100s of entries in the "Chicagoland Burger Build Off" competition to develop a breakfast-dinner mashup burger in 2015. The burger was placed on the menu on Chicago area locations starting Mid-November until December 27, 2015. The burger adds breakfast's Canadian bacon and applewood smoked bacon.[12]

Chicken[edit]

McChicken – a mildly spicy chicken sandwich, offered in a spicier variant as the Hot n' Spicy in some markets. Made from 100% ground white meat chicken, mayonnaise, and shredded lettuce, on a toasted bun. A full-size version was introduced in 1980, later removed, and reintroduced in 1988. In some markets it is not spicy, and in others a cajun spiced version is also offered. It remains one of the biggest sellers, just behind the Big Mac. The larger sandwich was replaced with the Crispy Chicken Deluxe in 1996, and brought back in 1998 in the current smaller size, and marketed as the Cajun (Style) McChicken. In Australia the average serving size for a McChicken is 185 grams. In Canada, it remains a full-size sandwich, while the US' smaller version is sold as the Junior Chicken.
Premium chicken sandwiches – the Premium line was added in July 2005. The Classic was a rebranding of the Crispy Chicken and Chicken McGrill sandwiches, themselves rebrandings of the Deluxe chicken line in 1998, with mayonnaise, leaf lettuce, and a tomato slice. The Ranch BLT contains ranch sauce instead of mayonnaise and includes bacon. The Club is similar to the Classic with added bacon and a piece of Swiss cheese. In Latin America, the Classic and the Club are sold, but a honey mustard chicken sandwich is sold in place of the BLT. All were served on a whole-grain roll, with either a grilled or crispy chicken breast. On March 20, 2014, the Premium Crispy Chicken Bacon Clubhouse and Premium Grilled Chicken Bacon Clubhouse were added to the lineup (alongside the beef variant of the sandwich) on a new artisan roll. In February 2015 the Ranch BLT and Club were removed from the menu. The standard crispy offering was renamed to the Premium Crispy Chicken Deluxe (later the Buttermilk Crispy Chicken Sandwich in August 2015) and it was upgraded to sit on the artisan roll introduced with the Bacon Clubhouse. In the first week of April 2015, McDonald's replaced the Premium Grilled Chicken sandwich with the Artisan Grilled Chicken.[13] Like the Taste-Crafted Burgers, the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches were introduced in 2016, in West Coast markets, and in all other U.S. markets in January 2017. Signature Sriracha was the latest to be added in June 2016; it was replaced by Sweet Barbecue Bacon in May 2017.
Southern Style Chicken Sandwich – a southern-style fried chicken breast filet, on a steamed bun, dressed with butter and two pickles. Nearly identical to a Chick-fil-A chicken sandwich. Discontinued at many franchises in early 2015.
Snack Wrap – a wrap made with white meat chicken breast (crispy or grilled), lettuce, shredded Cheddar cheese and Monterey Jack cheese, and a sauce (Spicy Buffalo, Ranch, Honey mustard, Chipotle barbecue, or Salsa Roja, the breakfast sauce on the McSkillet), wrapped in a soft flour tortilla. It was launched on July 1, 2006. Chipotle BBQ is the most recent flavor. Available in the United States, The Netherlands, United Kingdom, Canada, Australia and Brazil.[14][15][16] There is also a Mac Snack Wrap which features the fixings of the Big Mac, but without the bun and wrapped in a tortilla shell, and uses one half of a piece of quarter meat.[17]
Premium Chicken Wrap – in 2013, McDonald's in the U.S. introduced a larger wrap that it has had success with in parts of Europe. It comes in three variants: Sweet Chili Chicken, Chicken & Bacon, and Chicken & Ranch.
Chicken Fajita – chicken, cheese, red and green bell peppers, and diced onions in a flour tortilla. Comes with Picante sauce packets on request, which are available in mild and spicy. Available in only a few markets.
Chicken McNuggets – introduced in 1983 as a replacement for the McChicken, these are small chicken chunks served with dipping sauces of barbecue, sweet n' sour, honey, and hot mustard. Available in 4, 6, 10 (originally 9), or 20 pieces. Up until 2003, they were a combination of white and dark meat, now they are made with only white meat. In 2011, five new dipping sauces were introduced and added to the lineup: sweet chili, honey mustard, spicy buffalo, and creamy ranch. With the addition of these new dipping sauces, McDonald's began phasing out the Hot Mustard sauce, and by February 2014, it had been discontinued in most U.S. markets.
McArabia – there are two versions of the McArabia: grilled chicken, and grilled kofta (beef with spices). Both are served with lettuce, tomatoes, onions, and garlic mayonnaise in addition to two small patties of grilled chicken or kofta, all wrapped in an Arabian-style pita bread. McDonald's has performed a rather large advertising campaign for the McArabia since its introduction in 2003, largely focusing on the Arabian-themed nature of the sandwich, and it appears to have worked well. The McArabia has been very well received throughout Southwestern Eurasia. The same product is also introduced in Malaysia with "Chicken Foldover" as an alternative name.
(Premium) Crispy Chicken Deluxe – a sandwich made with a crispy chicken breast, tomato slices, and lettuce. It was first sold in 1996 and had its name changed to the Crispy Chicken Sandwich in 1998. It was replaced with a Premium chicken sandwich in July 2005, and was then brought back in 2015 under the original name with the added prefix Premium. The only other change is that it is now sold on an artisan roll instead of the potato bun that characterized the original Crispy Chicken Deluxe. By August 2015 it was renamed the Buttermilk Crispy Chicken Sandwich. This is part of the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches introduced in 2016.
Grilled Chicken Deluxe – this sandwich has the same ingredients as the Premium Crispy Chicken Deluxe, but has a marinated, grilled chicken breast at its center. It has been sold under various names since 1996, when it was introduced as the Grilled Chicken Deluxe, and had its name changed to the Chicken McGrill in 1998. It was replaced with a Premium chicken sandwich in July 2005, which was in turned replaced with the Artisan Grilled Chicken in 2015. It is also available in India, and has at times been available in Canada.
Artisan Grilled Chicken – in the first week of April 2015, McDonald's introduced a redesigned grilled chicken patty, replacing the Premium Grilled Chicken sandwich, which contains "less ingredients", and those that remain can be found in consumer's "own kitchens".[13] The sandwich sits atop the artisan roll first seen with the Bacon Clubhouse, and is the last of the full-size chicken sandwiches to switch to this bun. It is part of the Taste-Crafted Chicken sandwiches menu introduced in 2016.
Maharaja Mac- In India, McDonald's does not serve beef in its burgers. Instead, it has created a large Big Lac style chicken burger called the "Chicken Maharaja Mac", with a chicken patty and vegetable garnishings.[18]
Chicken McBites - "poppable" pieces of chicken that are made from chicken breasts.[19]
Tasty Basket - Available only in Italy, the Tasty Basket consists of 30 pieces of chicken, which includes the Chicken McNugget, Chicken McBites, and chicken wings.[20]

Fish[edit]

Filet-O-Fish – a fish fillet with tartar sauce and a half slice of cheese, on a steamed bun. It was introduced in Cincinnati in 1962 when it was discovered that many Roman Catholics chose to eat at Frisch's Big Boy on Fridays and during Lent, as it offered a fish sandwich so they could go without meat.[21] This was replaced with the Fish Filet Deluxe in 1996 and brought back in 1998 albeit a larger fish patty. During the Easter period in Hawaii and Guam, a Double Filet-O-Fish meal is offered with two pieces of fish on one bun.
Fish McBites – similar to the Chicken McBites, these are small pieces of flaky whitefish dipped in batter and fried until golden brown, and served with tartar sauce for dipping. They were taken off the menu in the end of March 2013.

Pork[edit]




The McRib



McRib – a sandwich featuring boneless pork with barbecue sauce, slivered onions, and pickles. First seen in test-market stores near interstate highways around Milwaukee and Madison, Wisconsin, in the late 1970s (along with early tests of personal-sized pizza) the McRib was more widely released in 1981, but pulled from menu in 1985. It is released annually in the U.S. as a limited time promotion in some locations. Since 2005, the McRib has reappeared in late October staying on the menu for 10 weeks. The McRib was released in Canada as a promotional sandwich from March 18 through April 8, 2008 and again in summer 2011. The McRib is presently on some European menus (e.g., Germany, where it has been standard since or even before 1990).[22]

Other products[edit]

McDonald's introduced salads to its menu in 1985. Since that time, they have restructured their salad lines several times. In the U.S., the newest salad offerings are part of the McDonald's Premium line. First introduced in 2003, the Premium Salads all are a mixture of iceberg lettuce and a special lettuce assortment (romaine, etc.), with cherry tomatoes and different toppings to differentiate them; additionally all salads can be topped with warm grilled or crispy chicken. All of its salads are part of McDonald's move towards creating a healthier image.
The Happy Meal/Mighty Kids Meal – McDonald's capitalized on Burger Chef's Funmeal concept of a children's meal when it introduced the first Happy Meal in 1979. The meal includes an entrée, a side dish, a beverage and a toy. Happy meals include a tiny order fries (far less than a small order of fries) and fruit, optional sauce for fries, and a choice of nuggets, a single patty burger, or wraps. An additional product, Pasta Zoo was discontinued in 2008. The Mighty Kids Meal contains more food than the Happy Meal, less than the adult meal, and still contains a toy.


The toy is usually a product tie-in with a movie or popular television show.

In mid-February 2012, McDonald's has introduced the Happy Meals/Mighty Kids Meals so that they now come with either a Hamburger, Cheeseburger, 4 piece Chicken McNuggets, McDouble or the 6-piece Chicken McNuggets with a smaller version of the small fry for the Happy Meal or a small fry for a Mighty Kids Meal. All kids meals now come with fries, apple slices and a toy. The apple slices have been reduced from 8 slices to only 4 and no longer come with caramel dipping sauce.



In the U.S., the traditional entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, or a four piece order of Chicken McNuggets (or a double cheeseburger or six piece order of Chicken McNuggets for the Mighty Kids Meals); the sides are fries and sliced apples. Milk, chocolate milk, boxed apple juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks. Some U.S. franchises also include a small cellophane package of McDonaldland cookies. In 2009, McDonald's offered a Happy Meal Wrap, but it was discontinued later that year due to low sales.
In the UK, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four Chicken McNuggets, three fish fingers, or a Chicken wrap; the sides are a choice of fries, carrot sticks or sliced apples and grapes. Organic milk, Tropicana orange juice, apple and blackcurrant Robinsons Fruit Shoot, milkshakes, water and the traditional soda are the choices for drinks.
In New Zealand and Australia, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, three or six piece order of Chicken McNuggets, five or ten Chicken McBites or a crispy or seared Chicken Snack Wrap; the sides are a choice of french fries or apple slices. Thickshake, boxed chocolate milk, apple or water pop tops, orange juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks.
In Canada, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four piece Chicken McNuggets, grilled cheese, or chicken snack wraps; the sides are a choice of fries or apple slices with caramel dip. Milk, chocolate milk, boxed apple juice, orange juice, and the traditional soda are choices for drinks.







Chicken McNuggets





In Belgium, the entrée is a choice of hamburger, cheeseburger, four piece order of Chicken McNuggets, McFish or a Ketchup Wrap.




McDonald's line of larger chicken sandwiches (The Classic, Club, Ranch BLT and Southwest), which are part of the McDonald's Premium line were introduced in July 2005 as part of McDonald's menu revamp.

The Classic includes Lettuce, Tomato, and Mayo.
The Club also has Lettuce Tomato and Mayo, but also comes with Swiss cheese and bacon.
The Ranch BLT comes with a creamy ranch sauce, bacon, lettuce and tomato.
The Grand Chicken Burger: Large chicken patty with two layers of cheese, tomatoes, lettuce and sauce
The Southwest comes with a southwest style ancho chili sauce, lettuce, tomato, and spicy pepperjack cheese.


All four can be chosen with either crispy or grilled chicken and all are served on a wheat ciabatta bun.
Deli Choices is a line of deli-style sandwiches that are sold internationally. It is targeted at health-conscious customers and is available in Australia, Austria, Canada, Germany, and Britain, and is testing in the United States. It is similar to the McHero sandwich, sold in parts of the United States.
McDonald's sells French fries as its primary side order. Until 1967, McFries were never frozen, but were cut on-site from potatoes and immediately fried. In some international locations, they sell potato wedges, a type of French fry that is thick cut and wedge shaped and fried onion pieces that are similar to onion rings.





McDonald's McFries.



Many McDonald's locations in discount stores offer freshly popped popcorn and soft pretzels in addition to the normal menu. In PA stores, only soft pretzels are offered as a side option.
Denali Mac – a burger that looks like the Big Mac, but it uses two quarter pound beef patties. Sold only in Alaska, named after Denali (formerly Mount McKinley).





McLobster in 2015.



McLobster – a lobster roll served in a hot dog bun with "lobster sauce" and shredded lettuce, introduced in 1993. The product had supply issues and was not very profitable nationally. Recently, it was only available in Atlantic Canada and New England region in the summer, when lobster is inexpensive.[23] In the 2010s, McDonald's had short term reintroductions in Canada and Italy.
McCrab – in response to the McLobster, McDonald's along the eastern coast of the Delmarva Peninsula (comprising parts of Delaware, Maryland and Virginia) developed the McCrab sandwich, a McDonald's version of the Chesapeake crabcake.
Poutine – originally only to be found in French-Canadian communities, poutine is now found on the menu at most McDonald's' across Canada.[24]
Brownie Melt – similar to a Cinnamelt, it is a rich chocolate brownie with chocolate and white frosting.
McRice – Most McDonald's restaurants in countries in Asia serve the product due to popular demand. It is normal rice.
McSpaghetti – was launched in the late 1970s as a part of McD's dinner menu which included a number of Italian dishes. The dish is still available international where in Philippines it is popular and is generally served with McNuggets.[25]
Angus Snack Wrap – wrap with Angus burger introduced to the U.S. market on August 9, 2010. Angus Snack wraps are available three ways: Deluxe (lettuce, tomato, onions, pickles, American cheese, mayo, mustard); Bacon & Cheese (onions, pickles, American cheese, ketchup, mustard, a strip of bacon); and Mushroom & Swiss (sauteed mushrooms, Swiss cheese, mayo). The Angus Wrap uses 1/2 of a regular Angus burger pattie.[26]
The McVeggie burger – a vegetarian burger on a whole wheat bun. Available in India, Slovenia, Greece and Portugal. A special version is available in Cheung Chau branch in Hong Kong during the Cheung Chau Bun Festival.
Veggie Clubhouse - first sandwich with a quinoa pattie.[27]
The McBean burger – a vegan burger where the patties are made with cannellini beans, kidney beans, onions, carrots and green peppers. Available in Sweden.
The menu in India has numerous unique items, all of which contain neither beef nor pork:

Chicken Maharaja Mac – like a Big Mac, but with two pressed spiced chicken patties instead of beef, served with a mustard sauce
Paneer Salsa Wrap (paneer is an Indian unsalted white cheese).
Chicken Mexican Wrap
McAloo Tikki – breaded potato patty with onion and tomato on a plain bun ("aloo" is "potato"). Available at select stores in India, Greece, and Walt Disney World in Lake Buena Vista, FL.
Chicken McGrill


Georgie Pie — a meat pie sold in New Zealand and Australia. The brand was also the name of a New Zealand-based chain that was bought by McDonald's New Zealand in 1996, and was revived as part of the McDonald's menu in 2013 due to popular demand.
Garlic fries were tested in the San Francisco Bay Area in 2016, using locally grown garlic from Gilroy, California[28]
Veggie Crunch Burger - The vegetarian burger was launched in the Singapore market on 6 September 2016. Its patty is made with a mixture of unto 7 types of vegetables, including green peas, carrots, tomatoes, capsicum, beans etc. However, its dressings contain garlic and eggs. The patty is fried in the same oil used for frying apple pies so it does not come in contact with meat products. The burger has received good reviews
Mc Aaloo Tikki Burger - In India, since Mc Donalds does not serve beef or pork in any of its products, it has created a few vegetarian options to suit the 85% vegetarian populace. Thus, the cheese burger is recast as a vegetarian option and served as an "Aaloo tikki burger" containing a potato patties and a slice of cheese.[29]
Veg Maharaja Mac - A vegetarian version of the Big Mac sold at Mc Donalds India, containing patties made of potato, corn, peas and cheese. Maharaja is a Hindi word meaning emperor. [30]

Breakfast[edit]
McDonald's introduced breakfast foods in 1972.




An Egg McMuffin



McDonald's primary breakfast offerings are breakfast sandwiches.

McMuffins are McDonald's signature breakfast sandwich, first sold at select restaurants in 1972 as the Egg McMuffin, five years before breakfast officially went into effect, it consists of a fried egg, back bacon (called Canadian bacon in the U.S.) and American cheese on a toasted English muffin. Sausage or bacon McMuffins are also available. A Chicken McMuffin is offered in South Africa.
McDonald's offers a line of breakfast sandwiches: bagels, biscuits, and a special type of maple flavored pancake called McGriddles. All can all be ordered with sausage, ham or bacon, with an optional choice of cheese and/or egg. Regional meat offerings include fried chicken, steak, spam and bacon. They are an internationally famous sandwich and as such have been well received, though Morgan Spurlock criticized the item near the end of his 2004 documentary Super-Size Me with the following quote: "McDonald's joined right in, sponsoring events and creating premium salads to show how health conscious they had become. At the same time however, they masterminded one of their fattest sandwiches to date: the McGriddle. A pancake-wrapped cake press that won my heart in Texas, but can pack as much fat as a Big Mac, and contains more sugar than a pack of McDonaldland cookies." His doctor also informed him that consumption of the item could be a risk factor for high blood cholesterol.
The McDonald's Hamdesal is a new breakfast sandwich which consist of a slice of ham on pandesal, which can be ordered plain, with eggs or with cheese. This sandwich is currently available in the Philippines.[31]


There are two styles of breakfast burritos available. The Sausage Burrito, introduced in 1991, is made with a flour tortilla, sausage, American cheese, eggs, onions, and peppers. The new McSkillet wrap burrito adds potatoes and salsa. Chicken and steak variants of the McSkillet exists in limited areas.
Additional breakfast items include hotcakes; several breakfast platters with eggs, hash browns and meats or breads. Biscuits and gravy are available in parts of the southern U.S.
Oatmeal was added to the breakfast menu on December 27, 2010, after it test marketed well in Washington, D.C. and some parts of Maryland. In the test market areas, oatmeal started selling in late January 2010.
A few American regional variations exist, in Hawaii and Guam McDonald's offers local breakfast items such as Spam, Portuguese sausage and fresh cut pineapple. And in New Mexico there is a breakfast burrito on the menu, with both bacon and sausage varieties, called the Green Chile Sunrise Burrito.
In the UK, McDonald's offers the standard McMuffin, Double McMuffin, bacon rolls, toasted bagels with jam or Philadelphia cream cheese, hash browns, Oatso Simple porridge, bagels with egg, cheese and bacon or sausage, and a range of wraps, that consist of sausage & egg, bacon & egg, or cheese & egg, or you have the option to have the full wrap called the Breakfast Wrap which consists of sausage, bacon, egg, hash browns (potato rösti), cheese and an optional sauce, either ketchup or brown sauce.
Since October 2015, McDonald's offers breakfast all day in Australia, Canada, Mexico (Tijuana, Baja California Norte only), New Zealand & USA. However, the full breakfast menu won’t be available at all hours. Only certain items, such as sausage burritos or hot cakes will be available beyond the usual 10:30 A.M. cutoff weekdays or 11 weekends.[32] All US restaurants expanded its all-day menu to add Biscuit sandwiches, Egg McMuffins & McGriddles in late September 2016.
Since February 2016, breakfast bowls were added to the breakfast menu, available in some US restaurants.

Beverages[edit]
Beverages purveyed by McDonald's varies regionally.

McDonald's primary soft drink supplier is the Coca-Cola Company, except in restaurants which fall under an overall contract with PepsiCo. For example: the Detroit Metropolitan Wayne County Airport, Luxor Las Vegas, Staples Center and the University of Maryland, College Park Student Union. In the U.S. and Canada, Cadbury-Schweppes supplies Dr Pepper.
S&D Coffee, Gavina and Kraft supply McDonald's Premium Roast Coffee for McDonald's U.S. restaurants besides the New England area. Green Mountain Coffee Roasters supplies Newman's Own branded coffee for McDonald's New England area restaurants.
Hot and iced tea (supplied by S&D Coffee in the U.S.), hot chocolate, various juices and other regional beverages are available in various markets.
The McCafe is an umbrella term for lattes, espresso, iced coffee, hot chocolate, mocha, malts, smoothies, and other drinks that are sold in several markets worldwide.
Shakes are available in all U.S. McDonald's and many global markets[33] Permanent flavors are vanilla, strawberry, and chocolate; regional or seasonal flavors include Caramel, Coffee, Cherry, Eggnog (during Christmas), Banana, Pumpkin (during Halloween), Strawberry Banana, Lime, Mango Raspberry, Honeycomb, Arctic Orange (sherbet), Orange Cream, Shamrock Shake (a green, spearmint Limited Time Offer shake for St. Patrick's Day), Chocolate Mint, and Rolo (available only in Canada and the UK. This flavoured milkshake was also available in the Republic of Ireland during the summer of 2007 for a limited time only). In June 1975, 13 months before the celebration of the United States Bicentennial, McDonald's introduced a blueberry-flavored shake in order to advertise "Red, White, and Blueberry Shakes" for independence day celebrations, and lasting through August of that year. The run was repeated in summer 1976, but not since. In the U.S., starting in February 2010, "Triple Thick Shakes" were rebranded under the McCafe name, along with the addition of whipped cream, and a cherry on top, and a significant reduction in size. In Canada, McDonald's milkshakes are still sold under the "Triple Thick" name.[34]
Beer of different brands (varies locally) is available at McDonald's in Belgium, Czech Republic, France, Germany, Italy, Lithuania, Portugal, Romania, Slovenia, and Spain.
Irn-Bru is available in some Scottish McDonald's locations.
Inca Kola is available in every Peruvian McDonald's location.
McDonald's also offers 1% milk, 1% chocolate milk, and apple juice, most often as replacements for fountain drinks in Happy Meals.
As of 2009[update], McDonald's Australia and New Zealand began offering Frozen Coke as part of their menu. It is available in small, medium or large sizes or a 'Mini Value-Pick' size.New flavors are introduced occasionally, such as Frozen Fanta Grape and Frozen Sprite. Over summer, flavoured syrups have become available, for use with Frozen Sprite. In the 2013/2014 summer, Bubblegum, Pineapple, Wild Grape, Fairy Floss and Apple were available.

Desserts[edit]




McDonald's apple pies



A soft serve ice cream product is available in several forms, including sundaes, cones (either vanilla or chocolate), and as the primary ingredient in the McFlurry. As with many other formulations of soft serve, cellulose gum is utilized as an extender and thickener.[35]

The McFlurry is a soft-serve ice cream dessert that has pieces of candy or cookies mixed into it.[36] The McFlurry was first integrated in the menu at a Bathurst, New Brunswick, Canada franchisee in 1995. The flavors are crushed Oreo, M&M's Minis, Reese's, or Mars, Incorporated candy bars like Snickers, Twix, Galaxy, etc., Cadbury's candy bars like Twirl, Wispa, Creme Egg, Crunchie etc., Nestlé candy bars like Yorkie, Smarties, Drifter, Rolo, Butterfinger, etc. McDonald's also does limited time only flavors, e.g. for Shrek the Third it released the Ogre-Load flavor. In Australia, they had a special range for their 40 years in Australia celebration. The flavors were double choc fudge, bubblegum squash, strawberry crumble and caramel cookie. Also in Malaysia a unique flavor called FuseofmyLife is offered to customers. The mixing blade for the dessert is actually a specially designed spoon with a hollow handle that attaches to the mixer spindle (except in Australia[37] and New Zealand where the staff mix it by hand). The blade is used once then given to the customer to use as an eating utensil. Originally test marketed in Hawaii in 1997,[38] it is now available in most of its markets.[39]


McDonaldland cookies are traditionally available and are similar to animal crackers, except the shapes of the cookies are of Ronald McDonald, Grimace, Birdie the Early Bird, and the Hamburglar, among other McDonaldland characters. In fact, they are manufactured by Keebler, and are just re-branded animal crackers (Elfin Crackers or Our Family Animal Crackers). In Australia, the McDonaldland Cookies are manufactured by Arnotts and are sold in McDonald's restaurants for $1.
Freshly baked cookies manufactured by Nestlé are available in some markets. Among the cookies offered are sugar, oatmeal raisin, or chocolate chip.
McDonald's pies are actually turnovers, and come in apple or, in some markets, cherry and other seasonal or limited-time-only flavors such as pumpkin pie, smores, sweet potato and Holiday pie, and in Hawaii, taro, haupia, banana, and (introduced in 2017) guava. In Canada, in the 1970s, blueberry was standard, as was the Great Fruit Pie. During some seasonal promotions, cherry and strawberry are an available pie flavor in Canada; also, newly featured is Blueberry Maple and Peach. In Thailand, Hawaii and Guam, taro pie is featured occasionally. Other regional flavors include coconut (also known as haupia in Hawaii) and tuna (all in Guam as limited-time), and corn in Japan. In Mexico, Guatemala, Panama, and Costa Rica, cheese pie is available all year round. In Cyprus, strawberry and custard pies are available all year round also, along with the apple one. In Brazil, banana pies are available. In Russia apricot pies are also available.





McDonald's Cinnamon Melts



Cinnamon Melts – a popular cinnamon roll type item with cream cheese icing.
Brownie melts – Similar to the Cinnamon melt, only chocolate flavored with fudge and cream cheese icing on top. Available only in selected markets.
The Fruit and Yogurt Parfait – a mix of frozen strawberries and blueberries and vanilla yogurt, sold with a package of granola topping.
Smoothies are available in some locations in either Blueberry Pomegranate, Strawberry Banana, or Mango-Pineapple flavors. In the test market areas, smoothies were introduced in 2009.
In 2012, McDonald's Australia and New Zealand began offering a 'McFloat'. It contained Frozen Coke and/or the promotional frozen beverage, a small amount of soft serve and a lot of ice. In Australia, the Frozen Coke 'McSpider' has also been purveyed, which consists of frozen Coke and soft serve ice cream.[40]

Former items[edit]





This section possibly contains original research. Please improve it by verifying the claims made and adding inline citations. Statements consisting only of original research should be removed. (October 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Angus burgers – Four types: the Angus Deluxe (American cheese, sliced red onions and sliced red tomatoes, iceberg lettuce, pickles, mustard, and mayonnaise); Angus Mushroom and Swiss (sautéed mushrooms, Swiss cheese and mayonnaise); Angus Bacon and Cheese (bacon, American cheese, sliced red onions, mustard, ketchup and pickles); and the Angus Chipotle BBQ Bacon (chipotle sauce, red onions, pickles, bacon, and American cheese). In Australia and New Zealand, there are three Angus burgers sold; The Grand Angus (which is a clone of the Angus Deluxe) and the Mighty Angus (which resembles the Angus Cheese and Bacon, but with no pickles and mayonnaise and onion relish replacing the ketchup and mustard). For a limited time only, the Angus The Third, similar to the Grand Angus, but with no mustard and made with a tomato chilli relish and only one slice of cheese. Also, for a limited time, Angus the Great was sold, a clone of the Angus Mushroom and Swiss. In October 2012, an Angus version of the Cheddar Bacon Onion (CBO) Sandwich was made available,[41] consisting of a horseradish-like sauce, grilled caramelized onions, bacon and cheddar cheese. In May 2013, McDonald's stopped selling the Angus burger.[42][43] Two years later the third-pound burgers returned (known as Sirloin Third Pound Burgers), but as a limited-time promotion. It comes in three sandwiches: Bacon & Cheese, Lettuce & Tomato, and Steakhouse. The Angus Burgers are still available in Canada and some markets in Latin America.
Arch Deluxe – An attempt to produce a "luxury" hamburger, promoted by a high-profile advertising campaign (introduced in 1996), today considered one of the most expensive failures in McDonald's history. It featured a honey mustard-type sauce,[44] quarter-pound beef patty on a potato roll, with leaf lettuce, tomato, red onion, and cheese; peppered bacon was also offered for an extra charge. The Arch Deluxe was accompanied with three other burgers at the time, the Crispy Chicken Deluxe (later renamed the Crispy Chicken Sandwich), the Grilled Chicken Deluxe (later renamed the Chicken McGrill), and the Fish Filet Deluxe (since discontinued along with the Arch Deluxe itself).
Barry Burger – A double bacon cheeseburger with onions and barbecue sauce named after football player Barry Sanders, sold mainly in his home state of Kansas.[citation needed]
BBQ Chicken – A toasted bun featuring shredded chicken and zesty BBQ sauce.[citation needed]
Beef Wennington – A burger solely offered in the Chicago area in 1998–99, named after former Chicago Bulls player Bill Wennington. It featured a single patty topped with cheese, onions, barbecue sauce and a slice of Canadian bacon.[45]
Chopped Beefsteak Sandwich – test-marketed in various markets across the United States in 1980 as part of a McDonald's "Dinner Menu", offered only after 4:00 p.m. The Chopped Beefsteak Sandwich was essentially an elongated hamburger of a different quality served on a short French roll, similar to a sub or hero roll. Packets of steak sauce (A1 sauce in Chicago) were available for the sandwich.[citation needed]
Big 33 or McJordan Special – A quarter pound burger with bacon and special barbecue sauce named after basketball players Larry Bird and Michael Jordan, respectively.
Boselli Burger – Jacksonville, Florida, franchises also featured the Triple-Double Burger in 1998, named after Jacksonville Jaguars tackle Tony Boselli.[46]
Bratwurst – For a few years during the 1990s and in 2002, Johnsonville brand bratwurst on a hot dog-like roll was sold in some US markets for a limited time each fall. A few locations in Eastern Wisconsin, which is the major market for the Sheboygan County-based company still offer bratwursts on a seasonal basis.
Buffalo Ranch McChicken (also the Hot 'n Spicy).
Catfish Sandwich – A sandwich made with a catfish patty, lettuce, and tangy sauce and sold on a McRib-style bun. Sold at McDonald's locations in Kentucky, Tennessee, Alabama, Arkansas, and Mississippi for a brief period in March 1991.[47]
Cheddar Melt – a quarter pound beef patty smothered with grilled onions (sauteed in butter and teriyaki), then topped with cheddar cheese sauce on a light rye bun, offered in 1988, the 1990s, 2004, and 2007. They are still available in Brazil under the name Cheddar McMelt.[48]
Chicken Fajitas – The Chicken Fajitas consisted of a small soft tortilla, a grilled vegetable medley, and grilled chicken. The fajita was in the traditional thin wrapping paper. These are still available in British Columbia, Saskatchewan, Nova Scotia, Newfoundland (at certain locations), Alberta (at select locations in the Edmonton area) and at all non-Walmart McDonald's in Ontario.[citation needed]
Chicken McBites – popcorn chicken breast with "home-style seasoning" offered through April 20, 2012 in 3-ounce, 5-ounce and 10-ounce versions. Dipping sauces include Ranch, Sweet n' Sour, Tangy BBQ, Chipotle BBQ, Honey Mustard,[49] Spicy Buffalo, and Sweet Chili.[citation needed]
Chicken Parmesan Sandwich – A chicken breast covered in bread crumbs and topped with tomato sauce and mozzarella on a toasted bun.[citation needed]
Chicken Platter – A grilled chicken burger served with lettuce and tomato on the HotCakes tray.[citation needed]





Chicken Selects



Chicken Selects – McDonald's version of chicken strips. They were introduced in early 1998 and offered again as a permanent part of the menu in late October 2003. They are sold in 3-, 5-, or 10-piece sizes and include choices of spicy buffalo, creamy ranch, honey mustard, and chipotle barbecue dipping sauces; sauce selections in the UK are smokey barbecue, sour cream and sweet chili sauce.[50] Sold in the United States, Canada, Israel and the UK. Available in Australia under the name Chicken McDippers.[51] McDonald's stopped selling Chicken Selects in the United States in February 2013,[52][53] but they returned to the menu on February 25, 2015 for a limited engagement and were renamed Chicken Select Tenders. Chicken Selects are still sold at McDonald's restaurants in the United Kingdom and Ireland.
Corn Dog McNuggets – For a brief time in 1991, McDonald's locations in Richmond, Virginia offered a multi-pack of mini corn dogs without sticks. They were offered again in 2002 as the "Mini Corn Dogs".
Cuban Sandwich – Roast pork and ham sandwich on a long roll with Swiss cheese, mustard, and pickles. One of several Hispanic-inspired menu items briefly sold at South Florida units in 2001.[54]
Derby Burger – A single patty hamburger with American Cheese, lettuce, tomato, ketchup, mayonnaise, and bacon. It was a regional item sold in the mid-1990s in Louisville, Kentucky only during the spring to coincide with the Kentucky Derby. Discontinued in the early 2000s (decade).
Diet Coke Float and Coke Float – In 1991 McDonald's ran a limited time promotion selling a float made with Diet Coke or Coke with low-fat soft-serve frozen yogurt in a collectable Coke bell glass. It sold for $1.59 with 40 cents from every sale donated to Ronald McDonald Children's Charities.[55]
Dinner Menu – After testing pasta in the South in 1989, McDonald's began testing a pasta-based menu at 40 units across Rochester, New York, in September 1991, including lasagna, fettuccine alfredo, and spaghetti with meatballs. In the early 1990s, a new Dinner Menu was tested for 6–12 months at two locations in New York and Tennessee. It consisted of the pizza mentioned below but also included lasagna, spaghetti, fettuccine alfredo, and roasted chicken as entrees. The side dishes included mashed potatoes with gravy and a vegetable medley.[citation needed] For the dessert, it included a brownie à la mode or peanut butter pie.[25][56]
Eggs Benedict McMuffin – Canadian style bacon, egg, special breakfast sauce, and American cheese on a toasted English muffin.
Fried Roast Beef Sandwich – In 1968 this product was launched targeting adults. Sold with a package of McDonald's BBQ sauce on the side using the slogan "McDonald's is my kind of place"; it was inspired by a franchisee's version of an Arby's sandwich. The sandwich failed due to the costs of getting roast beef slicers; no matter how many sandwiches they could sell, it would never turn a profit.[1]
Grilled Cheese Happy Meal – There was a Happy Meal introduced during the early part of the 2000s (decade) that contained a grilled cheese sandwich. It was discontinued the same summer it was released but is still sold in some Canadian markets.
Grilled Chicken Flatbread Sandwich – Grilled chicken strips, lettuce, tomato, grilled onions, pepper jack cheese, and a creamy herb sauce served wrapped in a heated flatbread. Served briefly in June 2002, and again from December 27, 2002 until February 9, 2003.
Happy Meal Breakfast – The Happy Meal Breakfast was a meal that was smaller than the traditional breakfast that lasted from the 1980s to 2009. It was discontinued by advice of the Nutrition department at the Corporate Headquarters in Oak Brook, Illinois, but is still sold in Hong Kong.
Home Fried Chicken – During 1968 McDonald's sold deep fried chicken (similar to KFC). Targeting parents who could not choose between burgers and chicken, McDonald's delivered home fried chicken served with distinct packaging. The white chicken meat was sold in light gold packages (for adults) and catering to the children – the dark chicken meat was sold in dark foil packages. TV slogan was... "so everyone can have just what they want ... McDonald's Strives to Reunite the American Family" (note the US was struggling with domestic civil unrest due to the combined social upheaval of the Vietnam War and the civil rights movement)
Hot dogs – In 1937, hot dogs were the first things sold in McDonald's. Then in CEO Ray Kroc's 1977 autobiography, he prohibited the company from selling hot dogs, regardless of potential demand, as he regarded them as unhygienic; however, hot dogs were reintroduced in 1995 at some Midwestern located stores (at the option of the franchise-holder) as a summer item. UK stores sold hot dogs during 2002 on the McChoice menu (later PoundSaver) and as a seasonal menu item in the summer of 1999. Also, at least one American restaurant offered Oscar Mayer hot dogs at some time, notably in Bethel Park, Pennsylvania, and McDonald's locations at Toronto Metro Zoo and SkyDome in Toronto offered hot dogs until 1999. Starting in the year 2007, a few McDonald's began selling Hot Dogs in central Pennsylvania due to popular demand from local sports fans. They can be found at 12 locations as of 2011[update]. In Tokyo locations, hot dogs were available from 1990 until 2004, and have been reintroduced one more for 2009, dubbed the "McHot Dog". McDonald's locations in Chile also sold hot dogs for a brief period in 2004.
Hot Ham 'N Cheese – Sliced ham, American cheese, lettuce and tomato on a triple split, sesame seed bun with a choice of mayonnaise or honey mustard sauce.
Hulaburger – A Ray Kroc invention, it featured a slice of pineapple instead of meat. Originally intended for Roman Catholics who are not allowed to eat meat on Fridays during Lent. It was test-marketed in 1963 alongside the Filet-O-Fish sandwich, with the highest seller being added to the menu full-time (the Filet-O-Fish, a creation of an Ohio franchiser, won).[57]
Italian Doubles – A limited summer promotion in Canada in 1989. Two regular patties on a hamburger bun with 1 slice of mozzarella cheese & marinara sauce.
Kiwiburger – In the 1990s, New Zealand sold a burger reflecting their national icon the Kiwi. It was a single beef patty hamburger, with egg (identical to the egg in McMuffins), cheese, lettuce, tomato, beetroot, onions, ketchup ("tomato sauce") and American mustard. It came in distinctive packaging with 46 classic kiwi quotes, kiwiana, and kiwi sporting icons, which were also used in promotions of the burger.[58] Complications with the cooking of the egg and the use of certain ingredients, that no other McDonald's burger had, saw the Kiwiburger discontinued. It has occasionally returned to the menu for limited times since.
McChicken LT (McDonald's Chicken Lettuce and Tomato) was the chicken version of the McDLT featuring the same two-sided container as the McDLT except the packaging was yellow instead of white. It was introduced about the same time as the McDLT in the mid-1980s. The chicken was a grilled, unbreaded chicken breast placed on the heel of the bun in one of the compartments. The toppings were shredded lettuce, tomato and mayonnaise assembled on the top half of the bun in the other compartment. Cheese was an optional addition for an extra US$0.10. The grilled chicken breast was then basted with a brushing of melted butter. As with the McDLT, the consumer would finalize preparation of the sandwich by combining the hot and cool sides just prior to eating. The McChicken LT was discontinued in the Fall of 1987.
McDLT – The McDLT (McDonald's Lettuce and Tomato) was sold in a novel form of packaging.[59] The McDLT was introduced in the fall of 1984 as the Lettuce and Tomato Special. The meat and bottom half of the bun were prepared separately from the lettuce, tomato, American cheese, pickles, sauces, and top half of the bun. Both were then packaged into a specially designed two-sided styrofoam container. The consumer was then expected to finalize preparation of the sandwich by combining the hot and cool sides just prior to eating. It was discontinued between December 1990 and January 1991 due to environmental concerns with styrofoam.
McDonald's Own Chocolaty Chip Cookie - mini-chocolate chip cookies which came in a small rectangular box
McDonaldland Cookies - cookies shaped like the McDonald's characters. originally came in a white box with a handle and later smaller rectangular boxes with cartoon images
McDouble Cruncher – two patties with a slice of cheese, chipotle BBQ sauce and crispy onions
McGrilled Chicken Classic – A sandwich featuring a grilled chicken breast portion that was introduced in September 1993 and was produced before being replaced by the Grilled Chicken Deluxe/Chicken McGrill.
McLean Deluxe – A lower-calorie Quarter Pounder-type sandwich (introduced in 1991) containing 90% lean beef and 10% water with carrageenan, a seaweed extract, to hold the water and beef together.[60] This item was otherwise identical to the Big N' Tasty and the McDLT.
McRye – a hamburger on rye bread sold in Finland in late 1990s.
McSoup – Campbell's Soup sold at McDonald's available in Broccoli & Cheese and Chicken Noodle. (This product is only sold in winter months in select markets)
McStuffin – a pocket sandwich available with various fillings. McStuffins were sold for a short time in 1993 and were discontinued that same year due to not having a lot of popularity.
McWraps – Inspired in the Mexican burritos Chicken Caesar, Chicken and Garden Salad wraps served toasted in a thick herb flat bread. McWraps is still offered in some parts of Europe(for instance in Denmark and Croatia).
Mighty Wings – deep-fried spicy chicken wings. McDonald's began selling these in 1990 as an optional item and stopped selling them in 2003. They are still sold in China, Spain, Samoa, and the U.S. Virgin Island of St Croix as of March 6, 2010. Also sold as McWings in Pakistan, they were discontinued for a while but relaunched. On September 9, 2013, McDonald's brought the Mighty Wings back to its menus in all of its American restaurants as a limited time offer available until November 2013. The Mighty Wings did not sell well its second time around in the U.S. The main problems cited with the Mighty Wings was the price point versus the amount purchased. Compared with competitors, the pricing was determined to be too high, but McDonald's stated that due to overruns in purchasing, the company could not sell them at lower prices without losing money. On February 24, 2014, McDonald's decided to put them back on the menu for a limited engagement to liquidate the remaining inventory at a lower price in all U.S. locations.
Mozzarella sticks - 3 fried cheesesticks with marinara sauce on the side. Was on the Dollar Menu & More menu from December 2015 to March 2016.
Onion Nuggets – introduced at the same time as the Beefsteak Sandwich as the side item for the Dinner Menu. Onion Nuggets were chopped onions shaped into small solid pieces, dipped in batter and deep-fried.
Philly Cheesesteak – Slices of steak and Swiss cheese with onions. Served until August 2007 at Australian and American McDonald's. This sandwich is still available in Canada, made with cheese spread and green bell pepper.
Pizza / McPizza – McDonald's has also attempted pizza at various times,[25][56] with an apple-pie–like McPizza and more conventional McDonald's Pizza. A line of personal-sized pizzas was first seen in the late 1970s in test-market stores near interstate highways around Milwaukee and Madison. In Canada (c. 1992–99), the pizza originally began as a family-sized pizza that was brought out to the table by an employee and placed on a raised rack in the centre of the table. Later it was scaled down to a personal-sized pizza. However, variations have found their way into some international markets such as India (the pie-like "Pizza McPuff"). McDonald's also test marketed a 14-inch, round, traditional-style pizza in Evansville, Indiana, and nearby Owensboro, Kentucky, in 1989.[61] By 1991, the McDonald's test markets for pizza had grown to over 500 McDonald's locations before the pizza test was placed on hold.[62] Pizza was discontinued in most restaurants by 2000. The reason for eliminating the pizza from the menu was that the time to cook a pizza took 11 minutes, and McDonald's wanted to keep its reputation for fast service. As of March 2017, two McDonald's locations, one in Pomeroy, Ohio, and the other in Spencer, West Virginia still offer the family style McPizza.[63]
Roast Beef on a Roll – A roast beef sandwich made just like the Arby's roast beef sandwich. Sold in 1968.
Root Beer Float – A combination of vanilla soft-serve ice cream and root beer.
Salad Shakers – A salad of lettuce, croutons and other vegetable in a tall dome shaped plastic container. Salad Shakers were introduced in the spring of 2000 and are still available in the Netherlands.
Son of Mac – Also known as the Mini Mac or Baby Mac, a version with only one patty and no centre roll piece. It sold as a Baby Mac in New Zealand, was sold in Australia, now discontinued. Served by some stores in the United States under the moniker "Mac Jr". It's still sold in places in Canada, known as the "kid's mac".
Southern Fried-Chicken – Was sold in Australia up until mid-1986. This was available as a 2 piece (or 3 piece) pack including French Fries. This was replaced by the current McNugget range, as the nuggets became cheaper to produce and safer to cook.
Spanish Omelet Bagel – existed during the mid to late 2000s, discontinued.
Spicy Chicken – Chicken breast with spicy breading introduced in 2006. (Still offered in some U.S. markets.)
Strawberry Shortcake McFlurry – Vanilla soft-serve ice cream with strawberry topping and Vanilla Cookie pieces mixed together.
Superhero Burger – Featuring 3 patties, yellow American cheese, white American cheese, tomato, lettuce, onion, and mayo all laid out on an elongated bun like a hero sandwich. The burger was released as part of the "Taste of the Month" series that McDonald's ran in 1995 where they had a new burger every month. The Superhero Burger was also tied into the promo campaign for the film Batman Forever and the ads for it featured Batman and the Batmobile.
Torta – In 2000, the company released their own version of tortas, a Mexican sandwich, in southern California on a trial basis.
Triple Ripple – A mixed cone with strawberry, vanilla, and chocolate, topped with a plastic top.[1]
Triple-Double Burger – A burger featuring 3 beef patties and 2 slices of cheese, served on the same 6 inch (15.2 cm) sesame seed roll as the McRib. It was originally marketed as the Superhero Burger to promote the release of the 1995 film Batman Forever. It was also sold under the names of local sports stars in at least five markets in the 1990s and in the Cleveland area in the early 2000s (decade):

The Hockey Hero burger, in Canada.
The Jason Kidd Burger – Downtown Phoenix, Arizona, franchises had a Limited Time Offer burger named after NBA player Jason Kidd, while he played for the Phoenix Suns.
The Michael Dean Perry burger, for the then Cleveland Browns star.
The Rory Sparrow burger was sold in the Sacramento area. It was named after the Sacramento Kings star.
Thome Triple was sold in the Cleveland, Ohio area. It was named after Cleveland Indians first baseman Jim Thome


Upside Down Iced Tea – A new cup tested at select locations in the southeast United States in the late 1990s. It featured an ice compartment at top of the cup to keep the beverage cold. It was quickly discontinued.
Szechuan Sauce, created to promote the Disney film, Mulan (1998 film). It was thrust back into the cultural spotlight after being referenced numerous times in the Season 3 premiere of Adult Swim animated comedy Rick and Morty.

See also[edit]


Food portal



List of Burger King products

References[edit]


^ a b c Love, John F. (1995). McDonald's: Behind the Arches (Revised ed.). New York: Bantam Books. ISBN 0553347594. 
^ a b Buiso, Gary (2012-12-02). "More burning questions about NYC answered | New York Post". Nypost.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Menu: Our Full McDonald's Food Menu | McDonald's". Mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Artz, Matthew (December 31, 2009). "Fremont's 'hamburger king' dead at 81". Oakland Tribune. Retrieved January 12, 2010. 
^ "ACCUEIL". McDonald's France. 
^ AP Newswire (July 2, 1997). "McDonald's hoping new burger a Whopper stopper". The Augusta Chronicle. Archived from the original on October 30, 2007. Retrieved October 23, 2007. 
^ a b c d Wong, Venessa (March 12, 2014). "After Year of Flubs, McDonald's Loses Its Taste for Novelty". Bloomberg Business. Retrieved March 3, 2015. 
^ "麥當勞 意想不到嘅嚐試". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Product Nutrition". McDonalds.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's 1955 Burger Review - Burger Lad - Burger Reviews". Burger Lad. 2013-10-16. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ John Reynolds (2011-08-25). "McDonald's cooks up 'no-nonsense' 1955 burger for the UK". Marketingmagazine.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Little, Katie (November 24, 2015). "McDonald's breakfast burger mashup debuts". CNBC. NBC News. Retrieved November 25, 2015. 
^ a b "McDonalds - Artisan Grilled Chicken". News.mcdonalds.com. 2015-04-06. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ http://www.aef.com/images/diversity/burrell/snack_wrap_case_study.pdf
^ "North County News - San Diego Union Tribune". Nctimes.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ McDonald's Australia reveals new Chicken Menu[permanent dead link]
^ "MacPride.Net - Kaufman Enterprises - Promotions". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Chicken Maharaja Mac". www.mcdonaldsindia.net. Mc Donalds India. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ "Chicken McBites". Mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Tasty Basket 30 pezzi | McDonald's Italia" (in (in Italian)). M.mcdonalds.it. 2012-12-03. Retrieved 2017-07-13. CS1 maint: Unrecognized language (link)
^ Clark, Paul (February 20, 2007). "No fish story: Sandwich saved his McDonald's". USA Today. Retrieved April 17, 2009. 
^ Eisenberg, Daniel (September 25, 2002). "Can McDonald's Shape Up?". Time. 
^ Velasco, Schuyler (August 21, 2013). "10 fast foods that have disappeared: McLobster". Christian Science Monitor. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 
^ Spencer Ross. "A connoisseur's guide to downtown poutine - a & e". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ a b c Velasco, Schuyler (August 21, 2013). "10 fast foods that have disappeared: 4. McSpaghetti". Christian Science Monitor. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 
^ "Forays of a Finance Foodie: McDonald's Steps Up Their Style: New Product Preview Day! [New York]". Financefoodie.com. 2010-06-08. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ [1][dead link]
^ "McDonalds Testing Garlic Fries". Time.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Harding, Luke (28 December 2000). "Give me a Big Mac - but hold the beef". The Guardian. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ "Maharaja Mac - Veg and Chicken options". www.mcdonaldsindia.net. Mc Donalds India. Retrieved 13 March 2017. 
^ mcdonalds.com.ph. "Ourfood". McDonalds. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's: You Deserve A Hash Brown All Day". NPR.org. 2015-09-02. Retrieved 2016-03-07. 
^ snopes (March 7, 2016). "McDonald's Shakes : snopes.com". snopes. Retrieved March 7, 2016. 
^ "Triple Thick MilkshakeÂ®". McDonalds.ca. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's USA – USA Core Menu Items by Ingredients". McDonald's Corporation. Archived from the original on April 26, 2009. Retrieved May 29, 2009. 
^ "McDonald's Nutrition Calculator | McDonald's" (PDF). Nutrition.mcdonalds.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Why don't you mix the mcflurry anymore like you used to?". December 10, 2013. Retrieved June 21, 2014. 
^ "A McFlurry of tasty ideas". Honolulu Star-Bulletin. August 13, 1998. Retrieved June 12, 2012. 
^ "Steve McFlurry USPTO trademark information". United States Patent and Trademark Office. December 19, 1997. Retrieved September 1, 2006. 
^ "Large Frozen McSpider Coke | Drinks Menu | McDonald's AU". Mcdonalds.com.au. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McShakeup". The Huffington Post. March 1, 2013. 
^ Candice Choi, AP. "McDonald's cuts Angus burgers from menu". Usatoday.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "R.I.P. McDonald's Angus Third Pounder". The Huffington Post. May 9, 2013. Retrieved October 18, 2013. 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Elliott Harris. "Beefing up his role – Bulls' Wennington latest burger celebrity". Chicago Sun-Times. March 8, 1998. Sports, 14.
^ Times, The (1998-08-16). "Jaguars: Advertising war games have definitely begun 08/16/98". Jacksonville.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "The Press-Courier". McDonalds testing catfish. 14 February 1991. Retrieved 13 July 2017. 
^ "McD brings back Cheddar Melt | Nation's Restaurant News | Find Articles at BNET". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Unveils Chicken McBites". Los Angeles Times. January 25, 2012. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's USA - USA Core Menu Items by Ingredients". Web.archive.org. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's chicken snack a hit". Azcentral.com. 2007-01-30. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ February 28, 2013 (2013-02-28). "Bid Adieu To Chicken Selects As McDonald’s Makes Room On The Menu For Newer Items – Consumerist". Consumerist.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's dropping Fruit & Walnut Salad, Chicken Selects in U.S.". Reuters. 
^ "Mcdonald's Tries Adding Hispanic Fare To Fast Food - tribunedigital-orlandosentinel". Articles.orlandosentinel.com. 2001-10-28. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "Floats offered at McDonalds". Beaver County Times. 22 May 1991. p. 14. Retrieved 12 July 2017. 
^ a b McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ "McDonald's Kiwi Burger television advertisement – New Zealand Film Archive". Archived from the original on July 14, 2011. Retrieved October 15, 2010. 
^ US 4653685 
^ McGrath, Jane. "5. The Hula Burger - 5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items | HowStuffWorks". Money.howstuffworks.com. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 
^ Chaudhry, Rajan (July 31, 1989). "McPizza? McDonald's widens pizza test: pizza operators gird for assault". Nation's Restaurant News. Findarticles.com. Retrieved November 13, 2009. 
^ Prewitt, Milford (October 7, 1991). "McDonald's developing separate dinner menu, puts pizza test on hold". Nation's Restaurant News. Findarticles.com. Archived from the original on May 1, 2009. Retrieved February 28, 2009. 
^ Pemberton, Becky (2016-03-10). "Ohio and West Virginia McDonald's are still selling MCPIZZA | Daily Mail Online". Dailymail.co.uk. Retrieved 2017-07-13. 


External links[edit]

 Media related to McDonald's products at Wikimedia Commons
"McPizza! – Tasting the elusive McDonald's Pizza". Science Tortilla (YouTube). March 14, 2015.  – Video on a taste test of a McPizza from one of the two locations still selling it.
McGrath, Jane. "5 Failed McDonald's Menu Items". HowStuffWorks, Inc. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 







v
t
e


McDonald's






History
Advertising

ad programs


Countries with franchises
Legal cases
Product list
International availability





People



Richard and Maurice McDonald
Ray Kroc
Joan Kroc
Ralph Alvarez
Charlie Bell
Al Bernardin
Jim Cantalupo
George Cohon
Dan Coudreaut
Steve Easterbrook
Janice L. Fields
Den Fujita
Don Gorske
Jack M. Greenberg
Eikō Harada
June Martino
Herb Peterson
Michael R. Quinlan
Ed Rensi
Willard Scott
James A. Skinner
Donald N. Smith
Harry J. Sonneborn
Don Thompson
Fred L. Turner





Company



Hamburger University
Leaps and Bounds
McBarge
McCafé
McDonald's #1 Store Museum
McDonald's (Will Rogers Turnpike)
Oldest McDonald's restaurant
Rock N Roll McDonald's
Ronald McDonald House Charities





Products




Beef



Big Mac
Big N' Tasty
Deluxe line
Kiwiburger
Quarter Pounder (McRoyal)





Chicken



Chicken McNuggets
McChicken





Other



Deli Choices
Filet-O-Fish
Georgie Pie
Happy Meal
McArabia
McGriddles
McMuffin
McRib
Premium line
Shamrock Shake





Former



Arch Deluxe
McAfrika








Advertising




Campaigns



Changeables
Global Gladiators
Golden Arches
Mac Tonight
McDonaldland
McDonald's Monopoly
McDonald's Treasure Land Adventure
M.C. Kids
McKids
Ronald McDonald
Teenie Beanies
The Wacky Adventures of Ronald McDonald





Sponsorships



Kyle Larson (NASCAR)
Jamie McMurray (NASCAR)
Graham Rahal (IndyCar Series)
McDonald's All-American Game
McDonald's Championship
McDonald's Championship (golf)
McDonald's Cycle Center
McDonald's Gospelfest
McDonald's Olympic Swim Stadium





Related



Burger wars
Donald Land
Fast food advertising
Mac and Me (1988 film)
McDonald's sign (Pine Bluff, Arkansas)
Supersize








Branches



Canada
Israel
New Zealand





Criticism



Fast Food Nation (film)
McDonaldization
McDonald's Videogame
McJob
McRefugee
McLibel
Maxime, McDuff & McDo
Super Size Me

Don't Eat This Book







Legal cases



Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants
Magee v. McDonald's
McDonald's Restaurants v. Morris & Steel
Sid & Marty Krofft Television Productions Inc. v. McDonald's Corp.





Related



McDelivery
Big Mac Index
Bill Elliott
McDonald's Young Entertainers
McWords
San Ysidro McDonald's massacre
"Seriously McDonalds"
Sydney River McDonald's murders
Taiwan McDonald's bombings
Urban legends
Boom, Like That
The Founder (2016 film)










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=List_of_McDonald%27s_products&oldid=791067944"					
Categories: Lists of brand name foodsMcDonald's foodsHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksArticles with Italian-language external linksCS1 maint: Unrecognized languageArticles with dead external links from July 2017Wikipedia articles needing copy edit from July 2017All articles needing copy editArticles that may contain original research from July 2017All articles that may contain original researchArticles needing additional references from July 2017All articles needing additional referencesWikipedia articles needing page number citations from July 2017All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2014Articles with unsourced statements from December 2014Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2009All articles containing potentially dated statementsArticles that may contain original research from October 2012Articles with unsourced statements from July 2017Articles with unsourced statements from March 2009Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2011 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


日本語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 23:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









McDonald's - Wikipedia




















 







McDonald's

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from MacDonalds)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other uses, see Macdonald (disambiguation).

McDonald's





Type

Public


Traded as



NYSE: MCD
DJIA Component
S&P 100 Component
S&P 500 Component





ISIN
US5801351017


Industry
Restaurants


Genre
Fast food restaurant


Founded
McDonald's:
May 15, 1940 (77 years ago)
 San Bernardino, CA
McDonald's Corporation:
April 15, 1955 (62 years ago)
 Des Plaines, IL


Founders
McDonald's:
Richard McDonald
Maurice McDonald
McDonald's Corporation:
Ray Kroc


Headquarters
 Oak Brook, Illinois, U.S.
(moving to Chicago in 2018)[1]



Number of locations

About 36,900[2] (December 31, 2016)



Area served

Worldwide



Key people




Andrew J. McKenna (Chairman)
Steve Easterbrook (President and CEO)





Products



Hamburgers
chicken
french fries
soft drinks
milkshakes
salads
desserts
coffee
breakfast





Revenue



 US$24.622 billion (2016)[2]






Operating income




 US$7.745 billion (2016)[2]






Net income




 US$4.686 billion (2016)[2]





Total assets



 US$31.024 billion (2016)[2]





Total equity



 US$2.2043 billion (2016)[2]






Number of employees

375,000 (2016)[2]


Website

corporate.mcdonalds.com/mcd.html
www.mcdonalds.com/us/en-us.html
This box:

view
talk
edit





McDonald's is an American hamburger and fast food restaurant chain. It was founded in 1940 as a barbecue restaurant operated by Richard and Maurice McDonald, in San Bernardino, California. In 1948, they reorganized their business as a hamburger stand, using production line principles. The first McDonald's franchise using the arches logo opened in Phoenix, Arizona in 1953. Businessman Ray Kroc joined the company as a franchise agent in 1955 and subsequently purchased the chain from the McDonald brothers. Based in Oak Brook, Illinois, McDonald's confirmed plans to move its global headquarters to Chicago by early 2018.[3][4]
Today, McDonald's is the world's largest restaurant chain, serving approximately 68 million customers daily in 120 countries across approximately 36,900 outlets.[5] McDonald's primarily sells hamburgers, cheeseburgers, chicken products, french fries, breakfast items, soft drinks, milkshakes, wraps, and desserts. In response to changing consumer tastes and after facing criticism for the unhealthy nature of their food,[6] the company has expanded its menu to include salads, fish, wraps, smoothies, and fruit. A McDonald's restaurant is operated by either a franchisee, an affiliate, or the corporation itself. The McDonald's Corporation revenues come from the rent, royalties, and fees paid by the franchisees, as well as sales in company-operated restaurants. According to a BBC report published in 2012, McDonald's is the world's second largest private employer (behind Walmart with 1.9 million employees), 1.5 million of whom work for franchises.



Contents


1 History
2 Corporate overview

2.1 Facts and figures
2.2 Business model
2.3 Headquarters
2.4 Board of directors
2.5 Global operations

2.5.1 Countries with McDonald's




3 Products

3.1 International menu variations


4 Restaurants

4.1 Types of restaurants

4.1.1 McDrive
4.1.2 McCafé
4.1.3 "Create Your Taste" restaurants
4.1.4 Other
4.1.5 Special diet
4.1.6 Playgrounds
4.1.7 McDonald's Next


4.2 2006 redesign
4.3 Smoking ban


5 Treatment of employees

5.1 Automation
5.2 Wages

5.2.1 Strikes


5.3 Working conditions


6 Animal welfare standards
7 Marketing and advertising

7.1 India
7.2 Space exploration
7.3 Children's advertising
7.4 Sports awards and honors


8 Charity

8.1 McHappy Day
8.2 McDonald's Monopoly donation
8.3 McRefugee


9 Criticism

9.1 Company responses to criticism
9.2 Environmental record
9.3 Legal cases

9.3.1 Asia
9.3.2 Australia
9.3.3 United Kingdom
9.3.4 United States


9.4 Use of genetically modified food


10 See also
11 References
12 Further reading
13 External links



History
Main article: History of McDonald's




McDonald's corporate logo used from November 18, 1968, to 2006. It still exists at some restaurants






The oldest operating McDonald's restaurant was the third one built, opening in 1953. It is located at 10207 Lakewood Blvd. at Florence Ave. in Downey, California (at 33°56′50″N 118°07′06″W﻿ / ﻿33.9471°N 118.1182°W﻿ / 33.9471; -118.1182).


The business began in 1940, with a restaurant opened by brothers Richard and Maurice McDonald at 1398 North E Street at West 14th Street in San Bernardino, California (at 34°07′32″N 117°17′41″W﻿ / ﻿34.1255°N 117.2946°W﻿ / 34.1255; -117.2946). Their introduction of the "Speedee Service System" in 1948 furthered the principles of the modern fast-food restaurant that the White Castle hamburger chain had already put into practice more than two decades earlier.[citation needed] The first McDonald's with the arches opened in Phoenix, Arizona in March 1953.[citation needed] The original mascot of McDonald's was a man with a chef's hat on top of a hamburger-shaped head whose name was "Speedee". In 1962, the Golden Arches replaced Speedee as the company symbol. A new mascot, Ronald McDonald, was introduced in 1965. The clown-like man having puffed out costume legs appeared in advertising aimed at children.[7]
On May 4, 1961, McDonald's first filed for a U.S. trademark on the name "McDonald's" with the description "Drive-In Restaurant Services", which continues to be renewed. On September 13, 1961, the company filed for a trademark on a new logo—an overlapping, double-arched "M" symbol. By September 6, 1962, this M-symbol was temporarily disfavored, when a trademark was filed for a single arch, which appeared over many of the early McDonald's restaurants in the early years.[clarification needed] Although the "Golden Arches" logo appeared in various forms, the present version as a letter "M" did not appear until November 18, 1968, when the company applied for a U.S. trademark.
The present corporation dates its founding to the opening of a franchised restaurant by businessman Ray Kroc in Des Plaines, Illinois on April 15, 1955, the ninth McDonald's restaurant overall; this location was demolished in 1984 after many remodels. Kroc later purchased the McDonald brothers' equity in the company and led its worldwide expansion, and the company became listed on the public stock markets ten years later. Kroc was also noted for aggressive business practices, compelling the McDonald brothers to leave the fast-food industry.
Kroc and the McDonald brothers feuded over control of the business, as documented in Kroc's autobiography. The San Bernardino restaurant was demolished in 1976 (1971, according to Juan Pollo) and the site was sold to the Juan Pollo restaurant chain. This area now serves as headquarters for the Juan Pollo chain, as well as a McDonald's and Route 66 museum.[8] With the expansion of McDonald's into many international markets, the company has become a symbol of globalization and the spread of the American way of life. Its prominence has also made it a frequent topic of public debates about obesity, corporate ethics, and consumer responsibility.
Corporate overview
Facts and figures




By 1993, McDonald's had sold more than 100 billion hamburgers. The once widespread restaurant signs that boasted the number of sales, such as this one in Harlem, were left at "99 billion" because there was space for only two digits.






The McDonald's in Northport, Alabama commemorates U.S. President Ronald Reagan's visit


McDonald's restaurants are found in 120 countries and territories around the world and serve 68 million customers each day.[9][10] McDonald's operates 36,899 restaurants worldwide, employing more than 375,000 people as of the end of 2016.[5][9] There are currently a total of 5,669 company-owned locations and 31,230 franchised locations, which includes 21,559 locations franchised to conventional franchisees, 6,300 locations licensed to developmental licensees, and 3,371 locations licensed to foreign affiliates, primarily Japan.[5]
Focusing on its core brand, McDonald's began divesting itself of other chains it had acquired during the 1990s. The company owned a majority stake in Chipotle Mexican Grill until October 2006, when McDonald's fully divested from Chipotle through a stock exchange.[11][12] Until December 2003, it also owned Donatos Pizza, and it owned a small share of Aroma Cafe from 1999 to 2001. On August 27, 2007, McDonald's sold Boston Market to Sun Capital Partners.[13]
Notably, McDonald's has increased shareholder dividends for 25 consecutive years,[14] making it one of the S&P 500 Dividend Aristocrats.[15][16] In October 2012, its monthly sales fell for the first time in nine years.[17] In 2014, its quarterly sales fell for the first time in seventeen years, when its sales dropped for the entirety of 1997.[18]
In the United States, it is reported that drive-throughs account for 70 percent of sales.[19][20] McDonald's plans to close 184 restaurants in the United States in 2015, which is 59 more than it plans to open.[21][22] This is the first time McDonald's will have a net decrease in the number of locations in the United States since 1970.[22]
Business model
The company currently owns all of its property[clarification needed] – valued at an estimated $16 to $18 billion. However, in recent times, there have been calls to spin off the company's US holdings into a potential real estate investment trust. The company earns a significant portion of its revenue from rental payments from franchisees. These rent payments rose 26 percent between 2010 and 2015, accounting for one-fifth of the company's total revenue at the end of the period.[23] The company announced at its investor conference on November 10, 2015, that it would not spin off its property into a real-estate investment trust. The CEO, Steve Easterbrook discussed that pursuing the REIT option would pose too large a risk to the company's business model.[24]




The McDonald's logo painted on the tail of a Crossair McDonnell Douglas MD-83 in 1999.


The United Kingdom and Ireland business model is different from the U.S, in that fewer than 30 percent of restaurants are franchised, with the majority under the ownership of the company. McDonald's trains its franchisees and management at Hamburger University in Oak Brook, Illinois.[25][26] In other countries, McDonald's restaurants are operated by joint ventures of McDonald's Corporation and other, local entities or governments.[27]
According to Fast Food Nation by Eric Schlosser (2001), nearly one in eight workers in the U.S. have at some time been employed by McDonald's. Employees are encouraged by McDonald's Corp. to maintain their health by singing along to their favorite songs in order to relieve stress, attending church services in order to have a lower blood pressure, and taking two vacations annually in order to reduce risk for myocardial infarction.[28] Fast Food Nation also states that McDonald's is the largest private operator of playgrounds in the U.S., as well as the single largest purchaser of beef, pork, potatoes, and apples. The selection of meats McDonald's uses varies to some extent based on the culture of the host country.[29]
Headquarters




McDonald's Plaza, located in Oak Brook, Illinois, is the headquarters of McDonald's


The McDonald's headquarters complex, McDonald's Plaza, is located in Oak Brook, Illinois. It sits on the site of the former headquarters and stabling area of Paul Butler, the founder of Oak Brook.[30] McDonald's moved into the Oak Brook facility from an office within the Chicago Loop in 1971.[31]
On June 13, 2016, McDonald's confirmed plans to move its global headquarters to Chicago's West Loop neighborhood in the Near West Side. The 608,000-square-foot structure will be built on the site of Oprah Winfrey's former Harpo Studios and open in early 2018.[3][4]
Board of directors
As of November 2014, the board of directors had the following members:[32]

Andrew J. McKenna, chairman
Susan E. Arnold, operating executive of Global Consumer & Retail Group of The Carlyle Group
Robert A. Eckert, operating partner of Friedman Fleischer & Lowe
Enrique Hernandez, Jr., president and CEO of Inter-Con Security
Jeanne P. Jackson, president of product and merchandising for Nike, Inc.
Richard H. Lenny, operating partner of Friedman Fleischer & Lowe
Walter E. Massey, president of the School of the Art Institute of Chicago
Cary D. McMillan, CEO of True Partners Consulting LLC
Sheila A. Penrose, non-executive chairman of Jones Lang LaSalle
John W. Rogers, Jr, chairman and CEO of Ariel Investments
Roger W. Stone, chairman and CEO of KapStone Paper and Packaging
Don Thompson, president and CEO
Miles D. White, chairman and CEO of Abbott Laboratories

On March 1, 2015, after being chief brand officer of McDonald's and its former head in the UK and northern Europe, Steve Easterbrook became CEO, succeeding Don Thompson, who stepped down on January 28, 2015.
Global operations
See also: List of countries with McDonald's restaurants and International availability of McDonald's products




Countries with McDonald's restaurants, showing their first year with its first restaurant






McDonald's on Nathan Road, Kowloon, Hong Kong.


McDonald's has become emblematic of globalization, sometimes referred to as the "McDonaldization" of society. The Economist newspaper uses the "Big Mac Index": the comparison of a Big Mac's cost in various world currencies can be used to informally judge these currencies' purchasing power parity. Switzerland has the most expensive Big Mac in the world as of July 2015, while the country with the least expensive Big Mac is India[33][34] (albeit for a Maharaja Mac—the next cheapest Big Mac is Hong Kong).[35]




McDonald's, Paulista Avenue, São Paulo, Brazil


Thomas Friedman once said that no country with a McDonald's had gone to war with another.[36][37] However, the "Golden Arches Theory of Conflict Prevention" is not strictly true. Exceptions are the 1989 United States invasion of Panama, NATO's bombing of Serbia in 1999, the 2006 Lebanon War, and the 2008 South Ossetia war. McDonald's suspended operations in its corporate-owned stores in Crimea after Russia annexed the region in 2014.[38] On August 20, 2014, as tensions between the United States and Russia strained over events in Ukraine, and the resultant U.S. sanctions, the Russian government temporarily shut down four McDonald's outlets in Moscow, citing sanitary concerns. The company has operated in Russia since 1990 and at August 2014 had 438 stores across the country.[39] On August 23, 2014, Russian Deputy Prime Minister Arkady Dvorkovich ruled out any government move to ban McDonald's and dismissed the notion that the temporary closures had anything to do with the sanctions.[40]




McDonald's, Old Mahabalipuram Road, Chennai, India


Some observers have suggested that the company should be given credit for increasing the standard of service in markets that it enters. A group of anthropologists in a study entitled Golden Arches East[41] looked at the impact McDonald's had on East Asia and Hong Kong, in particular. When it opened in Hong Kong in 1975, McDonald's was the first restaurant to consistently offer clean restrooms, driving customers to demand the same of other restaurants and institutions. McDonald's has taken to partnering up with Sinopec, the second largest oil company in the People's Republic of China, as it takes advantage of the country's growing use of personal vehicles by opening numerous drive-thru restaurants.[42] McDonald's has opened a McDonald's restaurant and McCafé on the underground premises of the French fine arts museum, The Louvre.[43]
The company stated it would open vegetarian-only restaurants in India by mid-2013.[44] Foreign restaurants are banned in Bermuda, with the exception of KFC, which was present before the current law was passed. Therefore, there are no McDonald's in Bermuda.[45]
On January 9, 2017, 80% of the franchise rights in the mainland China and in Hong Kong were sold for US$2.080 billion to a consortium of CITIC Limited (for 32%) and private equity funds managed by CITIC Capital (for 20%) and Carlyle (for 20%), which CITIC Limited and CITIC Capital would also formed a joint venture to own the stake.[46]
Countries with McDonald's

Africa


 Egypt
 Mauritius
 Mayotte
 Morocco
 Reunion
 South Africa
 Tunisia





Asia


 Azerbaijan
 Bahrain
 Brunei
 China

 Hong Kong
 Macau


 Cyprus
 Georgia
 India
 Indonesia
 Israel
 Japan
 Jordan
 Kazakhstan
 Kuwait
 Lebanon
 Malaysia
 Oman
 Pakistan
 Philippines
 Qatar
 Saudi Arabia
 Singapore
 South Korea
 Sri Lanka
 Taiwan
 Thailand
 Turkey
 United Arab Emirates
 Vietnam





Europe


 Andorra
 Austria
 Belarus
 Belgium
 Bosnia and Herzegovina
 Bulgaria
 Croatia
 Czech Republic
 Denmark
 Estonia
 Finland
 France
 Germany
 Greece
 Hungary
 Ireland
 Italy
 Latvia
 Liechtenstein
 Lithuania
 Luxembourg
 Malta
 Moldova
 Monaco
 Netherlands
 Norway
 Poland
 Portugal
 Romania
 Russia
 San Marino
 Serbia
 Slovakia
 Slovenia
 Spain
 Sweden
  Switzerland
 Ukraine
 United Kingdom

 Isle of Man
 Jersey







North America


 Aruba
 Bahamas
 Canada
 Costa Rica
 Cuba

 Guantanamo Bay Naval Base


 Curaçao
 Dominican Republic
 El Salvador
 Guadeloupe
 Guatemala
 Honduras
 Martinique
 Nicaragua
 Panama
 Sint Maarten
 Trinidad & Tobago
 Mexico
 United States

 Puerto Rico
 U.S. Virgin Islands







Oceania


 American Samoa
 Australia
 Fiji
 French Polynesia
 Guam
 New Caledonia
 New Zealand
 Northern Marianas
 Samoa





South America


 Argentina
 Brazil
 Chile
 Colombia
 Ecuador
 French Guiana
 Guyana
 Paraguay
 Peru
 Suriname
 Uruguay
 Venezuela




Products
Main article: List of McDonald's products




A typical "eat-in" McDonald's meal as sold in Hong Kong, consisting of French fries, a soft drink, and a "main product" - in this case, a McSpicy Chicken Fillet. Condiments are supplied in small packets; such a packet of tomato ketchup is seen in the foreground.


McDonald's predominantly sells hamburgers, various types of chicken, chicken sandwiches, French fries, soft drinks, breakfast items, and desserts. In most markets, McDonald's offers salads and vegetarian items, wraps and other localized fare. On a seasonal basis, McDonald's offers the McRib sandwich. Some speculate the seasonality of the McRib adds to its appeal.[47]
Products are offered as either "eat-in" (where the customer opts to eat in the restaurant) or "take-out" (where the customer opts to take the food for consumption off the premises). "Eat-in" meals are provided on a plastic tray with a paper insert on the floor of the tray. "Take-out" meals are usually delivered with the contents enclosed in a distinctive McDonald's-branded brown paper bag. In both cases, the individual items are wrapped or boxed as appropriate.
Since Steve Easterbrook became CEO of the company, McDonald's has streamlined the menu which in the United States contained nearly 200 items. The company has also looked to introduce healthier options, and removed high-fructose corn syrup from hamburger buns. The company has also removed artificial preservatives from Chicken McNuggets[48], replacing chicken skin, safflower oil and citric acid found in Chicken McNuggets with pea starch, rice starch and powdered lemon juice. [49]
International menu variations
See also: McDonald's products (international)




A McDonald's Ebi Feast meal sold at branches in Singapore, November 2013. McDonald's is known for tailoring its menus in different markets to cater to local tastes


Restaurants in several countries, particularly in Asia, serve soup. This local deviation from the standard menu is a characteristic for which the chain is particularly known, and one which is employed either to abide by regional food taboos (such as the religious prohibition of beef consumption in India) or to make available foods with which the regional market is more familiar (such as the sale of McRice in Indonesia, or Ebi (prawn) Burger in Singapore and Japan).
In Germany and some other Western European countries, McDonald's sells beer. In New Zealand, McDonald's sells meat pies, after the local affiliate partially relaunched the Georgie Pie fast food chain it bought out in 1996.
In the United States, after limited trials on a regional basis, McDonald's plans to offer an all-day breakfast menu whenever its restaurants are open, although eggs cannot be cooked at the same time on the same equipment as hamburgers due to different temperature requirements.[citation needed]
Restaurants





The examples and perspective in this section deal primarily with the United States and do not represent a worldwide view of the subject. You may improve this article, discuss the issue on the talk page, or create a new article, as appropriate. (November 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Types of restaurants




Counter service in a McDonald's restaurant in Dukhan, Qatar


Most standalone McDonald's restaurants offer both counter service and drive-through service, with indoor and sometimes outdoor seating.[50] Drive-Thru, Auto-Mac, Pay and Drive, or "McDrive" as it is known in many countries, often has separate stations for placing, paying for, and picking up orders, though the latter two steps are frequently combined;[50] it was first introduced in Arizona in 1975, following the lead of other fast-food chains. The first such restaurant in Britain opened at Fallowfield, Manchester in 1986.[51]
McDrive
In some countries, "McDrive" locations near highways offer no counter service or seating.[52] In contrast, locations in high-density city neighborhoods often omit drive-through service.[53] There are also a few locations, located mostly in downtown districts, that offer a "Walk-Thru" service in place of Drive-Thru.[54]
McCafé
Main article: McCafé




A Montevideo McCafé


McCafé is a café-style accompaniment to McDonald's restaurants and is a concept created by McDonald's Australia (also known, and marketed, as "Macca's" in Australia), starting with Melbourne in 1993.[55] As of 2016, most McDonald's in Australia have McCafés located within the existing McDonald's restaurant. In Tasmania, there are McCafés in every restaurant, with the rest of the states quickly following suit.[50] After upgrading to the new McCafé look and feel, some Australian restaurants have noticed up to a 60 percent increase in sales. At the end of 2003, there were over 600 McCafés worldwide.
"Create Your Taste" restaurants
From 2015–2016, McDonald's tried a new gourmet burger service/restaurant concept based on other gourmet restaurants such as Shake Shack and Grill'd. It was rolled out for the first time in Australia during the early months of 2015 and expanded to China, Hong Kong, Singapore, Arabia and New Zealand, with ongoing trials in the US market. In dedicated "Create Your Taste" (CYT) kiosks, customers could choose all ingredients including type of bun and meat along with optional extras. In late 2015 the Australian CYT service introduced CYT salads.
After a person had ordered, McDonald's advised that wait times were between 10–15 minutes. When the food was ready, trained crew ('hosts') brought the food to the customer's table. Instead of McDonald's usual cardboard and plastic packaging, CYT food was presented on wooden boards, fries in wire baskets and salads in china bowls with metal cutlery. A higher price applied.
In November 2016, Create Your Taste was replaced by a "Signature Crafted Recipes" program designed to be more efficient and less expensive.[56]
Other
Some locations are connected to gas stations/convenience stores,[57] while others called McExpress have limited seating and/or menu or may be located in a shopping mall. Other McDonald's are located in Walmart stores. McStop is a location targeted at truckers and travelers which may have services found at truck stops.[58]
In Sweden, customers who order a happy meal can use the meal's container for a pair of happy goggles.[59] The company created a game for the goggles known as "Slope Stars.[59]" McDonald's predicts happy goggles will continue in other countries.[59] In the Netherlands, McDonald's has introduced McTrax that doubles as a recording studio; it reacts to touch.[59] They can create their own beats with a synth and tweak sounds with special effects.[59]
Special diet




A kosher Express McDonald's outlet in the Malha Mall in Jerusalem





This section needs expansion with: Details of other McDonald's restaurants where special dietry requirements are catered for. You can help by adding to it. (November 2015)


The first kosher McDonald's was established in 1997 at the Abasto de Buenos Aires mall in Buenos Aires, Argentina. This is in addition to many kosher branches in Israel.[60][61]
Playgrounds




A McDonald's in Panorama City, Los Angeles, California with a Playplace designed to promote a family-friendly image





This section needs expansion. You can help by adding to it. (May 2014)


McDonald's playgrounds are called McDonald's PlayPlace. Some McDonald's in suburban areas and certain cities feature large indoor or outdoor playgrounds. The first PlayPlace with the familiar crawl-tube design with ball pits and slides was introduced in 1987 in the US, with many more being constructed soon after.
McDonald's Next




McDonald's Next in Admiralty, Hong Kong


McDonald's Next use open-concept design and offer "Create Your Taste" digital ordering. The concept store also offering free mobile device charging and table service after 6:00 pm. The first store open in Hong Kong in December 2015.[62]
2006 redesign




An American McDonald's in Mount Pleasant, Iowa in June 2008; this is an example of the "new" look of American McDonald's restaurants


In 2006, McDonald's introduced its "Forever Young" brand by redesigning all of its restaurants, the first major redesign since the 1970s.[63][64]
The goal of the redesign is to be more like a coffee shop, similar to Starbucks. The design includes wooden tables, faux-leather chairs, and muted colors; the red was muted to terracotta, the yellow was shifted to golden for a more "sunny" look, and olive and sage green were also added.
To create a warmer look, the restaurants have less plastic and more brick and wood, with modern hanging lights to produce a softer glow. Many restaurants now feature free Wi-Fi and flat-screen TVs. Other upgrades include double drive-thrus, flat roofs instead of the angled red roofs, and replacing fiber glass with wood. Also, instead of the familiar golden arches, the restaurants now feature "semi-swooshes" (half of a golden arch), similar to the Nike swoosh.[65]
Smoking ban
McDonald's began banning smoking in 1994 when it banned smoking within its 1,400 wholly owned restaurants.[66]
Treatment of employees




A McDonald's employee takes an order in the Philippines


Automation
Since the late 1990s, McDonald's has attempted to replace employees with electronic kiosks which would perform actions such taking orders and accepting money. In 1999, McDonald's first tested "E-Clerks" in suburban Chicago, Illinois, and Wyoming, Michigan, with the devices being able to "save money on live staffers" and attracting larger purchase amounts than average employees.[67]
In 2013, the University of Oxford estimated that in the succeeding decades, there was a 92% probability of food preparation and serving to become automated in fast food establishments.[68] By 2016, McDonald's "Create Your Taste" electronic kiosks were seen in some restaurants internationally where customers could custom order meals. As employees pushed for higher wages in the late-2010s, some believed that fast food companies such as McDonald's would use the devices to cut costs for employing individuals.[69]
Wages
On August 5, 2013, The Guardian revealed that 90 percent of McDonald's UK workforce are on zero hour contracts, making it possibly the largest such private sector employer in the country.[70] A study released by Fast Food Forward conducted by Anzalone Liszt Grove Research showed that approximately 84 percent of all fast food employees working in New York City in April 2013 had been paid less than their legal wages by their employers.[71]
From 2007 to 2011, fast food workers in the US drew an average of $7 billion of public assistance annually resulting from receiving low wages.[72] The McResource website advised employees to break their food into smaller pieces to feel fuller, seek refunds for unopened holiday purchases, sell possessions online for quick cash, and to "quit complaining" as "stress hormone levels rise by 15 percent after ten minutes of complaining."[73] In December 2013, McDonald's shut down the McResource website amidst negative publicity and criticism. McDonald's plans to continue an internal telephone help line through which its employees can obtain advice on work and life problems.[74]
Liberal thinktank the Roosevelt Institute accuses some McDonald's restaurants of actually paying less than the minimum wage to entry positions due to 'rampant' wage theft.[75] In South Korea, McDonald's pays part-time employees $5.50 an hour and is accused of paying less with arbitrary schedules adjustments and pay delays.[76] In late 2015, Anonymous aggregated data collected by Glassdoor suggests that McDonald's in the United States pays entry-level employees between $7.25 an hour and $11 an hour, with an average of $8.69 an hour. Shift managers get paid an average of $10.34 an hour. Assistant managers get paid an average of $11.57 an hour.[77] McDonald's CEO, Steve Easterbrook, currently earns an annual salary of $1,100,000.[78]
Strikes
See also: Fast food worker strikes




Fast food workers on strike outside of a McDonald's in St. Paul, Minnesota.


McDonald's workers have on occasions decided to strike over pay, with most of the employees on strike seeking to be paid $15.00.[79] When interviewed about the strikes occurring, former McDonald's CEO Ed Rensi stated: "It's cheaper to buy a $35,000 robotic arm than it is to hire an employee who's inefficient making $15 an hour bagging french fries" with Rensi explaining that increasing employee wages could possibly take away from entry-level jobs.[80] However, according to current McDonald's CEO Steve Easterbrook, increasing wages and benefits for workers saw a 6% increase in customer satisfaction when comparing 2015's first quarter data to the first quarter of 2016, with greater returns seen as a result.[80]
Working conditions
In March 2015, McDonald's workers in 19 US cities filed 28 health and safety complaints with OSHA which allege that low staffing, lack of protective gear, poor training and pressure to work fast has resulted in injuries. The complaints also allege that, because of a lack of first aid supplies, workers were told by management to treat burn injuries with condiments such as mayonnaise and mustard. The Fight for $15 labor organization aided the workers in filing the complaints.[81]
Animal welfare standards
In 2015, McDonald's pledged to stop using eggs from battery cage facilities by 2025. Since McDonald's purchases over 2 billion eggs per year or 4 percent of eggs produced in the United States, the switch is expected to have a major impact on the egg industry and is part of a general trend toward cage-free eggs driven by consumer concern over the harsh living conditions of hens.[82][83] The aviary systems from which the new eggs will be sourced are troubled by much higher mortality rates, as well as introducing environmental and worker safety problems.[84] The high hen mortality rate, which is more than double that of battery cage systems, will require new research to mitigate. The facilities also have higher ammonia levels due to faeces being kicked up into the air. Producers raised concerns about the production cost, which is expected to increase by 36 percent.[85]
McDonald's continues to source pork from facilities that use gestation crates, and in 2012 pledged to phase them out.[86]
Marketing and advertising
Main article: McDonald's advertising
McDonald's has for decades maintained an extensive advertising campaign. In addition to the usual media (television, radio, and newspaper), the company makes significant use of billboards and signage, sponsors sporting events ranging from Little League to the FIFA World Cup and Olympic Games.[87] Television has played a central role in the company's advertising strategy.[citation needed] To date, McDonald's has used 23 different slogans in United States advertising, as well as a few other slogans for select countries and regions.[88]
India





The neutrality of this section is disputed. Relevant discussion may be found on the talk page. Please do not remove this message until conditions to do so are met. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article contains wording that promotes the subject in a subjective manner without imparting real information. Please remove or replace such wording and instead of making proclamations about a subject's importance, use facts and attribution to demonstrate that importance. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


McDonald's began operations in India in 1996. It retained Leo Burnett (India) to provide authentic Indian insights regarding local favorite items, religious-based food taboos, and India's strong vegetarian tradition. Hamburgers are made of lamb or chicken, instead of beef. Local favorite foods are adapted into menu items such as McAloo Tikki, a breaded potato pancake on a bun. To assure vegetarian customers, kitchens are divided into vegetarian and non-vegetarian zones. Advertising tells Indians that McDonald's bright, inviting restaurants do not mean high prices; profit strategy uses low prices to generate high volume sales. Locally McDonald's of India sponsored sports programs and donations to visible charities.[89]
Space exploration
McDonald's and NASA explored an advertising agreement for a planned mission to the asteroid 449 Hamburga; however, the spacecraft was eventually cancelled.[90]
Children's advertising
Main articles: Ronald McDonald and McDonaldland
Sports awards and honors
See also: Category:McDonald's High School All-Americans
McDonald's is the title sponsor of the McDonald's All-American Game, all-star basketball games played each year for American and Canadian boys' and girls' high school basketball graduates
Charity
See also: Ronald McDonald House Charities
McHappy Day




A Ronald McDonald House collection box in Framingham, Massachusetts


McHappy Day is an annual event at McDonald's, where a percentage of the day's sales go to charity. It is the signature fundraising event for Ronald McDonald House Charities.[91]
In 2007, it was celebrated in 17 countries: Argentina, Australia, Austria, Brazil, Canada, the United States, Finland, France, Guatemala, Hungary, England, Ireland, New Zealand, Norway, Sweden, Switzerland, and Uruguay.
According to the Australian McHappy Day website, McHappy Day raised $20.4 million in 2009. The goal for 2010 was $20.8 million.[92]
McDonald's Monopoly donation
In 1995, St. Jude Children's Research Hospital received an anonymous letter postmarked in Dallas, Texas, containing a $1 million winning McDonald's Monopoly game piece. McDonald's officials came to the hospital, accompanied by a representative from the accounting firm Arthur Andersen, who examined the card under a jeweler's eyepiece, handled it with plastic gloves, and verified it as a winner.[93] Although game rules prohibited the transfer of prizes, McDonald's waived the rule and has made the annual $50,000 annuity payments, even after learning that the piece was sent by an individual involved in an embezzlement scheme intended to defraud McDonald's (see McDonald's Monopoly).
McRefugee
See also: McRefugee
McRefugees are poor people in Hong Kong, Japan, and China who use McDonald's 24-hour restaurants as a temporary hostel. One in five of Hong Kong's population lives below the poverty line. The rise of McRefugees was first documented by photographer Suraj Katra in 2013.[94]
Criticism




A PETA activist dressed as a chicken confronts the manager of the Times Square McDonald's over the company's animal welfare standards


In 1990, activists from a small group known as London Greenpeace (no connection to the international group Greenpeace) distributed leaflets entitled What's wrong with McDonald's?, criticizing its environmental, health, and labor record. The corporation wrote to the group demanding they desist and apologize, and, when two of the activists refused to back down, sued them for libel in one of the longest cases in British civil law. A documentary film of the McLibel Trial has been shown in several countries.[95]
In the late 1980s, Phil Sokolof, a millionaire businessman who had suffered a heart attack at the age of 43, took out full-page newspaper ads in New York, Chicago, and other large cities accusing McDonald's menu of being a threat to American health, and asking them to stop using beef tallow to cook their french fries.[citation needed]
Despite the objections of McDonald's, the term "McJob" was added to Merriam-Webster's Collegiate Dictionary in 2003.[96] The term was defined as "a low-paying job that requires little skill and provides little opportunity for advancement".[97]
In 2001, Eric Schlosser's book Fast Food Nation included criticism of the business practices of McDonald's. Among the critiques were allegations that McDonald's (along with other companies within the fast food industry) uses its political influence to increase its profits at the expense of people's health and the social conditions of its workers. The book also brought into question McDonald's advertisement techniques in which it targets children. While the book did mention other fast-food chains, it focused primarily on McDonald's.
In 2002, vegetarian groups, largely Hindu and Buddhist, successfully sued McDonald's for misrepresenting its French fries as vegetarian, when they contained beef broth.[98]
Morgan Spurlock's 2004 documentary film Super Size Me claimed that McDonald's food was contributing to the increase of obesity in society and that the company was failing to provide nutritional information about its food for its customers. Six weeks after the film premiered, McDonald's announced that it was eliminating the super size option, and was creating the adult Happy Meal.




Screenshot from McDonald's Videogame


In 2006, an unsanctioned McDonald's Videogame was released online. It is parody of the business practices of the corporate giant, taking the guise of a tycoon style business simulation game. In the game, the player plays the role of a McDonald's CEO, choosing whether or not to use controversial practices like genetically altered cow feed, plowing over rainforests, and corrupting public officials. McDonald's issued a statement distancing itself from the game.[99]
In January 2014, it was reported that McDonald's was accused of having used a series of tax maneuvers to avoid taxes in France. The company confirmed that tax authorities had visited McDonald's French headquarters in Paris but insisted that it had not done anything wrong, saying, "McDonald's firmly denies the accusation made by L'Express according to which McDonald's supposedly hid part of its revenue from taxes in France."[100]
Company responses to criticism




Discreet shopfront in historic Stratford-upon-Avon


In response to public pressure, McDonald's has sought to include more healthy choices in its menu and has introduced a new slogan to its recruitment posters: "Not bad for a McJob".[101] The word McJob, first attested in the mid-1980s[96] and later popularized by Canadian novelist Douglas Coupland in his book Generation X, has become a buzz word for low-paid, unskilled work with few prospects or benefits and little security. McDonald's disputes this definition of McJob. In 2007, the company launched an advertising campaign with the slogan "Would you like a career with that?" on Irish television, asserting that its jobs have good prospects.
In an effort to respond to growing consumer awareness of food provenance, the fast-food chain changed its supplier of both coffee beans and milk. UK chief executive Steve Easterbrook said: "British consumers are increasingly interested in the quality, sourcing, and ethics of the food and drink they buy".[102] In a bid to tap into the ethical consumer market,[103] McDonald's switched to using coffee beans taken from stocks that are certified by the Rainforest Alliance, a conservation group. Additionally, in response to pressure, McDonald's UK started using organic milk supplies for its bottled milk and hot drinks, although it still uses conventional milk in its milkshakes, and in all of its dairy products in the United States.[104] According to a report published by Farmers Weekly in 2007, the quantity of milk used by McDonald's could have accounted for as much as 5 percent of the UK's organic milk output.[105]
McDonald's announced on May 22, 2008, that, in the United States and Canada, it would switch to using cooking oil that contains no trans fats for its french fries, and canola-based oil with corn and soy oils, for its baked items, pies and cookies, by year's end.[106][107]
With regard to acquiring chickens from suppliers who use CAK/CAS methods of slaughter, McDonald's says that it needs to see more research "to help determine whether any CAS system in current use is optimal from an animal welfare perspective."[108]
Environmental record
In April 2008, McDonald's announced that 11 of its Sheffield, England restaurants have been engaged in a biomass trial that had cut its waste and carbon footprint by half in the area. In this trial, wastes from the restaurants were collected by Veolia Environmental Services and were used to produce energy at a power plant. McDonald's plans to expand this project, although the lack of biomass power plants in the United States will prevent this plan from becoming a national standard anytime soon.[109] In addition, in Europe, McDonald's has been recycling vegetable grease by converting it to fuel for its diesel trucks.[110]
McDonald's has been using a corn-based bioplastic to produce containers for some of its products. The environmental benefits of this technology are controversial, with critics noting that biodegradation is slow, produces greenhouse gases and that contamination of traditional plastic waste streams with bioplastics can complicate recycling efforts.[111]
In 1990, McDonald's worked with the Environmental Defense Fund to stop using "clam shell" shaped styrofoam food containers to house its food products.[112] 20 years later, McDonald's announced they would try replacing styrofoam coffee cups with an alternative material.[113]
The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency has recognized McDonald's continuous effort to reduce solid waste by designing more efficient packaging and by promoting the use of recycled-content materials.[114] McDonald's reports that it is committed towards environmental leadership by effectively managing electric energy, by conserving natural resources through recycling and reusing materials, and by addressing water management issues within the restaurant.[115]
In an effort to reduce energy usage by 25 percent in its restaurants, McDonald's opened a prototype restaurant in Chicago in 2009 with the intention of using the model in its other restaurants throughout the world. Building on past efforts, specifically a restaurant it opened in Sweden in 2000 that was the first to intentionally incorporate green ideas, McDonald's designed the Chicago site to save energy by incorporating old and new ideas such as managing storm water, using skylights for more natural lighting and installing some partitions and tabletops made from recycled goods.[116]
When McDonald's received criticism for its environmental policies in the 1970s, it began to make substantial progress in reducing its use of materials.[117] For instance, an "average meal" in the 1970s—a Big Mac, fries, and a drink—required 46 grams of packaging; today, it requires only 25 grams, allowing a 46 percent reduction.[118] In addition, McDonald's eliminated the need for intermediate containers for cola by having a delivery system that pumps syrup directly from the delivery truck into storage containers, saving two million pounds (910 tonnes) of packaging annually.[119] Overall, weight reductions in packaging and products, as well as the increased usage of bulk packaging ultimately decreased packaging by twenty-four million pounds (11,000 tonnes) annually.[120]
Legal cases
Main article: McDonald's legal cases
McDonald's has been involved in a number of lawsuits and other legal cases, most of which involved trademark disputes. The company has threatened many food businesses with legal action unless it drops the Mc or Mac from trading names.
Asia
On September 8, 2009, McDonald's Malaysian operations lost a lawsuit to prevent another restaurant calling itself McCurry. McDonald's lost in an appeal to Malaysia's highest court, the Federal Court.[121]
Australia
In April 2007, in Perth, Western Australia, McDonald's pleaded guilty to five charges relating to the employment of children under 15 in one of its outlets and was fined A$8,000.[122]
In 2016, the Australian Taxation Office revealed that McDonald's Asia-Pacific Consortium had generated $478 million in revenue in 2013–14, but had paid no tax on those earnings whatsoever.[123]
United Kingdom
McDonald's has defended itself in several cases involving workers' rights.[citation needed]
The longest running legal action of all time in the UK was the McLibel case against 2 defendants who criticized a number of aspects of the company. The trial lasted 10 years and called 130 witnesses. The European Court of Human Rights deemed that the unequal resources of the litigants breached the defendants rights to freedom of speech and biased the trial. The result was widely seen as a "PR disaster."[124]
United States
A famous legal case in the US involving McDonald's was the 1994 decision in Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants where Stella Liebeck was awarded several million dollars after she suffered third-degree burns after spilling a scalding cup of McDonald's coffee on herself.[125]
Use of genetically modified food
In April 2014, it was reported that McDonald's will use, in Europe, chicken meat that was produced by using genetically modified animal feed. Greenpeace argues that McDonald's saves less than one Eurocent for each chicken burger and goes down a path not desired by its customers.[126]
See also





Book: McDonald's





Arcos Dorados Holdings
Burger King—the second largest burger chain
List of hamburger restaurants
List of restaurant chains
The Founder—a 2016 film detailing the creation and controversial business history of McDonald's, that is also a biopic of Ray Kroc
MaDonal—a restaurant operating in northern Iraq that copies many features of McDonald's, illicitly
Maxime, McDuff & McDo-documentary film about the unionizing of a McDonald's in Montreal, Quebec, Canada
Wendy's—the third largest hamburger chain



Food portal
Companies portal
Chicago portal
Illinois portal


References


^ Bomkamp, Samantha (June 13, 2016). "Mcdonald's HQ Move Is Boldest Step Yet in Effort to Transform Itself". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved May 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e f g "Form 10-K: McDonald's Corporation (McDonald's Corporation 2016 Annual Report)" (PDF). United States Securities and Exchange Commission. Commission File Number 1-5231. Retrieved May 1, 2017. 
^ a b "McDonald's future Near West Side neighbors air parking, traffic safety beefs". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved August 7, 2016. 
^ a b Hufford, Austen (June 14, 2016). "McDonald’s to Move Headquarters to Downtown Chicago". Retrieved August 7, 2016 – via Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c http://d18rn0p25nwr6d.cloudfront.net/CIK-0000063908/62200c2b-da82-4364-be92-79ed454e3b88.pdf
^ Robbins, John (October 8, 2010). "How Bad Is McDonald's Food?". Huffington Post. 
^ "The McDonalds and Their Restaurant". www.referenceforbusiness.com. Retrieved January 16, 2017. In 1962, McDonald's golden arches replaced Speedee as the restaurant's main symbol, and ads told customers to "Look for the golden arches." ... Kroc believed in advertising heavily and in targeting children. In 1965, the company introduced a new mascot, a red-haired clown named Ronald McDonald, who became a frequent and friendly face in television commercials. 
^ "McDonalds Museum". Juan Pollo. Retrieved May 14, 2012. 
^ a b McDonald's – The Leading Global Food Service Retailer :: AboutMcDonalds.com, retrieved May 8, 2008
^ "McDonald's Momentum Delivers Another Year of Strong Results for 2011". Yahoo Finance. 2012. Retrieved January 25, 2012. [dead link]
^ Brand, Rachel (December 23, 2006). "Chipotle founder had big dreams". Rocky Mountain News. Archived from the original on July 8, 2009. Retrieved April 27, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's sets October deadline to sell Chipotle stock". Denver Business Journal. BizJournals.com. July 25, 2006. Retrieved August 10, 2009. 
^ "McDonald's Wraps Up Boston Market Sale". Dow Jones & Company, Inc. News Services. August 27, 2007. Archived from the original on September 28, 2007. Retrieved August 28, 2007. 
^ Baertlein, Lisa (September 24, 2009). "McDonald's raises cash dividend by 10%". reuters.com. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ "Definition of S&P 500 Aristocrat at Investopedia". Investopedia.com. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ "List of 2009 Dividend Aristocrats via Seeking Alpha, retrieved 10/1/2009". Seekingalpha.com. December 23, 2008. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ Tiffany Hsu (November 9, 2012). "McDonald's monthly sales fall for first time in nine years". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved March 9, 2013. 
^ "McDonald's New Turnaround Plan Is So 1990s". 
^ Baertlein, Lisa (March 14, 2017). "McDonald's, late to mobile ordering, seeks to avoid pitfalls". Reuters. Retrieved March 15, 2017. 
^ Patton, Leslie (November 23, 2015). "McDonald's Knows You're Sick of Screw-Ups at Drive-Thru Windows". Bloomberg. Retrieved March 15, 2017. 
^ Ferdman, Roberto A. (August 13, 2015). "This is a terrible sign for McDonald's". The Washington Post. 
^ a b "McDonald's to Cut U.S. Stores for First Time in Decades". The New York Times. Associated Press. June 18, 2015. 
^ LUBLIN, JOANN S.; JARGON, JULIE (October 15, 2015). "McDonald’s Nears Decision on Real Estate". Retrieved October 22, 2015. 
^ Jargon, Julie. "McDonald's Won't Spin Off Real Estate Holdings". Wall Street Journal. ISSN 0099-9660. Retrieved November 11, 2015. 
^ "Hamburger University Campus". mcdonalds.com. Retrieved January 18, 2017. 
^ "Hamburger University - Our Facility". 
^ "McDonald’s Business Model and Strategy :: McDonald’s". corporate.mcdonalds.com. Retrieved January 24, 2017. 
^ Eidelson, Josh (November 19, 2013). "McDonald's tells workers to "sing away stress," "chew away cares" and go to church". Salon. Retrieved August 21, 2014. These and other tips appear on a "McResource Line" website created by the McDonald's Corp. to advise workers on stress, health and personal finances. Among the tips that appear on the site: "Chewing gum can reduce cortisol levels by 16%"; "At least two vacations a year can cut heart attack risk by 50%"; "Singing along to your favorite songs can lower your blood pressure"; and "People who attend more church services tend to have lower blood pressure." 
^ Schlosser, Eric. Fast Food Nation. 
^ Steele, Jeffrey. Oak Brook history in caring hands society president is part of village's changing heritage". Chicago Tribune. July 29, 1998. Page 88. Retrieved on September 17, 2009.
^ Cross, Robert. Inside Hamburger Central". Chicago Tribune. January 9, 1972. G18. Retrieved on September 17, 2009.
^ "Board of Directors Biographical Information". McDonald's. Retrieved November 3, 2014. 
^ "India's 50 most trusted brands". Rediff.com. January 20, 2011. 
^ "The Big Mac index". The Economist. October 7, 2015. 
^ "The Big Mac index – Currency comparisons, to go". The Economist. July 28, 2011. Retrieved July 28, 2011. 
^ Friedman, Thomas L. (December 8, 1996). "Foreign Affairs Big Mac I". The New York Times. ISSN 0362-4331. Retrieved January 24, 2017. 
^ "The Lexus and the Olive Tree". Thomaslfriedman.com. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's quits Crimea due to fears of trade clash". INA Daily News. Retrieved April 5, 2014. 
^ "Russia Shuts 4 McDonald's Restaurants Amid Ukraine Tensions". Moscow News.Net. August 20, 2014. Retrieved August 21, 2014. 
^ "Russian Deputy PM says McDonalds is not being targeted in response to sanctions". Russia Herald. August 23, 2014. Retrieved August 23, 2014. 
^ Stanford University Press, 1998, edited by James L. Watson
^ "McDonald's deal with oil company marries China's new love of fast food, cars". Archived from the original on March 25, 2007. 
^ Samuel, Henry (October 4, 2009). "McDonald's restaurants to open at the Louvre". The Daily Telegraph. London. 
^ Gasparro, Annie; Jargon, Julie (September 5, 2012). "McDonald's to Go Vegetarian in India". The Wall Street Journal. p. B7. 
^ "10 Countries That Don't Have McDonald's". WhatCulture.com. Retrieved December 1, 2015. 
^ "VOLUNTARY ANNOUNCEMENT: ACQUISITION OF A CONTROLLING INTEREST IN MCDONALD'S MAINLAND CHINA AND HONG KONG BUSINESSES" (PDF). CITIC Limited. Hong Kong Stock Exchange. January 9, 2017. Retrieved January 13, 2017. 
^ "Fanatics Preach Fast Food Evangelism". Fox News. July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald’s is going for healthier fare and greater digitisation". The Economist. January 28, 2017. ISSN 0013-0613. Retrieved February 5, 2017. 
^ "McDonald's to remove corn syrup from buns, curbs antibiotics in chicken". August 1, 2016 – via Reuters. 
^ a b c Mohapatra, Sanjay (2012). Information Strategy Design and Practices. Google Books: Springer Science & Business Media. p. 301. ISBN 1-4614-2427-5. 
^ "McDonald's Restaurants". Caterersearch.com. Archived from the original on July 16, 2011. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDrive: il fast food comodo, facile e veloce". McDonald's Italia. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's vs Newk's Franchise Cost Comparison and Analysis". www.thefranchisemall.com. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ Duca, Lauren. "This McDonald's has a "Walk-Thru"". Teen Vogue. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's Australia". mcdonalds.com.au. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ Kieler, Ashlee. "McDonald's Ends 'Create Your Taste' Customized Burger Program". Consumerist. Retrieved December 18, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's and BP test combined operations. (McDonald's Restaurants; BP Oil Co.)". Archived from the original on January 18, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's serves up 'MCSTOP' – Its restaurant for big crowds". August 16, 1984. 
^ a b c d e "Restaurants going high tech". Yahoo Tech. June 14, 2016. Retrieved June 14, 2016. 
^ "El único Mc Donald's kosher del mundo fuera de Israel es certificado por Ajdut Kosher" (Spanish and English). Last consulted: May 22, 2011
^ "Buenos Aires Restaurants – Kosher McDonald's". travel.nytimes.com. Archived from the original on March 3, 2009. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "Big Mac with a side of quinoa? Inside the world's first McDonald's Next". edition.cnn.com. Cable News Network. Retrieved August 9, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's wants a digital-age makeover". 
^ "Mickey D's McMakeover". Archived from the original on May 24, 2006. 
^ Bruce Horovitz (May 9, 2011). "McDonald's revamps store to look more upscale". USA Today. Retrieved June 26, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's Bans Smoking at All the Sites It Owns". The New York Times. February 24, 1994. 
^ Gibson, Richard (August 12, 1999). "Want Fries With That? Ask McDonald's New E-Clerks". The Wall Street Journal.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ O'Toole, James (May 22, 2014). "Robots will replace fast-food workers". CNN Money. Retrieved August 18, 2016. 
^ Johnson, Hollis (May 16, 2016). "Fast food workers are becoming obsolete". Business Insider. Retrieved August 18, 2016. 
^ Neville, Simon (August 25, 2008). "McDonald's ties nine out of 10 workers to zero-hours contracts". The Guardian. London. Retrieved August 10, 2013. 
^ ' 'Anzalone Liszt Grove Research' ' and ' 'Fast Food Foreward' '. New York's Hidden Crime Wave: Wage Theft and New York City's Fast Food Workers
^ Maclay, Kathleen. "Fast Food, Poverty Wages: The Public Cost of Low-wage jobs in the Fast Food Industry". University of California Labor Center October 15, 2013.
^ Susanna Kim (November 21, 2013). McDonald's Defends Telling Workers to 'Quit Complaining' to Reduce Stress. ABC News. Retrieved November 21, 2013.
^ Associated Press (December 26, 2013). "McDonald's Closes Employee Website Amid Criticism". DailyDigest. Archived from the original on December 28, 2013. Retrieved December 26, 2013. 
^ Goldberg, Harmony, "How McDonald's gets away with rampant wage theft", Salon, April 6, 2015. Accessed May 22, 2015.
^ Tae-hoon, Lee (August 16, 2015). "McDonald's lures customers with illegal ads on Independence Day". The Korea Observer. Retrieved August 17, 2015. 
^ "McDonald's Hourly Pay". Glassdoor. Retrieved December 1, 2015. 
^ Beckerman, Josh. "McDonald's New CEO Gets 69% Pay Raise"[dead link], Wall Street Journal, March 3, 2015. Accessed May 22, 2015.
^ Bruce Horovitz and Yamiche Alcindor (April 15, 2015). Fast-food strikes widen into social-justice movement. USA Today. Accessed May 22, 2015.
^ a b Taylor, Kate (May 25, 2016). "McDonald's ex-CEO just revealed a terrifying reality for fast-food workers". Business Insider. Retrieved August 18, 2016. 
^ Jana Kasperkevic (March 16, 2015). McDonald's workers told to treat burns with condiments, survey shows. The Guardian. Retrieved March 17, 2015.
^ Owen, Tess (September 10, 2015). "McDonald's Is Switching to Cage-Free Eggs at a Delicate Moment for the Poultry Industry". VICE News. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ "The Insanely Complicated Logistics of Cage-Free Eggs for All". Wired. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ Gelles, David (July 16, 2016). "Eggs That Clear the Cages, but Maybe Not the Conscience". New York Times. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ Kesmodel, David (March 18, 2015). "Cage-Free Hens Study Finds Little Difference in Egg Quality". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ Strom, Stephanie (February 13, 2012). "McDonald's Set to Phase Out Suppliers' Use of Sow Crates". New York Times. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's renews as FIFA World Cup Sponsor until 2014". FIFA.com. Retrieved October 24, 2014
^ "McDonald's slogans used around the world, past and present". Retrieved June 23, 2015. 
^ William M. O'Barr, "Advertising in India." Advertising & Society Review 9#3 (2008): 1-33.
^ "Mars rover Curiosity's other mission: publicity machine". Statesman.com. December 5, 2012. Retrieved March 9, 2013. 
^ McHappy Day, Ronald McDonald House Charities. Retrieved September 12, 2010.
^ McHappy Day Retrieved November 8, 2010.
^ "Donor Turns Fast Food Into Big Bucks For Hospital". The New York Times. December 8, 1995. Retrieved May 24, 2010. 
^ "The night time 'McRefugees' of Hong Kong". BBC news. October 27, 2015. Retrieved October 10, 2016. 
^ "BBC NEWS | UK | McLibel: Longest case in English history". BBC News. Retrieved April 9, 2015. 
^ a b Associated Press (November 11, 2003). "Merriam-Webster: 'McJob' is here to stay". CNN Offbeat News. 
^ "McJob". Merriam-Webster's Online Dictionary. 1986. Retrieved November 29, 2009. 
^ "Letter from McDonald's headquarters claiming fries are vegetarian". 
^ Bluestien, Greg. "Creators Put Politics Into Video Games", The Associated Press, published January 21, 2007, accessed April 20, 2007.
^ "Do You Want Fries With That Audit?". Forbes. January 23, 2014. 
^ Sweney, Mark (April 20, 2006). "Not bad for a McJob?". The Guardian. London. Retrieved March 30, 2009. 
^ Ian Ashbridge (July 3, 2007). "McDonalds' milk goes organic – 7/3/2007 – Farmers Weekly". Fwi.co.uk. Archived from the original on May 14, 2012. Retrieved June 7, 2012. 
^ Carrigan, Marylyn and De Pelsmacker, Patrick (2009). Will ethical consumers sustain their values in the global credit crunch? International Marketing Review, 26(6), pp. 674–687,(p.7).
^ "The Truth-O-Meter : Chef Jamie Oliver praises McDonald's in England". Truth-O-Meter. Tampa Bay Times. Retrieved October 22, 2012. 
^ Ian Ashbridge (July 3, 2007). "McDonald's milk goes organic – 03/07/2007 – FarmersWeekly". Fwi.co.uk. Archived from the original on September 24, 2009. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ "McDonald's Holds down Dollar Meal, Making Menu Healthier". International Business Times. May 22, 2008. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's says all US French fries cooked in zero-trans-fat oil". www.gmanews. Archived from the original on January 14, 2011. 
^ "Report of the Corporate Responsibility Committee of the Board of Directors of McDonald's Corporation" (PDF). November 19, 2009. Archived from the original (PDF) on July 17, 2011. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's hails success of waste-to-energy trial". Businessgreen.com. April 14, 2008. Archived from the original on September 26, 2012. Retrieved April 9, 2015. 
^ "Local woman creates environmental-friendly Web site". Herald-dispatch.com. April 19, 2008. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ Vidal, John (April 26, 2008). "'Sustainable' bio-plastic can damage the environment". The Guardian. London. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's and Environmental Defense Fund Mark 20 Years of Partnerships for Sustainability". Environmental Defense Fund. November 15, 2010. Retrieved November 28, 2013. 
^ "McDonald's testing eco-friendlier coffee cups". NBC News. March 12, 2012. Retrieved November 28, 2013. 
^ "U.S. Environmental Protection Agency". Archived from the original on August 5, 2012. Retrieved April 17, 2008. 
^ "McDonald's Corporation website". Archived from the original on May 31, 2016. Retrieved April 17, 2008. 
^ Goodman, Matthew (April 5, 2009). "Big Mac, hold the CO2". The Sunday Times. London. 
^ "National Pollution Prevention Center for Higher Education" (PDF). 
^ Environmental Defense Fund. Task Force Report. p. 42.
^ Environmental Defense Fund and McDonald's Corporation. Waste Reduction Task Force Final Report. Oak Brook, IL: McDonald's, 1991. p. 22.
^ "Corporation. McDonald's Packaging – The Facts. Oak Brook, IL: McDonald's, 1990. p. 7.". 
^ BBC online news article dated September 8, 2009 News.BB.co.uk
^ "McDonald's fined for employing underage workers". ABC News Online. April 12, 2007. Archived from the original on April 18, 2007. Retrieved April 12, 2007. 
^ "98 private companies earning over $200m pay no tax: ATO". ABC News. Retrieved April 4, 2016. 
^ "McLibel: Longest case in English history". BBC news. February 15, 2005. Retrieved January 17, 2016. 
^ Do You Know the Full Story Behind the Infamous McDonald's Coffee Case and How Corporations Used it to Promote Tort Reform? Democracy Now! January 25, 2011.
^ "McDonald's: Gentechnik im Burger". Spiegel Online (in German). April 27, 2014. Retrieved December 1, 2015. 


Further reading

Evans, Stephen (April 20, 2004). "McDonald's: The journey to health". BBC News. Retrieved June 30, 2016. 
Horovitz, Bruce (May 8, 2014). "McDonald's testing seasoned fries". USA Today. Retrieved June 30, 2016. 
Love, John F. (April 1987). "Big Macs, Fries, and Real Estate". Financial Executive (4): 20–6. 
Thomas Derdak and Jay P. Pederson, ed. (2004). "McDonald's". International directory of company histories. 67 (3rd ed.). St. James Press. pp. 108–9. ISBN 978-1-55862-512-9. 
"McDonald's : Behind The Arches" by John F. Love, paperback July 1, 1995
"Grinding It Out: The Making of McDonald's" by Ray Kroc, 1977 ISBN 0809282593
"Ray & Joan: The Man Who Made the McDonald's Fortune and the Woman Who Gave It All Away" by Lisa Napoli, 2016 ISBN 1101984953
"Fast Food Nation: The Dark Side of the All-American Meal" by Eric Schlosser, 2001 ISBN 0395977894

External links

Find more aboutMcDonald'sat Wikipedia's sister projects

Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Travel guide from Wikivoyage
Learning resources from Wikiversity
Data from Wikidata



Official Website
Corporate Website



Business data for McDonald's: Google Finance
Yahoo! Finance
Reuters
SEC filings










v
t
e


McDonald's






History
Advertising

ad programs


Countries with franchises
Legal cases
Product list
International availability





People



Richard and Maurice McDonald
Ray Kroc
Joan Kroc
Ralph Alvarez
Charlie Bell
Al Bernardin
Jim Cantalupo
George Cohon
Dan Coudreaut
Steve Easterbrook
Janice L. Fields
Den Fujita
Don Gorske
Jack M. Greenberg
Eikō Harada
June Martino
Herb Peterson
Michael R. Quinlan
Ed Rensi
Willard Scott
James A. Skinner
Donald N. Smith
Harry J. Sonneborn
Don Thompson
Fred L. Turner





Company



Hamburger University
Leaps and Bounds
McBarge
McCafé
McDonald's #1 Store Museum
McDonald's (Will Rogers Turnpike)
Oldest McDonald's restaurant
Rock N Roll McDonald's
Ronald McDonald House Charities





Products




Beef



Big Mac
Big N' Tasty
Deluxe line
Kiwiburger
Quarter Pounder (McRoyal)





Chicken



Chicken McNuggets
McChicken





Other



Deli Choices
Filet-O-Fish
Georgie Pie
Happy Meal
McArabia
McGriddles
McMuffin
McRib
Premium line
Shamrock Shake





Former



Arch Deluxe
McAfrika








Advertising




Campaigns



Changeables
Global Gladiators
Golden Arches
Mac Tonight
McDonaldland
McDonald's Monopoly
McDonald's Treasure Land Adventure
M.C. Kids
McKids
Ronald McDonald
Teenie Beanies
The Wacky Adventures of Ronald McDonald





Sponsorships



Kyle Larson (NASCAR)
Jamie McMurray (NASCAR)
Graham Rahal (IndyCar Series)
McDonald's All-American Game
McDonald's Championship
McDonald's Championship (golf)
McDonald's Cycle Center
McDonald's Gospelfest
McDonald's Olympic Swim Stadium





Related



Burger wars
Donald Land
Fast food advertising
Mac and Me (1988 film)
McDonald's sign (Pine Bluff, Arkansas)
Supersize








Branches



Canada
Israel
New Zealand





Criticism



Fast Food Nation (film)
McDonaldization
McDonald's Videogame
McJob
McRefugee
McLibel
Maxime, McDuff & McDo
Super Size Me

Don't Eat This Book







Legal cases



Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants
Magee v. McDonald's
McDonald's Restaurants v. Morris & Steel
Sid & Marty Krofft Television Productions Inc. v. McDonald's Corp.





Related



McDelivery
Big Mac Index
Bill Elliott
McDonald's Young Entertainers
McWords
San Ysidro McDonald's massacre
"Seriously McDonalds"
Sydney River McDonald's murders
Taiwan McDonald's bombings
Urban legends
Boom, Like That
The Founder (2016 film)










Links to related articles











v
t
e


Components of the Dow Jones Industrial Average






3M
American Express
Apple
Boeing
Caterpillar
Chevron
Cisco Systems
Coca-Cola
Disney
DuPont
ExxonMobil
General Electric
Goldman Sachs
The Home Depot
Intel
IBM
Johnson & Johnson
JPMorgan Chase
McDonald's
Merck & Co.
Microsoft
Nike
Pfizer
Procter & Gamble
Travelers
UnitedHealth Group
United Technologies
Verizon Communications
Visa
Walmart












v
t
e


Fast food and fast casual restaurant chains in the United States






Chicken chains
Coffeehouse chains
Pizza chains





Hamburgers



A&W
Arctic Circle
Back Yard
Big Boy
Burger King
Burgerville
Carl's Jr.
Checkers/Rally's
Cook Out
Fatburger
Five Guys
Freddy's
Fuddruckers
The Habit
Hardee's
Hwy 55
In-N-Out
Jack in the Box
Johnny Rockets
Krystal
McDonald's
Red Robin
Roy Rogers
Shake Shack
Smashburger
Sonic
Steak 'n Shake
Wayback
Wendy's
Whataburger
White Castle





Asian



L&L Hawaiian Barbecue
Manchu Wok
Panda Express
Pei Wei Asian Diner
P. F. Chang's China Bistro
Pick Up Stix
Sarku





Baked goods



Au Bon Pain
Auntie Anne's
Bruegger's
Cinnabon
Corner Bakery Cafe
Dunkin' Donuts
Einstein Bros.
Great American Cookies
Honey Dew Donuts
Krispy Kreme
Mrs. Fields
Nestlé Toll House
Panera Bread
Pretzelmaker/Pretzel Time
Shipley Do-Nuts
Tim Hortons
T.J. Cinnamons
Wetzel's
Winchell's





Beverages



Argo Tea
Biggby Coffee
Caribou
Coffee Bean & Tea Leaf
Coffee Beanery
Dunn Bros
Gloria Jean's
Jamba Juice
Juice It Up!
Orange Julius
Peet's
Planet Smoothie
Robeks
Seattle's Best Coffee
Smoothie King
Starbucks
Teavana
Tropical Smoothie Cafe
Tully's





Frozen
desserts



Baskin-Robbins
Ben & Jerry's
Braum's
Bruster's
Carvel
Cold Stone
Culver's
Dairy Queen
Dippin' Dots
Fosters Freeze
Friendly's
Golden Spoon
Graeter's
Häagen-Dazs
Handel's
Kiwi Yogurt
MaggieMoo's
Marble Slab
Menchie's
Pinkberry
Red Mango
Rita's
Sweet Frog
Tastee-Freez
TCBY
Tropical Sno
Tutti Frutti
Yogen Früz
Yogurtland





Hot dogs



Hot Dog on a Stick
Nathan's Famous
Portillo's
Wienerschnitzel





Mexican-style /
Tex-Mex



Baja Fresh
Cafe Rio
Chipotle
Chronic Tacos
Del Taco
El Pollo Loco
Freebirds
Green/Red Burrito
La Salsa
Moe's
Pancheros
Qdoba
Rubio's
Taco Bell
Taco Bueno
Taco Cabana
Taco del Mar
Taco John's
Taco Mayo
Taco Time
Tijuana Flats
Wahoo's Fish Taco





Noodles



Fazoli's
Noodles & Company
Skyline Chili





Sandwiches



Arby's
Atlanta Bread
Blimpie
Capriotti's
Charley's
Così
Cousins
D'Angelo
Daphne's
Erbert & Gerbert's
Firehouse Subs
Great Wraps
Jason's
Jerry's Subs
Jersey Mike's
Jimmy John's
Lee's Sandwiches
Lenny's Sub
McAlister's Deli
Miami Subs
Mr. Hero
Newk's Eatery
Penn Station
Port of Subs
PDQ
Potbelly
Quiznos
Rax
Runza
Sandella's
Schlotzsky's
Steak Escape
Subway
Togo's
Tubby's
Tudor's Biscuit World
Which Wich?





Seafood



Arthur Treacher's
Captain D's
H. Salt Esquire
Ivar's
Long John Silver's
Skippers Seafood & Chowder House





Defunct



Bresler's Ice Cream
Brigham's
Burger Chef
Carrols
D'Lites
Druther's
Henry's Hamburgers
Hot 'n Now
Hot Sam Pretzels
Naugles
Red Barn
Sandy's
Zantigo












v
t
e


Illinois-based corporations



Fortune 500
corporations
(by size–2013)



Walgreens Boots Alliance
Archer Daniels Midland
Boeing
Caterpillar Inc.
State Farm Insurance
Abbott Laboratories
Sears Holdings
United Continental Holdings
Deere & Company
Mondelēz International
Allstate
McDonald's
Exelon
Kraft Heinz
Illinois Tool Works
Baxter International
Navistar International
RR Donnelley
CDW
Hillshire Brands
Discover Financial
W. W. Grainger
Motorola Solutions
Dover Corporation
Tenneco
Ingredion
Anixter
United Stationers
AbbVie
Old Republic International





Other major
public companies
(alphabetically)



ACCO Brands
Accretive Health
Allscripts
Amcol International Corporation
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Brunswick Corporation
Calamos
Career Education Corporation
Catamaran Corporation
CBOE Holdings
CF Industries Holdings
CME Group
CNA Financial
Equity Residential
Fortune Brands Home & Security
General Growth Properties
Hospira
Hyatt Hotels Corp.
Integrys Energy Group
Jones Lang LaSalle
Kemper Corporation
Nalco Holding Company
Nicor
Northern Trust
RLI Corp.
Rubicon Technology
Stericycle
Telephone and Data Systems
Titan International
Tribune Media
Tronc
Tootsie Roll Industries
ULTA Beauty
US Foods
USG Corporation
Westell
Zebra Technologies





Other major
private companies
(alphabetically)



Ace Hardware
Baker & McKenzie
Blue Cross Blue Shield Association
Claire's
Country Financial
Danfoss Power Solutions
Dot Foods
Eby-Brown
Electro-Motive Diesel
Flex-N-Gate
Follett Corporation
Gardner Denver
Grant Thornton LLP
Health Care Service Corporation
Heico Cos.
Hendrickson International
Hub International
Jenner & Block
Kirkland & Ellis
Marmon Group
Mayer Brown
Medline Industries
Molex
Morton Salt
Nestlé Frozen Pizza
OSI Group
Pactiv
Reyes Holdings
Ryerson, Inc.
Sidley Austin
Skidmore, Owings & Merrill
Solo Cup Company
Tellabs
TransUnion
True Value
Wirtz Corporation





Related topics



Breweries in Illinois
Companies in the Chicago metropolitan area
Food manufacturers of Chicago
Newspapers in Illinois
Wineries in Illinois












v
t
e


Food chains in the United Kingdom



Casual dining



Angus Steakhouse
Ask
Beefeater Grill
Bella Italia
Brewers Fayre
Byron Hamburgers
Café Rouge
Carluccio's
Chiquito
Damon's
Ed's Easy Diner
Frankie & Benny's
Giraffe
Gourmet Burger Kitchen
Harry Ramsden's
Harvester
Hungry Horse
La Tasca
Little Chef
Loch Fyne Restaurants
Nando's
OK Diner
Pizza Hut
PizzaExpress
Prezzo
Strada
Table Table
T.G.I. Friday's
Toby Carvery
Tony Roma's
Wagamama
Wahaca
Wildwood Kitchen
Zizzi





Fast food



Barburrito
Burger King
Chicken Cottage
Chipotle Mexican Grill
Dixy Chicken
Domino's Pizza
Five Guys
KFC
McDonald's
Morley's
Papa John's Pizza
Sam's Chicken
Southern Fried Chicken
Subway
Taco Bell
Tops Pizza
Tortilla
Wasabi
Wimpy
YO! Sushi





Baked goods



Auntie Anne's
Cinnabon
Cooplands
Ditsch
Dunkin' Donuts
Eat
Greggs
Krispy Kreme
Millie's Cookies
Patisserie Valerie
Pret a Manger
Sayers
Spudulike
Upper Crust
The West Cornwall Pasty Company





Coffee shops and tea rooms



AMT Coffee
Betty's
Caffè Nero
Caffè Ritazza
Coffee #1
Coffee Republic
Costa Coffee
Harris + Hoole
Starbucks





Dairy



Baskin-Robbins
Ben & Jerry's
Kaspa's





Pub chains



All Bar One
Chef & Brewer
O'Neill's
Scream Pubs
Slug and Lettuce
Walkabout
Wetherspoons
Yates's














Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 136891459
LCCN: n50000582
ISNI: 0000 0000 9322 4855
GND: 2084334-3
SUDOC: 029547199
BNF: cb121150481 (data)










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=McDonald%27s&oldid=791385530"					
Categories: McDonald's1940 establishments in California1955 establishments in IllinoisCompanies based in DuPage County, IllinoisCompanies in the Dow Jones Industrial AverageCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeFast-food chains of AustraliaFast-food chains of SingaporeFast-food chains of the United StatesFast-food franchisesFast-food hamburger restaurantsMultinational food companiesOak Brook, IllinoisRestaurant chains in the United StatesRestaurants established in 1940American companies established in 1940Hidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from April 2013Pages using citations with accessdate and no URLArticles with dead external links from August 2016CS1 German-language sources (de)Wikipedia indefinitely semi-protected pagesUse mdy dates from March 2017Use American English from August 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from May 2016Wikipedia articles needing clarification from January 2017Wikipedia articles needing clarification from March 2017Articles with unsourced statements from September 2015Articles with limited geographic scope from November 2015USA-centricArticles to be expanded from November 2015All articles to be expandedArticles using small message boxesArticles to be expanded from May 2014Articles with unsourced statements from April 2017NPOV disputes from July 2017All NPOV disputesArticles with peacock terms from July 2017All articles with peacock termsArticles with unsourced statements from December 2014Articles with unsourced statements from March 2015Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikinewsWikiquote 



Languages


AfrikaansالعربيةAsturianuAzərbaycancaবাংলাBân-lâm-gúБеларускаяBikol CentralБългарскиCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiΕλληνικάEspañolEsperantoEstremeñuEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisFryskGalego客家語/Hak-kâ-ngî한국어Հայերենहिन्दीHrvatskiIlokanoBahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתಕನ್ನಡКъарачай-малкъарქართულიҚазақшаKreyòl ayisyenKurdîLatinaLatviešuLietuviųLimburgsLumbaartMagyarМакедонскиമലയാളംმარგალურიمصرىBahasa MelayuBaso MinangkabauNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskOccitanਪੰਜਾਬੀPälzischپنجابیپښتوPolskiPortuguêsRomânăRumantschРусскийСаха тылаScotsSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSlovenščinaکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиBasa SundaSuomiSvenskaTagalogதமிழ்Татарча/tatarçaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаVepsän kel’Tiếng ViệtWinarayייִדיש粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 19 July 2017, at 22:46.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









McDonald's - Wikipedia




















 







McDonald's

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from MacDonalds)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other uses, see Macdonald (disambiguation).

McDonald's





Type

Public


Traded as



NYSE: MCD
DJIA Component
S&P 100 Component
S&P 500 Component





ISIN
US5801351017


Industry
Restaurants


Genre
Fast food restaurant


Founded
McDonald's:
May 15, 1940 (77 years ago)
 San Bernardino, CA
McDonald's Corporation:
April 15, 1955 (62 years ago)
 Des Plaines, IL


Founders
McDonald's:
Richard McDonald
Maurice McDonald
McDonald's Corporation:
Ray Kroc


Headquarters
 Oak Brook, Illinois, U.S.
(moving to Chicago in 2018)[1]



Number of locations

About 36,900[2] (December 31, 2016)



Area served

Worldwide



Key people




Andrew J. McKenna (Chairman)
Steve Easterbrook (President and CEO)





Products



Hamburgers
chicken
french fries
soft drinks
milkshakes
salads
desserts
coffee
breakfast





Revenue



 US$24.622 billion (2016)[2]






Operating income




 US$7.745 billion (2016)[2]






Net income




 US$4.686 billion (2016)[2]





Total assets



 US$31.024 billion (2016)[2]





Total equity



 US$2.2043 billion (2016)[2]






Number of employees

375,000 (2016)[2]


Website

corporate.mcdonalds.com/mcd.html
www.mcdonalds.com/us/en-us.html
This box:

view
talk
edit





McDonald's is an American hamburger and fast food restaurant chain. It was founded in 1940 as a barbecue restaurant operated by Richard and Maurice McDonald, in San Bernardino, California. In 1948, they reorganized their business as a hamburger stand, using production line principles. The first McDonald's franchise using the arches logo opened in Phoenix, Arizona in 1953. Businessman Ray Kroc joined the company as a franchise agent in 1955 and subsequently purchased the chain from the McDonald brothers. Based in Oak Brook, Illinois, McDonald's confirmed plans to move its global headquarters to Chicago by early 2018.[3][4]
Today, McDonald's is the world's largest restaurant chain, serving approximately 68 million customers daily in 120 countries across approximately 36,900 outlets.[5] McDonald's primarily sells hamburgers, cheeseburgers, chicken products, french fries, breakfast items, soft drinks, milkshakes, wraps, and desserts. In response to changing consumer tastes and after facing criticism for the unhealthy nature of their food,[6] the company has expanded its menu to include salads, fish, wraps, smoothies, and fruit. A McDonald's restaurant is operated by either a franchisee, an affiliate, or the corporation itself. The McDonald's Corporation revenues come from the rent, royalties, and fees paid by the franchisees, as well as sales in company-operated restaurants. According to a BBC report published in 2012, McDonald's is the world's second largest private employer (behind Walmart with 1.9 million employees), 1.5 million of whom work for franchises.



Contents


1 History
2 Corporate overview

2.1 Facts and figures
2.2 Business model
2.3 Headquarters
2.4 Board of directors
2.5 Global operations

2.5.1 Countries with McDonald's




3 Products

3.1 International menu variations


4 Restaurants

4.1 Types of restaurants

4.1.1 McDrive
4.1.2 McCafé
4.1.3 "Create Your Taste" restaurants
4.1.4 Other
4.1.5 Special diet
4.1.6 Playgrounds
4.1.7 McDonald's Next


4.2 2006 redesign
4.3 Smoking ban


5 Treatment of employees

5.1 Automation
5.2 Wages

5.2.1 Strikes


5.3 Working conditions


6 Animal welfare standards
7 Marketing and advertising

7.1 India
7.2 Space exploration
7.3 Children's advertising
7.4 Sports awards and honors


8 Charity

8.1 McHappy Day
8.2 McDonald's Monopoly donation
8.3 McRefugee


9 Criticism

9.1 Company responses to criticism
9.2 Environmental record
9.3 Legal cases

9.3.1 Asia
9.3.2 Australia
9.3.3 United Kingdom
9.3.4 United States


9.4 Use of genetically modified food


10 See also
11 References
12 Further reading
13 External links



History
Main article: History of McDonald's




McDonald's corporate logo used from November 18, 1968, to 2006. It still exists at some restaurants






The oldest operating McDonald's restaurant was the third one built, opening in 1953. It is located at 10207 Lakewood Blvd. at Florence Ave. in Downey, California (at 33°56′50″N 118°07′06″W﻿ / ﻿33.9471°N 118.1182°W﻿ / 33.9471; -118.1182).


The business began in 1940, with a restaurant opened by brothers Richard and Maurice McDonald at 1398 North E Street at West 14th Street in San Bernardino, California (at 34°07′32″N 117°17′41″W﻿ / ﻿34.1255°N 117.2946°W﻿ / 34.1255; -117.2946). Their introduction of the "Speedee Service System" in 1948 furthered the principles of the modern fast-food restaurant that the White Castle hamburger chain had already put into practice more than two decades earlier.[citation needed] The first McDonald's with the arches opened in Phoenix, Arizona in March 1953.[citation needed] The original mascot of McDonald's was a man with a chef's hat on top of a hamburger-shaped head whose name was "Speedee". In 1962, the Golden Arches replaced Speedee as the company symbol. A new mascot, Ronald McDonald, was introduced in 1965. The clown-like man having puffed out costume legs appeared in advertising aimed at children.[7]
On May 4, 1961, McDonald's first filed for a U.S. trademark on the name "McDonald's" with the description "Drive-In Restaurant Services", which continues to be renewed. On September 13, 1961, the company filed for a trademark on a new logo—an overlapping, double-arched "M" symbol. By September 6, 1962, this M-symbol was temporarily disfavored, when a trademark was filed for a single arch, which appeared over many of the early McDonald's restaurants in the early years.[clarification needed] Although the "Golden Arches" logo appeared in various forms, the present version as a letter "M" did not appear until November 18, 1968, when the company applied for a U.S. trademark.
The present corporation dates its founding to the opening of a franchised restaurant by businessman Ray Kroc in Des Plaines, Illinois on April 15, 1955, the ninth McDonald's restaurant overall; this location was demolished in 1984 after many remodels. Kroc later purchased the McDonald brothers' equity in the company and led its worldwide expansion, and the company became listed on the public stock markets ten years later. Kroc was also noted for aggressive business practices, compelling the McDonald brothers to leave the fast-food industry.
Kroc and the McDonald brothers feuded over control of the business, as documented in Kroc's autobiography. The San Bernardino restaurant was demolished in 1976 (1971, according to Juan Pollo) and the site was sold to the Juan Pollo restaurant chain. This area now serves as headquarters for the Juan Pollo chain, as well as a McDonald's and Route 66 museum.[8] With the expansion of McDonald's into many international markets, the company has become a symbol of globalization and the spread of the American way of life. Its prominence has also made it a frequent topic of public debates about obesity, corporate ethics, and consumer responsibility.
Corporate overview
Facts and figures




By 1993, McDonald's had sold more than 100 billion hamburgers. The once widespread restaurant signs that boasted the number of sales, such as this one in Harlem, were left at "99 billion" because there was space for only two digits.






The McDonald's in Northport, Alabama commemorates U.S. President Ronald Reagan's visit


McDonald's restaurants are found in 120 countries and territories around the world and serve 68 million customers each day.[9][10] McDonald's operates 36,899 restaurants worldwide, employing more than 375,000 people as of the end of 2016.[5][9] There are currently a total of 5,669 company-owned locations and 31,230 franchised locations, which includes 21,559 locations franchised to conventional franchisees, 6,300 locations licensed to developmental licensees, and 3,371 locations licensed to foreign affiliates, primarily Japan.[5]
Focusing on its core brand, McDonald's began divesting itself of other chains it had acquired during the 1990s. The company owned a majority stake in Chipotle Mexican Grill until October 2006, when McDonald's fully divested from Chipotle through a stock exchange.[11][12] Until December 2003, it also owned Donatos Pizza, and it owned a small share of Aroma Cafe from 1999 to 2001. On August 27, 2007, McDonald's sold Boston Market to Sun Capital Partners.[13]
Notably, McDonald's has increased shareholder dividends for 25 consecutive years,[14] making it one of the S&P 500 Dividend Aristocrats.[15][16] In October 2012, its monthly sales fell for the first time in nine years.[17] In 2014, its quarterly sales fell for the first time in seventeen years, when its sales dropped for the entirety of 1997.[18]
In the United States, it is reported that drive-throughs account for 70 percent of sales.[19][20] McDonald's plans to close 184 restaurants in the United States in 2015, which is 59 more than it plans to open.[21][22] This is the first time McDonald's will have a net decrease in the number of locations in the United States since 1970.[22]
Business model
The company currently owns all of its property[clarification needed] – valued at an estimated $16 to $18 billion. However, in recent times, there have been calls to spin off the company's US holdings into a potential real estate investment trust. The company earns a significant portion of its revenue from rental payments from franchisees. These rent payments rose 26 percent between 2010 and 2015, accounting for one-fifth of the company's total revenue at the end of the period.[23] The company announced at its investor conference on November 10, 2015, that it would not spin off its property into a real-estate investment trust. The CEO, Steve Easterbrook discussed that pursuing the REIT option would pose too large a risk to the company's business model.[24]




The McDonald's logo painted on the tail of a Crossair McDonnell Douglas MD-83 in 1999.


The United Kingdom and Ireland business model is different from the U.S, in that fewer than 30 percent of restaurants are franchised, with the majority under the ownership of the company. McDonald's trains its franchisees and management at Hamburger University in Oak Brook, Illinois.[25][26] In other countries, McDonald's restaurants are operated by joint ventures of McDonald's Corporation and other, local entities or governments.[27]
According to Fast Food Nation by Eric Schlosser (2001), nearly one in eight workers in the U.S. have at some time been employed by McDonald's. Employees are encouraged by McDonald's Corp. to maintain their health by singing along to their favorite songs in order to relieve stress, attending church services in order to have a lower blood pressure, and taking two vacations annually in order to reduce risk for myocardial infarction.[28] Fast Food Nation also states that McDonald's is the largest private operator of playgrounds in the U.S., as well as the single largest purchaser of beef, pork, potatoes, and apples. The selection of meats McDonald's uses varies to some extent based on the culture of the host country.[29]
Headquarters




McDonald's Plaza, located in Oak Brook, Illinois, is the headquarters of McDonald's


The McDonald's headquarters complex, McDonald's Plaza, is located in Oak Brook, Illinois. It sits on the site of the former headquarters and stabling area of Paul Butler, the founder of Oak Brook.[30] McDonald's moved into the Oak Brook facility from an office within the Chicago Loop in 1971.[31]
On June 13, 2016, McDonald's confirmed plans to move its global headquarters to Chicago's West Loop neighborhood in the Near West Side. The 608,000-square-foot structure will be built on the site of Oprah Winfrey's former Harpo Studios and open in early 2018.[3][4]
Board of directors
As of November 2014, the board of directors had the following members:[32]

Andrew J. McKenna, chairman
Susan E. Arnold, operating executive of Global Consumer & Retail Group of The Carlyle Group
Robert A. Eckert, operating partner of Friedman Fleischer & Lowe
Enrique Hernandez, Jr., president and CEO of Inter-Con Security
Jeanne P. Jackson, president of product and merchandising for Nike, Inc.
Richard H. Lenny, operating partner of Friedman Fleischer & Lowe
Walter E. Massey, president of the School of the Art Institute of Chicago
Cary D. McMillan, CEO of True Partners Consulting LLC
Sheila A. Penrose, non-executive chairman of Jones Lang LaSalle
John W. Rogers, Jr, chairman and CEO of Ariel Investments
Roger W. Stone, chairman and CEO of KapStone Paper and Packaging
Don Thompson, president and CEO
Miles D. White, chairman and CEO of Abbott Laboratories

On March 1, 2015, after being chief brand officer of McDonald's and its former head in the UK and northern Europe, Steve Easterbrook became CEO, succeeding Don Thompson, who stepped down on January 28, 2015.
Global operations
See also: List of countries with McDonald's restaurants and International availability of McDonald's products




Countries with McDonald's restaurants, showing their first year with its first restaurant






McDonald's on Nathan Road, Kowloon, Hong Kong.


McDonald's has become emblematic of globalization, sometimes referred to as the "McDonaldization" of society. The Economist newspaper uses the "Big Mac Index": the comparison of a Big Mac's cost in various world currencies can be used to informally judge these currencies' purchasing power parity. Switzerland has the most expensive Big Mac in the world as of July 2015, while the country with the least expensive Big Mac is India[33][34] (albeit for a Maharaja Mac—the next cheapest Big Mac is Hong Kong).[35]




McDonald's, Paulista Avenue, São Paulo, Brazil


Thomas Friedman once said that no country with a McDonald's had gone to war with another.[36][37] However, the "Golden Arches Theory of Conflict Prevention" is not strictly true. Exceptions are the 1989 United States invasion of Panama, NATO's bombing of Serbia in 1999, the 2006 Lebanon War, and the 2008 South Ossetia war. McDonald's suspended operations in its corporate-owned stores in Crimea after Russia annexed the region in 2014.[38] On August 20, 2014, as tensions between the United States and Russia strained over events in Ukraine, and the resultant U.S. sanctions, the Russian government temporarily shut down four McDonald's outlets in Moscow, citing sanitary concerns. The company has operated in Russia since 1990 and at August 2014 had 438 stores across the country.[39] On August 23, 2014, Russian Deputy Prime Minister Arkady Dvorkovich ruled out any government move to ban McDonald's and dismissed the notion that the temporary closures had anything to do with the sanctions.[40]




McDonald's, Old Mahabalipuram Road, Chennai, India


Some observers have suggested that the company should be given credit for increasing the standard of service in markets that it enters. A group of anthropologists in a study entitled Golden Arches East[41] looked at the impact McDonald's had on East Asia and Hong Kong, in particular. When it opened in Hong Kong in 1975, McDonald's was the first restaurant to consistently offer clean restrooms, driving customers to demand the same of other restaurants and institutions. McDonald's has taken to partnering up with Sinopec, the second largest oil company in the People's Republic of China, as it takes advantage of the country's growing use of personal vehicles by opening numerous drive-thru restaurants.[42] McDonald's has opened a McDonald's restaurant and McCafé on the underground premises of the French fine arts museum, The Louvre.[43]
The company stated it would open vegetarian-only restaurants in India by mid-2013.[44] Foreign restaurants are banned in Bermuda, with the exception of KFC, which was present before the current law was passed. Therefore, there are no McDonald's in Bermuda.[45]
On January 9, 2017, 80% of the franchise rights in the mainland China and in Hong Kong were sold for US$2.080 billion to a consortium of CITIC Limited (for 32%) and private equity funds managed by CITIC Capital (for 20%) and Carlyle (for 20%), which CITIC Limited and CITIC Capital would also formed a joint venture to own the stake.[46]
Countries with McDonald's

Africa


 Egypt
 Mauritius
 Mayotte
 Morocco
 Reunion
 South Africa
 Tunisia





Asia


 Azerbaijan
 Bahrain
 Brunei
 China

 Hong Kong
 Macau


 Cyprus
 Georgia
 India
 Indonesia
 Israel
 Japan
 Jordan
 Kazakhstan
 Kuwait
 Lebanon
 Malaysia
 Oman
 Pakistan
 Philippines
 Qatar
 Saudi Arabia
 Singapore
 South Korea
 Sri Lanka
 Taiwan
 Thailand
 Turkey
 United Arab Emirates
 Vietnam





Europe


 Andorra
 Austria
 Belarus
 Belgium
 Bosnia and Herzegovina
 Bulgaria
 Croatia
 Czech Republic
 Denmark
 Estonia
 Finland
 France
 Germany
 Greece
 Hungary
 Ireland
 Italy
 Latvia
 Liechtenstein
 Lithuania
 Luxembourg
 Malta
 Moldova
 Monaco
 Netherlands
 Norway
 Poland
 Portugal
 Romania
 Russia
 San Marino
 Serbia
 Slovakia
 Slovenia
 Spain
 Sweden
  Switzerland
 Ukraine
 United Kingdom

 Isle of Man
 Jersey







North America


 Aruba
 Bahamas
 Canada
 Costa Rica
 Cuba

 Guantanamo Bay Naval Base


 Curaçao
 Dominican Republic
 El Salvador
 Guadeloupe
 Guatemala
 Honduras
 Martinique
 Nicaragua
 Panama
 Sint Maarten
 Trinidad & Tobago
 Mexico
 United States

 Puerto Rico
 U.S. Virgin Islands







Oceania


 American Samoa
 Australia
 Fiji
 French Polynesia
 Guam
 New Caledonia
 New Zealand
 Northern Marianas
 Samoa





South America


 Argentina
 Brazil
 Chile
 Colombia
 Ecuador
 French Guiana
 Guyana
 Paraguay
 Peru
 Suriname
 Uruguay
 Venezuela




Products
Main article: List of McDonald's products




A typical "eat-in" McDonald's meal as sold in Hong Kong, consisting of French fries, a soft drink, and a "main product" - in this case, a McSpicy Chicken Fillet. Condiments are supplied in small packets; such a packet of tomato ketchup is seen in the foreground.


McDonald's predominantly sells hamburgers, various types of chicken, chicken sandwiches, French fries, soft drinks, breakfast items, and desserts. In most markets, McDonald's offers salads and vegetarian items, wraps and other localized fare. On a seasonal basis, McDonald's offers the McRib sandwich. Some speculate the seasonality of the McRib adds to its appeal.[47]
Products are offered as either "eat-in" (where the customer opts to eat in the restaurant) or "take-out" (where the customer opts to take the food for consumption off the premises). "Eat-in" meals are provided on a plastic tray with a paper insert on the floor of the tray. "Take-out" meals are usually delivered with the contents enclosed in a distinctive McDonald's-branded brown paper bag. In both cases, the individual items are wrapped or boxed as appropriate.
Since Steve Easterbrook became CEO of the company, McDonald's has streamlined the menu which in the United States contained nearly 200 items. The company has also looked to introduce healthier options, and removed high-fructose corn syrup from hamburger buns. The company has also removed artificial preservatives from Chicken McNuggets[48], replacing chicken skin, safflower oil and citric acid found in Chicken McNuggets with pea starch, rice starch and powdered lemon juice. [49]
International menu variations
See also: McDonald's products (international)




A McDonald's Ebi Feast meal sold at branches in Singapore, November 2013. McDonald's is known for tailoring its menus in different markets to cater to local tastes


Restaurants in several countries, particularly in Asia, serve soup. This local deviation from the standard menu is a characteristic for which the chain is particularly known, and one which is employed either to abide by regional food taboos (such as the religious prohibition of beef consumption in India) or to make available foods with which the regional market is more familiar (such as the sale of McRice in Indonesia, or Ebi (prawn) Burger in Singapore and Japan).
In Germany and some other Western European countries, McDonald's sells beer. In New Zealand, McDonald's sells meat pies, after the local affiliate partially relaunched the Georgie Pie fast food chain it bought out in 1996.
In the United States, after limited trials on a regional basis, McDonald's plans to offer an all-day breakfast menu whenever its restaurants are open, although eggs cannot be cooked at the same time on the same equipment as hamburgers due to different temperature requirements.[citation needed]
Restaurants





The examples and perspective in this section deal primarily with the United States and do not represent a worldwide view of the subject. You may improve this article, discuss the issue on the talk page, or create a new article, as appropriate. (November 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Types of restaurants




Counter service in a McDonald's restaurant in Dukhan, Qatar


Most standalone McDonald's restaurants offer both counter service and drive-through service, with indoor and sometimes outdoor seating.[50] Drive-Thru, Auto-Mac, Pay and Drive, or "McDrive" as it is known in many countries, often has separate stations for placing, paying for, and picking up orders, though the latter two steps are frequently combined;[50] it was first introduced in Arizona in 1975, following the lead of other fast-food chains. The first such restaurant in Britain opened at Fallowfield, Manchester in 1986.[51]
McDrive
In some countries, "McDrive" locations near highways offer no counter service or seating.[52] In contrast, locations in high-density city neighborhoods often omit drive-through service.[53] There are also a few locations, located mostly in downtown districts, that offer a "Walk-Thru" service in place of Drive-Thru.[54]
McCafé
Main article: McCafé




A Montevideo McCafé


McCafé is a café-style accompaniment to McDonald's restaurants and is a concept created by McDonald's Australia (also known, and marketed, as "Macca's" in Australia), starting with Melbourne in 1993.[55] As of 2016, most McDonald's in Australia have McCafés located within the existing McDonald's restaurant. In Tasmania, there are McCafés in every restaurant, with the rest of the states quickly following suit.[50] After upgrading to the new McCafé look and feel, some Australian restaurants have noticed up to a 60 percent increase in sales. At the end of 2003, there were over 600 McCafés worldwide.
"Create Your Taste" restaurants
From 2015–2016, McDonald's tried a new gourmet burger service/restaurant concept based on other gourmet restaurants such as Shake Shack and Grill'd. It was rolled out for the first time in Australia during the early months of 2015 and expanded to China, Hong Kong, Singapore, Arabia and New Zealand, with ongoing trials in the US market. In dedicated "Create Your Taste" (CYT) kiosks, customers could choose all ingredients including type of bun and meat along with optional extras. In late 2015 the Australian CYT service introduced CYT salads.
After a person had ordered, McDonald's advised that wait times were between 10–15 minutes. When the food was ready, trained crew ('hosts') brought the food to the customer's table. Instead of McDonald's usual cardboard and plastic packaging, CYT food was presented on wooden boards, fries in wire baskets and salads in china bowls with metal cutlery. A higher price applied.
In November 2016, Create Your Taste was replaced by a "Signature Crafted Recipes" program designed to be more efficient and less expensive.[56]
Other
Some locations are connected to gas stations/convenience stores,[57] while others called McExpress have limited seating and/or menu or may be located in a shopping mall. Other McDonald's are located in Walmart stores. McStop is a location targeted at truckers and travelers which may have services found at truck stops.[58]
In Sweden, customers who order a happy meal can use the meal's container for a pair of happy goggles.[59] The company created a game for the goggles known as "Slope Stars.[59]" McDonald's predicts happy goggles will continue in other countries.[59] In the Netherlands, McDonald's has introduced McTrax that doubles as a recording studio; it reacts to touch.[59] They can create their own beats with a synth and tweak sounds with special effects.[59]
Special diet




A kosher Express McDonald's outlet in the Malha Mall in Jerusalem





This section needs expansion with: Details of other McDonald's restaurants where special dietry requirements are catered for. You can help by adding to it. (November 2015)


The first kosher McDonald's was established in 1997 at the Abasto de Buenos Aires mall in Buenos Aires, Argentina. This is in addition to many kosher branches in Israel.[60][61]
Playgrounds




A McDonald's in Panorama City, Los Angeles, California with a Playplace designed to promote a family-friendly image





This section needs expansion. You can help by adding to it. (May 2014)


McDonald's playgrounds are called McDonald's PlayPlace. Some McDonald's in suburban areas and certain cities feature large indoor or outdoor playgrounds. The first PlayPlace with the familiar crawl-tube design with ball pits and slides was introduced in 1987 in the US, with many more being constructed soon after.
McDonald's Next




McDonald's Next in Admiralty, Hong Kong


McDonald's Next use open-concept design and offer "Create Your Taste" digital ordering. The concept store also offering free mobile device charging and table service after 6:00 pm. The first store open in Hong Kong in December 2015.[62]
2006 redesign




An American McDonald's in Mount Pleasant, Iowa in June 2008; this is an example of the "new" look of American McDonald's restaurants


In 2006, McDonald's introduced its "Forever Young" brand by redesigning all of its restaurants, the first major redesign since the 1970s.[63][64]
The goal of the redesign is to be more like a coffee shop, similar to Starbucks. The design includes wooden tables, faux-leather chairs, and muted colors; the red was muted to terracotta, the yellow was shifted to golden for a more "sunny" look, and olive and sage green were also added.
To create a warmer look, the restaurants have less plastic and more brick and wood, with modern hanging lights to produce a softer glow. Many restaurants now feature free Wi-Fi and flat-screen TVs. Other upgrades include double drive-thrus, flat roofs instead of the angled red roofs, and replacing fiber glass with wood. Also, instead of the familiar golden arches, the restaurants now feature "semi-swooshes" (half of a golden arch), similar to the Nike swoosh.[65]
Smoking ban
McDonald's began banning smoking in 1994 when it banned smoking within its 1,400 wholly owned restaurants.[66]
Treatment of employees




A McDonald's employee takes an order in the Philippines


Automation
Since the late 1990s, McDonald's has attempted to replace employees with electronic kiosks which would perform actions such taking orders and accepting money. In 1999, McDonald's first tested "E-Clerks" in suburban Chicago, Illinois, and Wyoming, Michigan, with the devices being able to "save money on live staffers" and attracting larger purchase amounts than average employees.[67]
In 2013, the University of Oxford estimated that in the succeeding decades, there was a 92% probability of food preparation and serving to become automated in fast food establishments.[68] By 2016, McDonald's "Create Your Taste" electronic kiosks were seen in some restaurants internationally where customers could custom order meals. As employees pushed for higher wages in the late-2010s, some believed that fast food companies such as McDonald's would use the devices to cut costs for employing individuals.[69]
Wages
On August 5, 2013, The Guardian revealed that 90 percent of McDonald's UK workforce are on zero hour contracts, making it possibly the largest such private sector employer in the country.[70] A study released by Fast Food Forward conducted by Anzalone Liszt Grove Research showed that approximately 84 percent of all fast food employees working in New York City in April 2013 had been paid less than their legal wages by their employers.[71]
From 2007 to 2011, fast food workers in the US drew an average of $7 billion of public assistance annually resulting from receiving low wages.[72] The McResource website advised employees to break their food into smaller pieces to feel fuller, seek refunds for unopened holiday purchases, sell possessions online for quick cash, and to "quit complaining" as "stress hormone levels rise by 15 percent after ten minutes of complaining."[73] In December 2013, McDonald's shut down the McResource website amidst negative publicity and criticism. McDonald's plans to continue an internal telephone help line through which its employees can obtain advice on work and life problems.[74]
Liberal thinktank the Roosevelt Institute accuses some McDonald's restaurants of actually paying less than the minimum wage to entry positions due to 'rampant' wage theft.[75] In South Korea, McDonald's pays part-time employees $5.50 an hour and is accused of paying less with arbitrary schedules adjustments and pay delays.[76] In late 2015, Anonymous aggregated data collected by Glassdoor suggests that McDonald's in the United States pays entry-level employees between $7.25 an hour and $11 an hour, with an average of $8.69 an hour. Shift managers get paid an average of $10.34 an hour. Assistant managers get paid an average of $11.57 an hour.[77] McDonald's CEO, Steve Easterbrook, currently earns an annual salary of $1,100,000.[78]
Strikes
See also: Fast food worker strikes




Fast food workers on strike outside of a McDonald's in St. Paul, Minnesota.


McDonald's workers have on occasions decided to strike over pay, with most of the employees on strike seeking to be paid $15.00.[79] When interviewed about the strikes occurring, former McDonald's CEO Ed Rensi stated: "It's cheaper to buy a $35,000 robotic arm than it is to hire an employee who's inefficient making $15 an hour bagging french fries" with Rensi explaining that increasing employee wages could possibly take away from entry-level jobs.[80] However, according to current McDonald's CEO Steve Easterbrook, increasing wages and benefits for workers saw a 6% increase in customer satisfaction when comparing 2015's first quarter data to the first quarter of 2016, with greater returns seen as a result.[80]
Working conditions
In March 2015, McDonald's workers in 19 US cities filed 28 health and safety complaints with OSHA which allege that low staffing, lack of protective gear, poor training and pressure to work fast has resulted in injuries. The complaints also allege that, because of a lack of first aid supplies, workers were told by management to treat burn injuries with condiments such as mayonnaise and mustard. The Fight for $15 labor organization aided the workers in filing the complaints.[81]
Animal welfare standards
In 2015, McDonald's pledged to stop using eggs from battery cage facilities by 2025. Since McDonald's purchases over 2 billion eggs per year or 4 percent of eggs produced in the United States, the switch is expected to have a major impact on the egg industry and is part of a general trend toward cage-free eggs driven by consumer concern over the harsh living conditions of hens.[82][83] The aviary systems from which the new eggs will be sourced are troubled by much higher mortality rates, as well as introducing environmental and worker safety problems.[84] The high hen mortality rate, which is more than double that of battery cage systems, will require new research to mitigate. The facilities also have higher ammonia levels due to faeces being kicked up into the air. Producers raised concerns about the production cost, which is expected to increase by 36 percent.[85]
McDonald's continues to source pork from facilities that use gestation crates, and in 2012 pledged to phase them out.[86]
Marketing and advertising
Main article: McDonald's advertising
McDonald's has for decades maintained an extensive advertising campaign. In addition to the usual media (television, radio, and newspaper), the company makes significant use of billboards and signage, sponsors sporting events ranging from Little League to the FIFA World Cup and Olympic Games.[87] Television has played a central role in the company's advertising strategy.[citation needed] To date, McDonald's has used 23 different slogans in United States advertising, as well as a few other slogans for select countries and regions.[88]
India





The neutrality of this section is disputed. Relevant discussion may be found on the talk page. Please do not remove this message until conditions to do so are met. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article contains wording that promotes the subject in a subjective manner without imparting real information. Please remove or replace such wording and instead of making proclamations about a subject's importance, use facts and attribution to demonstrate that importance. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


McDonald's began operations in India in 1996. It retained Leo Burnett (India) to provide authentic Indian insights regarding local favorite items, religious-based food taboos, and India's strong vegetarian tradition. Hamburgers are made of lamb or chicken, instead of beef. Local favorite foods are adapted into menu items such as McAloo Tikki, a breaded potato pancake on a bun. To assure vegetarian customers, kitchens are divided into vegetarian and non-vegetarian zones. Advertising tells Indians that McDonald's bright, inviting restaurants do not mean high prices; profit strategy uses low prices to generate high volume sales. Locally McDonald's of India sponsored sports programs and donations to visible charities.[89]
Space exploration
McDonald's and NASA explored an advertising agreement for a planned mission to the asteroid 449 Hamburga; however, the spacecraft was eventually cancelled.[90]
Children's advertising
Main articles: Ronald McDonald and McDonaldland
Sports awards and honors
See also: Category:McDonald's High School All-Americans
McDonald's is the title sponsor of the McDonald's All-American Game, all-star basketball games played each year for American and Canadian boys' and girls' high school basketball graduates
Charity
See also: Ronald McDonald House Charities
McHappy Day




A Ronald McDonald House collection box in Framingham, Massachusetts


McHappy Day is an annual event at McDonald's, where a percentage of the day's sales go to charity. It is the signature fundraising event for Ronald McDonald House Charities.[91]
In 2007, it was celebrated in 17 countries: Argentina, Australia, Austria, Brazil, Canada, the United States, Finland, France, Guatemala, Hungary, England, Ireland, New Zealand, Norway, Sweden, Switzerland, and Uruguay.
According to the Australian McHappy Day website, McHappy Day raised $20.4 million in 2009. The goal for 2010 was $20.8 million.[92]
McDonald's Monopoly donation
In 1995, St. Jude Children's Research Hospital received an anonymous letter postmarked in Dallas, Texas, containing a $1 million winning McDonald's Monopoly game piece. McDonald's officials came to the hospital, accompanied by a representative from the accounting firm Arthur Andersen, who examined the card under a jeweler's eyepiece, handled it with plastic gloves, and verified it as a winner.[93] Although game rules prohibited the transfer of prizes, McDonald's waived the rule and has made the annual $50,000 annuity payments, even after learning that the piece was sent by an individual involved in an embezzlement scheme intended to defraud McDonald's (see McDonald's Monopoly).
McRefugee
See also: McRefugee
McRefugees are poor people in Hong Kong, Japan, and China who use McDonald's 24-hour restaurants as a temporary hostel. One in five of Hong Kong's population lives below the poverty line. The rise of McRefugees was first documented by photographer Suraj Katra in 2013.[94]
Criticism




A PETA activist dressed as a chicken confronts the manager of the Times Square McDonald's over the company's animal welfare standards


In 1990, activists from a small group known as London Greenpeace (no connection to the international group Greenpeace) distributed leaflets entitled What's wrong with McDonald's?, criticizing its environmental, health, and labor record. The corporation wrote to the group demanding they desist and apologize, and, when two of the activists refused to back down, sued them for libel in one of the longest cases in British civil law. A documentary film of the McLibel Trial has been shown in several countries.[95]
In the late 1980s, Phil Sokolof, a millionaire businessman who had suffered a heart attack at the age of 43, took out full-page newspaper ads in New York, Chicago, and other large cities accusing McDonald's menu of being a threat to American health, and asking them to stop using beef tallow to cook their french fries.[citation needed]
Despite the objections of McDonald's, the term "McJob" was added to Merriam-Webster's Collegiate Dictionary in 2003.[96] The term was defined as "a low-paying job that requires little skill and provides little opportunity for advancement".[97]
In 2001, Eric Schlosser's book Fast Food Nation included criticism of the business practices of McDonald's. Among the critiques were allegations that McDonald's (along with other companies within the fast food industry) uses its political influence to increase its profits at the expense of people's health and the social conditions of its workers. The book also brought into question McDonald's advertisement techniques in which it targets children. While the book did mention other fast-food chains, it focused primarily on McDonald's.
In 2002, vegetarian groups, largely Hindu and Buddhist, successfully sued McDonald's for misrepresenting its French fries as vegetarian, when they contained beef broth.[98]
Morgan Spurlock's 2004 documentary film Super Size Me claimed that McDonald's food was contributing to the increase of obesity in society and that the company was failing to provide nutritional information about its food for its customers. Six weeks after the film premiered, McDonald's announced that it was eliminating the super size option, and was creating the adult Happy Meal.




Screenshot from McDonald's Videogame


In 2006, an unsanctioned McDonald's Videogame was released online. It is parody of the business practices of the corporate giant, taking the guise of a tycoon style business simulation game. In the game, the player plays the role of a McDonald's CEO, choosing whether or not to use controversial practices like genetically altered cow feed, plowing over rainforests, and corrupting public officials. McDonald's issued a statement distancing itself from the game.[99]
In January 2014, it was reported that McDonald's was accused of having used a series of tax maneuvers to avoid taxes in France. The company confirmed that tax authorities had visited McDonald's French headquarters in Paris but insisted that it had not done anything wrong, saying, "McDonald's firmly denies the accusation made by L'Express according to which McDonald's supposedly hid part of its revenue from taxes in France."[100]
Company responses to criticism




Discreet shopfront in historic Stratford-upon-Avon


In response to public pressure, McDonald's has sought to include more healthy choices in its menu and has introduced a new slogan to its recruitment posters: "Not bad for a McJob".[101] The word McJob, first attested in the mid-1980s[96] and later popularized by Canadian novelist Douglas Coupland in his book Generation X, has become a buzz word for low-paid, unskilled work with few prospects or benefits and little security. McDonald's disputes this definition of McJob. In 2007, the company launched an advertising campaign with the slogan "Would you like a career with that?" on Irish television, asserting that its jobs have good prospects.
In an effort to respond to growing consumer awareness of food provenance, the fast-food chain changed its supplier of both coffee beans and milk. UK chief executive Steve Easterbrook said: "British consumers are increasingly interested in the quality, sourcing, and ethics of the food and drink they buy".[102] In a bid to tap into the ethical consumer market,[103] McDonald's switched to using coffee beans taken from stocks that are certified by the Rainforest Alliance, a conservation group. Additionally, in response to pressure, McDonald's UK started using organic milk supplies for its bottled milk and hot drinks, although it still uses conventional milk in its milkshakes, and in all of its dairy products in the United States.[104] According to a report published by Farmers Weekly in 2007, the quantity of milk used by McDonald's could have accounted for as much as 5 percent of the UK's organic milk output.[105]
McDonald's announced on May 22, 2008, that, in the United States and Canada, it would switch to using cooking oil that contains no trans fats for its french fries, and canola-based oil with corn and soy oils, for its baked items, pies and cookies, by year's end.[106][107]
With regard to acquiring chickens from suppliers who use CAK/CAS methods of slaughter, McDonald's says that it needs to see more research "to help determine whether any CAS system in current use is optimal from an animal welfare perspective."[108]
Environmental record
In April 2008, McDonald's announced that 11 of its Sheffield, England restaurants have been engaged in a biomass trial that had cut its waste and carbon footprint by half in the area. In this trial, wastes from the restaurants were collected by Veolia Environmental Services and were used to produce energy at a power plant. McDonald's plans to expand this project, although the lack of biomass power plants in the United States will prevent this plan from becoming a national standard anytime soon.[109] In addition, in Europe, McDonald's has been recycling vegetable grease by converting it to fuel for its diesel trucks.[110]
McDonald's has been using a corn-based bioplastic to produce containers for some of its products. The environmental benefits of this technology are controversial, with critics noting that biodegradation is slow, produces greenhouse gases and that contamination of traditional plastic waste streams with bioplastics can complicate recycling efforts.[111]
In 1990, McDonald's worked with the Environmental Defense Fund to stop using "clam shell" shaped styrofoam food containers to house its food products.[112] 20 years later, McDonald's announced they would try replacing styrofoam coffee cups with an alternative material.[113]
The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency has recognized McDonald's continuous effort to reduce solid waste by designing more efficient packaging and by promoting the use of recycled-content materials.[114] McDonald's reports that it is committed towards environmental leadership by effectively managing electric energy, by conserving natural resources through recycling and reusing materials, and by addressing water management issues within the restaurant.[115]
In an effort to reduce energy usage by 25 percent in its restaurants, McDonald's opened a prototype restaurant in Chicago in 2009 with the intention of using the model in its other restaurants throughout the world. Building on past efforts, specifically a restaurant it opened in Sweden in 2000 that was the first to intentionally incorporate green ideas, McDonald's designed the Chicago site to save energy by incorporating old and new ideas such as managing storm water, using skylights for more natural lighting and installing some partitions and tabletops made from recycled goods.[116]
When McDonald's received criticism for its environmental policies in the 1970s, it began to make substantial progress in reducing its use of materials.[117] For instance, an "average meal" in the 1970s—a Big Mac, fries, and a drink—required 46 grams of packaging; today, it requires only 25 grams, allowing a 46 percent reduction.[118] In addition, McDonald's eliminated the need for intermediate containers for cola by having a delivery system that pumps syrup directly from the delivery truck into storage containers, saving two million pounds (910 tonnes) of packaging annually.[119] Overall, weight reductions in packaging and products, as well as the increased usage of bulk packaging ultimately decreased packaging by twenty-four million pounds (11,000 tonnes) annually.[120]
Legal cases
Main article: McDonald's legal cases
McDonald's has been involved in a number of lawsuits and other legal cases, most of which involved trademark disputes. The company has threatened many food businesses with legal action unless it drops the Mc or Mac from trading names.
Asia
On September 8, 2009, McDonald's Malaysian operations lost a lawsuit to prevent another restaurant calling itself McCurry. McDonald's lost in an appeal to Malaysia's highest court, the Federal Court.[121]
Australia
In April 2007, in Perth, Western Australia, McDonald's pleaded guilty to five charges relating to the employment of children under 15 in one of its outlets and was fined A$8,000.[122]
In 2016, the Australian Taxation Office revealed that McDonald's Asia-Pacific Consortium had generated $478 million in revenue in 2013–14, but had paid no tax on those earnings whatsoever.[123]
United Kingdom
McDonald's has defended itself in several cases involving workers' rights.[citation needed]
The longest running legal action of all time in the UK was the McLibel case against 2 defendants who criticized a number of aspects of the company. The trial lasted 10 years and called 130 witnesses. The European Court of Human Rights deemed that the unequal resources of the litigants breached the defendants rights to freedom of speech and biased the trial. The result was widely seen as a "PR disaster."[124]
United States
A famous legal case in the US involving McDonald's was the 1994 decision in Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants where Stella Liebeck was awarded several million dollars after she suffered third-degree burns after spilling a scalding cup of McDonald's coffee on herself.[125]
Use of genetically modified food
In April 2014, it was reported that McDonald's will use, in Europe, chicken meat that was produced by using genetically modified animal feed. Greenpeace argues that McDonald's saves less than one Eurocent for each chicken burger and goes down a path not desired by its customers.[126]
See also





Book: McDonald's





Arcos Dorados Holdings
Burger King—the second largest burger chain
List of hamburger restaurants
List of restaurant chains
The Founder—a 2016 film detailing the creation and controversial business history of McDonald's, that is also a biopic of Ray Kroc
MaDonal—a restaurant operating in northern Iraq that copies many features of McDonald's, illicitly
Maxime, McDuff & McDo-documentary film about the unionizing of a McDonald's in Montreal, Quebec, Canada
Wendy's—the third largest hamburger chain



Food portal
Companies portal
Chicago portal
Illinois portal


References


^ Bomkamp, Samantha (June 13, 2016). "Mcdonald's HQ Move Is Boldest Step Yet in Effort to Transform Itself". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved May 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e f g "Form 10-K: McDonald's Corporation (McDonald's Corporation 2016 Annual Report)" (PDF). United States Securities and Exchange Commission. Commission File Number 1-5231. Retrieved May 1, 2017. 
^ a b "McDonald's future Near West Side neighbors air parking, traffic safety beefs". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved August 7, 2016. 
^ a b Hufford, Austen (June 14, 2016). "McDonald’s to Move Headquarters to Downtown Chicago". Retrieved August 7, 2016 – via Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c http://d18rn0p25nwr6d.cloudfront.net/CIK-0000063908/62200c2b-da82-4364-be92-79ed454e3b88.pdf
^ Robbins, John (October 8, 2010). "How Bad Is McDonald's Food?". Huffington Post. 
^ "The McDonalds and Their Restaurant". www.referenceforbusiness.com. Retrieved January 16, 2017. In 1962, McDonald's golden arches replaced Speedee as the restaurant's main symbol, and ads told customers to "Look for the golden arches." ... Kroc believed in advertising heavily and in targeting children. In 1965, the company introduced a new mascot, a red-haired clown named Ronald McDonald, who became a frequent and friendly face in television commercials. 
^ "McDonalds Museum". Juan Pollo. Retrieved May 14, 2012. 
^ a b McDonald's – The Leading Global Food Service Retailer :: AboutMcDonalds.com, retrieved May 8, 2008
^ "McDonald's Momentum Delivers Another Year of Strong Results for 2011". Yahoo Finance. 2012. Retrieved January 25, 2012. [dead link]
^ Brand, Rachel (December 23, 2006). "Chipotle founder had big dreams". Rocky Mountain News. Archived from the original on July 8, 2009. Retrieved April 27, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's sets October deadline to sell Chipotle stock". Denver Business Journal. BizJournals.com. July 25, 2006. Retrieved August 10, 2009. 
^ "McDonald's Wraps Up Boston Market Sale". Dow Jones & Company, Inc. News Services. August 27, 2007. Archived from the original on September 28, 2007. Retrieved August 28, 2007. 
^ Baertlein, Lisa (September 24, 2009). "McDonald's raises cash dividend by 10%". reuters.com. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ "Definition of S&P 500 Aristocrat at Investopedia". Investopedia.com. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ "List of 2009 Dividend Aristocrats via Seeking Alpha, retrieved 10/1/2009". Seekingalpha.com. December 23, 2008. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ Tiffany Hsu (November 9, 2012). "McDonald's monthly sales fall for first time in nine years". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved March 9, 2013. 
^ "McDonald's New Turnaround Plan Is So 1990s". 
^ Baertlein, Lisa (March 14, 2017). "McDonald's, late to mobile ordering, seeks to avoid pitfalls". Reuters. Retrieved March 15, 2017. 
^ Patton, Leslie (November 23, 2015). "McDonald's Knows You're Sick of Screw-Ups at Drive-Thru Windows". Bloomberg. Retrieved March 15, 2017. 
^ Ferdman, Roberto A. (August 13, 2015). "This is a terrible sign for McDonald's". The Washington Post. 
^ a b "McDonald's to Cut U.S. Stores for First Time in Decades". The New York Times. Associated Press. June 18, 2015. 
^ LUBLIN, JOANN S.; JARGON, JULIE (October 15, 2015). "McDonald’s Nears Decision on Real Estate". Retrieved October 22, 2015. 
^ Jargon, Julie. "McDonald's Won't Spin Off Real Estate Holdings". Wall Street Journal. ISSN 0099-9660. Retrieved November 11, 2015. 
^ "Hamburger University Campus". mcdonalds.com. Retrieved January 18, 2017. 
^ "Hamburger University - Our Facility". 
^ "McDonald’s Business Model and Strategy :: McDonald’s". corporate.mcdonalds.com. Retrieved January 24, 2017. 
^ Eidelson, Josh (November 19, 2013). "McDonald's tells workers to "sing away stress," "chew away cares" and go to church". Salon. Retrieved August 21, 2014. These and other tips appear on a "McResource Line" website created by the McDonald's Corp. to advise workers on stress, health and personal finances. Among the tips that appear on the site: "Chewing gum can reduce cortisol levels by 16%"; "At least two vacations a year can cut heart attack risk by 50%"; "Singing along to your favorite songs can lower your blood pressure"; and "People who attend more church services tend to have lower blood pressure." 
^ Schlosser, Eric. Fast Food Nation. 
^ Steele, Jeffrey. Oak Brook history in caring hands society president is part of village's changing heritage". Chicago Tribune. July 29, 1998. Page 88. Retrieved on September 17, 2009.
^ Cross, Robert. Inside Hamburger Central". Chicago Tribune. January 9, 1972. G18. Retrieved on September 17, 2009.
^ "Board of Directors Biographical Information". McDonald's. Retrieved November 3, 2014. 
^ "India's 50 most trusted brands". Rediff.com. January 20, 2011. 
^ "The Big Mac index". The Economist. October 7, 2015. 
^ "The Big Mac index – Currency comparisons, to go". The Economist. July 28, 2011. Retrieved July 28, 2011. 
^ Friedman, Thomas L. (December 8, 1996). "Foreign Affairs Big Mac I". The New York Times. ISSN 0362-4331. Retrieved January 24, 2017. 
^ "The Lexus and the Olive Tree". Thomaslfriedman.com. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's quits Crimea due to fears of trade clash". INA Daily News. Retrieved April 5, 2014. 
^ "Russia Shuts 4 McDonald's Restaurants Amid Ukraine Tensions". Moscow News.Net. August 20, 2014. Retrieved August 21, 2014. 
^ "Russian Deputy PM says McDonalds is not being targeted in response to sanctions". Russia Herald. August 23, 2014. Retrieved August 23, 2014. 
^ Stanford University Press, 1998, edited by James L. Watson
^ "McDonald's deal with oil company marries China's new love of fast food, cars". Archived from the original on March 25, 2007. 
^ Samuel, Henry (October 4, 2009). "McDonald's restaurants to open at the Louvre". The Daily Telegraph. London. 
^ Gasparro, Annie; Jargon, Julie (September 5, 2012). "McDonald's to Go Vegetarian in India". The Wall Street Journal. p. B7. 
^ "10 Countries That Don't Have McDonald's". WhatCulture.com. Retrieved December 1, 2015. 
^ "VOLUNTARY ANNOUNCEMENT: ACQUISITION OF A CONTROLLING INTEREST IN MCDONALD'S MAINLAND CHINA AND HONG KONG BUSINESSES" (PDF). CITIC Limited. Hong Kong Stock Exchange. January 9, 2017. Retrieved January 13, 2017. 
^ "Fanatics Preach Fast Food Evangelism". Fox News. July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald’s is going for healthier fare and greater digitisation". The Economist. January 28, 2017. ISSN 0013-0613. Retrieved February 5, 2017. 
^ "McDonald's to remove corn syrup from buns, curbs antibiotics in chicken". August 1, 2016 – via Reuters. 
^ a b c Mohapatra, Sanjay (2012). Information Strategy Design and Practices. Google Books: Springer Science & Business Media. p. 301. ISBN 1-4614-2427-5. 
^ "McDonald's Restaurants". Caterersearch.com. Archived from the original on July 16, 2011. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDrive: il fast food comodo, facile e veloce". McDonald's Italia. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's vs Newk's Franchise Cost Comparison and Analysis". www.thefranchisemall.com. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ Duca, Lauren. "This McDonald's has a "Walk-Thru"". Teen Vogue. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's Australia". mcdonalds.com.au. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ Kieler, Ashlee. "McDonald's Ends 'Create Your Taste' Customized Burger Program". Consumerist. Retrieved December 18, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's and BP test combined operations. (McDonald's Restaurants; BP Oil Co.)". Archived from the original on January 18, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's serves up 'MCSTOP' – Its restaurant for big crowds". August 16, 1984. 
^ a b c d e "Restaurants going high tech". Yahoo Tech. June 14, 2016. Retrieved June 14, 2016. 
^ "El único Mc Donald's kosher del mundo fuera de Israel es certificado por Ajdut Kosher" (Spanish and English). Last consulted: May 22, 2011
^ "Buenos Aires Restaurants – Kosher McDonald's". travel.nytimes.com. Archived from the original on March 3, 2009. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "Big Mac with a side of quinoa? Inside the world's first McDonald's Next". edition.cnn.com. Cable News Network. Retrieved August 9, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's wants a digital-age makeover". 
^ "Mickey D's McMakeover". Archived from the original on May 24, 2006. 
^ Bruce Horovitz (May 9, 2011). "McDonald's revamps store to look more upscale". USA Today. Retrieved June 26, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's Bans Smoking at All the Sites It Owns". The New York Times. February 24, 1994. 
^ Gibson, Richard (August 12, 1999). "Want Fries With That? Ask McDonald's New E-Clerks". The Wall Street Journal.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ O'Toole, James (May 22, 2014). "Robots will replace fast-food workers". CNN Money. Retrieved August 18, 2016. 
^ Johnson, Hollis (May 16, 2016). "Fast food workers are becoming obsolete". Business Insider. Retrieved August 18, 2016. 
^ Neville, Simon (August 25, 2008). "McDonald's ties nine out of 10 workers to zero-hours contracts". The Guardian. London. Retrieved August 10, 2013. 
^ ' 'Anzalone Liszt Grove Research' ' and ' 'Fast Food Foreward' '. New York's Hidden Crime Wave: Wage Theft and New York City's Fast Food Workers
^ Maclay, Kathleen. "Fast Food, Poverty Wages: The Public Cost of Low-wage jobs in the Fast Food Industry". University of California Labor Center October 15, 2013.
^ Susanna Kim (November 21, 2013). McDonald's Defends Telling Workers to 'Quit Complaining' to Reduce Stress. ABC News. Retrieved November 21, 2013.
^ Associated Press (December 26, 2013). "McDonald's Closes Employee Website Amid Criticism". DailyDigest. Archived from the original on December 28, 2013. Retrieved December 26, 2013. 
^ Goldberg, Harmony, "How McDonald's gets away with rampant wage theft", Salon, April 6, 2015. Accessed May 22, 2015.
^ Tae-hoon, Lee (August 16, 2015). "McDonald's lures customers with illegal ads on Independence Day". The Korea Observer. Retrieved August 17, 2015. 
^ "McDonald's Hourly Pay". Glassdoor. Retrieved December 1, 2015. 
^ Beckerman, Josh. "McDonald's New CEO Gets 69% Pay Raise"[dead link], Wall Street Journal, March 3, 2015. Accessed May 22, 2015.
^ Bruce Horovitz and Yamiche Alcindor (April 15, 2015). Fast-food strikes widen into social-justice movement. USA Today. Accessed May 22, 2015.
^ a b Taylor, Kate (May 25, 2016). "McDonald's ex-CEO just revealed a terrifying reality for fast-food workers". Business Insider. Retrieved August 18, 2016. 
^ Jana Kasperkevic (March 16, 2015). McDonald's workers told to treat burns with condiments, survey shows. The Guardian. Retrieved March 17, 2015.
^ Owen, Tess (September 10, 2015). "McDonald's Is Switching to Cage-Free Eggs at a Delicate Moment for the Poultry Industry". VICE News. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ "The Insanely Complicated Logistics of Cage-Free Eggs for All". Wired. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ Gelles, David (July 16, 2016). "Eggs That Clear the Cages, but Maybe Not the Conscience". New York Times. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ Kesmodel, David (March 18, 2015). "Cage-Free Hens Study Finds Little Difference in Egg Quality". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ Strom, Stephanie (February 13, 2012). "McDonald's Set to Phase Out Suppliers' Use of Sow Crates". New York Times. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's renews as FIFA World Cup Sponsor until 2014". FIFA.com. Retrieved October 24, 2014
^ "McDonald's slogans used around the world, past and present". Retrieved June 23, 2015. 
^ William M. O'Barr, "Advertising in India." Advertising & Society Review 9#3 (2008): 1-33.
^ "Mars rover Curiosity's other mission: publicity machine". Statesman.com. December 5, 2012. Retrieved March 9, 2013. 
^ McHappy Day, Ronald McDonald House Charities. Retrieved September 12, 2010.
^ McHappy Day Retrieved November 8, 2010.
^ "Donor Turns Fast Food Into Big Bucks For Hospital". The New York Times. December 8, 1995. Retrieved May 24, 2010. 
^ "The night time 'McRefugees' of Hong Kong". BBC news. October 27, 2015. Retrieved October 10, 2016. 
^ "BBC NEWS | UK | McLibel: Longest case in English history". BBC News. Retrieved April 9, 2015. 
^ a b Associated Press (November 11, 2003). "Merriam-Webster: 'McJob' is here to stay". CNN Offbeat News. 
^ "McJob". Merriam-Webster's Online Dictionary. 1986. Retrieved November 29, 2009. 
^ "Letter from McDonald's headquarters claiming fries are vegetarian". 
^ Bluestien, Greg. "Creators Put Politics Into Video Games", The Associated Press, published January 21, 2007, accessed April 20, 2007.
^ "Do You Want Fries With That Audit?". Forbes. January 23, 2014. 
^ Sweney, Mark (April 20, 2006). "Not bad for a McJob?". The Guardian. London. Retrieved March 30, 2009. 
^ Ian Ashbridge (July 3, 2007). "McDonalds' milk goes organic – 7/3/2007 – Farmers Weekly". Fwi.co.uk. Archived from the original on May 14, 2012. Retrieved June 7, 2012. 
^ Carrigan, Marylyn and De Pelsmacker, Patrick (2009). Will ethical consumers sustain their values in the global credit crunch? International Marketing Review, 26(6), pp. 674–687,(p.7).
^ "The Truth-O-Meter : Chef Jamie Oliver praises McDonald's in England". Truth-O-Meter. Tampa Bay Times. Retrieved October 22, 2012. 
^ Ian Ashbridge (July 3, 2007). "McDonald's milk goes organic – 03/07/2007 – FarmersWeekly". Fwi.co.uk. Archived from the original on September 24, 2009. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ "McDonald's Holds down Dollar Meal, Making Menu Healthier". International Business Times. May 22, 2008. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's says all US French fries cooked in zero-trans-fat oil". www.gmanews. Archived from the original on January 14, 2011. 
^ "Report of the Corporate Responsibility Committee of the Board of Directors of McDonald's Corporation" (PDF). November 19, 2009. Archived from the original (PDF) on July 17, 2011. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's hails success of waste-to-energy trial". Businessgreen.com. April 14, 2008. Archived from the original on September 26, 2012. Retrieved April 9, 2015. 
^ "Local woman creates environmental-friendly Web site". Herald-dispatch.com. April 19, 2008. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ Vidal, John (April 26, 2008). "'Sustainable' bio-plastic can damage the environment". The Guardian. London. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's and Environmental Defense Fund Mark 20 Years of Partnerships for Sustainability". Environmental Defense Fund. November 15, 2010. Retrieved November 28, 2013. 
^ "McDonald's testing eco-friendlier coffee cups". NBC News. March 12, 2012. Retrieved November 28, 2013. 
^ "U.S. Environmental Protection Agency". Archived from the original on August 5, 2012. Retrieved April 17, 2008. 
^ "McDonald's Corporation website". Archived from the original on May 31, 2016. Retrieved April 17, 2008. 
^ Goodman, Matthew (April 5, 2009). "Big Mac, hold the CO2". The Sunday Times. London. 
^ "National Pollution Prevention Center for Higher Education" (PDF). 
^ Environmental Defense Fund. Task Force Report. p. 42.
^ Environmental Defense Fund and McDonald's Corporation. Waste Reduction Task Force Final Report. Oak Brook, IL: McDonald's, 1991. p. 22.
^ "Corporation. McDonald's Packaging – The Facts. Oak Brook, IL: McDonald's, 1990. p. 7.". 
^ BBC online news article dated September 8, 2009 News.BB.co.uk
^ "McDonald's fined for employing underage workers". ABC News Online. April 12, 2007. Archived from the original on April 18, 2007. Retrieved April 12, 2007. 
^ "98 private companies earning over $200m pay no tax: ATO". ABC News. Retrieved April 4, 2016. 
^ "McLibel: Longest case in English history". BBC news. February 15, 2005. Retrieved January 17, 2016. 
^ Do You Know the Full Story Behind the Infamous McDonald's Coffee Case and How Corporations Used it to Promote Tort Reform? Democracy Now! January 25, 2011.
^ "McDonald's: Gentechnik im Burger". Spiegel Online (in German). April 27, 2014. Retrieved December 1, 2015. 


Further reading

Evans, Stephen (April 20, 2004). "McDonald's: The journey to health". BBC News. Retrieved June 30, 2016. 
Horovitz, Bruce (May 8, 2014). "McDonald's testing seasoned fries". USA Today. Retrieved June 30, 2016. 
Love, John F. (April 1987). "Big Macs, Fries, and Real Estate". Financial Executive (4): 20–6. 
Thomas Derdak and Jay P. Pederson, ed. (2004). "McDonald's". International directory of company histories. 67 (3rd ed.). St. James Press. pp. 108–9. ISBN 978-1-55862-512-9. 
"McDonald's : Behind The Arches" by John F. Love, paperback July 1, 1995
"Grinding It Out: The Making of McDonald's" by Ray Kroc, 1977 ISBN 0809282593
"Ray & Joan: The Man Who Made the McDonald's Fortune and the Woman Who Gave It All Away" by Lisa Napoli, 2016 ISBN 1101984953
"Fast Food Nation: The Dark Side of the All-American Meal" by Eric Schlosser, 2001 ISBN 0395977894

External links

Find more aboutMcDonald'sat Wikipedia's sister projects

Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Travel guide from Wikivoyage
Learning resources from Wikiversity
Data from Wikidata



Official Website
Corporate Website



Business data for McDonald's: Google Finance
Yahoo! Finance
Reuters
SEC filings










v
t
e


McDonald's






History
Advertising

ad programs


Countries with franchises
Legal cases
Product list
International availability





People



Richard and Maurice McDonald
Ray Kroc
Joan Kroc
Ralph Alvarez
Charlie Bell
Al Bernardin
Jim Cantalupo
George Cohon
Dan Coudreaut
Steve Easterbrook
Janice L. Fields
Den Fujita
Don Gorske
Jack M. Greenberg
Eikō Harada
June Martino
Herb Peterson
Michael R. Quinlan
Ed Rensi
Willard Scott
James A. Skinner
Donald N. Smith
Harry J. Sonneborn
Don Thompson
Fred L. Turner





Company



Hamburger University
Leaps and Bounds
McBarge
McCafé
McDonald's #1 Store Museum
McDonald's (Will Rogers Turnpike)
Oldest McDonald's restaurant
Rock N Roll McDonald's
Ronald McDonald House Charities





Products




Beef



Big Mac
Big N' Tasty
Deluxe line
Kiwiburger
Quarter Pounder (McRoyal)





Chicken



Chicken McNuggets
McChicken





Other



Deli Choices
Filet-O-Fish
Georgie Pie
Happy Meal
McArabia
McGriddles
McMuffin
McRib
Premium line
Shamrock Shake





Former



Arch Deluxe
McAfrika








Advertising




Campaigns



Changeables
Global Gladiators
Golden Arches
Mac Tonight
McDonaldland
McDonald's Monopoly
McDonald's Treasure Land Adventure
M.C. Kids
McKids
Ronald McDonald
Teenie Beanies
The Wacky Adventures of Ronald McDonald





Sponsorships



Kyle Larson (NASCAR)
Jamie McMurray (NASCAR)
Graham Rahal (IndyCar Series)
McDonald's All-American Game
McDonald's Championship
McDonald's Championship (golf)
McDonald's Cycle Center
McDonald's Gospelfest
McDonald's Olympic Swim Stadium





Related



Burger wars
Donald Land
Fast food advertising
Mac and Me (1988 film)
McDonald's sign (Pine Bluff, Arkansas)
Supersize








Branches



Canada
Israel
New Zealand





Criticism



Fast Food Nation (film)
McDonaldization
McDonald's Videogame
McJob
McRefugee
McLibel
Maxime, McDuff & McDo
Super Size Me

Don't Eat This Book







Legal cases



Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants
Magee v. McDonald's
McDonald's Restaurants v. Morris & Steel
Sid & Marty Krofft Television Productions Inc. v. McDonald's Corp.





Related



McDelivery
Big Mac Index
Bill Elliott
McDonald's Young Entertainers
McWords
San Ysidro McDonald's massacre
"Seriously McDonalds"
Sydney River McDonald's murders
Taiwan McDonald's bombings
Urban legends
Boom, Like That
The Founder (2016 film)










Links to related articles











v
t
e


Components of the Dow Jones Industrial Average






3M
American Express
Apple
Boeing
Caterpillar
Chevron
Cisco Systems
Coca-Cola
Disney
DuPont
ExxonMobil
General Electric
Goldman Sachs
The Home Depot
Intel
IBM
Johnson & Johnson
JPMorgan Chase
McDonald's
Merck & Co.
Microsoft
Nike
Pfizer
Procter & Gamble
Travelers
UnitedHealth Group
United Technologies
Verizon Communications
Visa
Walmart












v
t
e


Fast food and fast casual restaurant chains in the United States






Chicken chains
Coffeehouse chains
Pizza chains





Hamburgers



A&W
Arctic Circle
Back Yard
Big Boy
Burger King
Burgerville
Carl's Jr.
Checkers/Rally's
Cook Out
Fatburger
Five Guys
Freddy's
Fuddruckers
The Habit
Hardee's
Hwy 55
In-N-Out
Jack in the Box
Johnny Rockets
Krystal
McDonald's
Red Robin
Roy Rogers
Shake Shack
Smashburger
Sonic
Steak 'n Shake
Wayback
Wendy's
Whataburger
White Castle





Asian



L&L Hawaiian Barbecue
Manchu Wok
Panda Express
Pei Wei Asian Diner
P. F. Chang's China Bistro
Pick Up Stix
Sarku





Baked goods



Au Bon Pain
Auntie Anne's
Bruegger's
Cinnabon
Corner Bakery Cafe
Dunkin' Donuts
Einstein Bros.
Great American Cookies
Honey Dew Donuts
Krispy Kreme
Mrs. Fields
Nestlé Toll House
Panera Bread
Pretzelmaker/Pretzel Time
Shipley Do-Nuts
Tim Hortons
T.J. Cinnamons
Wetzel's
Winchell's





Beverages



Argo Tea
Biggby Coffee
Caribou
Coffee Bean & Tea Leaf
Coffee Beanery
Dunn Bros
Gloria Jean's
Jamba Juice
Juice It Up!
Orange Julius
Peet's
Planet Smoothie
Robeks
Seattle's Best Coffee
Smoothie King
Starbucks
Teavana
Tropical Smoothie Cafe
Tully's





Frozen
desserts



Baskin-Robbins
Ben & Jerry's
Braum's
Bruster's
Carvel
Cold Stone
Culver's
Dairy Queen
Dippin' Dots
Fosters Freeze
Friendly's
Golden Spoon
Graeter's
Häagen-Dazs
Handel's
Kiwi Yogurt
MaggieMoo's
Marble Slab
Menchie's
Pinkberry
Red Mango
Rita's
Sweet Frog
Tastee-Freez
TCBY
Tropical Sno
Tutti Frutti
Yogen Früz
Yogurtland





Hot dogs



Hot Dog on a Stick
Nathan's Famous
Portillo's
Wienerschnitzel





Mexican-style /
Tex-Mex



Baja Fresh
Cafe Rio
Chipotle
Chronic Tacos
Del Taco
El Pollo Loco
Freebirds
Green/Red Burrito
La Salsa
Moe's
Pancheros
Qdoba
Rubio's
Taco Bell
Taco Bueno
Taco Cabana
Taco del Mar
Taco John's
Taco Mayo
Taco Time
Tijuana Flats
Wahoo's Fish Taco





Noodles



Fazoli's
Noodles & Company
Skyline Chili





Sandwiches



Arby's
Atlanta Bread
Blimpie
Capriotti's
Charley's
Così
Cousins
D'Angelo
Daphne's
Erbert & Gerbert's
Firehouse Subs
Great Wraps
Jason's
Jerry's Subs
Jersey Mike's
Jimmy John's
Lee's Sandwiches
Lenny's Sub
McAlister's Deli
Miami Subs
Mr. Hero
Newk's Eatery
Penn Station
Port of Subs
PDQ
Potbelly
Quiznos
Rax
Runza
Sandella's
Schlotzsky's
Steak Escape
Subway
Togo's
Tubby's
Tudor's Biscuit World
Which Wich?





Seafood



Arthur Treacher's
Captain D's
H. Salt Esquire
Ivar's
Long John Silver's
Skippers Seafood & Chowder House





Defunct



Bresler's Ice Cream
Brigham's
Burger Chef
Carrols
D'Lites
Druther's
Henry's Hamburgers
Hot 'n Now
Hot Sam Pretzels
Naugles
Red Barn
Sandy's
Zantigo












v
t
e


Illinois-based corporations



Fortune 500
corporations
(by size–2013)



Walgreens Boots Alliance
Archer Daniels Midland
Boeing
Caterpillar Inc.
State Farm Insurance
Abbott Laboratories
Sears Holdings
United Continental Holdings
Deere & Company
Mondelēz International
Allstate
McDonald's
Exelon
Kraft Heinz
Illinois Tool Works
Baxter International
Navistar International
RR Donnelley
CDW
Hillshire Brands
Discover Financial
W. W. Grainger
Motorola Solutions
Dover Corporation
Tenneco
Ingredion
Anixter
United Stationers
AbbVie
Old Republic International





Other major
public companies
(alphabetically)



ACCO Brands
Accretive Health
Allscripts
Amcol International Corporation
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Brunswick Corporation
Calamos
Career Education Corporation
Catamaran Corporation
CBOE Holdings
CF Industries Holdings
CME Group
CNA Financial
Equity Residential
Fortune Brands Home & Security
General Growth Properties
Hospira
Hyatt Hotels Corp.
Integrys Energy Group
Jones Lang LaSalle
Kemper Corporation
Nalco Holding Company
Nicor
Northern Trust
RLI Corp.
Rubicon Technology
Stericycle
Telephone and Data Systems
Titan International
Tribune Media
Tronc
Tootsie Roll Industries
ULTA Beauty
US Foods
USG Corporation
Westell
Zebra Technologies





Other major
private companies
(alphabetically)



Ace Hardware
Baker & McKenzie
Blue Cross Blue Shield Association
Claire's
Country Financial
Danfoss Power Solutions
Dot Foods
Eby-Brown
Electro-Motive Diesel
Flex-N-Gate
Follett Corporation
Gardner Denver
Grant Thornton LLP
Health Care Service Corporation
Heico Cos.
Hendrickson International
Hub International
Jenner & Block
Kirkland & Ellis
Marmon Group
Mayer Brown
Medline Industries
Molex
Morton Salt
Nestlé Frozen Pizza
OSI Group
Pactiv
Reyes Holdings
Ryerson, Inc.
Sidley Austin
Skidmore, Owings & Merrill
Solo Cup Company
Tellabs
TransUnion
True Value
Wirtz Corporation





Related topics



Breweries in Illinois
Companies in the Chicago metropolitan area
Food manufacturers of Chicago
Newspapers in Illinois
Wineries in Illinois












v
t
e


Food chains in the United Kingdom



Casual dining



Angus Steakhouse
Ask
Beefeater Grill
Bella Italia
Brewers Fayre
Byron Hamburgers
Café Rouge
Carluccio's
Chiquito
Damon's
Ed's Easy Diner
Frankie & Benny's
Giraffe
Gourmet Burger Kitchen
Harry Ramsden's
Harvester
Hungry Horse
La Tasca
Little Chef
Loch Fyne Restaurants
Nando's
OK Diner
Pizza Hut
PizzaExpress
Prezzo
Strada
Table Table
T.G.I. Friday's
Toby Carvery
Tony Roma's
Wagamama
Wahaca
Wildwood Kitchen
Zizzi





Fast food



Barburrito
Burger King
Chicken Cottage
Chipotle Mexican Grill
Dixy Chicken
Domino's Pizza
Five Guys
KFC
McDonald's
Morley's
Papa John's Pizza
Sam's Chicken
Southern Fried Chicken
Subway
Taco Bell
Tops Pizza
Tortilla
Wasabi
Wimpy
YO! Sushi





Baked goods



Auntie Anne's
Cinnabon
Cooplands
Ditsch
Dunkin' Donuts
Eat
Greggs
Krispy Kreme
Millie's Cookies
Patisserie Valerie
Pret a Manger
Sayers
Spudulike
Upper Crust
The West Cornwall Pasty Company





Coffee shops and tea rooms



AMT Coffee
Betty's
Caffè Nero
Caffè Ritazza
Coffee #1
Coffee Republic
Costa Coffee
Harris + Hoole
Starbucks





Dairy



Baskin-Robbins
Ben & Jerry's
Kaspa's





Pub chains



All Bar One
Chef & Brewer
O'Neill's
Scream Pubs
Slug and Lettuce
Walkabout
Wetherspoons
Yates's














Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 136891459
LCCN: n50000582
ISNI: 0000 0000 9322 4855
GND: 2084334-3
SUDOC: 029547199
BNF: cb121150481 (data)










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=McDonald%27s&oldid=791385530"					
Categories: McDonald's1940 establishments in California1955 establishments in IllinoisCompanies based in DuPage County, IllinoisCompanies in the Dow Jones Industrial AverageCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeFast-food chains of AustraliaFast-food chains of SingaporeFast-food chains of the United StatesFast-food franchisesFast-food hamburger restaurantsMultinational food companiesOak Brook, IllinoisRestaurant chains in the United StatesRestaurants established in 1940American companies established in 1940Hidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from April 2013Pages using citations with accessdate and no URLArticles with dead external links from August 2016CS1 German-language sources (de)Wikipedia indefinitely semi-protected pagesUse mdy dates from March 2017Use American English from August 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from May 2016Wikipedia articles needing clarification from January 2017Wikipedia articles needing clarification from March 2017Articles with unsourced statements from September 2015Articles with limited geographic scope from November 2015USA-centricArticles to be expanded from November 2015All articles to be expandedArticles using small message boxesArticles to be expanded from May 2014Articles with unsourced statements from April 2017NPOV disputes from July 2017All NPOV disputesArticles with peacock terms from July 2017All articles with peacock termsArticles with unsourced statements from December 2014Articles with unsourced statements from March 2015Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikinewsWikiquote 



Languages


AfrikaansالعربيةAsturianuAzərbaycancaবাংলাBân-lâm-gúБеларускаяBikol CentralБългарскиCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiΕλληνικάEspañolEsperantoEstremeñuEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisFryskGalego客家語/Hak-kâ-ngî한국어Հայերենहिन्दीHrvatskiIlokanoBahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתಕನ್ನಡКъарачай-малкъарქართულიҚазақшаKreyòl ayisyenKurdîLatinaLatviešuLietuviųLimburgsLumbaartMagyarМакедонскиമലയാളംმარგალურიمصرىBahasa MelayuBaso MinangkabauNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskOccitanਪੰਜਾਬੀPälzischپنجابیپښتوPolskiPortuguêsRomânăRumantschРусскийСаха тылаScotsSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSlovenščinaکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиBasa SundaSuomiSvenskaTagalogதமிழ்Татарча/tatarçaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаVepsän kel’Tiếng ViệtWinarayייִדיש粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 19 July 2017, at 22:46.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









McDonald's - Wikipedia




















 







McDonald's

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from MacDonalds)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other uses, see Macdonald (disambiguation).

McDonald's





Type

Public


Traded as



NYSE: MCD
DJIA Component
S&P 100 Component
S&P 500 Component





ISIN
US5801351017


Industry
Restaurants


Genre
Fast food restaurant


Founded
McDonald's:
May 15, 1940 (77 years ago)
 San Bernardino, CA
McDonald's Corporation:
April 15, 1955 (62 years ago)
 Des Plaines, IL


Founders
McDonald's:
Richard McDonald
Maurice McDonald
McDonald's Corporation:
Ray Kroc


Headquarters
 Oak Brook, Illinois, U.S.
(moving to Chicago in 2018)[1]



Number of locations

About 36,900[2] (December 31, 2016)



Area served

Worldwide



Key people




Andrew J. McKenna (Chairman)
Steve Easterbrook (President and CEO)





Products



Hamburgers
chicken
french fries
soft drinks
milkshakes
salads
desserts
coffee
breakfast





Revenue



 US$24.622 billion (2016)[2]






Operating income




 US$7.745 billion (2016)[2]






Net income




 US$4.686 billion (2016)[2]





Total assets



 US$31.024 billion (2016)[2]





Total equity



 US$2.2043 billion (2016)[2]






Number of employees

375,000 (2016)[2]


Website

corporate.mcdonalds.com/mcd.html
www.mcdonalds.com/us/en-us.html
This box:

view
talk
edit





McDonald's is an American hamburger and fast food restaurant chain. It was founded in 1940 as a barbecue restaurant operated by Richard and Maurice McDonald, in San Bernardino, California. In 1948, they reorganized their business as a hamburger stand, using production line principles. The first McDonald's franchise using the arches logo opened in Phoenix, Arizona in 1953. Businessman Ray Kroc joined the company as a franchise agent in 1955 and subsequently purchased the chain from the McDonald brothers. Based in Oak Brook, Illinois, McDonald's confirmed plans to move its global headquarters to Chicago by early 2018.[3][4]
Today, McDonald's is the world's largest restaurant chain, serving approximately 68 million customers daily in 120 countries across approximately 36,900 outlets.[5] McDonald's primarily sells hamburgers, cheeseburgers, chicken products, french fries, breakfast items, soft drinks, milkshakes, wraps, and desserts. In response to changing consumer tastes and after facing criticism for the unhealthy nature of their food,[6] the company has expanded its menu to include salads, fish, wraps, smoothies, and fruit. A McDonald's restaurant is operated by either a franchisee, an affiliate, or the corporation itself. The McDonald's Corporation revenues come from the rent, royalties, and fees paid by the franchisees, as well as sales in company-operated restaurants. According to a BBC report published in 2012, McDonald's is the world's second largest private employer (behind Walmart with 1.9 million employees), 1.5 million of whom work for franchises.



Contents


1 History
2 Corporate overview

2.1 Facts and figures
2.2 Business model
2.3 Headquarters
2.4 Board of directors
2.5 Global operations

2.5.1 Countries with McDonald's




3 Products

3.1 International menu variations


4 Restaurants

4.1 Types of restaurants

4.1.1 McDrive
4.1.2 McCafé
4.1.3 "Create Your Taste" restaurants
4.1.4 Other
4.1.5 Special diet
4.1.6 Playgrounds
4.1.7 McDonald's Next


4.2 2006 redesign
4.3 Smoking ban


5 Treatment of employees

5.1 Automation
5.2 Wages

5.2.1 Strikes


5.3 Working conditions


6 Animal welfare standards
7 Marketing and advertising

7.1 India
7.2 Space exploration
7.3 Children's advertising
7.4 Sports awards and honors


8 Charity

8.1 McHappy Day
8.2 McDonald's Monopoly donation
8.3 McRefugee


9 Criticism

9.1 Company responses to criticism
9.2 Environmental record
9.3 Legal cases

9.3.1 Asia
9.3.2 Australia
9.3.3 United Kingdom
9.3.4 United States


9.4 Use of genetically modified food


10 See also
11 References
12 Further reading
13 External links



History
Main article: History of McDonald's




McDonald's corporate logo used from November 18, 1968, to 2006. It still exists at some restaurants






The oldest operating McDonald's restaurant was the third one built, opening in 1953. It is located at 10207 Lakewood Blvd. at Florence Ave. in Downey, California (at 33°56′50″N 118°07′06″W﻿ / ﻿33.9471°N 118.1182°W﻿ / 33.9471; -118.1182).


The business began in 1940, with a restaurant opened by brothers Richard and Maurice McDonald at 1398 North E Street at West 14th Street in San Bernardino, California (at 34°07′32″N 117°17′41″W﻿ / ﻿34.1255°N 117.2946°W﻿ / 34.1255; -117.2946). Their introduction of the "Speedee Service System" in 1948 furthered the principles of the modern fast-food restaurant that the White Castle hamburger chain had already put into practice more than two decades earlier.[citation needed] The first McDonald's with the arches opened in Phoenix, Arizona in March 1953.[citation needed] The original mascot of McDonald's was a man with a chef's hat on top of a hamburger-shaped head whose name was "Speedee". In 1962, the Golden Arches replaced Speedee as the company symbol. A new mascot, Ronald McDonald, was introduced in 1965. The clown-like man having puffed out costume legs appeared in advertising aimed at children.[7]
On May 4, 1961, McDonald's first filed for a U.S. trademark on the name "McDonald's" with the description "Drive-In Restaurant Services", which continues to be renewed. On September 13, 1961, the company filed for a trademark on a new logo—an overlapping, double-arched "M" symbol. By September 6, 1962, this M-symbol was temporarily disfavored, when a trademark was filed for a single arch, which appeared over many of the early McDonald's restaurants in the early years.[clarification needed] Although the "Golden Arches" logo appeared in various forms, the present version as a letter "M" did not appear until November 18, 1968, when the company applied for a U.S. trademark.
The present corporation dates its founding to the opening of a franchised restaurant by businessman Ray Kroc in Des Plaines, Illinois on April 15, 1955, the ninth McDonald's restaurant overall; this location was demolished in 1984 after many remodels. Kroc later purchased the McDonald brothers' equity in the company and led its worldwide expansion, and the company became listed on the public stock markets ten years later. Kroc was also noted for aggressive business practices, compelling the McDonald brothers to leave the fast-food industry.
Kroc and the McDonald brothers feuded over control of the business, as documented in Kroc's autobiography. The San Bernardino restaurant was demolished in 1976 (1971, according to Juan Pollo) and the site was sold to the Juan Pollo restaurant chain. This area now serves as headquarters for the Juan Pollo chain, as well as a McDonald's and Route 66 museum.[8] With the expansion of McDonald's into many international markets, the company has become a symbol of globalization and the spread of the American way of life. Its prominence has also made it a frequent topic of public debates about obesity, corporate ethics, and consumer responsibility.
Corporate overview
Facts and figures




By 1993, McDonald's had sold more than 100 billion hamburgers. The once widespread restaurant signs that boasted the number of sales, such as this one in Harlem, were left at "99 billion" because there was space for only two digits.






The McDonald's in Northport, Alabama commemorates U.S. President Ronald Reagan's visit


McDonald's restaurants are found in 120 countries and territories around the world and serve 68 million customers each day.[9][10] McDonald's operates 36,899 restaurants worldwide, employing more than 375,000 people as of the end of 2016.[5][9] There are currently a total of 5,669 company-owned locations and 31,230 franchised locations, which includes 21,559 locations franchised to conventional franchisees, 6,300 locations licensed to developmental licensees, and 3,371 locations licensed to foreign affiliates, primarily Japan.[5]
Focusing on its core brand, McDonald's began divesting itself of other chains it had acquired during the 1990s. The company owned a majority stake in Chipotle Mexican Grill until October 2006, when McDonald's fully divested from Chipotle through a stock exchange.[11][12] Until December 2003, it also owned Donatos Pizza, and it owned a small share of Aroma Cafe from 1999 to 2001. On August 27, 2007, McDonald's sold Boston Market to Sun Capital Partners.[13]
Notably, McDonald's has increased shareholder dividends for 25 consecutive years,[14] making it one of the S&P 500 Dividend Aristocrats.[15][16] In October 2012, its monthly sales fell for the first time in nine years.[17] In 2014, its quarterly sales fell for the first time in seventeen years, when its sales dropped for the entirety of 1997.[18]
In the United States, it is reported that drive-throughs account for 70 percent of sales.[19][20] McDonald's plans to close 184 restaurants in the United States in 2015, which is 59 more than it plans to open.[21][22] This is the first time McDonald's will have a net decrease in the number of locations in the United States since 1970.[22]
Business model
The company currently owns all of its property[clarification needed] – valued at an estimated $16 to $18 billion. However, in recent times, there have been calls to spin off the company's US holdings into a potential real estate investment trust. The company earns a significant portion of its revenue from rental payments from franchisees. These rent payments rose 26 percent between 2010 and 2015, accounting for one-fifth of the company's total revenue at the end of the period.[23] The company announced at its investor conference on November 10, 2015, that it would not spin off its property into a real-estate investment trust. The CEO, Steve Easterbrook discussed that pursuing the REIT option would pose too large a risk to the company's business model.[24]




The McDonald's logo painted on the tail of a Crossair McDonnell Douglas MD-83 in 1999.


The United Kingdom and Ireland business model is different from the U.S, in that fewer than 30 percent of restaurants are franchised, with the majority under the ownership of the company. McDonald's trains its franchisees and management at Hamburger University in Oak Brook, Illinois.[25][26] In other countries, McDonald's restaurants are operated by joint ventures of McDonald's Corporation and other, local entities or governments.[27]
According to Fast Food Nation by Eric Schlosser (2001), nearly one in eight workers in the U.S. have at some time been employed by McDonald's. Employees are encouraged by McDonald's Corp. to maintain their health by singing along to their favorite songs in order to relieve stress, attending church services in order to have a lower blood pressure, and taking two vacations annually in order to reduce risk for myocardial infarction.[28] Fast Food Nation also states that McDonald's is the largest private operator of playgrounds in the U.S., as well as the single largest purchaser of beef, pork, potatoes, and apples. The selection of meats McDonald's uses varies to some extent based on the culture of the host country.[29]
Headquarters




McDonald's Plaza, located in Oak Brook, Illinois, is the headquarters of McDonald's


The McDonald's headquarters complex, McDonald's Plaza, is located in Oak Brook, Illinois. It sits on the site of the former headquarters and stabling area of Paul Butler, the founder of Oak Brook.[30] McDonald's moved into the Oak Brook facility from an office within the Chicago Loop in 1971.[31]
On June 13, 2016, McDonald's confirmed plans to move its global headquarters to Chicago's West Loop neighborhood in the Near West Side. The 608,000-square-foot structure will be built on the site of Oprah Winfrey's former Harpo Studios and open in early 2018.[3][4]
Board of directors
As of November 2014, the board of directors had the following members:[32]

Andrew J. McKenna, chairman
Susan E. Arnold, operating executive of Global Consumer & Retail Group of The Carlyle Group
Robert A. Eckert, operating partner of Friedman Fleischer & Lowe
Enrique Hernandez, Jr., president and CEO of Inter-Con Security
Jeanne P. Jackson, president of product and merchandising for Nike, Inc.
Richard H. Lenny, operating partner of Friedman Fleischer & Lowe
Walter E. Massey, president of the School of the Art Institute of Chicago
Cary D. McMillan, CEO of True Partners Consulting LLC
Sheila A. Penrose, non-executive chairman of Jones Lang LaSalle
John W. Rogers, Jr, chairman and CEO of Ariel Investments
Roger W. Stone, chairman and CEO of KapStone Paper and Packaging
Don Thompson, president and CEO
Miles D. White, chairman and CEO of Abbott Laboratories

On March 1, 2015, after being chief brand officer of McDonald's and its former head in the UK and northern Europe, Steve Easterbrook became CEO, succeeding Don Thompson, who stepped down on January 28, 2015.
Global operations
See also: List of countries with McDonald's restaurants and International availability of McDonald's products




Countries with McDonald's restaurants, showing their first year with its first restaurant






McDonald's on Nathan Road, Kowloon, Hong Kong.


McDonald's has become emblematic of globalization, sometimes referred to as the "McDonaldization" of society. The Economist newspaper uses the "Big Mac Index": the comparison of a Big Mac's cost in various world currencies can be used to informally judge these currencies' purchasing power parity. Switzerland has the most expensive Big Mac in the world as of July 2015, while the country with the least expensive Big Mac is India[33][34] (albeit for a Maharaja Mac—the next cheapest Big Mac is Hong Kong).[35]




McDonald's, Paulista Avenue, São Paulo, Brazil


Thomas Friedman once said that no country with a McDonald's had gone to war with another.[36][37] However, the "Golden Arches Theory of Conflict Prevention" is not strictly true. Exceptions are the 1989 United States invasion of Panama, NATO's bombing of Serbia in 1999, the 2006 Lebanon War, and the 2008 South Ossetia war. McDonald's suspended operations in its corporate-owned stores in Crimea after Russia annexed the region in 2014.[38] On August 20, 2014, as tensions between the United States and Russia strained over events in Ukraine, and the resultant U.S. sanctions, the Russian government temporarily shut down four McDonald's outlets in Moscow, citing sanitary concerns. The company has operated in Russia since 1990 and at August 2014 had 438 stores across the country.[39] On August 23, 2014, Russian Deputy Prime Minister Arkady Dvorkovich ruled out any government move to ban McDonald's and dismissed the notion that the temporary closures had anything to do with the sanctions.[40]




McDonald's, Old Mahabalipuram Road, Chennai, India


Some observers have suggested that the company should be given credit for increasing the standard of service in markets that it enters. A group of anthropologists in a study entitled Golden Arches East[41] looked at the impact McDonald's had on East Asia and Hong Kong, in particular. When it opened in Hong Kong in 1975, McDonald's was the first restaurant to consistently offer clean restrooms, driving customers to demand the same of other restaurants and institutions. McDonald's has taken to partnering up with Sinopec, the second largest oil company in the People's Republic of China, as it takes advantage of the country's growing use of personal vehicles by opening numerous drive-thru restaurants.[42] McDonald's has opened a McDonald's restaurant and McCafé on the underground premises of the French fine arts museum, The Louvre.[43]
The company stated it would open vegetarian-only restaurants in India by mid-2013.[44] Foreign restaurants are banned in Bermuda, with the exception of KFC, which was present before the current law was passed. Therefore, there are no McDonald's in Bermuda.[45]
On January 9, 2017, 80% of the franchise rights in the mainland China and in Hong Kong were sold for US$2.080 billion to a consortium of CITIC Limited (for 32%) and private equity funds managed by CITIC Capital (for 20%) and Carlyle (for 20%), which CITIC Limited and CITIC Capital would also formed a joint venture to own the stake.[46]
Countries with McDonald's

Africa


 Egypt
 Mauritius
 Mayotte
 Morocco
 Reunion
 South Africa
 Tunisia





Asia


 Azerbaijan
 Bahrain
 Brunei
 China

 Hong Kong
 Macau


 Cyprus
 Georgia
 India
 Indonesia
 Israel
 Japan
 Jordan
 Kazakhstan
 Kuwait
 Lebanon
 Malaysia
 Oman
 Pakistan
 Philippines
 Qatar
 Saudi Arabia
 Singapore
 South Korea
 Sri Lanka
 Taiwan
 Thailand
 Turkey
 United Arab Emirates
 Vietnam





Europe


 Andorra
 Austria
 Belarus
 Belgium
 Bosnia and Herzegovina
 Bulgaria
 Croatia
 Czech Republic
 Denmark
 Estonia
 Finland
 France
 Germany
 Greece
 Hungary
 Ireland
 Italy
 Latvia
 Liechtenstein
 Lithuania
 Luxembourg
 Malta
 Moldova
 Monaco
 Netherlands
 Norway
 Poland
 Portugal
 Romania
 Russia
 San Marino
 Serbia
 Slovakia
 Slovenia
 Spain
 Sweden
  Switzerland
 Ukraine
 United Kingdom

 Isle of Man
 Jersey







North America


 Aruba
 Bahamas
 Canada
 Costa Rica
 Cuba

 Guantanamo Bay Naval Base


 Curaçao
 Dominican Republic
 El Salvador
 Guadeloupe
 Guatemala
 Honduras
 Martinique
 Nicaragua
 Panama
 Sint Maarten
 Trinidad & Tobago
 Mexico
 United States

 Puerto Rico
 U.S. Virgin Islands







Oceania


 American Samoa
 Australia
 Fiji
 French Polynesia
 Guam
 New Caledonia
 New Zealand
 Northern Marianas
 Samoa





South America


 Argentina
 Brazil
 Chile
 Colombia
 Ecuador
 French Guiana
 Guyana
 Paraguay
 Peru
 Suriname
 Uruguay
 Venezuela




Products
Main article: List of McDonald's products




A typical "eat-in" McDonald's meal as sold in Hong Kong, consisting of French fries, a soft drink, and a "main product" - in this case, a McSpicy Chicken Fillet. Condiments are supplied in small packets; such a packet of tomato ketchup is seen in the foreground.


McDonald's predominantly sells hamburgers, various types of chicken, chicken sandwiches, French fries, soft drinks, breakfast items, and desserts. In most markets, McDonald's offers salads and vegetarian items, wraps and other localized fare. On a seasonal basis, McDonald's offers the McRib sandwich. Some speculate the seasonality of the McRib adds to its appeal.[47]
Products are offered as either "eat-in" (where the customer opts to eat in the restaurant) or "take-out" (where the customer opts to take the food for consumption off the premises). "Eat-in" meals are provided on a plastic tray with a paper insert on the floor of the tray. "Take-out" meals are usually delivered with the contents enclosed in a distinctive McDonald's-branded brown paper bag. In both cases, the individual items are wrapped or boxed as appropriate.
Since Steve Easterbrook became CEO of the company, McDonald's has streamlined the menu which in the United States contained nearly 200 items. The company has also looked to introduce healthier options, and removed high-fructose corn syrup from hamburger buns. The company has also removed artificial preservatives from Chicken McNuggets[48], replacing chicken skin, safflower oil and citric acid found in Chicken McNuggets with pea starch, rice starch and powdered lemon juice. [49]
International menu variations
See also: McDonald's products (international)




A McDonald's Ebi Feast meal sold at branches in Singapore, November 2013. McDonald's is known for tailoring its menus in different markets to cater to local tastes


Restaurants in several countries, particularly in Asia, serve soup. This local deviation from the standard menu is a characteristic for which the chain is particularly known, and one which is employed either to abide by regional food taboos (such as the religious prohibition of beef consumption in India) or to make available foods with which the regional market is more familiar (such as the sale of McRice in Indonesia, or Ebi (prawn) Burger in Singapore and Japan).
In Germany and some other Western European countries, McDonald's sells beer. In New Zealand, McDonald's sells meat pies, after the local affiliate partially relaunched the Georgie Pie fast food chain it bought out in 1996.
In the United States, after limited trials on a regional basis, McDonald's plans to offer an all-day breakfast menu whenever its restaurants are open, although eggs cannot be cooked at the same time on the same equipment as hamburgers due to different temperature requirements.[citation needed]
Restaurants





The examples and perspective in this section deal primarily with the United States and do not represent a worldwide view of the subject. You may improve this article, discuss the issue on the talk page, or create a new article, as appropriate. (November 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Types of restaurants




Counter service in a McDonald's restaurant in Dukhan, Qatar


Most standalone McDonald's restaurants offer both counter service and drive-through service, with indoor and sometimes outdoor seating.[50] Drive-Thru, Auto-Mac, Pay and Drive, or "McDrive" as it is known in many countries, often has separate stations for placing, paying for, and picking up orders, though the latter two steps are frequently combined;[50] it was first introduced in Arizona in 1975, following the lead of other fast-food chains. The first such restaurant in Britain opened at Fallowfield, Manchester in 1986.[51]
McDrive
In some countries, "McDrive" locations near highways offer no counter service or seating.[52] In contrast, locations in high-density city neighborhoods often omit drive-through service.[53] There are also a few locations, located mostly in downtown districts, that offer a "Walk-Thru" service in place of Drive-Thru.[54]
McCafé
Main article: McCafé




A Montevideo McCafé


McCafé is a café-style accompaniment to McDonald's restaurants and is a concept created by McDonald's Australia (also known, and marketed, as "Macca's" in Australia), starting with Melbourne in 1993.[55] As of 2016, most McDonald's in Australia have McCafés located within the existing McDonald's restaurant. In Tasmania, there are McCafés in every restaurant, with the rest of the states quickly following suit.[50] After upgrading to the new McCafé look and feel, some Australian restaurants have noticed up to a 60 percent increase in sales. At the end of 2003, there were over 600 McCafés worldwide.
"Create Your Taste" restaurants
From 2015–2016, McDonald's tried a new gourmet burger service/restaurant concept based on other gourmet restaurants such as Shake Shack and Grill'd. It was rolled out for the first time in Australia during the early months of 2015 and expanded to China, Hong Kong, Singapore, Arabia and New Zealand, with ongoing trials in the US market. In dedicated "Create Your Taste" (CYT) kiosks, customers could choose all ingredients including type of bun and meat along with optional extras. In late 2015 the Australian CYT service introduced CYT salads.
After a person had ordered, McDonald's advised that wait times were between 10–15 minutes. When the food was ready, trained crew ('hosts') brought the food to the customer's table. Instead of McDonald's usual cardboard and plastic packaging, CYT food was presented on wooden boards, fries in wire baskets and salads in china bowls with metal cutlery. A higher price applied.
In November 2016, Create Your Taste was replaced by a "Signature Crafted Recipes" program designed to be more efficient and less expensive.[56]
Other
Some locations are connected to gas stations/convenience stores,[57] while others called McExpress have limited seating and/or menu or may be located in a shopping mall. Other McDonald's are located in Walmart stores. McStop is a location targeted at truckers and travelers which may have services found at truck stops.[58]
In Sweden, customers who order a happy meal can use the meal's container for a pair of happy goggles.[59] The company created a game for the goggles known as "Slope Stars.[59]" McDonald's predicts happy goggles will continue in other countries.[59] In the Netherlands, McDonald's has introduced McTrax that doubles as a recording studio; it reacts to touch.[59] They can create their own beats with a synth and tweak sounds with special effects.[59]
Special diet




A kosher Express McDonald's outlet in the Malha Mall in Jerusalem





This section needs expansion with: Details of other McDonald's restaurants where special dietry requirements are catered for. You can help by adding to it. (November 2015)


The first kosher McDonald's was established in 1997 at the Abasto de Buenos Aires mall in Buenos Aires, Argentina. This is in addition to many kosher branches in Israel.[60][61]
Playgrounds




A McDonald's in Panorama City, Los Angeles, California with a Playplace designed to promote a family-friendly image





This section needs expansion. You can help by adding to it. (May 2014)


McDonald's playgrounds are called McDonald's PlayPlace. Some McDonald's in suburban areas and certain cities feature large indoor or outdoor playgrounds. The first PlayPlace with the familiar crawl-tube design with ball pits and slides was introduced in 1987 in the US, with many more being constructed soon after.
McDonald's Next




McDonald's Next in Admiralty, Hong Kong


McDonald's Next use open-concept design and offer "Create Your Taste" digital ordering. The concept store also offering free mobile device charging and table service after 6:00 pm. The first store open in Hong Kong in December 2015.[62]
2006 redesign




An American McDonald's in Mount Pleasant, Iowa in June 2008; this is an example of the "new" look of American McDonald's restaurants


In 2006, McDonald's introduced its "Forever Young" brand by redesigning all of its restaurants, the first major redesign since the 1970s.[63][64]
The goal of the redesign is to be more like a coffee shop, similar to Starbucks. The design includes wooden tables, faux-leather chairs, and muted colors; the red was muted to terracotta, the yellow was shifted to golden for a more "sunny" look, and olive and sage green were also added.
To create a warmer look, the restaurants have less plastic and more brick and wood, with modern hanging lights to produce a softer glow. Many restaurants now feature free Wi-Fi and flat-screen TVs. Other upgrades include double drive-thrus, flat roofs instead of the angled red roofs, and replacing fiber glass with wood. Also, instead of the familiar golden arches, the restaurants now feature "semi-swooshes" (half of a golden arch), similar to the Nike swoosh.[65]
Smoking ban
McDonald's began banning smoking in 1994 when it banned smoking within its 1,400 wholly owned restaurants.[66]
Treatment of employees




A McDonald's employee takes an order in the Philippines


Automation
Since the late 1990s, McDonald's has attempted to replace employees with electronic kiosks which would perform actions such taking orders and accepting money. In 1999, McDonald's first tested "E-Clerks" in suburban Chicago, Illinois, and Wyoming, Michigan, with the devices being able to "save money on live staffers" and attracting larger purchase amounts than average employees.[67]
In 2013, the University of Oxford estimated that in the succeeding decades, there was a 92% probability of food preparation and serving to become automated in fast food establishments.[68] By 2016, McDonald's "Create Your Taste" electronic kiosks were seen in some restaurants internationally where customers could custom order meals. As employees pushed for higher wages in the late-2010s, some believed that fast food companies such as McDonald's would use the devices to cut costs for employing individuals.[69]
Wages
On August 5, 2013, The Guardian revealed that 90 percent of McDonald's UK workforce are on zero hour contracts, making it possibly the largest such private sector employer in the country.[70] A study released by Fast Food Forward conducted by Anzalone Liszt Grove Research showed that approximately 84 percent of all fast food employees working in New York City in April 2013 had been paid less than their legal wages by their employers.[71]
From 2007 to 2011, fast food workers in the US drew an average of $7 billion of public assistance annually resulting from receiving low wages.[72] The McResource website advised employees to break their food into smaller pieces to feel fuller, seek refunds for unopened holiday purchases, sell possessions online for quick cash, and to "quit complaining" as "stress hormone levels rise by 15 percent after ten minutes of complaining."[73] In December 2013, McDonald's shut down the McResource website amidst negative publicity and criticism. McDonald's plans to continue an internal telephone help line through which its employees can obtain advice on work and life problems.[74]
Liberal thinktank the Roosevelt Institute accuses some McDonald's restaurants of actually paying less than the minimum wage to entry positions due to 'rampant' wage theft.[75] In South Korea, McDonald's pays part-time employees $5.50 an hour and is accused of paying less with arbitrary schedules adjustments and pay delays.[76] In late 2015, Anonymous aggregated data collected by Glassdoor suggests that McDonald's in the United States pays entry-level employees between $7.25 an hour and $11 an hour, with an average of $8.69 an hour. Shift managers get paid an average of $10.34 an hour. Assistant managers get paid an average of $11.57 an hour.[77] McDonald's CEO, Steve Easterbrook, currently earns an annual salary of $1,100,000.[78]
Strikes
See also: Fast food worker strikes




Fast food workers on strike outside of a McDonald's in St. Paul, Minnesota.


McDonald's workers have on occasions decided to strike over pay, with most of the employees on strike seeking to be paid $15.00.[79] When interviewed about the strikes occurring, former McDonald's CEO Ed Rensi stated: "It's cheaper to buy a $35,000 robotic arm than it is to hire an employee who's inefficient making $15 an hour bagging french fries" with Rensi explaining that increasing employee wages could possibly take away from entry-level jobs.[80] However, according to current McDonald's CEO Steve Easterbrook, increasing wages and benefits for workers saw a 6% increase in customer satisfaction when comparing 2015's first quarter data to the first quarter of 2016, with greater returns seen as a result.[80]
Working conditions
In March 2015, McDonald's workers in 19 US cities filed 28 health and safety complaints with OSHA which allege that low staffing, lack of protective gear, poor training and pressure to work fast has resulted in injuries. The complaints also allege that, because of a lack of first aid supplies, workers were told by management to treat burn injuries with condiments such as mayonnaise and mustard. The Fight for $15 labor organization aided the workers in filing the complaints.[81]
Animal welfare standards
In 2015, McDonald's pledged to stop using eggs from battery cage facilities by 2025. Since McDonald's purchases over 2 billion eggs per year or 4 percent of eggs produced in the United States, the switch is expected to have a major impact on the egg industry and is part of a general trend toward cage-free eggs driven by consumer concern over the harsh living conditions of hens.[82][83] The aviary systems from which the new eggs will be sourced are troubled by much higher mortality rates, as well as introducing environmental and worker safety problems.[84] The high hen mortality rate, which is more than double that of battery cage systems, will require new research to mitigate. The facilities also have higher ammonia levels due to faeces being kicked up into the air. Producers raised concerns about the production cost, which is expected to increase by 36 percent.[85]
McDonald's continues to source pork from facilities that use gestation crates, and in 2012 pledged to phase them out.[86]
Marketing and advertising
Main article: McDonald's advertising
McDonald's has for decades maintained an extensive advertising campaign. In addition to the usual media (television, radio, and newspaper), the company makes significant use of billboards and signage, sponsors sporting events ranging from Little League to the FIFA World Cup and Olympic Games.[87] Television has played a central role in the company's advertising strategy.[citation needed] To date, McDonald's has used 23 different slogans in United States advertising, as well as a few other slogans for select countries and regions.[88]
India





The neutrality of this section is disputed. Relevant discussion may be found on the talk page. Please do not remove this message until conditions to do so are met. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article contains wording that promotes the subject in a subjective manner without imparting real information. Please remove or replace such wording and instead of making proclamations about a subject's importance, use facts and attribution to demonstrate that importance. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


McDonald's began operations in India in 1996. It retained Leo Burnett (India) to provide authentic Indian insights regarding local favorite items, religious-based food taboos, and India's strong vegetarian tradition. Hamburgers are made of lamb or chicken, instead of beef. Local favorite foods are adapted into menu items such as McAloo Tikki, a breaded potato pancake on a bun. To assure vegetarian customers, kitchens are divided into vegetarian and non-vegetarian zones. Advertising tells Indians that McDonald's bright, inviting restaurants do not mean high prices; profit strategy uses low prices to generate high volume sales. Locally McDonald's of India sponsored sports programs and donations to visible charities.[89]
Space exploration
McDonald's and NASA explored an advertising agreement for a planned mission to the asteroid 449 Hamburga; however, the spacecraft was eventually cancelled.[90]
Children's advertising
Main articles: Ronald McDonald and McDonaldland
Sports awards and honors
See also: Category:McDonald's High School All-Americans
McDonald's is the title sponsor of the McDonald's All-American Game, all-star basketball games played each year for American and Canadian boys' and girls' high school basketball graduates
Charity
See also: Ronald McDonald House Charities
McHappy Day




A Ronald McDonald House collection box in Framingham, Massachusetts


McHappy Day is an annual event at McDonald's, where a percentage of the day's sales go to charity. It is the signature fundraising event for Ronald McDonald House Charities.[91]
In 2007, it was celebrated in 17 countries: Argentina, Australia, Austria, Brazil, Canada, the United States, Finland, France, Guatemala, Hungary, England, Ireland, New Zealand, Norway, Sweden, Switzerland, and Uruguay.
According to the Australian McHappy Day website, McHappy Day raised $20.4 million in 2009. The goal for 2010 was $20.8 million.[92]
McDonald's Monopoly donation
In 1995, St. Jude Children's Research Hospital received an anonymous letter postmarked in Dallas, Texas, containing a $1 million winning McDonald's Monopoly game piece. McDonald's officials came to the hospital, accompanied by a representative from the accounting firm Arthur Andersen, who examined the card under a jeweler's eyepiece, handled it with plastic gloves, and verified it as a winner.[93] Although game rules prohibited the transfer of prizes, McDonald's waived the rule and has made the annual $50,000 annuity payments, even after learning that the piece was sent by an individual involved in an embezzlement scheme intended to defraud McDonald's (see McDonald's Monopoly).
McRefugee
See also: McRefugee
McRefugees are poor people in Hong Kong, Japan, and China who use McDonald's 24-hour restaurants as a temporary hostel. One in five of Hong Kong's population lives below the poverty line. The rise of McRefugees was first documented by photographer Suraj Katra in 2013.[94]
Criticism




A PETA activist dressed as a chicken confronts the manager of the Times Square McDonald's over the company's animal welfare standards


In 1990, activists from a small group known as London Greenpeace (no connection to the international group Greenpeace) distributed leaflets entitled What's wrong with McDonald's?, criticizing its environmental, health, and labor record. The corporation wrote to the group demanding they desist and apologize, and, when two of the activists refused to back down, sued them for libel in one of the longest cases in British civil law. A documentary film of the McLibel Trial has been shown in several countries.[95]
In the late 1980s, Phil Sokolof, a millionaire businessman who had suffered a heart attack at the age of 43, took out full-page newspaper ads in New York, Chicago, and other large cities accusing McDonald's menu of being a threat to American health, and asking them to stop using beef tallow to cook their french fries.[citation needed]
Despite the objections of McDonald's, the term "McJob" was added to Merriam-Webster's Collegiate Dictionary in 2003.[96] The term was defined as "a low-paying job that requires little skill and provides little opportunity for advancement".[97]
In 2001, Eric Schlosser's book Fast Food Nation included criticism of the business practices of McDonald's. Among the critiques were allegations that McDonald's (along with other companies within the fast food industry) uses its political influence to increase its profits at the expense of people's health and the social conditions of its workers. The book also brought into question McDonald's advertisement techniques in which it targets children. While the book did mention other fast-food chains, it focused primarily on McDonald's.
In 2002, vegetarian groups, largely Hindu and Buddhist, successfully sued McDonald's for misrepresenting its French fries as vegetarian, when they contained beef broth.[98]
Morgan Spurlock's 2004 documentary film Super Size Me claimed that McDonald's food was contributing to the increase of obesity in society and that the company was failing to provide nutritional information about its food for its customers. Six weeks after the film premiered, McDonald's announced that it was eliminating the super size option, and was creating the adult Happy Meal.




Screenshot from McDonald's Videogame


In 2006, an unsanctioned McDonald's Videogame was released online. It is parody of the business practices of the corporate giant, taking the guise of a tycoon style business simulation game. In the game, the player plays the role of a McDonald's CEO, choosing whether or not to use controversial practices like genetically altered cow feed, plowing over rainforests, and corrupting public officials. McDonald's issued a statement distancing itself from the game.[99]
In January 2014, it was reported that McDonald's was accused of having used a series of tax maneuvers to avoid taxes in France. The company confirmed that tax authorities had visited McDonald's French headquarters in Paris but insisted that it had not done anything wrong, saying, "McDonald's firmly denies the accusation made by L'Express according to which McDonald's supposedly hid part of its revenue from taxes in France."[100]
Company responses to criticism




Discreet shopfront in historic Stratford-upon-Avon


In response to public pressure, McDonald's has sought to include more healthy choices in its menu and has introduced a new slogan to its recruitment posters: "Not bad for a McJob".[101] The word McJob, first attested in the mid-1980s[96] and later popularized by Canadian novelist Douglas Coupland in his book Generation X, has become a buzz word for low-paid, unskilled work with few prospects or benefits and little security. McDonald's disputes this definition of McJob. In 2007, the company launched an advertising campaign with the slogan "Would you like a career with that?" on Irish television, asserting that its jobs have good prospects.
In an effort to respond to growing consumer awareness of food provenance, the fast-food chain changed its supplier of both coffee beans and milk. UK chief executive Steve Easterbrook said: "British consumers are increasingly interested in the quality, sourcing, and ethics of the food and drink they buy".[102] In a bid to tap into the ethical consumer market,[103] McDonald's switched to using coffee beans taken from stocks that are certified by the Rainforest Alliance, a conservation group. Additionally, in response to pressure, McDonald's UK started using organic milk supplies for its bottled milk and hot drinks, although it still uses conventional milk in its milkshakes, and in all of its dairy products in the United States.[104] According to a report published by Farmers Weekly in 2007, the quantity of milk used by McDonald's could have accounted for as much as 5 percent of the UK's organic milk output.[105]
McDonald's announced on May 22, 2008, that, in the United States and Canada, it would switch to using cooking oil that contains no trans fats for its french fries, and canola-based oil with corn and soy oils, for its baked items, pies and cookies, by year's end.[106][107]
With regard to acquiring chickens from suppliers who use CAK/CAS methods of slaughter, McDonald's says that it needs to see more research "to help determine whether any CAS system in current use is optimal from an animal welfare perspective."[108]
Environmental record
In April 2008, McDonald's announced that 11 of its Sheffield, England restaurants have been engaged in a biomass trial that had cut its waste and carbon footprint by half in the area. In this trial, wastes from the restaurants were collected by Veolia Environmental Services and were used to produce energy at a power plant. McDonald's plans to expand this project, although the lack of biomass power plants in the United States will prevent this plan from becoming a national standard anytime soon.[109] In addition, in Europe, McDonald's has been recycling vegetable grease by converting it to fuel for its diesel trucks.[110]
McDonald's has been using a corn-based bioplastic to produce containers for some of its products. The environmental benefits of this technology are controversial, with critics noting that biodegradation is slow, produces greenhouse gases and that contamination of traditional plastic waste streams with bioplastics can complicate recycling efforts.[111]
In 1990, McDonald's worked with the Environmental Defense Fund to stop using "clam shell" shaped styrofoam food containers to house its food products.[112] 20 years later, McDonald's announced they would try replacing styrofoam coffee cups with an alternative material.[113]
The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency has recognized McDonald's continuous effort to reduce solid waste by designing more efficient packaging and by promoting the use of recycled-content materials.[114] McDonald's reports that it is committed towards environmental leadership by effectively managing electric energy, by conserving natural resources through recycling and reusing materials, and by addressing water management issues within the restaurant.[115]
In an effort to reduce energy usage by 25 percent in its restaurants, McDonald's opened a prototype restaurant in Chicago in 2009 with the intention of using the model in its other restaurants throughout the world. Building on past efforts, specifically a restaurant it opened in Sweden in 2000 that was the first to intentionally incorporate green ideas, McDonald's designed the Chicago site to save energy by incorporating old and new ideas such as managing storm water, using skylights for more natural lighting and installing some partitions and tabletops made from recycled goods.[116]
When McDonald's received criticism for its environmental policies in the 1970s, it began to make substantial progress in reducing its use of materials.[117] For instance, an "average meal" in the 1970s—a Big Mac, fries, and a drink—required 46 grams of packaging; today, it requires only 25 grams, allowing a 46 percent reduction.[118] In addition, McDonald's eliminated the need for intermediate containers for cola by having a delivery system that pumps syrup directly from the delivery truck into storage containers, saving two million pounds (910 tonnes) of packaging annually.[119] Overall, weight reductions in packaging and products, as well as the increased usage of bulk packaging ultimately decreased packaging by twenty-four million pounds (11,000 tonnes) annually.[120]
Legal cases
Main article: McDonald's legal cases
McDonald's has been involved in a number of lawsuits and other legal cases, most of which involved trademark disputes. The company has threatened many food businesses with legal action unless it drops the Mc or Mac from trading names.
Asia
On September 8, 2009, McDonald's Malaysian operations lost a lawsuit to prevent another restaurant calling itself McCurry. McDonald's lost in an appeal to Malaysia's highest court, the Federal Court.[121]
Australia
In April 2007, in Perth, Western Australia, McDonald's pleaded guilty to five charges relating to the employment of children under 15 in one of its outlets and was fined A$8,000.[122]
In 2016, the Australian Taxation Office revealed that McDonald's Asia-Pacific Consortium had generated $478 million in revenue in 2013–14, but had paid no tax on those earnings whatsoever.[123]
United Kingdom
McDonald's has defended itself in several cases involving workers' rights.[citation needed]
The longest running legal action of all time in the UK was the McLibel case against 2 defendants who criticized a number of aspects of the company. The trial lasted 10 years and called 130 witnesses. The European Court of Human Rights deemed that the unequal resources of the litigants breached the defendants rights to freedom of speech and biased the trial. The result was widely seen as a "PR disaster."[124]
United States
A famous legal case in the US involving McDonald's was the 1994 decision in Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants where Stella Liebeck was awarded several million dollars after she suffered third-degree burns after spilling a scalding cup of McDonald's coffee on herself.[125]
Use of genetically modified food
In April 2014, it was reported that McDonald's will use, in Europe, chicken meat that was produced by using genetically modified animal feed. Greenpeace argues that McDonald's saves less than one Eurocent for each chicken burger and goes down a path not desired by its customers.[126]
See also





Book: McDonald's





Arcos Dorados Holdings
Burger King—the second largest burger chain
List of hamburger restaurants
List of restaurant chains
The Founder—a 2016 film detailing the creation and controversial business history of McDonald's, that is also a biopic of Ray Kroc
MaDonal—a restaurant operating in northern Iraq that copies many features of McDonald's, illicitly
Maxime, McDuff & McDo-documentary film about the unionizing of a McDonald's in Montreal, Quebec, Canada
Wendy's—the third largest hamburger chain



Food portal
Companies portal
Chicago portal
Illinois portal


References


^ Bomkamp, Samantha (June 13, 2016). "Mcdonald's HQ Move Is Boldest Step Yet in Effort to Transform Itself". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved May 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e f g "Form 10-K: McDonald's Corporation (McDonald's Corporation 2016 Annual Report)" (PDF). United States Securities and Exchange Commission. Commission File Number 1-5231. Retrieved May 1, 2017. 
^ a b "McDonald's future Near West Side neighbors air parking, traffic safety beefs". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved August 7, 2016. 
^ a b Hufford, Austen (June 14, 2016). "McDonald’s to Move Headquarters to Downtown Chicago". Retrieved August 7, 2016 – via Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c http://d18rn0p25nwr6d.cloudfront.net/CIK-0000063908/62200c2b-da82-4364-be92-79ed454e3b88.pdf
^ Robbins, John (October 8, 2010). "How Bad Is McDonald's Food?". Huffington Post. 
^ "The McDonalds and Their Restaurant". www.referenceforbusiness.com. Retrieved January 16, 2017. In 1962, McDonald's golden arches replaced Speedee as the restaurant's main symbol, and ads told customers to "Look for the golden arches." ... Kroc believed in advertising heavily and in targeting children. In 1965, the company introduced a new mascot, a red-haired clown named Ronald McDonald, who became a frequent and friendly face in television commercials. 
^ "McDonalds Museum". Juan Pollo. Retrieved May 14, 2012. 
^ a b McDonald's – The Leading Global Food Service Retailer :: AboutMcDonalds.com, retrieved May 8, 2008
^ "McDonald's Momentum Delivers Another Year of Strong Results for 2011". Yahoo Finance. 2012. Retrieved January 25, 2012. [dead link]
^ Brand, Rachel (December 23, 2006). "Chipotle founder had big dreams". Rocky Mountain News. Archived from the original on July 8, 2009. Retrieved April 27, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's sets October deadline to sell Chipotle stock". Denver Business Journal. BizJournals.com. July 25, 2006. Retrieved August 10, 2009. 
^ "McDonald's Wraps Up Boston Market Sale". Dow Jones & Company, Inc. News Services. August 27, 2007. Archived from the original on September 28, 2007. Retrieved August 28, 2007. 
^ Baertlein, Lisa (September 24, 2009). "McDonald's raises cash dividend by 10%". reuters.com. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ "Definition of S&P 500 Aristocrat at Investopedia". Investopedia.com. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ "List of 2009 Dividend Aristocrats via Seeking Alpha, retrieved 10/1/2009". Seekingalpha.com. December 23, 2008. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ Tiffany Hsu (November 9, 2012). "McDonald's monthly sales fall for first time in nine years". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved March 9, 2013. 
^ "McDonald's New Turnaround Plan Is So 1990s". 
^ Baertlein, Lisa (March 14, 2017). "McDonald's, late to mobile ordering, seeks to avoid pitfalls". Reuters. Retrieved March 15, 2017. 
^ Patton, Leslie (November 23, 2015). "McDonald's Knows You're Sick of Screw-Ups at Drive-Thru Windows". Bloomberg. Retrieved March 15, 2017. 
^ Ferdman, Roberto A. (August 13, 2015). "This is a terrible sign for McDonald's". The Washington Post. 
^ a b "McDonald's to Cut U.S. Stores for First Time in Decades". The New York Times. Associated Press. June 18, 2015. 
^ LUBLIN, JOANN S.; JARGON, JULIE (October 15, 2015). "McDonald’s Nears Decision on Real Estate". Retrieved October 22, 2015. 
^ Jargon, Julie. "McDonald's Won't Spin Off Real Estate Holdings". Wall Street Journal. ISSN 0099-9660. Retrieved November 11, 2015. 
^ "Hamburger University Campus". mcdonalds.com. Retrieved January 18, 2017. 
^ "Hamburger University - Our Facility". 
^ "McDonald’s Business Model and Strategy :: McDonald’s". corporate.mcdonalds.com. Retrieved January 24, 2017. 
^ Eidelson, Josh (November 19, 2013). "McDonald's tells workers to "sing away stress," "chew away cares" and go to church". Salon. Retrieved August 21, 2014. These and other tips appear on a "McResource Line" website created by the McDonald's Corp. to advise workers on stress, health and personal finances. Among the tips that appear on the site: "Chewing gum can reduce cortisol levels by 16%"; "At least two vacations a year can cut heart attack risk by 50%"; "Singing along to your favorite songs can lower your blood pressure"; and "People who attend more church services tend to have lower blood pressure." 
^ Schlosser, Eric. Fast Food Nation. 
^ Steele, Jeffrey. Oak Brook history in caring hands society president is part of village's changing heritage". Chicago Tribune. July 29, 1998. Page 88. Retrieved on September 17, 2009.
^ Cross, Robert. Inside Hamburger Central". Chicago Tribune. January 9, 1972. G18. Retrieved on September 17, 2009.
^ "Board of Directors Biographical Information". McDonald's. Retrieved November 3, 2014. 
^ "India's 50 most trusted brands". Rediff.com. January 20, 2011. 
^ "The Big Mac index". The Economist. October 7, 2015. 
^ "The Big Mac index – Currency comparisons, to go". The Economist. July 28, 2011. Retrieved July 28, 2011. 
^ Friedman, Thomas L. (December 8, 1996). "Foreign Affairs Big Mac I". The New York Times. ISSN 0362-4331. Retrieved January 24, 2017. 
^ "The Lexus and the Olive Tree". Thomaslfriedman.com. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's quits Crimea due to fears of trade clash". INA Daily News. Retrieved April 5, 2014. 
^ "Russia Shuts 4 McDonald's Restaurants Amid Ukraine Tensions". Moscow News.Net. August 20, 2014. Retrieved August 21, 2014. 
^ "Russian Deputy PM says McDonalds is not being targeted in response to sanctions". Russia Herald. August 23, 2014. Retrieved August 23, 2014. 
^ Stanford University Press, 1998, edited by James L. Watson
^ "McDonald's deal with oil company marries China's new love of fast food, cars". Archived from the original on March 25, 2007. 
^ Samuel, Henry (October 4, 2009). "McDonald's restaurants to open at the Louvre". The Daily Telegraph. London. 
^ Gasparro, Annie; Jargon, Julie (September 5, 2012). "McDonald's to Go Vegetarian in India". The Wall Street Journal. p. B7. 
^ "10 Countries That Don't Have McDonald's". WhatCulture.com. Retrieved December 1, 2015. 
^ "VOLUNTARY ANNOUNCEMENT: ACQUISITION OF A CONTROLLING INTEREST IN MCDONALD'S MAINLAND CHINA AND HONG KONG BUSINESSES" (PDF). CITIC Limited. Hong Kong Stock Exchange. January 9, 2017. Retrieved January 13, 2017. 
^ "Fanatics Preach Fast Food Evangelism". Fox News. July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald’s is going for healthier fare and greater digitisation". The Economist. January 28, 2017. ISSN 0013-0613. Retrieved February 5, 2017. 
^ "McDonald's to remove corn syrup from buns, curbs antibiotics in chicken". August 1, 2016 – via Reuters. 
^ a b c Mohapatra, Sanjay (2012). Information Strategy Design and Practices. Google Books: Springer Science & Business Media. p. 301. ISBN 1-4614-2427-5. 
^ "McDonald's Restaurants". Caterersearch.com. Archived from the original on July 16, 2011. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDrive: il fast food comodo, facile e veloce". McDonald's Italia. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's vs Newk's Franchise Cost Comparison and Analysis". www.thefranchisemall.com. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ Duca, Lauren. "This McDonald's has a "Walk-Thru"". Teen Vogue. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's Australia". mcdonalds.com.au. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ Kieler, Ashlee. "McDonald's Ends 'Create Your Taste' Customized Burger Program". Consumerist. Retrieved December 18, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's and BP test combined operations. (McDonald's Restaurants; BP Oil Co.)". Archived from the original on January 18, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's serves up 'MCSTOP' – Its restaurant for big crowds". August 16, 1984. 
^ a b c d e "Restaurants going high tech". Yahoo Tech. June 14, 2016. Retrieved June 14, 2016. 
^ "El único Mc Donald's kosher del mundo fuera de Israel es certificado por Ajdut Kosher" (Spanish and English). Last consulted: May 22, 2011
^ "Buenos Aires Restaurants – Kosher McDonald's". travel.nytimes.com. Archived from the original on March 3, 2009. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "Big Mac with a side of quinoa? Inside the world's first McDonald's Next". edition.cnn.com. Cable News Network. Retrieved August 9, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's wants a digital-age makeover". 
^ "Mickey D's McMakeover". Archived from the original on May 24, 2006. 
^ Bruce Horovitz (May 9, 2011). "McDonald's revamps store to look more upscale". USA Today. Retrieved June 26, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's Bans Smoking at All the Sites It Owns". The New York Times. February 24, 1994. 
^ Gibson, Richard (August 12, 1999). "Want Fries With That? Ask McDonald's New E-Clerks". The Wall Street Journal.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ O'Toole, James (May 22, 2014). "Robots will replace fast-food workers". CNN Money. Retrieved August 18, 2016. 
^ Johnson, Hollis (May 16, 2016). "Fast food workers are becoming obsolete". Business Insider. Retrieved August 18, 2016. 
^ Neville, Simon (August 25, 2008). "McDonald's ties nine out of 10 workers to zero-hours contracts". The Guardian. London. Retrieved August 10, 2013. 
^ ' 'Anzalone Liszt Grove Research' ' and ' 'Fast Food Foreward' '. New York's Hidden Crime Wave: Wage Theft and New York City's Fast Food Workers
^ Maclay, Kathleen. "Fast Food, Poverty Wages: The Public Cost of Low-wage jobs in the Fast Food Industry". University of California Labor Center October 15, 2013.
^ Susanna Kim (November 21, 2013). McDonald's Defends Telling Workers to 'Quit Complaining' to Reduce Stress. ABC News. Retrieved November 21, 2013.
^ Associated Press (December 26, 2013). "McDonald's Closes Employee Website Amid Criticism". DailyDigest. Archived from the original on December 28, 2013. Retrieved December 26, 2013. 
^ Goldberg, Harmony, "How McDonald's gets away with rampant wage theft", Salon, April 6, 2015. Accessed May 22, 2015.
^ Tae-hoon, Lee (August 16, 2015). "McDonald's lures customers with illegal ads on Independence Day". The Korea Observer. Retrieved August 17, 2015. 
^ "McDonald's Hourly Pay". Glassdoor. Retrieved December 1, 2015. 
^ Beckerman, Josh. "McDonald's New CEO Gets 69% Pay Raise"[dead link], Wall Street Journal, March 3, 2015. Accessed May 22, 2015.
^ Bruce Horovitz and Yamiche Alcindor (April 15, 2015). Fast-food strikes widen into social-justice movement. USA Today. Accessed May 22, 2015.
^ a b Taylor, Kate (May 25, 2016). "McDonald's ex-CEO just revealed a terrifying reality for fast-food workers". Business Insider. Retrieved August 18, 2016. 
^ Jana Kasperkevic (March 16, 2015). McDonald's workers told to treat burns with condiments, survey shows. The Guardian. Retrieved March 17, 2015.
^ Owen, Tess (September 10, 2015). "McDonald's Is Switching to Cage-Free Eggs at a Delicate Moment for the Poultry Industry". VICE News. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ "The Insanely Complicated Logistics of Cage-Free Eggs for All". Wired. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ Gelles, David (July 16, 2016). "Eggs That Clear the Cages, but Maybe Not the Conscience". New York Times. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ Kesmodel, David (March 18, 2015). "Cage-Free Hens Study Finds Little Difference in Egg Quality". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ Strom, Stephanie (February 13, 2012). "McDonald's Set to Phase Out Suppliers' Use of Sow Crates". New York Times. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's renews as FIFA World Cup Sponsor until 2014". FIFA.com. Retrieved October 24, 2014
^ "McDonald's slogans used around the world, past and present". Retrieved June 23, 2015. 
^ William M. O'Barr, "Advertising in India." Advertising & Society Review 9#3 (2008): 1-33.
^ "Mars rover Curiosity's other mission: publicity machine". Statesman.com. December 5, 2012. Retrieved March 9, 2013. 
^ McHappy Day, Ronald McDonald House Charities. Retrieved September 12, 2010.
^ McHappy Day Retrieved November 8, 2010.
^ "Donor Turns Fast Food Into Big Bucks For Hospital". The New York Times. December 8, 1995. Retrieved May 24, 2010. 
^ "The night time 'McRefugees' of Hong Kong". BBC news. October 27, 2015. Retrieved October 10, 2016. 
^ "BBC NEWS | UK | McLibel: Longest case in English history". BBC News. Retrieved April 9, 2015. 
^ a b Associated Press (November 11, 2003). "Merriam-Webster: 'McJob' is here to stay". CNN Offbeat News. 
^ "McJob". Merriam-Webster's Online Dictionary. 1986. Retrieved November 29, 2009. 
^ "Letter from McDonald's headquarters claiming fries are vegetarian". 
^ Bluestien, Greg. "Creators Put Politics Into Video Games", The Associated Press, published January 21, 2007, accessed April 20, 2007.
^ "Do You Want Fries With That Audit?". Forbes. January 23, 2014. 
^ Sweney, Mark (April 20, 2006). "Not bad for a McJob?". The Guardian. London. Retrieved March 30, 2009. 
^ Ian Ashbridge (July 3, 2007). "McDonalds' milk goes organic – 7/3/2007 – Farmers Weekly". Fwi.co.uk. Archived from the original on May 14, 2012. Retrieved June 7, 2012. 
^ Carrigan, Marylyn and De Pelsmacker, Patrick (2009). Will ethical consumers sustain their values in the global credit crunch? International Marketing Review, 26(6), pp. 674–687,(p.7).
^ "The Truth-O-Meter : Chef Jamie Oliver praises McDonald's in England". Truth-O-Meter. Tampa Bay Times. Retrieved October 22, 2012. 
^ Ian Ashbridge (July 3, 2007). "McDonald's milk goes organic – 03/07/2007 – FarmersWeekly". Fwi.co.uk. Archived from the original on September 24, 2009. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ "McDonald's Holds down Dollar Meal, Making Menu Healthier". International Business Times. May 22, 2008. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's says all US French fries cooked in zero-trans-fat oil". www.gmanews. Archived from the original on January 14, 2011. 
^ "Report of the Corporate Responsibility Committee of the Board of Directors of McDonald's Corporation" (PDF). November 19, 2009. Archived from the original (PDF) on July 17, 2011. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's hails success of waste-to-energy trial". Businessgreen.com. April 14, 2008. Archived from the original on September 26, 2012. Retrieved April 9, 2015. 
^ "Local woman creates environmental-friendly Web site". Herald-dispatch.com. April 19, 2008. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ Vidal, John (April 26, 2008). "'Sustainable' bio-plastic can damage the environment". The Guardian. London. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's and Environmental Defense Fund Mark 20 Years of Partnerships for Sustainability". Environmental Defense Fund. November 15, 2010. Retrieved November 28, 2013. 
^ "McDonald's testing eco-friendlier coffee cups". NBC News. March 12, 2012. Retrieved November 28, 2013. 
^ "U.S. Environmental Protection Agency". Archived from the original on August 5, 2012. Retrieved April 17, 2008. 
^ "McDonald's Corporation website". Archived from the original on May 31, 2016. Retrieved April 17, 2008. 
^ Goodman, Matthew (April 5, 2009). "Big Mac, hold the CO2". The Sunday Times. London. 
^ "National Pollution Prevention Center for Higher Education" (PDF). 
^ Environmental Defense Fund. Task Force Report. p. 42.
^ Environmental Defense Fund and McDonald's Corporation. Waste Reduction Task Force Final Report. Oak Brook, IL: McDonald's, 1991. p. 22.
^ "Corporation. McDonald's Packaging – The Facts. Oak Brook, IL: McDonald's, 1990. p. 7.". 
^ BBC online news article dated September 8, 2009 News.BB.co.uk
^ "McDonald's fined for employing underage workers". ABC News Online. April 12, 2007. Archived from the original on April 18, 2007. Retrieved April 12, 2007. 
^ "98 private companies earning over $200m pay no tax: ATO". ABC News. Retrieved April 4, 2016. 
^ "McLibel: Longest case in English history". BBC news. February 15, 2005. Retrieved January 17, 2016. 
^ Do You Know the Full Story Behind the Infamous McDonald's Coffee Case and How Corporations Used it to Promote Tort Reform? Democracy Now! January 25, 2011.
^ "McDonald's: Gentechnik im Burger". Spiegel Online (in German). April 27, 2014. Retrieved December 1, 2015. 


Further reading

Evans, Stephen (April 20, 2004). "McDonald's: The journey to health". BBC News. Retrieved June 30, 2016. 
Horovitz, Bruce (May 8, 2014). "McDonald's testing seasoned fries". USA Today. Retrieved June 30, 2016. 
Love, John F. (April 1987). "Big Macs, Fries, and Real Estate". Financial Executive (4): 20–6. 
Thomas Derdak and Jay P. Pederson, ed. (2004). "McDonald's". International directory of company histories. 67 (3rd ed.). St. James Press. pp. 108–9. ISBN 978-1-55862-512-9. 
"McDonald's : Behind The Arches" by John F. Love, paperback July 1, 1995
"Grinding It Out: The Making of McDonald's" by Ray Kroc, 1977 ISBN 0809282593
"Ray & Joan: The Man Who Made the McDonald's Fortune and the Woman Who Gave It All Away" by Lisa Napoli, 2016 ISBN 1101984953
"Fast Food Nation: The Dark Side of the All-American Meal" by Eric Schlosser, 2001 ISBN 0395977894

External links

Find more aboutMcDonald'sat Wikipedia's sister projects

Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Travel guide from Wikivoyage
Learning resources from Wikiversity
Data from Wikidata



Official Website
Corporate Website



Business data for McDonald's: Google Finance
Yahoo! Finance
Reuters
SEC filings










v
t
e


McDonald's






History
Advertising

ad programs


Countries with franchises
Legal cases
Product list
International availability





People



Richard and Maurice McDonald
Ray Kroc
Joan Kroc
Ralph Alvarez
Charlie Bell
Al Bernardin
Jim Cantalupo
George Cohon
Dan Coudreaut
Steve Easterbrook
Janice L. Fields
Den Fujita
Don Gorske
Jack M. Greenberg
Eikō Harada
June Martino
Herb Peterson
Michael R. Quinlan
Ed Rensi
Willard Scott
James A. Skinner
Donald N. Smith
Harry J. Sonneborn
Don Thompson
Fred L. Turner





Company



Hamburger University
Leaps and Bounds
McBarge
McCafé
McDonald's #1 Store Museum
McDonald's (Will Rogers Turnpike)
Oldest McDonald's restaurant
Rock N Roll McDonald's
Ronald McDonald House Charities





Products




Beef



Big Mac
Big N' Tasty
Deluxe line
Kiwiburger
Quarter Pounder (McRoyal)





Chicken



Chicken McNuggets
McChicken





Other



Deli Choices
Filet-O-Fish
Georgie Pie
Happy Meal
McArabia
McGriddles
McMuffin
McRib
Premium line
Shamrock Shake





Former



Arch Deluxe
McAfrika








Advertising




Campaigns



Changeables
Global Gladiators
Golden Arches
Mac Tonight
McDonaldland
McDonald's Monopoly
McDonald's Treasure Land Adventure
M.C. Kids
McKids
Ronald McDonald
Teenie Beanies
The Wacky Adventures of Ronald McDonald





Sponsorships



Kyle Larson (NASCAR)
Jamie McMurray (NASCAR)
Graham Rahal (IndyCar Series)
McDonald's All-American Game
McDonald's Championship
McDonald's Championship (golf)
McDonald's Cycle Center
McDonald's Gospelfest
McDonald's Olympic Swim Stadium





Related



Burger wars
Donald Land
Fast food advertising
Mac and Me (1988 film)
McDonald's sign (Pine Bluff, Arkansas)
Supersize








Branches



Canada
Israel
New Zealand





Criticism



Fast Food Nation (film)
McDonaldization
McDonald's Videogame
McJob
McRefugee
McLibel
Maxime, McDuff & McDo
Super Size Me

Don't Eat This Book







Legal cases



Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants
Magee v. McDonald's
McDonald's Restaurants v. Morris & Steel
Sid & Marty Krofft Television Productions Inc. v. McDonald's Corp.





Related



McDelivery
Big Mac Index
Bill Elliott
McDonald's Young Entertainers
McWords
San Ysidro McDonald's massacre
"Seriously McDonalds"
Sydney River McDonald's murders
Taiwan McDonald's bombings
Urban legends
Boom, Like That
The Founder (2016 film)










Links to related articles











v
t
e


Components of the Dow Jones Industrial Average






3M
American Express
Apple
Boeing
Caterpillar
Chevron
Cisco Systems
Coca-Cola
Disney
DuPont
ExxonMobil
General Electric
Goldman Sachs
The Home Depot
Intel
IBM
Johnson & Johnson
JPMorgan Chase
McDonald's
Merck & Co.
Microsoft
Nike
Pfizer
Procter & Gamble
Travelers
UnitedHealth Group
United Technologies
Verizon Communications
Visa
Walmart












v
t
e


Fast food and fast casual restaurant chains in the United States






Chicken chains
Coffeehouse chains
Pizza chains





Hamburgers



A&W
Arctic Circle
Back Yard
Big Boy
Burger King
Burgerville
Carl's Jr.
Checkers/Rally's
Cook Out
Fatburger
Five Guys
Freddy's
Fuddruckers
The Habit
Hardee's
Hwy 55
In-N-Out
Jack in the Box
Johnny Rockets
Krystal
McDonald's
Red Robin
Roy Rogers
Shake Shack
Smashburger
Sonic
Steak 'n Shake
Wayback
Wendy's
Whataburger
White Castle





Asian



L&L Hawaiian Barbecue
Manchu Wok
Panda Express
Pei Wei Asian Diner
P. F. Chang's China Bistro
Pick Up Stix
Sarku





Baked goods



Au Bon Pain
Auntie Anne's
Bruegger's
Cinnabon
Corner Bakery Cafe
Dunkin' Donuts
Einstein Bros.
Great American Cookies
Honey Dew Donuts
Krispy Kreme
Mrs. Fields
Nestlé Toll House
Panera Bread
Pretzelmaker/Pretzel Time
Shipley Do-Nuts
Tim Hortons
T.J. Cinnamons
Wetzel's
Winchell's





Beverages



Argo Tea
Biggby Coffee
Caribou
Coffee Bean & Tea Leaf
Coffee Beanery
Dunn Bros
Gloria Jean's
Jamba Juice
Juice It Up!
Orange Julius
Peet's
Planet Smoothie
Robeks
Seattle's Best Coffee
Smoothie King
Starbucks
Teavana
Tropical Smoothie Cafe
Tully's





Frozen
desserts



Baskin-Robbins
Ben & Jerry's
Braum's
Bruster's
Carvel
Cold Stone
Culver's
Dairy Queen
Dippin' Dots
Fosters Freeze
Friendly's
Golden Spoon
Graeter's
Häagen-Dazs
Handel's
Kiwi Yogurt
MaggieMoo's
Marble Slab
Menchie's
Pinkberry
Red Mango
Rita's
Sweet Frog
Tastee-Freez
TCBY
Tropical Sno
Tutti Frutti
Yogen Früz
Yogurtland





Hot dogs



Hot Dog on a Stick
Nathan's Famous
Portillo's
Wienerschnitzel





Mexican-style /
Tex-Mex



Baja Fresh
Cafe Rio
Chipotle
Chronic Tacos
Del Taco
El Pollo Loco
Freebirds
Green/Red Burrito
La Salsa
Moe's
Pancheros
Qdoba
Rubio's
Taco Bell
Taco Bueno
Taco Cabana
Taco del Mar
Taco John's
Taco Mayo
Taco Time
Tijuana Flats
Wahoo's Fish Taco





Noodles



Fazoli's
Noodles & Company
Skyline Chili





Sandwiches



Arby's
Atlanta Bread
Blimpie
Capriotti's
Charley's
Così
Cousins
D'Angelo
Daphne's
Erbert & Gerbert's
Firehouse Subs
Great Wraps
Jason's
Jerry's Subs
Jersey Mike's
Jimmy John's
Lee's Sandwiches
Lenny's Sub
McAlister's Deli
Miami Subs
Mr. Hero
Newk's Eatery
Penn Station
Port of Subs
PDQ
Potbelly
Quiznos
Rax
Runza
Sandella's
Schlotzsky's
Steak Escape
Subway
Togo's
Tubby's
Tudor's Biscuit World
Which Wich?





Seafood



Arthur Treacher's
Captain D's
H. Salt Esquire
Ivar's
Long John Silver's
Skippers Seafood & Chowder House





Defunct



Bresler's Ice Cream
Brigham's
Burger Chef
Carrols
D'Lites
Druther's
Henry's Hamburgers
Hot 'n Now
Hot Sam Pretzels
Naugles
Red Barn
Sandy's
Zantigo












v
t
e


Illinois-based corporations



Fortune 500
corporations
(by size–2013)



Walgreens Boots Alliance
Archer Daniels Midland
Boeing
Caterpillar Inc.
State Farm Insurance
Abbott Laboratories
Sears Holdings
United Continental Holdings
Deere & Company
Mondelēz International
Allstate
McDonald's
Exelon
Kraft Heinz
Illinois Tool Works
Baxter International
Navistar International
RR Donnelley
CDW
Hillshire Brands
Discover Financial
W. W. Grainger
Motorola Solutions
Dover Corporation
Tenneco
Ingredion
Anixter
United Stationers
AbbVie
Old Republic International





Other major
public companies
(alphabetically)



ACCO Brands
Accretive Health
Allscripts
Amcol International Corporation
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Brunswick Corporation
Calamos
Career Education Corporation
Catamaran Corporation
CBOE Holdings
CF Industries Holdings
CME Group
CNA Financial
Equity Residential
Fortune Brands Home & Security
General Growth Properties
Hospira
Hyatt Hotels Corp.
Integrys Energy Group
Jones Lang LaSalle
Kemper Corporation
Nalco Holding Company
Nicor
Northern Trust
RLI Corp.
Rubicon Technology
Stericycle
Telephone and Data Systems
Titan International
Tribune Media
Tronc
Tootsie Roll Industries
ULTA Beauty
US Foods
USG Corporation
Westell
Zebra Technologies





Other major
private companies
(alphabetically)



Ace Hardware
Baker & McKenzie
Blue Cross Blue Shield Association
Claire's
Country Financial
Danfoss Power Solutions
Dot Foods
Eby-Brown
Electro-Motive Diesel
Flex-N-Gate
Follett Corporation
Gardner Denver
Grant Thornton LLP
Health Care Service Corporation
Heico Cos.
Hendrickson International
Hub International
Jenner & Block
Kirkland & Ellis
Marmon Group
Mayer Brown
Medline Industries
Molex
Morton Salt
Nestlé Frozen Pizza
OSI Group
Pactiv
Reyes Holdings
Ryerson, Inc.
Sidley Austin
Skidmore, Owings & Merrill
Solo Cup Company
Tellabs
TransUnion
True Value
Wirtz Corporation





Related topics



Breweries in Illinois
Companies in the Chicago metropolitan area
Food manufacturers of Chicago
Newspapers in Illinois
Wineries in Illinois












v
t
e


Food chains in the United Kingdom



Casual dining



Angus Steakhouse
Ask
Beefeater Grill
Bella Italia
Brewers Fayre
Byron Hamburgers
Café Rouge
Carluccio's
Chiquito
Damon's
Ed's Easy Diner
Frankie & Benny's
Giraffe
Gourmet Burger Kitchen
Harry Ramsden's
Harvester
Hungry Horse
La Tasca
Little Chef
Loch Fyne Restaurants
Nando's
OK Diner
Pizza Hut
PizzaExpress
Prezzo
Strada
Table Table
T.G.I. Friday's
Toby Carvery
Tony Roma's
Wagamama
Wahaca
Wildwood Kitchen
Zizzi





Fast food



Barburrito
Burger King
Chicken Cottage
Chipotle Mexican Grill
Dixy Chicken
Domino's Pizza
Five Guys
KFC
McDonald's
Morley's
Papa John's Pizza
Sam's Chicken
Southern Fried Chicken
Subway
Taco Bell
Tops Pizza
Tortilla
Wasabi
Wimpy
YO! Sushi





Baked goods



Auntie Anne's
Cinnabon
Cooplands
Ditsch
Dunkin' Donuts
Eat
Greggs
Krispy Kreme
Millie's Cookies
Patisserie Valerie
Pret a Manger
Sayers
Spudulike
Upper Crust
The West Cornwall Pasty Company





Coffee shops and tea rooms



AMT Coffee
Betty's
Caffè Nero
Caffè Ritazza
Coffee #1
Coffee Republic
Costa Coffee
Harris + Hoole
Starbucks





Dairy



Baskin-Robbins
Ben & Jerry's
Kaspa's





Pub chains



All Bar One
Chef & Brewer
O'Neill's
Scream Pubs
Slug and Lettuce
Walkabout
Wetherspoons
Yates's














Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 136891459
LCCN: n50000582
ISNI: 0000 0000 9322 4855
GND: 2084334-3
SUDOC: 029547199
BNF: cb121150481 (data)










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=McDonald%27s&oldid=791385530"					
Categories: McDonald's1940 establishments in California1955 establishments in IllinoisCompanies based in DuPage County, IllinoisCompanies in the Dow Jones Industrial AverageCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeFast-food chains of AustraliaFast-food chains of SingaporeFast-food chains of the United StatesFast-food franchisesFast-food hamburger restaurantsMultinational food companiesOak Brook, IllinoisRestaurant chains in the United StatesRestaurants established in 1940American companies established in 1940Hidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from April 2013Pages using citations with accessdate and no URLArticles with dead external links from August 2016CS1 German-language sources (de)Wikipedia indefinitely semi-protected pagesUse mdy dates from March 2017Use American English from August 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from May 2016Wikipedia articles needing clarification from January 2017Wikipedia articles needing clarification from March 2017Articles with unsourced statements from September 2015Articles with limited geographic scope from November 2015USA-centricArticles to be expanded from November 2015All articles to be expandedArticles using small message boxesArticles to be expanded from May 2014Articles with unsourced statements from April 2017NPOV disputes from July 2017All NPOV disputesArticles with peacock terms from July 2017All articles with peacock termsArticles with unsourced statements from December 2014Articles with unsourced statements from March 2015Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikinewsWikiquote 



Languages


AfrikaansالعربيةAsturianuAzərbaycancaবাংলাBân-lâm-gúБеларускаяBikol CentralБългарскиCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiΕλληνικάEspañolEsperantoEstremeñuEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisFryskGalego客家語/Hak-kâ-ngî한국어Հայերենहिन्दीHrvatskiIlokanoBahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתಕನ್ನಡКъарачай-малкъарქართულიҚазақшаKreyòl ayisyenKurdîLatinaLatviešuLietuviųLimburgsLumbaartMagyarМакедонскиമലയാളംმარგალურიمصرىBahasa MelayuBaso MinangkabauNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskOccitanਪੰਜਾਬੀPälzischپنجابیپښتوPolskiPortuguêsRomânăRumantschРусскийСаха тылаScotsSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSlovenščinaکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиBasa SundaSuomiSvenskaTagalogதமிழ்Татарча/tatarçaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаVepsän kel’Tiếng ViệtWinarayייִדיש粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 19 July 2017, at 22:46.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









McDonald's - Wikipedia




















 







McDonald's

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from MacDonalds)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other uses, see Macdonald (disambiguation).

McDonald's





Type

Public


Traded as



NYSE: MCD
DJIA Component
S&P 100 Component
S&P 500 Component





ISIN
US5801351017


Industry
Restaurants


Genre
Fast food restaurant


Founded
McDonald's:
May 15, 1940 (77 years ago)
 San Bernardino, CA
McDonald's Corporation:
April 15, 1955 (62 years ago)
 Des Plaines, IL


Founders
McDonald's:
Richard McDonald
Maurice McDonald
McDonald's Corporation:
Ray Kroc


Headquarters
 Oak Brook, Illinois, U.S.
(moving to Chicago in 2018)[1]



Number of locations

About 36,900[2] (December 31, 2016)



Area served

Worldwide



Key people




Andrew J. McKenna (Chairman)
Steve Easterbrook (President and CEO)





Products



Hamburgers
chicken
french fries
soft drinks
milkshakes
salads
desserts
coffee
breakfast





Revenue



 US$24.622 billion (2016)[2]






Operating income




 US$7.745 billion (2016)[2]






Net income




 US$4.686 billion (2016)[2]





Total assets



 US$31.024 billion (2016)[2]





Total equity



 US$2.2043 billion (2016)[2]






Number of employees

375,000 (2016)[2]


Website

corporate.mcdonalds.com/mcd.html
www.mcdonalds.com/us/en-us.html
This box:

view
talk
edit





McDonald's is an American hamburger and fast food restaurant chain. It was founded in 1940 as a barbecue restaurant operated by Richard and Maurice McDonald, in San Bernardino, California. In 1948, they reorganized their business as a hamburger stand, using production line principles. The first McDonald's franchise using the arches logo opened in Phoenix, Arizona in 1953. Businessman Ray Kroc joined the company as a franchise agent in 1955 and subsequently purchased the chain from the McDonald brothers. Based in Oak Brook, Illinois, McDonald's confirmed plans to move its global headquarters to Chicago by early 2018.[3][4]
Today, McDonald's is the world's largest restaurant chain, serving approximately 68 million customers daily in 120 countries across approximately 36,900 outlets.[5] McDonald's primarily sells hamburgers, cheeseburgers, chicken products, french fries, breakfast items, soft drinks, milkshakes, wraps, and desserts. In response to changing consumer tastes and after facing criticism for the unhealthy nature of their food,[6] the company has expanded its menu to include salads, fish, wraps, smoothies, and fruit. A McDonald's restaurant is operated by either a franchisee, an affiliate, or the corporation itself. The McDonald's Corporation revenues come from the rent, royalties, and fees paid by the franchisees, as well as sales in company-operated restaurants. According to a BBC report published in 2012, McDonald's is the world's second largest private employer (behind Walmart with 1.9 million employees), 1.5 million of whom work for franchises.



Contents


1 History
2 Corporate overview

2.1 Facts and figures
2.2 Business model
2.3 Headquarters
2.4 Board of directors
2.5 Global operations

2.5.1 Countries with McDonald's




3 Products

3.1 International menu variations


4 Restaurants

4.1 Types of restaurants

4.1.1 McDrive
4.1.2 McCafé
4.1.3 "Create Your Taste" restaurants
4.1.4 Other
4.1.5 Special diet
4.1.6 Playgrounds
4.1.7 McDonald's Next


4.2 2006 redesign
4.3 Smoking ban


5 Treatment of employees

5.1 Automation
5.2 Wages

5.2.1 Strikes


5.3 Working conditions


6 Animal welfare standards
7 Marketing and advertising

7.1 India
7.2 Space exploration
7.3 Children's advertising
7.4 Sports awards and honors


8 Charity

8.1 McHappy Day
8.2 McDonald's Monopoly donation
8.3 McRefugee


9 Criticism

9.1 Company responses to criticism
9.2 Environmental record
9.3 Legal cases

9.3.1 Asia
9.3.2 Australia
9.3.3 United Kingdom
9.3.4 United States


9.4 Use of genetically modified food


10 See also
11 References
12 Further reading
13 External links



History
Main article: History of McDonald's




McDonald's corporate logo used from November 18, 1968, to 2006. It still exists at some restaurants






The oldest operating McDonald's restaurant was the third one built, opening in 1953. It is located at 10207 Lakewood Blvd. at Florence Ave. in Downey, California (at 33°56′50″N 118°07′06″W﻿ / ﻿33.9471°N 118.1182°W﻿ / 33.9471; -118.1182).


The business began in 1940, with a restaurant opened by brothers Richard and Maurice McDonald at 1398 North E Street at West 14th Street in San Bernardino, California (at 34°07′32″N 117°17′41″W﻿ / ﻿34.1255°N 117.2946°W﻿ / 34.1255; -117.2946). Their introduction of the "Speedee Service System" in 1948 furthered the principles of the modern fast-food restaurant that the White Castle hamburger chain had already put into practice more than two decades earlier.[citation needed] The first McDonald's with the arches opened in Phoenix, Arizona in March 1953.[citation needed] The original mascot of McDonald's was a man with a chef's hat on top of a hamburger-shaped head whose name was "Speedee". In 1962, the Golden Arches replaced Speedee as the company symbol. A new mascot, Ronald McDonald, was introduced in 1965. The clown-like man having puffed out costume legs appeared in advertising aimed at children.[7]
On May 4, 1961, McDonald's first filed for a U.S. trademark on the name "McDonald's" with the description "Drive-In Restaurant Services", which continues to be renewed. On September 13, 1961, the company filed for a trademark on a new logo—an overlapping, double-arched "M" symbol. By September 6, 1962, this M-symbol was temporarily disfavored, when a trademark was filed for a single arch, which appeared over many of the early McDonald's restaurants in the early years.[clarification needed] Although the "Golden Arches" logo appeared in various forms, the present version as a letter "M" did not appear until November 18, 1968, when the company applied for a U.S. trademark.
The present corporation dates its founding to the opening of a franchised restaurant by businessman Ray Kroc in Des Plaines, Illinois on April 15, 1955, the ninth McDonald's restaurant overall; this location was demolished in 1984 after many remodels. Kroc later purchased the McDonald brothers' equity in the company and led its worldwide expansion, and the company became listed on the public stock markets ten years later. Kroc was also noted for aggressive business practices, compelling the McDonald brothers to leave the fast-food industry.
Kroc and the McDonald brothers feuded over control of the business, as documented in Kroc's autobiography. The San Bernardino restaurant was demolished in 1976 (1971, according to Juan Pollo) and the site was sold to the Juan Pollo restaurant chain. This area now serves as headquarters for the Juan Pollo chain, as well as a McDonald's and Route 66 museum.[8] With the expansion of McDonald's into many international markets, the company has become a symbol of globalization and the spread of the American way of life. Its prominence has also made it a frequent topic of public debates about obesity, corporate ethics, and consumer responsibility.
Corporate overview
Facts and figures




By 1993, McDonald's had sold more than 100 billion hamburgers. The once widespread restaurant signs that boasted the number of sales, such as this one in Harlem, were left at "99 billion" because there was space for only two digits.






The McDonald's in Northport, Alabama commemorates U.S. President Ronald Reagan's visit


McDonald's restaurants are found in 120 countries and territories around the world and serve 68 million customers each day.[9][10] McDonald's operates 36,899 restaurants worldwide, employing more than 375,000 people as of the end of 2016.[5][9] There are currently a total of 5,669 company-owned locations and 31,230 franchised locations, which includes 21,559 locations franchised to conventional franchisees, 6,300 locations licensed to developmental licensees, and 3,371 locations licensed to foreign affiliates, primarily Japan.[5]
Focusing on its core brand, McDonald's began divesting itself of other chains it had acquired during the 1990s. The company owned a majority stake in Chipotle Mexican Grill until October 2006, when McDonald's fully divested from Chipotle through a stock exchange.[11][12] Until December 2003, it also owned Donatos Pizza, and it owned a small share of Aroma Cafe from 1999 to 2001. On August 27, 2007, McDonald's sold Boston Market to Sun Capital Partners.[13]
Notably, McDonald's has increased shareholder dividends for 25 consecutive years,[14] making it one of the S&P 500 Dividend Aristocrats.[15][16] In October 2012, its monthly sales fell for the first time in nine years.[17] In 2014, its quarterly sales fell for the first time in seventeen years, when its sales dropped for the entirety of 1997.[18]
In the United States, it is reported that drive-throughs account for 70 percent of sales.[19][20] McDonald's plans to close 184 restaurants in the United States in 2015, which is 59 more than it plans to open.[21][22] This is the first time McDonald's will have a net decrease in the number of locations in the United States since 1970.[22]
Business model
The company currently owns all of its property[clarification needed] – valued at an estimated $16 to $18 billion. However, in recent times, there have been calls to spin off the company's US holdings into a potential real estate investment trust. The company earns a significant portion of its revenue from rental payments from franchisees. These rent payments rose 26 percent between 2010 and 2015, accounting for one-fifth of the company's total revenue at the end of the period.[23] The company announced at its investor conference on November 10, 2015, that it would not spin off its property into a real-estate investment trust. The CEO, Steve Easterbrook discussed that pursuing the REIT option would pose too large a risk to the company's business model.[24]




The McDonald's logo painted on the tail of a Crossair McDonnell Douglas MD-83 in 1999.


The United Kingdom and Ireland business model is different from the U.S, in that fewer than 30 percent of restaurants are franchised, with the majority under the ownership of the company. McDonald's trains its franchisees and management at Hamburger University in Oak Brook, Illinois.[25][26] In other countries, McDonald's restaurants are operated by joint ventures of McDonald's Corporation and other, local entities or governments.[27]
According to Fast Food Nation by Eric Schlosser (2001), nearly one in eight workers in the U.S. have at some time been employed by McDonald's. Employees are encouraged by McDonald's Corp. to maintain their health by singing along to their favorite songs in order to relieve stress, attending church services in order to have a lower blood pressure, and taking two vacations annually in order to reduce risk for myocardial infarction.[28] Fast Food Nation also states that McDonald's is the largest private operator of playgrounds in the U.S., as well as the single largest purchaser of beef, pork, potatoes, and apples. The selection of meats McDonald's uses varies to some extent based on the culture of the host country.[29]
Headquarters




McDonald's Plaza, located in Oak Brook, Illinois, is the headquarters of McDonald's


The McDonald's headquarters complex, McDonald's Plaza, is located in Oak Brook, Illinois. It sits on the site of the former headquarters and stabling area of Paul Butler, the founder of Oak Brook.[30] McDonald's moved into the Oak Brook facility from an office within the Chicago Loop in 1971.[31]
On June 13, 2016, McDonald's confirmed plans to move its global headquarters to Chicago's West Loop neighborhood in the Near West Side. The 608,000-square-foot structure will be built on the site of Oprah Winfrey's former Harpo Studios and open in early 2018.[3][4]
Board of directors
As of November 2014, the board of directors had the following members:[32]

Andrew J. McKenna, chairman
Susan E. Arnold, operating executive of Global Consumer & Retail Group of The Carlyle Group
Robert A. Eckert, operating partner of Friedman Fleischer & Lowe
Enrique Hernandez, Jr., president and CEO of Inter-Con Security
Jeanne P. Jackson, president of product and merchandising for Nike, Inc.
Richard H. Lenny, operating partner of Friedman Fleischer & Lowe
Walter E. Massey, president of the School of the Art Institute of Chicago
Cary D. McMillan, CEO of True Partners Consulting LLC
Sheila A. Penrose, non-executive chairman of Jones Lang LaSalle
John W. Rogers, Jr, chairman and CEO of Ariel Investments
Roger W. Stone, chairman and CEO of KapStone Paper and Packaging
Don Thompson, president and CEO
Miles D. White, chairman and CEO of Abbott Laboratories

On March 1, 2015, after being chief brand officer of McDonald's and its former head in the UK and northern Europe, Steve Easterbrook became CEO, succeeding Don Thompson, who stepped down on January 28, 2015.
Global operations
See also: List of countries with McDonald's restaurants and International availability of McDonald's products




Countries with McDonald's restaurants, showing their first year with its first restaurant






McDonald's on Nathan Road, Kowloon, Hong Kong.


McDonald's has become emblematic of globalization, sometimes referred to as the "McDonaldization" of society. The Economist newspaper uses the "Big Mac Index": the comparison of a Big Mac's cost in various world currencies can be used to informally judge these currencies' purchasing power parity. Switzerland has the most expensive Big Mac in the world as of July 2015, while the country with the least expensive Big Mac is India[33][34] (albeit for a Maharaja Mac—the next cheapest Big Mac is Hong Kong).[35]




McDonald's, Paulista Avenue, São Paulo, Brazil


Thomas Friedman once said that no country with a McDonald's had gone to war with another.[36][37] However, the "Golden Arches Theory of Conflict Prevention" is not strictly true. Exceptions are the 1989 United States invasion of Panama, NATO's bombing of Serbia in 1999, the 2006 Lebanon War, and the 2008 South Ossetia war. McDonald's suspended operations in its corporate-owned stores in Crimea after Russia annexed the region in 2014.[38] On August 20, 2014, as tensions between the United States and Russia strained over events in Ukraine, and the resultant U.S. sanctions, the Russian government temporarily shut down four McDonald's outlets in Moscow, citing sanitary concerns. The company has operated in Russia since 1990 and at August 2014 had 438 stores across the country.[39] On August 23, 2014, Russian Deputy Prime Minister Arkady Dvorkovich ruled out any government move to ban McDonald's and dismissed the notion that the temporary closures had anything to do with the sanctions.[40]




McDonald's, Old Mahabalipuram Road, Chennai, India


Some observers have suggested that the company should be given credit for increasing the standard of service in markets that it enters. A group of anthropologists in a study entitled Golden Arches East[41] looked at the impact McDonald's had on East Asia and Hong Kong, in particular. When it opened in Hong Kong in 1975, McDonald's was the first restaurant to consistently offer clean restrooms, driving customers to demand the same of other restaurants and institutions. McDonald's has taken to partnering up with Sinopec, the second largest oil company in the People's Republic of China, as it takes advantage of the country's growing use of personal vehicles by opening numerous drive-thru restaurants.[42] McDonald's has opened a McDonald's restaurant and McCafé on the underground premises of the French fine arts museum, The Louvre.[43]
The company stated it would open vegetarian-only restaurants in India by mid-2013.[44] Foreign restaurants are banned in Bermuda, with the exception of KFC, which was present before the current law was passed. Therefore, there are no McDonald's in Bermuda.[45]
On January 9, 2017, 80% of the franchise rights in the mainland China and in Hong Kong were sold for US$2.080 billion to a consortium of CITIC Limited (for 32%) and private equity funds managed by CITIC Capital (for 20%) and Carlyle (for 20%), which CITIC Limited and CITIC Capital would also formed a joint venture to own the stake.[46]
Countries with McDonald's

Africa


 Egypt
 Mauritius
 Mayotte
 Morocco
 Reunion
 South Africa
 Tunisia





Asia


 Azerbaijan
 Bahrain
 Brunei
 China

 Hong Kong
 Macau


 Cyprus
 Georgia
 India
 Indonesia
 Israel
 Japan
 Jordan
 Kazakhstan
 Kuwait
 Lebanon
 Malaysia
 Oman
 Pakistan
 Philippines
 Qatar
 Saudi Arabia
 Singapore
 South Korea
 Sri Lanka
 Taiwan
 Thailand
 Turkey
 United Arab Emirates
 Vietnam





Europe


 Andorra
 Austria
 Belarus
 Belgium
 Bosnia and Herzegovina
 Bulgaria
 Croatia
 Czech Republic
 Denmark
 Estonia
 Finland
 France
 Germany
 Greece
 Hungary
 Ireland
 Italy
 Latvia
 Liechtenstein
 Lithuania
 Luxembourg
 Malta
 Moldova
 Monaco
 Netherlands
 Norway
 Poland
 Portugal
 Romania
 Russia
 San Marino
 Serbia
 Slovakia
 Slovenia
 Spain
 Sweden
  Switzerland
 Ukraine
 United Kingdom

 Isle of Man
 Jersey







North America


 Aruba
 Bahamas
 Canada
 Costa Rica
 Cuba

 Guantanamo Bay Naval Base


 Curaçao
 Dominican Republic
 El Salvador
 Guadeloupe
 Guatemala
 Honduras
 Martinique
 Nicaragua
 Panama
 Sint Maarten
 Trinidad & Tobago
 Mexico
 United States

 Puerto Rico
 U.S. Virgin Islands







Oceania


 American Samoa
 Australia
 Fiji
 French Polynesia
 Guam
 New Caledonia
 New Zealand
 Northern Marianas
 Samoa





South America


 Argentina
 Brazil
 Chile
 Colombia
 Ecuador
 French Guiana
 Guyana
 Paraguay
 Peru
 Suriname
 Uruguay
 Venezuela




Products
Main article: List of McDonald's products




A typical "eat-in" McDonald's meal as sold in Hong Kong, consisting of French fries, a soft drink, and a "main product" - in this case, a McSpicy Chicken Fillet. Condiments are supplied in small packets; such a packet of tomato ketchup is seen in the foreground.


McDonald's predominantly sells hamburgers, various types of chicken, chicken sandwiches, French fries, soft drinks, breakfast items, and desserts. In most markets, McDonald's offers salads and vegetarian items, wraps and other localized fare. On a seasonal basis, McDonald's offers the McRib sandwich. Some speculate the seasonality of the McRib adds to its appeal.[47]
Products are offered as either "eat-in" (where the customer opts to eat in the restaurant) or "take-out" (where the customer opts to take the food for consumption off the premises). "Eat-in" meals are provided on a plastic tray with a paper insert on the floor of the tray. "Take-out" meals are usually delivered with the contents enclosed in a distinctive McDonald's-branded brown paper bag. In both cases, the individual items are wrapped or boxed as appropriate.
Since Steve Easterbrook became CEO of the company, McDonald's has streamlined the menu which in the United States contained nearly 200 items. The company has also looked to introduce healthier options, and removed high-fructose corn syrup from hamburger buns. The company has also removed artificial preservatives from Chicken McNuggets[48], replacing chicken skin, safflower oil and citric acid found in Chicken McNuggets with pea starch, rice starch and powdered lemon juice. [49]
International menu variations
See also: McDonald's products (international)




A McDonald's Ebi Feast meal sold at branches in Singapore, November 2013. McDonald's is known for tailoring its menus in different markets to cater to local tastes


Restaurants in several countries, particularly in Asia, serve soup. This local deviation from the standard menu is a characteristic for which the chain is particularly known, and one which is employed either to abide by regional food taboos (such as the religious prohibition of beef consumption in India) or to make available foods with which the regional market is more familiar (such as the sale of McRice in Indonesia, or Ebi (prawn) Burger in Singapore and Japan).
In Germany and some other Western European countries, McDonald's sells beer. In New Zealand, McDonald's sells meat pies, after the local affiliate partially relaunched the Georgie Pie fast food chain it bought out in 1996.
In the United States, after limited trials on a regional basis, McDonald's plans to offer an all-day breakfast menu whenever its restaurants are open, although eggs cannot be cooked at the same time on the same equipment as hamburgers due to different temperature requirements.[citation needed]
Restaurants





The examples and perspective in this section deal primarily with the United States and do not represent a worldwide view of the subject. You may improve this article, discuss the issue on the talk page, or create a new article, as appropriate. (November 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Types of restaurants




Counter service in a McDonald's restaurant in Dukhan, Qatar


Most standalone McDonald's restaurants offer both counter service and drive-through service, with indoor and sometimes outdoor seating.[50] Drive-Thru, Auto-Mac, Pay and Drive, or "McDrive" as it is known in many countries, often has separate stations for placing, paying for, and picking up orders, though the latter two steps are frequently combined;[50] it was first introduced in Arizona in 1975, following the lead of other fast-food chains. The first such restaurant in Britain opened at Fallowfield, Manchester in 1986.[51]
McDrive
In some countries, "McDrive" locations near highways offer no counter service or seating.[52] In contrast, locations in high-density city neighborhoods often omit drive-through service.[53] There are also a few locations, located mostly in downtown districts, that offer a "Walk-Thru" service in place of Drive-Thru.[54]
McCafé
Main article: McCafé




A Montevideo McCafé


McCafé is a café-style accompaniment to McDonald's restaurants and is a concept created by McDonald's Australia (also known, and marketed, as "Macca's" in Australia), starting with Melbourne in 1993.[55] As of 2016, most McDonald's in Australia have McCafés located within the existing McDonald's restaurant. In Tasmania, there are McCafés in every restaurant, with the rest of the states quickly following suit.[50] After upgrading to the new McCafé look and feel, some Australian restaurants have noticed up to a 60 percent increase in sales. At the end of 2003, there were over 600 McCafés worldwide.
"Create Your Taste" restaurants
From 2015–2016, McDonald's tried a new gourmet burger service/restaurant concept based on other gourmet restaurants such as Shake Shack and Grill'd. It was rolled out for the first time in Australia during the early months of 2015 and expanded to China, Hong Kong, Singapore, Arabia and New Zealand, with ongoing trials in the US market. In dedicated "Create Your Taste" (CYT) kiosks, customers could choose all ingredients including type of bun and meat along with optional extras. In late 2015 the Australian CYT service introduced CYT salads.
After a person had ordered, McDonald's advised that wait times were between 10–15 minutes. When the food was ready, trained crew ('hosts') brought the food to the customer's table. Instead of McDonald's usual cardboard and plastic packaging, CYT food was presented on wooden boards, fries in wire baskets and salads in china bowls with metal cutlery. A higher price applied.
In November 2016, Create Your Taste was replaced by a "Signature Crafted Recipes" program designed to be more efficient and less expensive.[56]
Other
Some locations are connected to gas stations/convenience stores,[57] while others called McExpress have limited seating and/or menu or may be located in a shopping mall. Other McDonald's are located in Walmart stores. McStop is a location targeted at truckers and travelers which may have services found at truck stops.[58]
In Sweden, customers who order a happy meal can use the meal's container for a pair of happy goggles.[59] The company created a game for the goggles known as "Slope Stars.[59]" McDonald's predicts happy goggles will continue in other countries.[59] In the Netherlands, McDonald's has introduced McTrax that doubles as a recording studio; it reacts to touch.[59] They can create their own beats with a synth and tweak sounds with special effects.[59]
Special diet




A kosher Express McDonald's outlet in the Malha Mall in Jerusalem





This section needs expansion with: Details of other McDonald's restaurants where special dietry requirements are catered for. You can help by adding to it. (November 2015)


The first kosher McDonald's was established in 1997 at the Abasto de Buenos Aires mall in Buenos Aires, Argentina. This is in addition to many kosher branches in Israel.[60][61]
Playgrounds




A McDonald's in Panorama City, Los Angeles, California with a Playplace designed to promote a family-friendly image





This section needs expansion. You can help by adding to it. (May 2014)


McDonald's playgrounds are called McDonald's PlayPlace. Some McDonald's in suburban areas and certain cities feature large indoor or outdoor playgrounds. The first PlayPlace with the familiar crawl-tube design with ball pits and slides was introduced in 1987 in the US, with many more being constructed soon after.
McDonald's Next




McDonald's Next in Admiralty, Hong Kong


McDonald's Next use open-concept design and offer "Create Your Taste" digital ordering. The concept store also offering free mobile device charging and table service after 6:00 pm. The first store open in Hong Kong in December 2015.[62]
2006 redesign




An American McDonald's in Mount Pleasant, Iowa in June 2008; this is an example of the "new" look of American McDonald's restaurants


In 2006, McDonald's introduced its "Forever Young" brand by redesigning all of its restaurants, the first major redesign since the 1970s.[63][64]
The goal of the redesign is to be more like a coffee shop, similar to Starbucks. The design includes wooden tables, faux-leather chairs, and muted colors; the red was muted to terracotta, the yellow was shifted to golden for a more "sunny" look, and olive and sage green were also added.
To create a warmer look, the restaurants have less plastic and more brick and wood, with modern hanging lights to produce a softer glow. Many restaurants now feature free Wi-Fi and flat-screen TVs. Other upgrades include double drive-thrus, flat roofs instead of the angled red roofs, and replacing fiber glass with wood. Also, instead of the familiar golden arches, the restaurants now feature "semi-swooshes" (half of a golden arch), similar to the Nike swoosh.[65]
Smoking ban
McDonald's began banning smoking in 1994 when it banned smoking within its 1,400 wholly owned restaurants.[66]
Treatment of employees




A McDonald's employee takes an order in the Philippines


Automation
Since the late 1990s, McDonald's has attempted to replace employees with electronic kiosks which would perform actions such taking orders and accepting money. In 1999, McDonald's first tested "E-Clerks" in suburban Chicago, Illinois, and Wyoming, Michigan, with the devices being able to "save money on live staffers" and attracting larger purchase amounts than average employees.[67]
In 2013, the University of Oxford estimated that in the succeeding decades, there was a 92% probability of food preparation and serving to become automated in fast food establishments.[68] By 2016, McDonald's "Create Your Taste" electronic kiosks were seen in some restaurants internationally where customers could custom order meals. As employees pushed for higher wages in the late-2010s, some believed that fast food companies such as McDonald's would use the devices to cut costs for employing individuals.[69]
Wages
On August 5, 2013, The Guardian revealed that 90 percent of McDonald's UK workforce are on zero hour contracts, making it possibly the largest such private sector employer in the country.[70] A study released by Fast Food Forward conducted by Anzalone Liszt Grove Research showed that approximately 84 percent of all fast food employees working in New York City in April 2013 had been paid less than their legal wages by their employers.[71]
From 2007 to 2011, fast food workers in the US drew an average of $7 billion of public assistance annually resulting from receiving low wages.[72] The McResource website advised employees to break their food into smaller pieces to feel fuller, seek refunds for unopened holiday purchases, sell possessions online for quick cash, and to "quit complaining" as "stress hormone levels rise by 15 percent after ten minutes of complaining."[73] In December 2013, McDonald's shut down the McResource website amidst negative publicity and criticism. McDonald's plans to continue an internal telephone help line through which its employees can obtain advice on work and life problems.[74]
Liberal thinktank the Roosevelt Institute accuses some McDonald's restaurants of actually paying less than the minimum wage to entry positions due to 'rampant' wage theft.[75] In South Korea, McDonald's pays part-time employees $5.50 an hour and is accused of paying less with arbitrary schedules adjustments and pay delays.[76] In late 2015, Anonymous aggregated data collected by Glassdoor suggests that McDonald's in the United States pays entry-level employees between $7.25 an hour and $11 an hour, with an average of $8.69 an hour. Shift managers get paid an average of $10.34 an hour. Assistant managers get paid an average of $11.57 an hour.[77] McDonald's CEO, Steve Easterbrook, currently earns an annual salary of $1,100,000.[78]
Strikes
See also: Fast food worker strikes




Fast food workers on strike outside of a McDonald's in St. Paul, Minnesota.


McDonald's workers have on occasions decided to strike over pay, with most of the employees on strike seeking to be paid $15.00.[79] When interviewed about the strikes occurring, former McDonald's CEO Ed Rensi stated: "It's cheaper to buy a $35,000 robotic arm than it is to hire an employee who's inefficient making $15 an hour bagging french fries" with Rensi explaining that increasing employee wages could possibly take away from entry-level jobs.[80] However, according to current McDonald's CEO Steve Easterbrook, increasing wages and benefits for workers saw a 6% increase in customer satisfaction when comparing 2015's first quarter data to the first quarter of 2016, with greater returns seen as a result.[80]
Working conditions
In March 2015, McDonald's workers in 19 US cities filed 28 health and safety complaints with OSHA which allege that low staffing, lack of protective gear, poor training and pressure to work fast has resulted in injuries. The complaints also allege that, because of a lack of first aid supplies, workers were told by management to treat burn injuries with condiments such as mayonnaise and mustard. The Fight for $15 labor organization aided the workers in filing the complaints.[81]
Animal welfare standards
In 2015, McDonald's pledged to stop using eggs from battery cage facilities by 2025. Since McDonald's purchases over 2 billion eggs per year or 4 percent of eggs produced in the United States, the switch is expected to have a major impact on the egg industry and is part of a general trend toward cage-free eggs driven by consumer concern over the harsh living conditions of hens.[82][83] The aviary systems from which the new eggs will be sourced are troubled by much higher mortality rates, as well as introducing environmental and worker safety problems.[84] The high hen mortality rate, which is more than double that of battery cage systems, will require new research to mitigate. The facilities also have higher ammonia levels due to faeces being kicked up into the air. Producers raised concerns about the production cost, which is expected to increase by 36 percent.[85]
McDonald's continues to source pork from facilities that use gestation crates, and in 2012 pledged to phase them out.[86]
Marketing and advertising
Main article: McDonald's advertising
McDonald's has for decades maintained an extensive advertising campaign. In addition to the usual media (television, radio, and newspaper), the company makes significant use of billboards and signage, sponsors sporting events ranging from Little League to the FIFA World Cup and Olympic Games.[87] Television has played a central role in the company's advertising strategy.[citation needed] To date, McDonald's has used 23 different slogans in United States advertising, as well as a few other slogans for select countries and regions.[88]
India





The neutrality of this section is disputed. Relevant discussion may be found on the talk page. Please do not remove this message until conditions to do so are met. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article contains wording that promotes the subject in a subjective manner without imparting real information. Please remove or replace such wording and instead of making proclamations about a subject's importance, use facts and attribution to demonstrate that importance. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


McDonald's began operations in India in 1996. It retained Leo Burnett (India) to provide authentic Indian insights regarding local favorite items, religious-based food taboos, and India's strong vegetarian tradition. Hamburgers are made of lamb or chicken, instead of beef. Local favorite foods are adapted into menu items such as McAloo Tikki, a breaded potato pancake on a bun. To assure vegetarian customers, kitchens are divided into vegetarian and non-vegetarian zones. Advertising tells Indians that McDonald's bright, inviting restaurants do not mean high prices; profit strategy uses low prices to generate high volume sales. Locally McDonald's of India sponsored sports programs and donations to visible charities.[89]
Space exploration
McDonald's and NASA explored an advertising agreement for a planned mission to the asteroid 449 Hamburga; however, the spacecraft was eventually cancelled.[90]
Children's advertising
Main articles: Ronald McDonald and McDonaldland
Sports awards and honors
See also: Category:McDonald's High School All-Americans
McDonald's is the title sponsor of the McDonald's All-American Game, all-star basketball games played each year for American and Canadian boys' and girls' high school basketball graduates
Charity
See also: Ronald McDonald House Charities
McHappy Day




A Ronald McDonald House collection box in Framingham, Massachusetts


McHappy Day is an annual event at McDonald's, where a percentage of the day's sales go to charity. It is the signature fundraising event for Ronald McDonald House Charities.[91]
In 2007, it was celebrated in 17 countries: Argentina, Australia, Austria, Brazil, Canada, the United States, Finland, France, Guatemala, Hungary, England, Ireland, New Zealand, Norway, Sweden, Switzerland, and Uruguay.
According to the Australian McHappy Day website, McHappy Day raised $20.4 million in 2009. The goal for 2010 was $20.8 million.[92]
McDonald's Monopoly donation
In 1995, St. Jude Children's Research Hospital received an anonymous letter postmarked in Dallas, Texas, containing a $1 million winning McDonald's Monopoly game piece. McDonald's officials came to the hospital, accompanied by a representative from the accounting firm Arthur Andersen, who examined the card under a jeweler's eyepiece, handled it with plastic gloves, and verified it as a winner.[93] Although game rules prohibited the transfer of prizes, McDonald's waived the rule and has made the annual $50,000 annuity payments, even after learning that the piece was sent by an individual involved in an embezzlement scheme intended to defraud McDonald's (see McDonald's Monopoly).
McRefugee
See also: McRefugee
McRefugees are poor people in Hong Kong, Japan, and China who use McDonald's 24-hour restaurants as a temporary hostel. One in five of Hong Kong's population lives below the poverty line. The rise of McRefugees was first documented by photographer Suraj Katra in 2013.[94]
Criticism




A PETA activist dressed as a chicken confronts the manager of the Times Square McDonald's over the company's animal welfare standards


In 1990, activists from a small group known as London Greenpeace (no connection to the international group Greenpeace) distributed leaflets entitled What's wrong with McDonald's?, criticizing its environmental, health, and labor record. The corporation wrote to the group demanding they desist and apologize, and, when two of the activists refused to back down, sued them for libel in one of the longest cases in British civil law. A documentary film of the McLibel Trial has been shown in several countries.[95]
In the late 1980s, Phil Sokolof, a millionaire businessman who had suffered a heart attack at the age of 43, took out full-page newspaper ads in New York, Chicago, and other large cities accusing McDonald's menu of being a threat to American health, and asking them to stop using beef tallow to cook their french fries.[citation needed]
Despite the objections of McDonald's, the term "McJob" was added to Merriam-Webster's Collegiate Dictionary in 2003.[96] The term was defined as "a low-paying job that requires little skill and provides little opportunity for advancement".[97]
In 2001, Eric Schlosser's book Fast Food Nation included criticism of the business practices of McDonald's. Among the critiques were allegations that McDonald's (along with other companies within the fast food industry) uses its political influence to increase its profits at the expense of people's health and the social conditions of its workers. The book also brought into question McDonald's advertisement techniques in which it targets children. While the book did mention other fast-food chains, it focused primarily on McDonald's.
In 2002, vegetarian groups, largely Hindu and Buddhist, successfully sued McDonald's for misrepresenting its French fries as vegetarian, when they contained beef broth.[98]
Morgan Spurlock's 2004 documentary film Super Size Me claimed that McDonald's food was contributing to the increase of obesity in society and that the company was failing to provide nutritional information about its food for its customers. Six weeks after the film premiered, McDonald's announced that it was eliminating the super size option, and was creating the adult Happy Meal.




Screenshot from McDonald's Videogame


In 2006, an unsanctioned McDonald's Videogame was released online. It is parody of the business practices of the corporate giant, taking the guise of a tycoon style business simulation game. In the game, the player plays the role of a McDonald's CEO, choosing whether or not to use controversial practices like genetically altered cow feed, plowing over rainforests, and corrupting public officials. McDonald's issued a statement distancing itself from the game.[99]
In January 2014, it was reported that McDonald's was accused of having used a series of tax maneuvers to avoid taxes in France. The company confirmed that tax authorities had visited McDonald's French headquarters in Paris but insisted that it had not done anything wrong, saying, "McDonald's firmly denies the accusation made by L'Express according to which McDonald's supposedly hid part of its revenue from taxes in France."[100]
Company responses to criticism




Discreet shopfront in historic Stratford-upon-Avon


In response to public pressure, McDonald's has sought to include more healthy choices in its menu and has introduced a new slogan to its recruitment posters: "Not bad for a McJob".[101] The word McJob, first attested in the mid-1980s[96] and later popularized by Canadian novelist Douglas Coupland in his book Generation X, has become a buzz word for low-paid, unskilled work with few prospects or benefits and little security. McDonald's disputes this definition of McJob. In 2007, the company launched an advertising campaign with the slogan "Would you like a career with that?" on Irish television, asserting that its jobs have good prospects.
In an effort to respond to growing consumer awareness of food provenance, the fast-food chain changed its supplier of both coffee beans and milk. UK chief executive Steve Easterbrook said: "British consumers are increasingly interested in the quality, sourcing, and ethics of the food and drink they buy".[102] In a bid to tap into the ethical consumer market,[103] McDonald's switched to using coffee beans taken from stocks that are certified by the Rainforest Alliance, a conservation group. Additionally, in response to pressure, McDonald's UK started using organic milk supplies for its bottled milk and hot drinks, although it still uses conventional milk in its milkshakes, and in all of its dairy products in the United States.[104] According to a report published by Farmers Weekly in 2007, the quantity of milk used by McDonald's could have accounted for as much as 5 percent of the UK's organic milk output.[105]
McDonald's announced on May 22, 2008, that, in the United States and Canada, it would switch to using cooking oil that contains no trans fats for its french fries, and canola-based oil with corn and soy oils, for its baked items, pies and cookies, by year's end.[106][107]
With regard to acquiring chickens from suppliers who use CAK/CAS methods of slaughter, McDonald's says that it needs to see more research "to help determine whether any CAS system in current use is optimal from an animal welfare perspective."[108]
Environmental record
In April 2008, McDonald's announced that 11 of its Sheffield, England restaurants have been engaged in a biomass trial that had cut its waste and carbon footprint by half in the area. In this trial, wastes from the restaurants were collected by Veolia Environmental Services and were used to produce energy at a power plant. McDonald's plans to expand this project, although the lack of biomass power plants in the United States will prevent this plan from becoming a national standard anytime soon.[109] In addition, in Europe, McDonald's has been recycling vegetable grease by converting it to fuel for its diesel trucks.[110]
McDonald's has been using a corn-based bioplastic to produce containers for some of its products. The environmental benefits of this technology are controversial, with critics noting that biodegradation is slow, produces greenhouse gases and that contamination of traditional plastic waste streams with bioplastics can complicate recycling efforts.[111]
In 1990, McDonald's worked with the Environmental Defense Fund to stop using "clam shell" shaped styrofoam food containers to house its food products.[112] 20 years later, McDonald's announced they would try replacing styrofoam coffee cups with an alternative material.[113]
The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency has recognized McDonald's continuous effort to reduce solid waste by designing more efficient packaging and by promoting the use of recycled-content materials.[114] McDonald's reports that it is committed towards environmental leadership by effectively managing electric energy, by conserving natural resources through recycling and reusing materials, and by addressing water management issues within the restaurant.[115]
In an effort to reduce energy usage by 25 percent in its restaurants, McDonald's opened a prototype restaurant in Chicago in 2009 with the intention of using the model in its other restaurants throughout the world. Building on past efforts, specifically a restaurant it opened in Sweden in 2000 that was the first to intentionally incorporate green ideas, McDonald's designed the Chicago site to save energy by incorporating old and new ideas such as managing storm water, using skylights for more natural lighting and installing some partitions and tabletops made from recycled goods.[116]
When McDonald's received criticism for its environmental policies in the 1970s, it began to make substantial progress in reducing its use of materials.[117] For instance, an "average meal" in the 1970s—a Big Mac, fries, and a drink—required 46 grams of packaging; today, it requires only 25 grams, allowing a 46 percent reduction.[118] In addition, McDonald's eliminated the need for intermediate containers for cola by having a delivery system that pumps syrup directly from the delivery truck into storage containers, saving two million pounds (910 tonnes) of packaging annually.[119] Overall, weight reductions in packaging and products, as well as the increased usage of bulk packaging ultimately decreased packaging by twenty-four million pounds (11,000 tonnes) annually.[120]
Legal cases
Main article: McDonald's legal cases
McDonald's has been involved in a number of lawsuits and other legal cases, most of which involved trademark disputes. The company has threatened many food businesses with legal action unless it drops the Mc or Mac from trading names.
Asia
On September 8, 2009, McDonald's Malaysian operations lost a lawsuit to prevent another restaurant calling itself McCurry. McDonald's lost in an appeal to Malaysia's highest court, the Federal Court.[121]
Australia
In April 2007, in Perth, Western Australia, McDonald's pleaded guilty to five charges relating to the employment of children under 15 in one of its outlets and was fined A$8,000.[122]
In 2016, the Australian Taxation Office revealed that McDonald's Asia-Pacific Consortium had generated $478 million in revenue in 2013–14, but had paid no tax on those earnings whatsoever.[123]
United Kingdom
McDonald's has defended itself in several cases involving workers' rights.[citation needed]
The longest running legal action of all time in the UK was the McLibel case against 2 defendants who criticized a number of aspects of the company. The trial lasted 10 years and called 130 witnesses. The European Court of Human Rights deemed that the unequal resources of the litigants breached the defendants rights to freedom of speech and biased the trial. The result was widely seen as a "PR disaster."[124]
United States
A famous legal case in the US involving McDonald's was the 1994 decision in Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants where Stella Liebeck was awarded several million dollars after she suffered third-degree burns after spilling a scalding cup of McDonald's coffee on herself.[125]
Use of genetically modified food
In April 2014, it was reported that McDonald's will use, in Europe, chicken meat that was produced by using genetically modified animal feed. Greenpeace argues that McDonald's saves less than one Eurocent for each chicken burger and goes down a path not desired by its customers.[126]
See also





Book: McDonald's





Arcos Dorados Holdings
Burger King—the second largest burger chain
List of hamburger restaurants
List of restaurant chains
The Founder—a 2016 film detailing the creation and controversial business history of McDonald's, that is also a biopic of Ray Kroc
MaDonal—a restaurant operating in northern Iraq that copies many features of McDonald's, illicitly
Maxime, McDuff & McDo-documentary film about the unionizing of a McDonald's in Montreal, Quebec, Canada
Wendy's—the third largest hamburger chain



Food portal
Companies portal
Chicago portal
Illinois portal


References


^ Bomkamp, Samantha (June 13, 2016). "Mcdonald's HQ Move Is Boldest Step Yet in Effort to Transform Itself". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved May 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e f g "Form 10-K: McDonald's Corporation (McDonald's Corporation 2016 Annual Report)" (PDF). United States Securities and Exchange Commission. Commission File Number 1-5231. Retrieved May 1, 2017. 
^ a b "McDonald's future Near West Side neighbors air parking, traffic safety beefs". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved August 7, 2016. 
^ a b Hufford, Austen (June 14, 2016). "McDonald’s to Move Headquarters to Downtown Chicago". Retrieved August 7, 2016 – via Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c http://d18rn0p25nwr6d.cloudfront.net/CIK-0000063908/62200c2b-da82-4364-be92-79ed454e3b88.pdf
^ Robbins, John (October 8, 2010). "How Bad Is McDonald's Food?". Huffington Post. 
^ "The McDonalds and Their Restaurant". www.referenceforbusiness.com. Retrieved January 16, 2017. In 1962, McDonald's golden arches replaced Speedee as the restaurant's main symbol, and ads told customers to "Look for the golden arches." ... Kroc believed in advertising heavily and in targeting children. In 1965, the company introduced a new mascot, a red-haired clown named Ronald McDonald, who became a frequent and friendly face in television commercials. 
^ "McDonalds Museum". Juan Pollo. Retrieved May 14, 2012. 
^ a b McDonald's – The Leading Global Food Service Retailer :: AboutMcDonalds.com, retrieved May 8, 2008
^ "McDonald's Momentum Delivers Another Year of Strong Results for 2011". Yahoo Finance. 2012. Retrieved January 25, 2012. [dead link]
^ Brand, Rachel (December 23, 2006). "Chipotle founder had big dreams". Rocky Mountain News. Archived from the original on July 8, 2009. Retrieved April 27, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's sets October deadline to sell Chipotle stock". Denver Business Journal. BizJournals.com. July 25, 2006. Retrieved August 10, 2009. 
^ "McDonald's Wraps Up Boston Market Sale". Dow Jones & Company, Inc. News Services. August 27, 2007. Archived from the original on September 28, 2007. Retrieved August 28, 2007. 
^ Baertlein, Lisa (September 24, 2009). "McDonald's raises cash dividend by 10%". reuters.com. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ "Definition of S&P 500 Aristocrat at Investopedia". Investopedia.com. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ "List of 2009 Dividend Aristocrats via Seeking Alpha, retrieved 10/1/2009". Seekingalpha.com. December 23, 2008. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ Tiffany Hsu (November 9, 2012). "McDonald's monthly sales fall for first time in nine years". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved March 9, 2013. 
^ "McDonald's New Turnaround Plan Is So 1990s". 
^ Baertlein, Lisa (March 14, 2017). "McDonald's, late to mobile ordering, seeks to avoid pitfalls". Reuters. Retrieved March 15, 2017. 
^ Patton, Leslie (November 23, 2015). "McDonald's Knows You're Sick of Screw-Ups at Drive-Thru Windows". Bloomberg. Retrieved March 15, 2017. 
^ Ferdman, Roberto A. (August 13, 2015). "This is a terrible sign for McDonald's". The Washington Post. 
^ a b "McDonald's to Cut U.S. Stores for First Time in Decades". The New York Times. Associated Press. June 18, 2015. 
^ LUBLIN, JOANN S.; JARGON, JULIE (October 15, 2015). "McDonald’s Nears Decision on Real Estate". Retrieved October 22, 2015. 
^ Jargon, Julie. "McDonald's Won't Spin Off Real Estate Holdings". Wall Street Journal. ISSN 0099-9660. Retrieved November 11, 2015. 
^ "Hamburger University Campus". mcdonalds.com. Retrieved January 18, 2017. 
^ "Hamburger University - Our Facility". 
^ "McDonald’s Business Model and Strategy :: McDonald’s". corporate.mcdonalds.com. Retrieved January 24, 2017. 
^ Eidelson, Josh (November 19, 2013). "McDonald's tells workers to "sing away stress," "chew away cares" and go to church". Salon. Retrieved August 21, 2014. These and other tips appear on a "McResource Line" website created by the McDonald's Corp. to advise workers on stress, health and personal finances. Among the tips that appear on the site: "Chewing gum can reduce cortisol levels by 16%"; "At least two vacations a year can cut heart attack risk by 50%"; "Singing along to your favorite songs can lower your blood pressure"; and "People who attend more church services tend to have lower blood pressure." 
^ Schlosser, Eric. Fast Food Nation. 
^ Steele, Jeffrey. Oak Brook history in caring hands society president is part of village's changing heritage". Chicago Tribune. July 29, 1998. Page 88. Retrieved on September 17, 2009.
^ Cross, Robert. Inside Hamburger Central". Chicago Tribune. January 9, 1972. G18. Retrieved on September 17, 2009.
^ "Board of Directors Biographical Information". McDonald's. Retrieved November 3, 2014. 
^ "India's 50 most trusted brands". Rediff.com. January 20, 2011. 
^ "The Big Mac index". The Economist. October 7, 2015. 
^ "The Big Mac index – Currency comparisons, to go". The Economist. July 28, 2011. Retrieved July 28, 2011. 
^ Friedman, Thomas L. (December 8, 1996). "Foreign Affairs Big Mac I". The New York Times. ISSN 0362-4331. Retrieved January 24, 2017. 
^ "The Lexus and the Olive Tree". Thomaslfriedman.com. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's quits Crimea due to fears of trade clash". INA Daily News. Retrieved April 5, 2014. 
^ "Russia Shuts 4 McDonald's Restaurants Amid Ukraine Tensions". Moscow News.Net. August 20, 2014. Retrieved August 21, 2014. 
^ "Russian Deputy PM says McDonalds is not being targeted in response to sanctions". Russia Herald. August 23, 2014. Retrieved August 23, 2014. 
^ Stanford University Press, 1998, edited by James L. Watson
^ "McDonald's deal with oil company marries China's new love of fast food, cars". Archived from the original on March 25, 2007. 
^ Samuel, Henry (October 4, 2009). "McDonald's restaurants to open at the Louvre". The Daily Telegraph. London. 
^ Gasparro, Annie; Jargon, Julie (September 5, 2012). "McDonald's to Go Vegetarian in India". The Wall Street Journal. p. B7. 
^ "10 Countries That Don't Have McDonald's". WhatCulture.com. Retrieved December 1, 2015. 
^ "VOLUNTARY ANNOUNCEMENT: ACQUISITION OF A CONTROLLING INTEREST IN MCDONALD'S MAINLAND CHINA AND HONG KONG BUSINESSES" (PDF). CITIC Limited. Hong Kong Stock Exchange. January 9, 2017. Retrieved January 13, 2017. 
^ "Fanatics Preach Fast Food Evangelism". Fox News. July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald’s is going for healthier fare and greater digitisation". The Economist. January 28, 2017. ISSN 0013-0613. Retrieved February 5, 2017. 
^ "McDonald's to remove corn syrup from buns, curbs antibiotics in chicken". August 1, 2016 – via Reuters. 
^ a b c Mohapatra, Sanjay (2012). Information Strategy Design and Practices. Google Books: Springer Science & Business Media. p. 301. ISBN 1-4614-2427-5. 
^ "McDonald's Restaurants". Caterersearch.com. Archived from the original on July 16, 2011. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDrive: il fast food comodo, facile e veloce". McDonald's Italia. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's vs Newk's Franchise Cost Comparison and Analysis". www.thefranchisemall.com. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ Duca, Lauren. "This McDonald's has a "Walk-Thru"". Teen Vogue. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's Australia". mcdonalds.com.au. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ Kieler, Ashlee. "McDonald's Ends 'Create Your Taste' Customized Burger Program". Consumerist. Retrieved December 18, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's and BP test combined operations. (McDonald's Restaurants; BP Oil Co.)". Archived from the original on January 18, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's serves up 'MCSTOP' – Its restaurant for big crowds". August 16, 1984. 
^ a b c d e "Restaurants going high tech". Yahoo Tech. June 14, 2016. Retrieved June 14, 2016. 
^ "El único Mc Donald's kosher del mundo fuera de Israel es certificado por Ajdut Kosher" (Spanish and English). Last consulted: May 22, 2011
^ "Buenos Aires Restaurants – Kosher McDonald's". travel.nytimes.com. Archived from the original on March 3, 2009. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "Big Mac with a side of quinoa? Inside the world's first McDonald's Next". edition.cnn.com. Cable News Network. Retrieved August 9, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's wants a digital-age makeover". 
^ "Mickey D's McMakeover". Archived from the original on May 24, 2006. 
^ Bruce Horovitz (May 9, 2011). "McDonald's revamps store to look more upscale". USA Today. Retrieved June 26, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's Bans Smoking at All the Sites It Owns". The New York Times. February 24, 1994. 
^ Gibson, Richard (August 12, 1999). "Want Fries With That? Ask McDonald's New E-Clerks". The Wall Street Journal.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ O'Toole, James (May 22, 2014). "Robots will replace fast-food workers". CNN Money. Retrieved August 18, 2016. 
^ Johnson, Hollis (May 16, 2016). "Fast food workers are becoming obsolete". Business Insider. Retrieved August 18, 2016. 
^ Neville, Simon (August 25, 2008). "McDonald's ties nine out of 10 workers to zero-hours contracts". The Guardian. London. Retrieved August 10, 2013. 
^ ' 'Anzalone Liszt Grove Research' ' and ' 'Fast Food Foreward' '. New York's Hidden Crime Wave: Wage Theft and New York City's Fast Food Workers
^ Maclay, Kathleen. "Fast Food, Poverty Wages: The Public Cost of Low-wage jobs in the Fast Food Industry". University of California Labor Center October 15, 2013.
^ Susanna Kim (November 21, 2013). McDonald's Defends Telling Workers to 'Quit Complaining' to Reduce Stress. ABC News. Retrieved November 21, 2013.
^ Associated Press (December 26, 2013). "McDonald's Closes Employee Website Amid Criticism". DailyDigest. Archived from the original on December 28, 2013. Retrieved December 26, 2013. 
^ Goldberg, Harmony, "How McDonald's gets away with rampant wage theft", Salon, April 6, 2015. Accessed May 22, 2015.
^ Tae-hoon, Lee (August 16, 2015). "McDonald's lures customers with illegal ads on Independence Day". The Korea Observer. Retrieved August 17, 2015. 
^ "McDonald's Hourly Pay". Glassdoor. Retrieved December 1, 2015. 
^ Beckerman, Josh. "McDonald's New CEO Gets 69% Pay Raise"[dead link], Wall Street Journal, March 3, 2015. Accessed May 22, 2015.
^ Bruce Horovitz and Yamiche Alcindor (April 15, 2015). Fast-food strikes widen into social-justice movement. USA Today. Accessed May 22, 2015.
^ a b Taylor, Kate (May 25, 2016). "McDonald's ex-CEO just revealed a terrifying reality for fast-food workers". Business Insider. Retrieved August 18, 2016. 
^ Jana Kasperkevic (March 16, 2015). McDonald's workers told to treat burns with condiments, survey shows. The Guardian. Retrieved March 17, 2015.
^ Owen, Tess (September 10, 2015). "McDonald's Is Switching to Cage-Free Eggs at a Delicate Moment for the Poultry Industry". VICE News. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ "The Insanely Complicated Logistics of Cage-Free Eggs for All". Wired. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ Gelles, David (July 16, 2016). "Eggs That Clear the Cages, but Maybe Not the Conscience". New York Times. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ Kesmodel, David (March 18, 2015). "Cage-Free Hens Study Finds Little Difference in Egg Quality". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ Strom, Stephanie (February 13, 2012). "McDonald's Set to Phase Out Suppliers' Use of Sow Crates". New York Times. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's renews as FIFA World Cup Sponsor until 2014". FIFA.com. Retrieved October 24, 2014
^ "McDonald's slogans used around the world, past and present". Retrieved June 23, 2015. 
^ William M. O'Barr, "Advertising in India." Advertising & Society Review 9#3 (2008): 1-33.
^ "Mars rover Curiosity's other mission: publicity machine". Statesman.com. December 5, 2012. Retrieved March 9, 2013. 
^ McHappy Day, Ronald McDonald House Charities. Retrieved September 12, 2010.
^ McHappy Day Retrieved November 8, 2010.
^ "Donor Turns Fast Food Into Big Bucks For Hospital". The New York Times. December 8, 1995. Retrieved May 24, 2010. 
^ "The night time 'McRefugees' of Hong Kong". BBC news. October 27, 2015. Retrieved October 10, 2016. 
^ "BBC NEWS | UK | McLibel: Longest case in English history". BBC News. Retrieved April 9, 2015. 
^ a b Associated Press (November 11, 2003). "Merriam-Webster: 'McJob' is here to stay". CNN Offbeat News. 
^ "McJob". Merriam-Webster's Online Dictionary. 1986. Retrieved November 29, 2009. 
^ "Letter from McDonald's headquarters claiming fries are vegetarian". 
^ Bluestien, Greg. "Creators Put Politics Into Video Games", The Associated Press, published January 21, 2007, accessed April 20, 2007.
^ "Do You Want Fries With That Audit?". Forbes. January 23, 2014. 
^ Sweney, Mark (April 20, 2006). "Not bad for a McJob?". The Guardian. London. Retrieved March 30, 2009. 
^ Ian Ashbridge (July 3, 2007). "McDonalds' milk goes organic – 7/3/2007 – Farmers Weekly". Fwi.co.uk. Archived from the original on May 14, 2012. Retrieved June 7, 2012. 
^ Carrigan, Marylyn and De Pelsmacker, Patrick (2009). Will ethical consumers sustain their values in the global credit crunch? International Marketing Review, 26(6), pp. 674–687,(p.7).
^ "The Truth-O-Meter : Chef Jamie Oliver praises McDonald's in England". Truth-O-Meter. Tampa Bay Times. Retrieved October 22, 2012. 
^ Ian Ashbridge (July 3, 2007). "McDonald's milk goes organic – 03/07/2007 – FarmersWeekly". Fwi.co.uk. Archived from the original on September 24, 2009. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ "McDonald's Holds down Dollar Meal, Making Menu Healthier". International Business Times. May 22, 2008. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's says all US French fries cooked in zero-trans-fat oil". www.gmanews. Archived from the original on January 14, 2011. 
^ "Report of the Corporate Responsibility Committee of the Board of Directors of McDonald's Corporation" (PDF). November 19, 2009. Archived from the original (PDF) on July 17, 2011. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's hails success of waste-to-energy trial". Businessgreen.com. April 14, 2008. Archived from the original on September 26, 2012. Retrieved April 9, 2015. 
^ "Local woman creates environmental-friendly Web site". Herald-dispatch.com. April 19, 2008. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ Vidal, John (April 26, 2008). "'Sustainable' bio-plastic can damage the environment". The Guardian. London. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's and Environmental Defense Fund Mark 20 Years of Partnerships for Sustainability". Environmental Defense Fund. November 15, 2010. Retrieved November 28, 2013. 
^ "McDonald's testing eco-friendlier coffee cups". NBC News. March 12, 2012. Retrieved November 28, 2013. 
^ "U.S. Environmental Protection Agency". Archived from the original on August 5, 2012. Retrieved April 17, 2008. 
^ "McDonald's Corporation website". Archived from the original on May 31, 2016. Retrieved April 17, 2008. 
^ Goodman, Matthew (April 5, 2009). "Big Mac, hold the CO2". The Sunday Times. London. 
^ "National Pollution Prevention Center for Higher Education" (PDF). 
^ Environmental Defense Fund. Task Force Report. p. 42.
^ Environmental Defense Fund and McDonald's Corporation. Waste Reduction Task Force Final Report. Oak Brook, IL: McDonald's, 1991. p. 22.
^ "Corporation. McDonald's Packaging – The Facts. Oak Brook, IL: McDonald's, 1990. p. 7.". 
^ BBC online news article dated September 8, 2009 News.BB.co.uk
^ "McDonald's fined for employing underage workers". ABC News Online. April 12, 2007. Archived from the original on April 18, 2007. Retrieved April 12, 2007. 
^ "98 private companies earning over $200m pay no tax: ATO". ABC News. Retrieved April 4, 2016. 
^ "McLibel: Longest case in English history". BBC news. February 15, 2005. Retrieved January 17, 2016. 
^ Do You Know the Full Story Behind the Infamous McDonald's Coffee Case and How Corporations Used it to Promote Tort Reform? Democracy Now! January 25, 2011.
^ "McDonald's: Gentechnik im Burger". Spiegel Online (in German). April 27, 2014. Retrieved December 1, 2015. 


Further reading

Evans, Stephen (April 20, 2004). "McDonald's: The journey to health". BBC News. Retrieved June 30, 2016. 
Horovitz, Bruce (May 8, 2014). "McDonald's testing seasoned fries". USA Today. Retrieved June 30, 2016. 
Love, John F. (April 1987). "Big Macs, Fries, and Real Estate". Financial Executive (4): 20–6. 
Thomas Derdak and Jay P. Pederson, ed. (2004). "McDonald's". International directory of company histories. 67 (3rd ed.). St. James Press. pp. 108–9. ISBN 978-1-55862-512-9. 
"McDonald's : Behind The Arches" by John F. Love, paperback July 1, 1995
"Grinding It Out: The Making of McDonald's" by Ray Kroc, 1977 ISBN 0809282593
"Ray & Joan: The Man Who Made the McDonald's Fortune and the Woman Who Gave It All Away" by Lisa Napoli, 2016 ISBN 1101984953
"Fast Food Nation: The Dark Side of the All-American Meal" by Eric Schlosser, 2001 ISBN 0395977894

External links

Find more aboutMcDonald'sat Wikipedia's sister projects

Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Travel guide from Wikivoyage
Learning resources from Wikiversity
Data from Wikidata



Official Website
Corporate Website



Business data for McDonald's: Google Finance
Yahoo! Finance
Reuters
SEC filings










v
t
e


McDonald's






History
Advertising

ad programs


Countries with franchises
Legal cases
Product list
International availability





People



Richard and Maurice McDonald
Ray Kroc
Joan Kroc
Ralph Alvarez
Charlie Bell
Al Bernardin
Jim Cantalupo
George Cohon
Dan Coudreaut
Steve Easterbrook
Janice L. Fields
Den Fujita
Don Gorske
Jack M. Greenberg
Eikō Harada
June Martino
Herb Peterson
Michael R. Quinlan
Ed Rensi
Willard Scott
James A. Skinner
Donald N. Smith
Harry J. Sonneborn
Don Thompson
Fred L. Turner





Company



Hamburger University
Leaps and Bounds
McBarge
McCafé
McDonald's #1 Store Museum
McDonald's (Will Rogers Turnpike)
Oldest McDonald's restaurant
Rock N Roll McDonald's
Ronald McDonald House Charities





Products




Beef



Big Mac
Big N' Tasty
Deluxe line
Kiwiburger
Quarter Pounder (McRoyal)





Chicken



Chicken McNuggets
McChicken





Other



Deli Choices
Filet-O-Fish
Georgie Pie
Happy Meal
McArabia
McGriddles
McMuffin
McRib
Premium line
Shamrock Shake





Former



Arch Deluxe
McAfrika








Advertising




Campaigns



Changeables
Global Gladiators
Golden Arches
Mac Tonight
McDonaldland
McDonald's Monopoly
McDonald's Treasure Land Adventure
M.C. Kids
McKids
Ronald McDonald
Teenie Beanies
The Wacky Adventures of Ronald McDonald





Sponsorships



Kyle Larson (NASCAR)
Jamie McMurray (NASCAR)
Graham Rahal (IndyCar Series)
McDonald's All-American Game
McDonald's Championship
McDonald's Championship (golf)
McDonald's Cycle Center
McDonald's Gospelfest
McDonald's Olympic Swim Stadium





Related



Burger wars
Donald Land
Fast food advertising
Mac and Me (1988 film)
McDonald's sign (Pine Bluff, Arkansas)
Supersize








Branches



Canada
Israel
New Zealand





Criticism



Fast Food Nation (film)
McDonaldization
McDonald's Videogame
McJob
McRefugee
McLibel
Maxime, McDuff & McDo
Super Size Me

Don't Eat This Book







Legal cases



Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants
Magee v. McDonald's
McDonald's Restaurants v. Morris & Steel
Sid & Marty Krofft Television Productions Inc. v. McDonald's Corp.





Related



McDelivery
Big Mac Index
Bill Elliott
McDonald's Young Entertainers
McWords
San Ysidro McDonald's massacre
"Seriously McDonalds"
Sydney River McDonald's murders
Taiwan McDonald's bombings
Urban legends
Boom, Like That
The Founder (2016 film)










Links to related articles











v
t
e


Components of the Dow Jones Industrial Average






3M
American Express
Apple
Boeing
Caterpillar
Chevron
Cisco Systems
Coca-Cola
Disney
DuPont
ExxonMobil
General Electric
Goldman Sachs
The Home Depot
Intel
IBM
Johnson & Johnson
JPMorgan Chase
McDonald's
Merck & Co.
Microsoft
Nike
Pfizer
Procter & Gamble
Travelers
UnitedHealth Group
United Technologies
Verizon Communications
Visa
Walmart












v
t
e


Fast food and fast casual restaurant chains in the United States






Chicken chains
Coffeehouse chains
Pizza chains





Hamburgers



A&W
Arctic Circle
Back Yard
Big Boy
Burger King
Burgerville
Carl's Jr.
Checkers/Rally's
Cook Out
Fatburger
Five Guys
Freddy's
Fuddruckers
The Habit
Hardee's
Hwy 55
In-N-Out
Jack in the Box
Johnny Rockets
Krystal
McDonald's
Red Robin
Roy Rogers
Shake Shack
Smashburger
Sonic
Steak 'n Shake
Wayback
Wendy's
Whataburger
White Castle





Asian



L&L Hawaiian Barbecue
Manchu Wok
Panda Express
Pei Wei Asian Diner
P. F. Chang's China Bistro
Pick Up Stix
Sarku





Baked goods



Au Bon Pain
Auntie Anne's
Bruegger's
Cinnabon
Corner Bakery Cafe
Dunkin' Donuts
Einstein Bros.
Great American Cookies
Honey Dew Donuts
Krispy Kreme
Mrs. Fields
Nestlé Toll House
Panera Bread
Pretzelmaker/Pretzel Time
Shipley Do-Nuts
Tim Hortons
T.J. Cinnamons
Wetzel's
Winchell's





Beverages



Argo Tea
Biggby Coffee
Caribou
Coffee Bean & Tea Leaf
Coffee Beanery
Dunn Bros
Gloria Jean's
Jamba Juice
Juice It Up!
Orange Julius
Peet's
Planet Smoothie
Robeks
Seattle's Best Coffee
Smoothie King
Starbucks
Teavana
Tropical Smoothie Cafe
Tully's





Frozen
desserts



Baskin-Robbins
Ben & Jerry's
Braum's
Bruster's
Carvel
Cold Stone
Culver's
Dairy Queen
Dippin' Dots
Fosters Freeze
Friendly's
Golden Spoon
Graeter's
Häagen-Dazs
Handel's
Kiwi Yogurt
MaggieMoo's
Marble Slab
Menchie's
Pinkberry
Red Mango
Rita's
Sweet Frog
Tastee-Freez
TCBY
Tropical Sno
Tutti Frutti
Yogen Früz
Yogurtland





Hot dogs



Hot Dog on a Stick
Nathan's Famous
Portillo's
Wienerschnitzel





Mexican-style /
Tex-Mex



Baja Fresh
Cafe Rio
Chipotle
Chronic Tacos
Del Taco
El Pollo Loco
Freebirds
Green/Red Burrito
La Salsa
Moe's
Pancheros
Qdoba
Rubio's
Taco Bell
Taco Bueno
Taco Cabana
Taco del Mar
Taco John's
Taco Mayo
Taco Time
Tijuana Flats
Wahoo's Fish Taco





Noodles



Fazoli's
Noodles & Company
Skyline Chili





Sandwiches



Arby's
Atlanta Bread
Blimpie
Capriotti's
Charley's
Così
Cousins
D'Angelo
Daphne's
Erbert & Gerbert's
Firehouse Subs
Great Wraps
Jason's
Jerry's Subs
Jersey Mike's
Jimmy John's
Lee's Sandwiches
Lenny's Sub
McAlister's Deli
Miami Subs
Mr. Hero
Newk's Eatery
Penn Station
Port of Subs
PDQ
Potbelly
Quiznos
Rax
Runza
Sandella's
Schlotzsky's
Steak Escape
Subway
Togo's
Tubby's
Tudor's Biscuit World
Which Wich?





Seafood



Arthur Treacher's
Captain D's
H. Salt Esquire
Ivar's
Long John Silver's
Skippers Seafood & Chowder House





Defunct



Bresler's Ice Cream
Brigham's
Burger Chef
Carrols
D'Lites
Druther's
Henry's Hamburgers
Hot 'n Now
Hot Sam Pretzels
Naugles
Red Barn
Sandy's
Zantigo












v
t
e


Illinois-based corporations



Fortune 500
corporations
(by size–2013)



Walgreens Boots Alliance
Archer Daniels Midland
Boeing
Caterpillar Inc.
State Farm Insurance
Abbott Laboratories
Sears Holdings
United Continental Holdings
Deere & Company
Mondelēz International
Allstate
McDonald's
Exelon
Kraft Heinz
Illinois Tool Works
Baxter International
Navistar International
RR Donnelley
CDW
Hillshire Brands
Discover Financial
W. W. Grainger
Motorola Solutions
Dover Corporation
Tenneco
Ingredion
Anixter
United Stationers
AbbVie
Old Republic International





Other major
public companies
(alphabetically)



ACCO Brands
Accretive Health
Allscripts
Amcol International Corporation
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Brunswick Corporation
Calamos
Career Education Corporation
Catamaran Corporation
CBOE Holdings
CF Industries Holdings
CME Group
CNA Financial
Equity Residential
Fortune Brands Home & Security
General Growth Properties
Hospira
Hyatt Hotels Corp.
Integrys Energy Group
Jones Lang LaSalle
Kemper Corporation
Nalco Holding Company
Nicor
Northern Trust
RLI Corp.
Rubicon Technology
Stericycle
Telephone and Data Systems
Titan International
Tribune Media
Tronc
Tootsie Roll Industries
ULTA Beauty
US Foods
USG Corporation
Westell
Zebra Technologies





Other major
private companies
(alphabetically)



Ace Hardware
Baker & McKenzie
Blue Cross Blue Shield Association
Claire's
Country Financial
Danfoss Power Solutions
Dot Foods
Eby-Brown
Electro-Motive Diesel
Flex-N-Gate
Follett Corporation
Gardner Denver
Grant Thornton LLP
Health Care Service Corporation
Heico Cos.
Hendrickson International
Hub International
Jenner & Block
Kirkland & Ellis
Marmon Group
Mayer Brown
Medline Industries
Molex
Morton Salt
Nestlé Frozen Pizza
OSI Group
Pactiv
Reyes Holdings
Ryerson, Inc.
Sidley Austin
Skidmore, Owings & Merrill
Solo Cup Company
Tellabs
TransUnion
True Value
Wirtz Corporation





Related topics



Breweries in Illinois
Companies in the Chicago metropolitan area
Food manufacturers of Chicago
Newspapers in Illinois
Wineries in Illinois












v
t
e


Food chains in the United Kingdom



Casual dining



Angus Steakhouse
Ask
Beefeater Grill
Bella Italia
Brewers Fayre
Byron Hamburgers
Café Rouge
Carluccio's
Chiquito
Damon's
Ed's Easy Diner
Frankie & Benny's
Giraffe
Gourmet Burger Kitchen
Harry Ramsden's
Harvester
Hungry Horse
La Tasca
Little Chef
Loch Fyne Restaurants
Nando's
OK Diner
Pizza Hut
PizzaExpress
Prezzo
Strada
Table Table
T.G.I. Friday's
Toby Carvery
Tony Roma's
Wagamama
Wahaca
Wildwood Kitchen
Zizzi





Fast food



Barburrito
Burger King
Chicken Cottage
Chipotle Mexican Grill
Dixy Chicken
Domino's Pizza
Five Guys
KFC
McDonald's
Morley's
Papa John's Pizza
Sam's Chicken
Southern Fried Chicken
Subway
Taco Bell
Tops Pizza
Tortilla
Wasabi
Wimpy
YO! Sushi





Baked goods



Auntie Anne's
Cinnabon
Cooplands
Ditsch
Dunkin' Donuts
Eat
Greggs
Krispy Kreme
Millie's Cookies
Patisserie Valerie
Pret a Manger
Sayers
Spudulike
Upper Crust
The West Cornwall Pasty Company





Coffee shops and tea rooms



AMT Coffee
Betty's
Caffè Nero
Caffè Ritazza
Coffee #1
Coffee Republic
Costa Coffee
Harris + Hoole
Starbucks





Dairy



Baskin-Robbins
Ben & Jerry's
Kaspa's





Pub chains



All Bar One
Chef & Brewer
O'Neill's
Scream Pubs
Slug and Lettuce
Walkabout
Wetherspoons
Yates's














Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 136891459
LCCN: n50000582
ISNI: 0000 0000 9322 4855
GND: 2084334-3
SUDOC: 029547199
BNF: cb121150481 (data)










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=McDonald%27s&oldid=791385530"					
Categories: McDonald's1940 establishments in California1955 establishments in IllinoisCompanies based in DuPage County, IllinoisCompanies in the Dow Jones Industrial AverageCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeFast-food chains of AustraliaFast-food chains of SingaporeFast-food chains of the United StatesFast-food franchisesFast-food hamburger restaurantsMultinational food companiesOak Brook, IllinoisRestaurant chains in the United StatesRestaurants established in 1940American companies established in 1940Hidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from April 2013Pages using citations with accessdate and no URLArticles with dead external links from August 2016CS1 German-language sources (de)Wikipedia indefinitely semi-protected pagesUse mdy dates from March 2017Use American English from August 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from May 2016Wikipedia articles needing clarification from January 2017Wikipedia articles needing clarification from March 2017Articles with unsourced statements from September 2015Articles with limited geographic scope from November 2015USA-centricArticles to be expanded from November 2015All articles to be expandedArticles using small message boxesArticles to be expanded from May 2014Articles with unsourced statements from April 2017NPOV disputes from July 2017All NPOV disputesArticles with peacock terms from July 2017All articles with peacock termsArticles with unsourced statements from December 2014Articles with unsourced statements from March 2015Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikinewsWikiquote 



Languages


AfrikaansالعربيةAsturianuAzərbaycancaবাংলাBân-lâm-gúБеларускаяBikol CentralБългарскиCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiΕλληνικάEspañolEsperantoEstremeñuEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisFryskGalego客家語/Hak-kâ-ngî한국어Հայերենहिन्दीHrvatskiIlokanoBahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתಕನ್ನಡКъарачай-малкъарქართულიҚазақшаKreyòl ayisyenKurdîLatinaLatviešuLietuviųLimburgsLumbaartMagyarМакедонскиമലയാളംმარგალურიمصرىBahasa MelayuBaso MinangkabauNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskOccitanਪੰਜਾਬੀPälzischپنجابیپښتوPolskiPortuguêsRomânăRumantschРусскийСаха тылаScotsSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSlovenščinaکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиBasa SundaSuomiSvenskaTagalogதமிழ்Татарча/tatarçaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаVepsän kel’Tiếng ViệtWinarayייִדיש粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 19 July 2017, at 22:46.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









McDonald's - Wikipedia




















 







McDonald's

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from MacDonalds)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other uses, see Macdonald (disambiguation).

McDonald's





Type

Public


Traded as



NYSE: MCD
DJIA Component
S&P 100 Component
S&P 500 Component





ISIN
US5801351017


Industry
Restaurants


Genre
Fast food restaurant


Founded
McDonald's:
May 15, 1940 (77 years ago)
 San Bernardino, CA
McDonald's Corporation:
April 15, 1955 (62 years ago)
 Des Plaines, IL


Founders
McDonald's:
Richard McDonald
Maurice McDonald
McDonald's Corporation:
Ray Kroc


Headquarters
 Oak Brook, Illinois, U.S.
(moving to Chicago in 2018)[1]



Number of locations

About 36,900[2] (December 31, 2016)



Area served

Worldwide



Key people




Andrew J. McKenna (Chairman)
Steve Easterbrook (President and CEO)





Products



Hamburgers
chicken
french fries
soft drinks
milkshakes
salads
desserts
coffee
breakfast





Revenue



 US$24.622 billion (2016)[2]






Operating income




 US$7.745 billion (2016)[2]






Net income




 US$4.686 billion (2016)[2]





Total assets



 US$31.024 billion (2016)[2]





Total equity



 US$2.2043 billion (2016)[2]






Number of employees

375,000 (2016)[2]


Website

corporate.mcdonalds.com/mcd.html
www.mcdonalds.com/us/en-us.html
This box:

view
talk
edit





McDonald's is an American hamburger and fast food restaurant chain. It was founded in 1940 as a barbecue restaurant operated by Richard and Maurice McDonald, in San Bernardino, California. In 1948, they reorganized their business as a hamburger stand, using production line principles. The first McDonald's franchise using the arches logo opened in Phoenix, Arizona in 1953. Businessman Ray Kroc joined the company as a franchise agent in 1955 and subsequently purchased the chain from the McDonald brothers. Based in Oak Brook, Illinois, McDonald's confirmed plans to move its global headquarters to Chicago by early 2018.[3][4]
Today, McDonald's is the world's largest restaurant chain, serving approximately 68 million customers daily in 120 countries across approximately 36,900 outlets.[5] McDonald's primarily sells hamburgers, cheeseburgers, chicken products, french fries, breakfast items, soft drinks, milkshakes, wraps, and desserts. In response to changing consumer tastes and after facing criticism for the unhealthy nature of their food,[6] the company has expanded its menu to include salads, fish, wraps, smoothies, and fruit. A McDonald's restaurant is operated by either a franchisee, an affiliate, or the corporation itself. The McDonald's Corporation revenues come from the rent, royalties, and fees paid by the franchisees, as well as sales in company-operated restaurants. According to a BBC report published in 2012, McDonald's is the world's second largest private employer (behind Walmart with 1.9 million employees), 1.5 million of whom work for franchises.



Contents


1 History
2 Corporate overview

2.1 Facts and figures
2.2 Business model
2.3 Headquarters
2.4 Board of directors
2.5 Global operations

2.5.1 Countries with McDonald's




3 Products

3.1 International menu variations


4 Restaurants

4.1 Types of restaurants

4.1.1 McDrive
4.1.2 McCafé
4.1.3 "Create Your Taste" restaurants
4.1.4 Other
4.1.5 Special diet
4.1.6 Playgrounds
4.1.7 McDonald's Next


4.2 2006 redesign
4.3 Smoking ban


5 Treatment of employees

5.1 Automation
5.2 Wages

5.2.1 Strikes


5.3 Working conditions


6 Animal welfare standards
7 Marketing and advertising

7.1 India
7.2 Space exploration
7.3 Children's advertising
7.4 Sports awards and honors


8 Charity

8.1 McHappy Day
8.2 McDonald's Monopoly donation
8.3 McRefugee


9 Criticism

9.1 Company responses to criticism
9.2 Environmental record
9.3 Legal cases

9.3.1 Asia
9.3.2 Australia
9.3.3 United Kingdom
9.3.4 United States


9.4 Use of genetically modified food


10 See also
11 References
12 Further reading
13 External links



History
Main article: History of McDonald's




McDonald's corporate logo used from November 18, 1968, to 2006. It still exists at some restaurants






The oldest operating McDonald's restaurant was the third one built, opening in 1953. It is located at 10207 Lakewood Blvd. at Florence Ave. in Downey, California (at 33°56′50″N 118°07′06″W﻿ / ﻿33.9471°N 118.1182°W﻿ / 33.9471; -118.1182).


The business began in 1940, with a restaurant opened by brothers Richard and Maurice McDonald at 1398 North E Street at West 14th Street in San Bernardino, California (at 34°07′32″N 117°17′41″W﻿ / ﻿34.1255°N 117.2946°W﻿ / 34.1255; -117.2946). Their introduction of the "Speedee Service System" in 1948 furthered the principles of the modern fast-food restaurant that the White Castle hamburger chain had already put into practice more than two decades earlier.[citation needed] The first McDonald's with the arches opened in Phoenix, Arizona in March 1953.[citation needed] The original mascot of McDonald's was a man with a chef's hat on top of a hamburger-shaped head whose name was "Speedee". In 1962, the Golden Arches replaced Speedee as the company symbol. A new mascot, Ronald McDonald, was introduced in 1965. The clown-like man having puffed out costume legs appeared in advertising aimed at children.[7]
On May 4, 1961, McDonald's first filed for a U.S. trademark on the name "McDonald's" with the description "Drive-In Restaurant Services", which continues to be renewed. On September 13, 1961, the company filed for a trademark on a new logo—an overlapping, double-arched "M" symbol. By September 6, 1962, this M-symbol was temporarily disfavored, when a trademark was filed for a single arch, which appeared over many of the early McDonald's restaurants in the early years.[clarification needed] Although the "Golden Arches" logo appeared in various forms, the present version as a letter "M" did not appear until November 18, 1968, when the company applied for a U.S. trademark.
The present corporation dates its founding to the opening of a franchised restaurant by businessman Ray Kroc in Des Plaines, Illinois on April 15, 1955, the ninth McDonald's restaurant overall; this location was demolished in 1984 after many remodels. Kroc later purchased the McDonald brothers' equity in the company and led its worldwide expansion, and the company became listed on the public stock markets ten years later. Kroc was also noted for aggressive business practices, compelling the McDonald brothers to leave the fast-food industry.
Kroc and the McDonald brothers feuded over control of the business, as documented in Kroc's autobiography. The San Bernardino restaurant was demolished in 1976 (1971, according to Juan Pollo) and the site was sold to the Juan Pollo restaurant chain. This area now serves as headquarters for the Juan Pollo chain, as well as a McDonald's and Route 66 museum.[8] With the expansion of McDonald's into many international markets, the company has become a symbol of globalization and the spread of the American way of life. Its prominence has also made it a frequent topic of public debates about obesity, corporate ethics, and consumer responsibility.
Corporate overview
Facts and figures




By 1993, McDonald's had sold more than 100 billion hamburgers. The once widespread restaurant signs that boasted the number of sales, such as this one in Harlem, were left at "99 billion" because there was space for only two digits.






The McDonald's in Northport, Alabama commemorates U.S. President Ronald Reagan's visit


McDonald's restaurants are found in 120 countries and territories around the world and serve 68 million customers each day.[9][10] McDonald's operates 36,899 restaurants worldwide, employing more than 375,000 people as of the end of 2016.[5][9] There are currently a total of 5,669 company-owned locations and 31,230 franchised locations, which includes 21,559 locations franchised to conventional franchisees, 6,300 locations licensed to developmental licensees, and 3,371 locations licensed to foreign affiliates, primarily Japan.[5]
Focusing on its core brand, McDonald's began divesting itself of other chains it had acquired during the 1990s. The company owned a majority stake in Chipotle Mexican Grill until October 2006, when McDonald's fully divested from Chipotle through a stock exchange.[11][12] Until December 2003, it also owned Donatos Pizza, and it owned a small share of Aroma Cafe from 1999 to 2001. On August 27, 2007, McDonald's sold Boston Market to Sun Capital Partners.[13]
Notably, McDonald's has increased shareholder dividends for 25 consecutive years,[14] making it one of the S&P 500 Dividend Aristocrats.[15][16] In October 2012, its monthly sales fell for the first time in nine years.[17] In 2014, its quarterly sales fell for the first time in seventeen years, when its sales dropped for the entirety of 1997.[18]
In the United States, it is reported that drive-throughs account for 70 percent of sales.[19][20] McDonald's plans to close 184 restaurants in the United States in 2015, which is 59 more than it plans to open.[21][22] This is the first time McDonald's will have a net decrease in the number of locations in the United States since 1970.[22]
Business model
The company currently owns all of its property[clarification needed] – valued at an estimated $16 to $18 billion. However, in recent times, there have been calls to spin off the company's US holdings into a potential real estate investment trust. The company earns a significant portion of its revenue from rental payments from franchisees. These rent payments rose 26 percent between 2010 and 2015, accounting for one-fifth of the company's total revenue at the end of the period.[23] The company announced at its investor conference on November 10, 2015, that it would not spin off its property into a real-estate investment trust. The CEO, Steve Easterbrook discussed that pursuing the REIT option would pose too large a risk to the company's business model.[24]




The McDonald's logo painted on the tail of a Crossair McDonnell Douglas MD-83 in 1999.


The United Kingdom and Ireland business model is different from the U.S, in that fewer than 30 percent of restaurants are franchised, with the majority under the ownership of the company. McDonald's trains its franchisees and management at Hamburger University in Oak Brook, Illinois.[25][26] In other countries, McDonald's restaurants are operated by joint ventures of McDonald's Corporation and other, local entities or governments.[27]
According to Fast Food Nation by Eric Schlosser (2001), nearly one in eight workers in the U.S. have at some time been employed by McDonald's. Employees are encouraged by McDonald's Corp. to maintain their health by singing along to their favorite songs in order to relieve stress, attending church services in order to have a lower blood pressure, and taking two vacations annually in order to reduce risk for myocardial infarction.[28] Fast Food Nation also states that McDonald's is the largest private operator of playgrounds in the U.S., as well as the single largest purchaser of beef, pork, potatoes, and apples. The selection of meats McDonald's uses varies to some extent based on the culture of the host country.[29]
Headquarters




McDonald's Plaza, located in Oak Brook, Illinois, is the headquarters of McDonald's


The McDonald's headquarters complex, McDonald's Plaza, is located in Oak Brook, Illinois. It sits on the site of the former headquarters and stabling area of Paul Butler, the founder of Oak Brook.[30] McDonald's moved into the Oak Brook facility from an office within the Chicago Loop in 1971.[31]
On June 13, 2016, McDonald's confirmed plans to move its global headquarters to Chicago's West Loop neighborhood in the Near West Side. The 608,000-square-foot structure will be built on the site of Oprah Winfrey's former Harpo Studios and open in early 2018.[3][4]
Board of directors
As of November 2014, the board of directors had the following members:[32]

Andrew J. McKenna, chairman
Susan E. Arnold, operating executive of Global Consumer & Retail Group of The Carlyle Group
Robert A. Eckert, operating partner of Friedman Fleischer & Lowe
Enrique Hernandez, Jr., president and CEO of Inter-Con Security
Jeanne P. Jackson, president of product and merchandising for Nike, Inc.
Richard H. Lenny, operating partner of Friedman Fleischer & Lowe
Walter E. Massey, president of the School of the Art Institute of Chicago
Cary D. McMillan, CEO of True Partners Consulting LLC
Sheila A. Penrose, non-executive chairman of Jones Lang LaSalle
John W. Rogers, Jr, chairman and CEO of Ariel Investments
Roger W. Stone, chairman and CEO of KapStone Paper and Packaging
Don Thompson, president and CEO
Miles D. White, chairman and CEO of Abbott Laboratories

On March 1, 2015, after being chief brand officer of McDonald's and its former head in the UK and northern Europe, Steve Easterbrook became CEO, succeeding Don Thompson, who stepped down on January 28, 2015.
Global operations
See also: List of countries with McDonald's restaurants and International availability of McDonald's products




Countries with McDonald's restaurants, showing their first year with its first restaurant






McDonald's on Nathan Road, Kowloon, Hong Kong.


McDonald's has become emblematic of globalization, sometimes referred to as the "McDonaldization" of society. The Economist newspaper uses the "Big Mac Index": the comparison of a Big Mac's cost in various world currencies can be used to informally judge these currencies' purchasing power parity. Switzerland has the most expensive Big Mac in the world as of July 2015, while the country with the least expensive Big Mac is India[33][34] (albeit for a Maharaja Mac—the next cheapest Big Mac is Hong Kong).[35]




McDonald's, Paulista Avenue, São Paulo, Brazil


Thomas Friedman once said that no country with a McDonald's had gone to war with another.[36][37] However, the "Golden Arches Theory of Conflict Prevention" is not strictly true. Exceptions are the 1989 United States invasion of Panama, NATO's bombing of Serbia in 1999, the 2006 Lebanon War, and the 2008 South Ossetia war. McDonald's suspended operations in its corporate-owned stores in Crimea after Russia annexed the region in 2014.[38] On August 20, 2014, as tensions between the United States and Russia strained over events in Ukraine, and the resultant U.S. sanctions, the Russian government temporarily shut down four McDonald's outlets in Moscow, citing sanitary concerns. The company has operated in Russia since 1990 and at August 2014 had 438 stores across the country.[39] On August 23, 2014, Russian Deputy Prime Minister Arkady Dvorkovich ruled out any government move to ban McDonald's and dismissed the notion that the temporary closures had anything to do with the sanctions.[40]




McDonald's, Old Mahabalipuram Road, Chennai, India


Some observers have suggested that the company should be given credit for increasing the standard of service in markets that it enters. A group of anthropologists in a study entitled Golden Arches East[41] looked at the impact McDonald's had on East Asia and Hong Kong, in particular. When it opened in Hong Kong in 1975, McDonald's was the first restaurant to consistently offer clean restrooms, driving customers to demand the same of other restaurants and institutions. McDonald's has taken to partnering up with Sinopec, the second largest oil company in the People's Republic of China, as it takes advantage of the country's growing use of personal vehicles by opening numerous drive-thru restaurants.[42] McDonald's has opened a McDonald's restaurant and McCafé on the underground premises of the French fine arts museum, The Louvre.[43]
The company stated it would open vegetarian-only restaurants in India by mid-2013.[44] Foreign restaurants are banned in Bermuda, with the exception of KFC, which was present before the current law was passed. Therefore, there are no McDonald's in Bermuda.[45]
On January 9, 2017, 80% of the franchise rights in the mainland China and in Hong Kong were sold for US$2.080 billion to a consortium of CITIC Limited (for 32%) and private equity funds managed by CITIC Capital (for 20%) and Carlyle (for 20%), which CITIC Limited and CITIC Capital would also formed a joint venture to own the stake.[46]
Countries with McDonald's

Africa


 Egypt
 Mauritius
 Mayotte
 Morocco
 Reunion
 South Africa
 Tunisia





Asia


 Azerbaijan
 Bahrain
 Brunei
 China

 Hong Kong
 Macau


 Cyprus
 Georgia
 India
 Indonesia
 Israel
 Japan
 Jordan
 Kazakhstan
 Kuwait
 Lebanon
 Malaysia
 Oman
 Pakistan
 Philippines
 Qatar
 Saudi Arabia
 Singapore
 South Korea
 Sri Lanka
 Taiwan
 Thailand
 Turkey
 United Arab Emirates
 Vietnam





Europe


 Andorra
 Austria
 Belarus
 Belgium
 Bosnia and Herzegovina
 Bulgaria
 Croatia
 Czech Republic
 Denmark
 Estonia
 Finland
 France
 Germany
 Greece
 Hungary
 Ireland
 Italy
 Latvia
 Liechtenstein
 Lithuania
 Luxembourg
 Malta
 Moldova
 Monaco
 Netherlands
 Norway
 Poland
 Portugal
 Romania
 Russia
 San Marino
 Serbia
 Slovakia
 Slovenia
 Spain
 Sweden
  Switzerland
 Ukraine
 United Kingdom

 Isle of Man
 Jersey







North America


 Aruba
 Bahamas
 Canada
 Costa Rica
 Cuba

 Guantanamo Bay Naval Base


 Curaçao
 Dominican Republic
 El Salvador
 Guadeloupe
 Guatemala
 Honduras
 Martinique
 Nicaragua
 Panama
 Sint Maarten
 Trinidad & Tobago
 Mexico
 United States

 Puerto Rico
 U.S. Virgin Islands







Oceania


 American Samoa
 Australia
 Fiji
 French Polynesia
 Guam
 New Caledonia
 New Zealand
 Northern Marianas
 Samoa





South America


 Argentina
 Brazil
 Chile
 Colombia
 Ecuador
 French Guiana
 Guyana
 Paraguay
 Peru
 Suriname
 Uruguay
 Venezuela




Products
Main article: List of McDonald's products




A typical "eat-in" McDonald's meal as sold in Hong Kong, consisting of French fries, a soft drink, and a "main product" - in this case, a McSpicy Chicken Fillet. Condiments are supplied in small packets; such a packet of tomato ketchup is seen in the foreground.


McDonald's predominantly sells hamburgers, various types of chicken, chicken sandwiches, French fries, soft drinks, breakfast items, and desserts. In most markets, McDonald's offers salads and vegetarian items, wraps and other localized fare. On a seasonal basis, McDonald's offers the McRib sandwich. Some speculate the seasonality of the McRib adds to its appeal.[47]
Products are offered as either "eat-in" (where the customer opts to eat in the restaurant) or "take-out" (where the customer opts to take the food for consumption off the premises). "Eat-in" meals are provided on a plastic tray with a paper insert on the floor of the tray. "Take-out" meals are usually delivered with the contents enclosed in a distinctive McDonald's-branded brown paper bag. In both cases, the individual items are wrapped or boxed as appropriate.
Since Steve Easterbrook became CEO of the company, McDonald's has streamlined the menu which in the United States contained nearly 200 items. The company has also looked to introduce healthier options, and removed high-fructose corn syrup from hamburger buns. The company has also removed artificial preservatives from Chicken McNuggets[48], replacing chicken skin, safflower oil and citric acid found in Chicken McNuggets with pea starch, rice starch and powdered lemon juice. [49]
International menu variations
See also: McDonald's products (international)




A McDonald's Ebi Feast meal sold at branches in Singapore, November 2013. McDonald's is known for tailoring its menus in different markets to cater to local tastes


Restaurants in several countries, particularly in Asia, serve soup. This local deviation from the standard menu is a characteristic for which the chain is particularly known, and one which is employed either to abide by regional food taboos (such as the religious prohibition of beef consumption in India) or to make available foods with which the regional market is more familiar (such as the sale of McRice in Indonesia, or Ebi (prawn) Burger in Singapore and Japan).
In Germany and some other Western European countries, McDonald's sells beer. In New Zealand, McDonald's sells meat pies, after the local affiliate partially relaunched the Georgie Pie fast food chain it bought out in 1996.
In the United States, after limited trials on a regional basis, McDonald's plans to offer an all-day breakfast menu whenever its restaurants are open, although eggs cannot be cooked at the same time on the same equipment as hamburgers due to different temperature requirements.[citation needed]
Restaurants





The examples and perspective in this section deal primarily with the United States and do not represent a worldwide view of the subject. You may improve this article, discuss the issue on the talk page, or create a new article, as appropriate. (November 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Types of restaurants




Counter service in a McDonald's restaurant in Dukhan, Qatar


Most standalone McDonald's restaurants offer both counter service and drive-through service, with indoor and sometimes outdoor seating.[50] Drive-Thru, Auto-Mac, Pay and Drive, or "McDrive" as it is known in many countries, often has separate stations for placing, paying for, and picking up orders, though the latter two steps are frequently combined;[50] it was first introduced in Arizona in 1975, following the lead of other fast-food chains. The first such restaurant in Britain opened at Fallowfield, Manchester in 1986.[51]
McDrive
In some countries, "McDrive" locations near highways offer no counter service or seating.[52] In contrast, locations in high-density city neighborhoods often omit drive-through service.[53] There are also a few locations, located mostly in downtown districts, that offer a "Walk-Thru" service in place of Drive-Thru.[54]
McCafé
Main article: McCafé




A Montevideo McCafé


McCafé is a café-style accompaniment to McDonald's restaurants and is a concept created by McDonald's Australia (also known, and marketed, as "Macca's" in Australia), starting with Melbourne in 1993.[55] As of 2016, most McDonald's in Australia have McCafés located within the existing McDonald's restaurant. In Tasmania, there are McCafés in every restaurant, with the rest of the states quickly following suit.[50] After upgrading to the new McCafé look and feel, some Australian restaurants have noticed up to a 60 percent increase in sales. At the end of 2003, there were over 600 McCafés worldwide.
"Create Your Taste" restaurants
From 2015–2016, McDonald's tried a new gourmet burger service/restaurant concept based on other gourmet restaurants such as Shake Shack and Grill'd. It was rolled out for the first time in Australia during the early months of 2015 and expanded to China, Hong Kong, Singapore, Arabia and New Zealand, with ongoing trials in the US market. In dedicated "Create Your Taste" (CYT) kiosks, customers could choose all ingredients including type of bun and meat along with optional extras. In late 2015 the Australian CYT service introduced CYT salads.
After a person had ordered, McDonald's advised that wait times were between 10–15 minutes. When the food was ready, trained crew ('hosts') brought the food to the customer's table. Instead of McDonald's usual cardboard and plastic packaging, CYT food was presented on wooden boards, fries in wire baskets and salads in china bowls with metal cutlery. A higher price applied.
In November 2016, Create Your Taste was replaced by a "Signature Crafted Recipes" program designed to be more efficient and less expensive.[56]
Other
Some locations are connected to gas stations/convenience stores,[57] while others called McExpress have limited seating and/or menu or may be located in a shopping mall. Other McDonald's are located in Walmart stores. McStop is a location targeted at truckers and travelers which may have services found at truck stops.[58]
In Sweden, customers who order a happy meal can use the meal's container for a pair of happy goggles.[59] The company created a game for the goggles known as "Slope Stars.[59]" McDonald's predicts happy goggles will continue in other countries.[59] In the Netherlands, McDonald's has introduced McTrax that doubles as a recording studio; it reacts to touch.[59] They can create their own beats with a synth and tweak sounds with special effects.[59]
Special diet




A kosher Express McDonald's outlet in the Malha Mall in Jerusalem





This section needs expansion with: Details of other McDonald's restaurants where special dietry requirements are catered for. You can help by adding to it. (November 2015)


The first kosher McDonald's was established in 1997 at the Abasto de Buenos Aires mall in Buenos Aires, Argentina. This is in addition to many kosher branches in Israel.[60][61]
Playgrounds




A McDonald's in Panorama City, Los Angeles, California with a Playplace designed to promote a family-friendly image





This section needs expansion. You can help by adding to it. (May 2014)


McDonald's playgrounds are called McDonald's PlayPlace. Some McDonald's in suburban areas and certain cities feature large indoor or outdoor playgrounds. The first PlayPlace with the familiar crawl-tube design with ball pits and slides was introduced in 1987 in the US, with many more being constructed soon after.
McDonald's Next




McDonald's Next in Admiralty, Hong Kong


McDonald's Next use open-concept design and offer "Create Your Taste" digital ordering. The concept store also offering free mobile device charging and table service after 6:00 pm. The first store open in Hong Kong in December 2015.[62]
2006 redesign




An American McDonald's in Mount Pleasant, Iowa in June 2008; this is an example of the "new" look of American McDonald's restaurants


In 2006, McDonald's introduced its "Forever Young" brand by redesigning all of its restaurants, the first major redesign since the 1970s.[63][64]
The goal of the redesign is to be more like a coffee shop, similar to Starbucks. The design includes wooden tables, faux-leather chairs, and muted colors; the red was muted to terracotta, the yellow was shifted to golden for a more "sunny" look, and olive and sage green were also added.
To create a warmer look, the restaurants have less plastic and more brick and wood, with modern hanging lights to produce a softer glow. Many restaurants now feature free Wi-Fi and flat-screen TVs. Other upgrades include double drive-thrus, flat roofs instead of the angled red roofs, and replacing fiber glass with wood. Also, instead of the familiar golden arches, the restaurants now feature "semi-swooshes" (half of a golden arch), similar to the Nike swoosh.[65]
Smoking ban
McDonald's began banning smoking in 1994 when it banned smoking within its 1,400 wholly owned restaurants.[66]
Treatment of employees




A McDonald's employee takes an order in the Philippines


Automation
Since the late 1990s, McDonald's has attempted to replace employees with electronic kiosks which would perform actions such taking orders and accepting money. In 1999, McDonald's first tested "E-Clerks" in suburban Chicago, Illinois, and Wyoming, Michigan, with the devices being able to "save money on live staffers" and attracting larger purchase amounts than average employees.[67]
In 2013, the University of Oxford estimated that in the succeeding decades, there was a 92% probability of food preparation and serving to become automated in fast food establishments.[68] By 2016, McDonald's "Create Your Taste" electronic kiosks were seen in some restaurants internationally where customers could custom order meals. As employees pushed for higher wages in the late-2010s, some believed that fast food companies such as McDonald's would use the devices to cut costs for employing individuals.[69]
Wages
On August 5, 2013, The Guardian revealed that 90 percent of McDonald's UK workforce are on zero hour contracts, making it possibly the largest such private sector employer in the country.[70] A study released by Fast Food Forward conducted by Anzalone Liszt Grove Research showed that approximately 84 percent of all fast food employees working in New York City in April 2013 had been paid less than their legal wages by their employers.[71]
From 2007 to 2011, fast food workers in the US drew an average of $7 billion of public assistance annually resulting from receiving low wages.[72] The McResource website advised employees to break their food into smaller pieces to feel fuller, seek refunds for unopened holiday purchases, sell possessions online for quick cash, and to "quit complaining" as "stress hormone levels rise by 15 percent after ten minutes of complaining."[73] In December 2013, McDonald's shut down the McResource website amidst negative publicity and criticism. McDonald's plans to continue an internal telephone help line through which its employees can obtain advice on work and life problems.[74]
Liberal thinktank the Roosevelt Institute accuses some McDonald's restaurants of actually paying less than the minimum wage to entry positions due to 'rampant' wage theft.[75] In South Korea, McDonald's pays part-time employees $5.50 an hour and is accused of paying less with arbitrary schedules adjustments and pay delays.[76] In late 2015, Anonymous aggregated data collected by Glassdoor suggests that McDonald's in the United States pays entry-level employees between $7.25 an hour and $11 an hour, with an average of $8.69 an hour. Shift managers get paid an average of $10.34 an hour. Assistant managers get paid an average of $11.57 an hour.[77] McDonald's CEO, Steve Easterbrook, currently earns an annual salary of $1,100,000.[78]
Strikes
See also: Fast food worker strikes




Fast food workers on strike outside of a McDonald's in St. Paul, Minnesota.


McDonald's workers have on occasions decided to strike over pay, with most of the employees on strike seeking to be paid $15.00.[79] When interviewed about the strikes occurring, former McDonald's CEO Ed Rensi stated: "It's cheaper to buy a $35,000 robotic arm than it is to hire an employee who's inefficient making $15 an hour bagging french fries" with Rensi explaining that increasing employee wages could possibly take away from entry-level jobs.[80] However, according to current McDonald's CEO Steve Easterbrook, increasing wages and benefits for workers saw a 6% increase in customer satisfaction when comparing 2015's first quarter data to the first quarter of 2016, with greater returns seen as a result.[80]
Working conditions
In March 2015, McDonald's workers in 19 US cities filed 28 health and safety complaints with OSHA which allege that low staffing, lack of protective gear, poor training and pressure to work fast has resulted in injuries. The complaints also allege that, because of a lack of first aid supplies, workers were told by management to treat burn injuries with condiments such as mayonnaise and mustard. The Fight for $15 labor organization aided the workers in filing the complaints.[81]
Animal welfare standards
In 2015, McDonald's pledged to stop using eggs from battery cage facilities by 2025. Since McDonald's purchases over 2 billion eggs per year or 4 percent of eggs produced in the United States, the switch is expected to have a major impact on the egg industry and is part of a general trend toward cage-free eggs driven by consumer concern over the harsh living conditions of hens.[82][83] The aviary systems from which the new eggs will be sourced are troubled by much higher mortality rates, as well as introducing environmental and worker safety problems.[84] The high hen mortality rate, which is more than double that of battery cage systems, will require new research to mitigate. The facilities also have higher ammonia levels due to faeces being kicked up into the air. Producers raised concerns about the production cost, which is expected to increase by 36 percent.[85]
McDonald's continues to source pork from facilities that use gestation crates, and in 2012 pledged to phase them out.[86]
Marketing and advertising
Main article: McDonald's advertising
McDonald's has for decades maintained an extensive advertising campaign. In addition to the usual media (television, radio, and newspaper), the company makes significant use of billboards and signage, sponsors sporting events ranging from Little League to the FIFA World Cup and Olympic Games.[87] Television has played a central role in the company's advertising strategy.[citation needed] To date, McDonald's has used 23 different slogans in United States advertising, as well as a few other slogans for select countries and regions.[88]
India





The neutrality of this section is disputed. Relevant discussion may be found on the talk page. Please do not remove this message until conditions to do so are met. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article contains wording that promotes the subject in a subjective manner without imparting real information. Please remove or replace such wording and instead of making proclamations about a subject's importance, use facts and attribution to demonstrate that importance. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


McDonald's began operations in India in 1996. It retained Leo Burnett (India) to provide authentic Indian insights regarding local favorite items, religious-based food taboos, and India's strong vegetarian tradition. Hamburgers are made of lamb or chicken, instead of beef. Local favorite foods are adapted into menu items such as McAloo Tikki, a breaded potato pancake on a bun. To assure vegetarian customers, kitchens are divided into vegetarian and non-vegetarian zones. Advertising tells Indians that McDonald's bright, inviting restaurants do not mean high prices; profit strategy uses low prices to generate high volume sales. Locally McDonald's of India sponsored sports programs and donations to visible charities.[89]
Space exploration
McDonald's and NASA explored an advertising agreement for a planned mission to the asteroid 449 Hamburga; however, the spacecraft was eventually cancelled.[90]
Children's advertising
Main articles: Ronald McDonald and McDonaldland
Sports awards and honors
See also: Category:McDonald's High School All-Americans
McDonald's is the title sponsor of the McDonald's All-American Game, all-star basketball games played each year for American and Canadian boys' and girls' high school basketball graduates
Charity
See also: Ronald McDonald House Charities
McHappy Day




A Ronald McDonald House collection box in Framingham, Massachusetts


McHappy Day is an annual event at McDonald's, where a percentage of the day's sales go to charity. It is the signature fundraising event for Ronald McDonald House Charities.[91]
In 2007, it was celebrated in 17 countries: Argentina, Australia, Austria, Brazil, Canada, the United States, Finland, France, Guatemala, Hungary, England, Ireland, New Zealand, Norway, Sweden, Switzerland, and Uruguay.
According to the Australian McHappy Day website, McHappy Day raised $20.4 million in 2009. The goal for 2010 was $20.8 million.[92]
McDonald's Monopoly donation
In 1995, St. Jude Children's Research Hospital received an anonymous letter postmarked in Dallas, Texas, containing a $1 million winning McDonald's Monopoly game piece. McDonald's officials came to the hospital, accompanied by a representative from the accounting firm Arthur Andersen, who examined the card under a jeweler's eyepiece, handled it with plastic gloves, and verified it as a winner.[93] Although game rules prohibited the transfer of prizes, McDonald's waived the rule and has made the annual $50,000 annuity payments, even after learning that the piece was sent by an individual involved in an embezzlement scheme intended to defraud McDonald's (see McDonald's Monopoly).
McRefugee
See also: McRefugee
McRefugees are poor people in Hong Kong, Japan, and China who use McDonald's 24-hour restaurants as a temporary hostel. One in five of Hong Kong's population lives below the poverty line. The rise of McRefugees was first documented by photographer Suraj Katra in 2013.[94]
Criticism




A PETA activist dressed as a chicken confronts the manager of the Times Square McDonald's over the company's animal welfare standards


In 1990, activists from a small group known as London Greenpeace (no connection to the international group Greenpeace) distributed leaflets entitled What's wrong with McDonald's?, criticizing its environmental, health, and labor record. The corporation wrote to the group demanding they desist and apologize, and, when two of the activists refused to back down, sued them for libel in one of the longest cases in British civil law. A documentary film of the McLibel Trial has been shown in several countries.[95]
In the late 1980s, Phil Sokolof, a millionaire businessman who had suffered a heart attack at the age of 43, took out full-page newspaper ads in New York, Chicago, and other large cities accusing McDonald's menu of being a threat to American health, and asking them to stop using beef tallow to cook their french fries.[citation needed]
Despite the objections of McDonald's, the term "McJob" was added to Merriam-Webster's Collegiate Dictionary in 2003.[96] The term was defined as "a low-paying job that requires little skill and provides little opportunity for advancement".[97]
In 2001, Eric Schlosser's book Fast Food Nation included criticism of the business practices of McDonald's. Among the critiques were allegations that McDonald's (along with other companies within the fast food industry) uses its political influence to increase its profits at the expense of people's health and the social conditions of its workers. The book also brought into question McDonald's advertisement techniques in which it targets children. While the book did mention other fast-food chains, it focused primarily on McDonald's.
In 2002, vegetarian groups, largely Hindu and Buddhist, successfully sued McDonald's for misrepresenting its French fries as vegetarian, when they contained beef broth.[98]
Morgan Spurlock's 2004 documentary film Super Size Me claimed that McDonald's food was contributing to the increase of obesity in society and that the company was failing to provide nutritional information about its food for its customers. Six weeks after the film premiered, McDonald's announced that it was eliminating the super size option, and was creating the adult Happy Meal.




Screenshot from McDonald's Videogame


In 2006, an unsanctioned McDonald's Videogame was released online. It is parody of the business practices of the corporate giant, taking the guise of a tycoon style business simulation game. In the game, the player plays the role of a McDonald's CEO, choosing whether or not to use controversial practices like genetically altered cow feed, plowing over rainforests, and corrupting public officials. McDonald's issued a statement distancing itself from the game.[99]
In January 2014, it was reported that McDonald's was accused of having used a series of tax maneuvers to avoid taxes in France. The company confirmed that tax authorities had visited McDonald's French headquarters in Paris but insisted that it had not done anything wrong, saying, "McDonald's firmly denies the accusation made by L'Express according to which McDonald's supposedly hid part of its revenue from taxes in France."[100]
Company responses to criticism




Discreet shopfront in historic Stratford-upon-Avon


In response to public pressure, McDonald's has sought to include more healthy choices in its menu and has introduced a new slogan to its recruitment posters: "Not bad for a McJob".[101] The word McJob, first attested in the mid-1980s[96] and later popularized by Canadian novelist Douglas Coupland in his book Generation X, has become a buzz word for low-paid, unskilled work with few prospects or benefits and little security. McDonald's disputes this definition of McJob. In 2007, the company launched an advertising campaign with the slogan "Would you like a career with that?" on Irish television, asserting that its jobs have good prospects.
In an effort to respond to growing consumer awareness of food provenance, the fast-food chain changed its supplier of both coffee beans and milk. UK chief executive Steve Easterbrook said: "British consumers are increasingly interested in the quality, sourcing, and ethics of the food and drink they buy".[102] In a bid to tap into the ethical consumer market,[103] McDonald's switched to using coffee beans taken from stocks that are certified by the Rainforest Alliance, a conservation group. Additionally, in response to pressure, McDonald's UK started using organic milk supplies for its bottled milk and hot drinks, although it still uses conventional milk in its milkshakes, and in all of its dairy products in the United States.[104] According to a report published by Farmers Weekly in 2007, the quantity of milk used by McDonald's could have accounted for as much as 5 percent of the UK's organic milk output.[105]
McDonald's announced on May 22, 2008, that, in the United States and Canada, it would switch to using cooking oil that contains no trans fats for its french fries, and canola-based oil with corn and soy oils, for its baked items, pies and cookies, by year's end.[106][107]
With regard to acquiring chickens from suppliers who use CAK/CAS methods of slaughter, McDonald's says that it needs to see more research "to help determine whether any CAS system in current use is optimal from an animal welfare perspective."[108]
Environmental record
In April 2008, McDonald's announced that 11 of its Sheffield, England restaurants have been engaged in a biomass trial that had cut its waste and carbon footprint by half in the area. In this trial, wastes from the restaurants were collected by Veolia Environmental Services and were used to produce energy at a power plant. McDonald's plans to expand this project, although the lack of biomass power plants in the United States will prevent this plan from becoming a national standard anytime soon.[109] In addition, in Europe, McDonald's has been recycling vegetable grease by converting it to fuel for its diesel trucks.[110]
McDonald's has been using a corn-based bioplastic to produce containers for some of its products. The environmental benefits of this technology are controversial, with critics noting that biodegradation is slow, produces greenhouse gases and that contamination of traditional plastic waste streams with bioplastics can complicate recycling efforts.[111]
In 1990, McDonald's worked with the Environmental Defense Fund to stop using "clam shell" shaped styrofoam food containers to house its food products.[112] 20 years later, McDonald's announced they would try replacing styrofoam coffee cups with an alternative material.[113]
The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency has recognized McDonald's continuous effort to reduce solid waste by designing more efficient packaging and by promoting the use of recycled-content materials.[114] McDonald's reports that it is committed towards environmental leadership by effectively managing electric energy, by conserving natural resources through recycling and reusing materials, and by addressing water management issues within the restaurant.[115]
In an effort to reduce energy usage by 25 percent in its restaurants, McDonald's opened a prototype restaurant in Chicago in 2009 with the intention of using the model in its other restaurants throughout the world. Building on past efforts, specifically a restaurant it opened in Sweden in 2000 that was the first to intentionally incorporate green ideas, McDonald's designed the Chicago site to save energy by incorporating old and new ideas such as managing storm water, using skylights for more natural lighting and installing some partitions and tabletops made from recycled goods.[116]
When McDonald's received criticism for its environmental policies in the 1970s, it began to make substantial progress in reducing its use of materials.[117] For instance, an "average meal" in the 1970s—a Big Mac, fries, and a drink—required 46 grams of packaging; today, it requires only 25 grams, allowing a 46 percent reduction.[118] In addition, McDonald's eliminated the need for intermediate containers for cola by having a delivery system that pumps syrup directly from the delivery truck into storage containers, saving two million pounds (910 tonnes) of packaging annually.[119] Overall, weight reductions in packaging and products, as well as the increased usage of bulk packaging ultimately decreased packaging by twenty-four million pounds (11,000 tonnes) annually.[120]
Legal cases
Main article: McDonald's legal cases
McDonald's has been involved in a number of lawsuits and other legal cases, most of which involved trademark disputes. The company has threatened many food businesses with legal action unless it drops the Mc or Mac from trading names.
Asia
On September 8, 2009, McDonald's Malaysian operations lost a lawsuit to prevent another restaurant calling itself McCurry. McDonald's lost in an appeal to Malaysia's highest court, the Federal Court.[121]
Australia
In April 2007, in Perth, Western Australia, McDonald's pleaded guilty to five charges relating to the employment of children under 15 in one of its outlets and was fined A$8,000.[122]
In 2016, the Australian Taxation Office revealed that McDonald's Asia-Pacific Consortium had generated $478 million in revenue in 2013–14, but had paid no tax on those earnings whatsoever.[123]
United Kingdom
McDonald's has defended itself in several cases involving workers' rights.[citation needed]
The longest running legal action of all time in the UK was the McLibel case against 2 defendants who criticized a number of aspects of the company. The trial lasted 10 years and called 130 witnesses. The European Court of Human Rights deemed that the unequal resources of the litigants breached the defendants rights to freedom of speech and biased the trial. The result was widely seen as a "PR disaster."[124]
United States
A famous legal case in the US involving McDonald's was the 1994 decision in Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants where Stella Liebeck was awarded several million dollars after she suffered third-degree burns after spilling a scalding cup of McDonald's coffee on herself.[125]
Use of genetically modified food
In April 2014, it was reported that McDonald's will use, in Europe, chicken meat that was produced by using genetically modified animal feed. Greenpeace argues that McDonald's saves less than one Eurocent for each chicken burger and goes down a path not desired by its customers.[126]
See also





Book: McDonald's





Arcos Dorados Holdings
Burger King—the second largest burger chain
List of hamburger restaurants
List of restaurant chains
The Founder—a 2016 film detailing the creation and controversial business history of McDonald's, that is also a biopic of Ray Kroc
MaDonal—a restaurant operating in northern Iraq that copies many features of McDonald's, illicitly
Maxime, McDuff & McDo-documentary film about the unionizing of a McDonald's in Montreal, Quebec, Canada
Wendy's—the third largest hamburger chain



Food portal
Companies portal
Chicago portal
Illinois portal


References


^ Bomkamp, Samantha (June 13, 2016). "Mcdonald's HQ Move Is Boldest Step Yet in Effort to Transform Itself". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved May 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e f g "Form 10-K: McDonald's Corporation (McDonald's Corporation 2016 Annual Report)" (PDF). United States Securities and Exchange Commission. Commission File Number 1-5231. Retrieved May 1, 2017. 
^ a b "McDonald's future Near West Side neighbors air parking, traffic safety beefs". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved August 7, 2016. 
^ a b Hufford, Austen (June 14, 2016). "McDonald’s to Move Headquarters to Downtown Chicago". Retrieved August 7, 2016 – via Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c http://d18rn0p25nwr6d.cloudfront.net/CIK-0000063908/62200c2b-da82-4364-be92-79ed454e3b88.pdf
^ Robbins, John (October 8, 2010). "How Bad Is McDonald's Food?". Huffington Post. 
^ "The McDonalds and Their Restaurant". www.referenceforbusiness.com. Retrieved January 16, 2017. In 1962, McDonald's golden arches replaced Speedee as the restaurant's main symbol, and ads told customers to "Look for the golden arches." ... Kroc believed in advertising heavily and in targeting children. In 1965, the company introduced a new mascot, a red-haired clown named Ronald McDonald, who became a frequent and friendly face in television commercials. 
^ "McDonalds Museum". Juan Pollo. Retrieved May 14, 2012. 
^ a b McDonald's – The Leading Global Food Service Retailer :: AboutMcDonalds.com, retrieved May 8, 2008
^ "McDonald's Momentum Delivers Another Year of Strong Results for 2011". Yahoo Finance. 2012. Retrieved January 25, 2012. [dead link]
^ Brand, Rachel (December 23, 2006). "Chipotle founder had big dreams". Rocky Mountain News. Archived from the original on July 8, 2009. Retrieved April 27, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's sets October deadline to sell Chipotle stock". Denver Business Journal. BizJournals.com. July 25, 2006. Retrieved August 10, 2009. 
^ "McDonald's Wraps Up Boston Market Sale". Dow Jones & Company, Inc. News Services. August 27, 2007. Archived from the original on September 28, 2007. Retrieved August 28, 2007. 
^ Baertlein, Lisa (September 24, 2009). "McDonald's raises cash dividend by 10%". reuters.com. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ "Definition of S&P 500 Aristocrat at Investopedia". Investopedia.com. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ "List of 2009 Dividend Aristocrats via Seeking Alpha, retrieved 10/1/2009". Seekingalpha.com. December 23, 2008. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ Tiffany Hsu (November 9, 2012). "McDonald's monthly sales fall for first time in nine years". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved March 9, 2013. 
^ "McDonald's New Turnaround Plan Is So 1990s". 
^ Baertlein, Lisa (March 14, 2017). "McDonald's, late to mobile ordering, seeks to avoid pitfalls". Reuters. Retrieved March 15, 2017. 
^ Patton, Leslie (November 23, 2015). "McDonald's Knows You're Sick of Screw-Ups at Drive-Thru Windows". Bloomberg. Retrieved March 15, 2017. 
^ Ferdman, Roberto A. (August 13, 2015). "This is a terrible sign for McDonald's". The Washington Post. 
^ a b "McDonald's to Cut U.S. Stores for First Time in Decades". The New York Times. Associated Press. June 18, 2015. 
^ LUBLIN, JOANN S.; JARGON, JULIE (October 15, 2015). "McDonald’s Nears Decision on Real Estate". Retrieved October 22, 2015. 
^ Jargon, Julie. "McDonald's Won't Spin Off Real Estate Holdings". Wall Street Journal. ISSN 0099-9660. Retrieved November 11, 2015. 
^ "Hamburger University Campus". mcdonalds.com. Retrieved January 18, 2017. 
^ "Hamburger University - Our Facility". 
^ "McDonald’s Business Model and Strategy :: McDonald’s". corporate.mcdonalds.com. Retrieved January 24, 2017. 
^ Eidelson, Josh (November 19, 2013). "McDonald's tells workers to "sing away stress," "chew away cares" and go to church". Salon. Retrieved August 21, 2014. These and other tips appear on a "McResource Line" website created by the McDonald's Corp. to advise workers on stress, health and personal finances. Among the tips that appear on the site: "Chewing gum can reduce cortisol levels by 16%"; "At least two vacations a year can cut heart attack risk by 50%"; "Singing along to your favorite songs can lower your blood pressure"; and "People who attend more church services tend to have lower blood pressure." 
^ Schlosser, Eric. Fast Food Nation. 
^ Steele, Jeffrey. Oak Brook history in caring hands society president is part of village's changing heritage". Chicago Tribune. July 29, 1998. Page 88. Retrieved on September 17, 2009.
^ Cross, Robert. Inside Hamburger Central". Chicago Tribune. January 9, 1972. G18. Retrieved on September 17, 2009.
^ "Board of Directors Biographical Information". McDonald's. Retrieved November 3, 2014. 
^ "India's 50 most trusted brands". Rediff.com. January 20, 2011. 
^ "The Big Mac index". The Economist. October 7, 2015. 
^ "The Big Mac index – Currency comparisons, to go". The Economist. July 28, 2011. Retrieved July 28, 2011. 
^ Friedman, Thomas L. (December 8, 1996). "Foreign Affairs Big Mac I". The New York Times. ISSN 0362-4331. Retrieved January 24, 2017. 
^ "The Lexus and the Olive Tree". Thomaslfriedman.com. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's quits Crimea due to fears of trade clash". INA Daily News. Retrieved April 5, 2014. 
^ "Russia Shuts 4 McDonald's Restaurants Amid Ukraine Tensions". Moscow News.Net. August 20, 2014. Retrieved August 21, 2014. 
^ "Russian Deputy PM says McDonalds is not being targeted in response to sanctions". Russia Herald. August 23, 2014. Retrieved August 23, 2014. 
^ Stanford University Press, 1998, edited by James L. Watson
^ "McDonald's deal with oil company marries China's new love of fast food, cars". Archived from the original on March 25, 2007. 
^ Samuel, Henry (October 4, 2009). "McDonald's restaurants to open at the Louvre". The Daily Telegraph. London. 
^ Gasparro, Annie; Jargon, Julie (September 5, 2012). "McDonald's to Go Vegetarian in India". The Wall Street Journal. p. B7. 
^ "10 Countries That Don't Have McDonald's". WhatCulture.com. Retrieved December 1, 2015. 
^ "VOLUNTARY ANNOUNCEMENT: ACQUISITION OF A CONTROLLING INTEREST IN MCDONALD'S MAINLAND CHINA AND HONG KONG BUSINESSES" (PDF). CITIC Limited. Hong Kong Stock Exchange. January 9, 2017. Retrieved January 13, 2017. 
^ "Fanatics Preach Fast Food Evangelism". Fox News. July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald’s is going for healthier fare and greater digitisation". The Economist. January 28, 2017. ISSN 0013-0613. Retrieved February 5, 2017. 
^ "McDonald's to remove corn syrup from buns, curbs antibiotics in chicken". August 1, 2016 – via Reuters. 
^ a b c Mohapatra, Sanjay (2012). Information Strategy Design and Practices. Google Books: Springer Science & Business Media. p. 301. ISBN 1-4614-2427-5. 
^ "McDonald's Restaurants". Caterersearch.com. Archived from the original on July 16, 2011. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDrive: il fast food comodo, facile e veloce". McDonald's Italia. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's vs Newk's Franchise Cost Comparison and Analysis". www.thefranchisemall.com. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ Duca, Lauren. "This McDonald's has a "Walk-Thru"". Teen Vogue. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's Australia". mcdonalds.com.au. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ Kieler, Ashlee. "McDonald's Ends 'Create Your Taste' Customized Burger Program". Consumerist. Retrieved December 18, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's and BP test combined operations. (McDonald's Restaurants; BP Oil Co.)". Archived from the original on January 18, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's serves up 'MCSTOP' – Its restaurant for big crowds". August 16, 1984. 
^ a b c d e "Restaurants going high tech". Yahoo Tech. June 14, 2016. Retrieved June 14, 2016. 
^ "El único Mc Donald's kosher del mundo fuera de Israel es certificado por Ajdut Kosher" (Spanish and English). Last consulted: May 22, 2011
^ "Buenos Aires Restaurants – Kosher McDonald's". travel.nytimes.com. Archived from the original on March 3, 2009. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "Big Mac with a side of quinoa? Inside the world's first McDonald's Next". edition.cnn.com. Cable News Network. Retrieved August 9, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's wants a digital-age makeover". 
^ "Mickey D's McMakeover". Archived from the original on May 24, 2006. 
^ Bruce Horovitz (May 9, 2011). "McDonald's revamps store to look more upscale". USA Today. Retrieved June 26, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's Bans Smoking at All the Sites It Owns". The New York Times. February 24, 1994. 
^ Gibson, Richard (August 12, 1999). "Want Fries With That? Ask McDonald's New E-Clerks". The Wall Street Journal.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ O'Toole, James (May 22, 2014). "Robots will replace fast-food workers". CNN Money. Retrieved August 18, 2016. 
^ Johnson, Hollis (May 16, 2016). "Fast food workers are becoming obsolete". Business Insider. Retrieved August 18, 2016. 
^ Neville, Simon (August 25, 2008). "McDonald's ties nine out of 10 workers to zero-hours contracts". The Guardian. London. Retrieved August 10, 2013. 
^ ' 'Anzalone Liszt Grove Research' ' and ' 'Fast Food Foreward' '. New York's Hidden Crime Wave: Wage Theft and New York City's Fast Food Workers
^ Maclay, Kathleen. "Fast Food, Poverty Wages: The Public Cost of Low-wage jobs in the Fast Food Industry". University of California Labor Center October 15, 2013.
^ Susanna Kim (November 21, 2013). McDonald's Defends Telling Workers to 'Quit Complaining' to Reduce Stress. ABC News. Retrieved November 21, 2013.
^ Associated Press (December 26, 2013). "McDonald's Closes Employee Website Amid Criticism". DailyDigest. Archived from the original on December 28, 2013. Retrieved December 26, 2013. 
^ Goldberg, Harmony, "How McDonald's gets away with rampant wage theft", Salon, April 6, 2015. Accessed May 22, 2015.
^ Tae-hoon, Lee (August 16, 2015). "McDonald's lures customers with illegal ads on Independence Day". The Korea Observer. Retrieved August 17, 2015. 
^ "McDonald's Hourly Pay". Glassdoor. Retrieved December 1, 2015. 
^ Beckerman, Josh. "McDonald's New CEO Gets 69% Pay Raise"[dead link], Wall Street Journal, March 3, 2015. Accessed May 22, 2015.
^ Bruce Horovitz and Yamiche Alcindor (April 15, 2015). Fast-food strikes widen into social-justice movement. USA Today. Accessed May 22, 2015.
^ a b Taylor, Kate (May 25, 2016). "McDonald's ex-CEO just revealed a terrifying reality for fast-food workers". Business Insider. Retrieved August 18, 2016. 
^ Jana Kasperkevic (March 16, 2015). McDonald's workers told to treat burns with condiments, survey shows. The Guardian. Retrieved March 17, 2015.
^ Owen, Tess (September 10, 2015). "McDonald's Is Switching to Cage-Free Eggs at a Delicate Moment for the Poultry Industry". VICE News. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ "The Insanely Complicated Logistics of Cage-Free Eggs for All". Wired. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ Gelles, David (July 16, 2016). "Eggs That Clear the Cages, but Maybe Not the Conscience". New York Times. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ Kesmodel, David (March 18, 2015). "Cage-Free Hens Study Finds Little Difference in Egg Quality". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ Strom, Stephanie (February 13, 2012). "McDonald's Set to Phase Out Suppliers' Use of Sow Crates". New York Times. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's renews as FIFA World Cup Sponsor until 2014". FIFA.com. Retrieved October 24, 2014
^ "McDonald's slogans used around the world, past and present". Retrieved June 23, 2015. 
^ William M. O'Barr, "Advertising in India." Advertising & Society Review 9#3 (2008): 1-33.
^ "Mars rover Curiosity's other mission: publicity machine". Statesman.com. December 5, 2012. Retrieved March 9, 2013. 
^ McHappy Day, Ronald McDonald House Charities. Retrieved September 12, 2010.
^ McHappy Day Retrieved November 8, 2010.
^ "Donor Turns Fast Food Into Big Bucks For Hospital". The New York Times. December 8, 1995. Retrieved May 24, 2010. 
^ "The night time 'McRefugees' of Hong Kong". BBC news. October 27, 2015. Retrieved October 10, 2016. 
^ "BBC NEWS | UK | McLibel: Longest case in English history". BBC News. Retrieved April 9, 2015. 
^ a b Associated Press (November 11, 2003). "Merriam-Webster: 'McJob' is here to stay". CNN Offbeat News. 
^ "McJob". Merriam-Webster's Online Dictionary. 1986. Retrieved November 29, 2009. 
^ "Letter from McDonald's headquarters claiming fries are vegetarian". 
^ Bluestien, Greg. "Creators Put Politics Into Video Games", The Associated Press, published January 21, 2007, accessed April 20, 2007.
^ "Do You Want Fries With That Audit?". Forbes. January 23, 2014. 
^ Sweney, Mark (April 20, 2006). "Not bad for a McJob?". The Guardian. London. Retrieved March 30, 2009. 
^ Ian Ashbridge (July 3, 2007). "McDonalds' milk goes organic – 7/3/2007 – Farmers Weekly". Fwi.co.uk. Archived from the original on May 14, 2012. Retrieved June 7, 2012. 
^ Carrigan, Marylyn and De Pelsmacker, Patrick (2009). Will ethical consumers sustain their values in the global credit crunch? International Marketing Review, 26(6), pp. 674–687,(p.7).
^ "The Truth-O-Meter : Chef Jamie Oliver praises McDonald's in England". Truth-O-Meter. Tampa Bay Times. Retrieved October 22, 2012. 
^ Ian Ashbridge (July 3, 2007). "McDonald's milk goes organic – 03/07/2007 – FarmersWeekly". Fwi.co.uk. Archived from the original on September 24, 2009. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ "McDonald's Holds down Dollar Meal, Making Menu Healthier". International Business Times. May 22, 2008. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's says all US French fries cooked in zero-trans-fat oil". www.gmanews. Archived from the original on January 14, 2011. 
^ "Report of the Corporate Responsibility Committee of the Board of Directors of McDonald's Corporation" (PDF). November 19, 2009. Archived from the original (PDF) on July 17, 2011. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's hails success of waste-to-energy trial". Businessgreen.com. April 14, 2008. Archived from the original on September 26, 2012. Retrieved April 9, 2015. 
^ "Local woman creates environmental-friendly Web site". Herald-dispatch.com. April 19, 2008. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ Vidal, John (April 26, 2008). "'Sustainable' bio-plastic can damage the environment". The Guardian. London. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's and Environmental Defense Fund Mark 20 Years of Partnerships for Sustainability". Environmental Defense Fund. November 15, 2010. Retrieved November 28, 2013. 
^ "McDonald's testing eco-friendlier coffee cups". NBC News. March 12, 2012. Retrieved November 28, 2013. 
^ "U.S. Environmental Protection Agency". Archived from the original on August 5, 2012. Retrieved April 17, 2008. 
^ "McDonald's Corporation website". Archived from the original on May 31, 2016. Retrieved April 17, 2008. 
^ Goodman, Matthew (April 5, 2009). "Big Mac, hold the CO2". The Sunday Times. London. 
^ "National Pollution Prevention Center for Higher Education" (PDF). 
^ Environmental Defense Fund. Task Force Report. p. 42.
^ Environmental Defense Fund and McDonald's Corporation. Waste Reduction Task Force Final Report. Oak Brook, IL: McDonald's, 1991. p. 22.
^ "Corporation. McDonald's Packaging – The Facts. Oak Brook, IL: McDonald's, 1990. p. 7.". 
^ BBC online news article dated September 8, 2009 News.BB.co.uk
^ "McDonald's fined for employing underage workers". ABC News Online. April 12, 2007. Archived from the original on April 18, 2007. Retrieved April 12, 2007. 
^ "98 private companies earning over $200m pay no tax: ATO". ABC News. Retrieved April 4, 2016. 
^ "McLibel: Longest case in English history". BBC news. February 15, 2005. Retrieved January 17, 2016. 
^ Do You Know the Full Story Behind the Infamous McDonald's Coffee Case and How Corporations Used it to Promote Tort Reform? Democracy Now! January 25, 2011.
^ "McDonald's: Gentechnik im Burger". Spiegel Online (in German). April 27, 2014. Retrieved December 1, 2015. 


Further reading

Evans, Stephen (April 20, 2004). "McDonald's: The journey to health". BBC News. Retrieved June 30, 2016. 
Horovitz, Bruce (May 8, 2014). "McDonald's testing seasoned fries". USA Today. Retrieved June 30, 2016. 
Love, John F. (April 1987). "Big Macs, Fries, and Real Estate". Financial Executive (4): 20–6. 
Thomas Derdak and Jay P. Pederson, ed. (2004). "McDonald's". International directory of company histories. 67 (3rd ed.). St. James Press. pp. 108–9. ISBN 978-1-55862-512-9. 
"McDonald's : Behind The Arches" by John F. Love, paperback July 1, 1995
"Grinding It Out: The Making of McDonald's" by Ray Kroc, 1977 ISBN 0809282593
"Ray & Joan: The Man Who Made the McDonald's Fortune and the Woman Who Gave It All Away" by Lisa Napoli, 2016 ISBN 1101984953
"Fast Food Nation: The Dark Side of the All-American Meal" by Eric Schlosser, 2001 ISBN 0395977894

External links

Find more aboutMcDonald'sat Wikipedia's sister projects

Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Travel guide from Wikivoyage
Learning resources from Wikiversity
Data from Wikidata



Official Website
Corporate Website



Business data for McDonald's: Google Finance
Yahoo! Finance
Reuters
SEC filings










v
t
e


McDonald's






History
Advertising

ad programs


Countries with franchises
Legal cases
Product list
International availability





People



Richard and Maurice McDonald
Ray Kroc
Joan Kroc
Ralph Alvarez
Charlie Bell
Al Bernardin
Jim Cantalupo
George Cohon
Dan Coudreaut
Steve Easterbrook
Janice L. Fields
Den Fujita
Don Gorske
Jack M. Greenberg
Eikō Harada
June Martino
Herb Peterson
Michael R. Quinlan
Ed Rensi
Willard Scott
James A. Skinner
Donald N. Smith
Harry J. Sonneborn
Don Thompson
Fred L. Turner





Company



Hamburger University
Leaps and Bounds
McBarge
McCafé
McDonald's #1 Store Museum
McDonald's (Will Rogers Turnpike)
Oldest McDonald's restaurant
Rock N Roll McDonald's
Ronald McDonald House Charities





Products




Beef



Big Mac
Big N' Tasty
Deluxe line
Kiwiburger
Quarter Pounder (McRoyal)





Chicken



Chicken McNuggets
McChicken





Other



Deli Choices
Filet-O-Fish
Georgie Pie
Happy Meal
McArabia
McGriddles
McMuffin
McRib
Premium line
Shamrock Shake





Former



Arch Deluxe
McAfrika








Advertising




Campaigns



Changeables
Global Gladiators
Golden Arches
Mac Tonight
McDonaldland
McDonald's Monopoly
McDonald's Treasure Land Adventure
M.C. Kids
McKids
Ronald McDonald
Teenie Beanies
The Wacky Adventures of Ronald McDonald





Sponsorships



Kyle Larson (NASCAR)
Jamie McMurray (NASCAR)
Graham Rahal (IndyCar Series)
McDonald's All-American Game
McDonald's Championship
McDonald's Championship (golf)
McDonald's Cycle Center
McDonald's Gospelfest
McDonald's Olympic Swim Stadium





Related



Burger wars
Donald Land
Fast food advertising
Mac and Me (1988 film)
McDonald's sign (Pine Bluff, Arkansas)
Supersize








Branches



Canada
Israel
New Zealand





Criticism



Fast Food Nation (film)
McDonaldization
McDonald's Videogame
McJob
McRefugee
McLibel
Maxime, McDuff & McDo
Super Size Me

Don't Eat This Book







Legal cases



Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants
Magee v. McDonald's
McDonald's Restaurants v. Morris & Steel
Sid & Marty Krofft Television Productions Inc. v. McDonald's Corp.





Related



McDelivery
Big Mac Index
Bill Elliott
McDonald's Young Entertainers
McWords
San Ysidro McDonald's massacre
"Seriously McDonalds"
Sydney River McDonald's murders
Taiwan McDonald's bombings
Urban legends
Boom, Like That
The Founder (2016 film)










Links to related articles











v
t
e


Components of the Dow Jones Industrial Average






3M
American Express
Apple
Boeing
Caterpillar
Chevron
Cisco Systems
Coca-Cola
Disney
DuPont
ExxonMobil
General Electric
Goldman Sachs
The Home Depot
Intel
IBM
Johnson & Johnson
JPMorgan Chase
McDonald's
Merck & Co.
Microsoft
Nike
Pfizer
Procter & Gamble
Travelers
UnitedHealth Group
United Technologies
Verizon Communications
Visa
Walmart












v
t
e


Fast food and fast casual restaurant chains in the United States






Chicken chains
Coffeehouse chains
Pizza chains





Hamburgers



A&W
Arctic Circle
Back Yard
Big Boy
Burger King
Burgerville
Carl's Jr.
Checkers/Rally's
Cook Out
Fatburger
Five Guys
Freddy's
Fuddruckers
The Habit
Hardee's
Hwy 55
In-N-Out
Jack in the Box
Johnny Rockets
Krystal
McDonald's
Red Robin
Roy Rogers
Shake Shack
Smashburger
Sonic
Steak 'n Shake
Wayback
Wendy's
Whataburger
White Castle





Asian



L&L Hawaiian Barbecue
Manchu Wok
Panda Express
Pei Wei Asian Diner
P. F. Chang's China Bistro
Pick Up Stix
Sarku





Baked goods



Au Bon Pain
Auntie Anne's
Bruegger's
Cinnabon
Corner Bakery Cafe
Dunkin' Donuts
Einstein Bros.
Great American Cookies
Honey Dew Donuts
Krispy Kreme
Mrs. Fields
Nestlé Toll House
Panera Bread
Pretzelmaker/Pretzel Time
Shipley Do-Nuts
Tim Hortons
T.J. Cinnamons
Wetzel's
Winchell's





Beverages



Argo Tea
Biggby Coffee
Caribou
Coffee Bean & Tea Leaf
Coffee Beanery
Dunn Bros
Gloria Jean's
Jamba Juice
Juice It Up!
Orange Julius
Peet's
Planet Smoothie
Robeks
Seattle's Best Coffee
Smoothie King
Starbucks
Teavana
Tropical Smoothie Cafe
Tully's





Frozen
desserts



Baskin-Robbins
Ben & Jerry's
Braum's
Bruster's
Carvel
Cold Stone
Culver's
Dairy Queen
Dippin' Dots
Fosters Freeze
Friendly's
Golden Spoon
Graeter's
Häagen-Dazs
Handel's
Kiwi Yogurt
MaggieMoo's
Marble Slab
Menchie's
Pinkberry
Red Mango
Rita's
Sweet Frog
Tastee-Freez
TCBY
Tropical Sno
Tutti Frutti
Yogen Früz
Yogurtland





Hot dogs



Hot Dog on a Stick
Nathan's Famous
Portillo's
Wienerschnitzel





Mexican-style /
Tex-Mex



Baja Fresh
Cafe Rio
Chipotle
Chronic Tacos
Del Taco
El Pollo Loco
Freebirds
Green/Red Burrito
La Salsa
Moe's
Pancheros
Qdoba
Rubio's
Taco Bell
Taco Bueno
Taco Cabana
Taco del Mar
Taco John's
Taco Mayo
Taco Time
Tijuana Flats
Wahoo's Fish Taco





Noodles



Fazoli's
Noodles & Company
Skyline Chili





Sandwiches



Arby's
Atlanta Bread
Blimpie
Capriotti's
Charley's
Così
Cousins
D'Angelo
Daphne's
Erbert & Gerbert's
Firehouse Subs
Great Wraps
Jason's
Jerry's Subs
Jersey Mike's
Jimmy John's
Lee's Sandwiches
Lenny's Sub
McAlister's Deli
Miami Subs
Mr. Hero
Newk's Eatery
Penn Station
Port of Subs
PDQ
Potbelly
Quiznos
Rax
Runza
Sandella's
Schlotzsky's
Steak Escape
Subway
Togo's
Tubby's
Tudor's Biscuit World
Which Wich?





Seafood



Arthur Treacher's
Captain D's
H. Salt Esquire
Ivar's
Long John Silver's
Skippers Seafood & Chowder House





Defunct



Bresler's Ice Cream
Brigham's
Burger Chef
Carrols
D'Lites
Druther's
Henry's Hamburgers
Hot 'n Now
Hot Sam Pretzels
Naugles
Red Barn
Sandy's
Zantigo












v
t
e


Illinois-based corporations



Fortune 500
corporations
(by size–2013)



Walgreens Boots Alliance
Archer Daniels Midland
Boeing
Caterpillar Inc.
State Farm Insurance
Abbott Laboratories
Sears Holdings
United Continental Holdings
Deere & Company
Mondelēz International
Allstate
McDonald's
Exelon
Kraft Heinz
Illinois Tool Works
Baxter International
Navistar International
RR Donnelley
CDW
Hillshire Brands
Discover Financial
W. W. Grainger
Motorola Solutions
Dover Corporation
Tenneco
Ingredion
Anixter
United Stationers
AbbVie
Old Republic International





Other major
public companies
(alphabetically)



ACCO Brands
Accretive Health
Allscripts
Amcol International Corporation
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Brunswick Corporation
Calamos
Career Education Corporation
Catamaran Corporation
CBOE Holdings
CF Industries Holdings
CME Group
CNA Financial
Equity Residential
Fortune Brands Home & Security
General Growth Properties
Hospira
Hyatt Hotels Corp.
Integrys Energy Group
Jones Lang LaSalle
Kemper Corporation
Nalco Holding Company
Nicor
Northern Trust
RLI Corp.
Rubicon Technology
Stericycle
Telephone and Data Systems
Titan International
Tribune Media
Tronc
Tootsie Roll Industries
ULTA Beauty
US Foods
USG Corporation
Westell
Zebra Technologies





Other major
private companies
(alphabetically)



Ace Hardware
Baker & McKenzie
Blue Cross Blue Shield Association
Claire's
Country Financial
Danfoss Power Solutions
Dot Foods
Eby-Brown
Electro-Motive Diesel
Flex-N-Gate
Follett Corporation
Gardner Denver
Grant Thornton LLP
Health Care Service Corporation
Heico Cos.
Hendrickson International
Hub International
Jenner & Block
Kirkland & Ellis
Marmon Group
Mayer Brown
Medline Industries
Molex
Morton Salt
Nestlé Frozen Pizza
OSI Group
Pactiv
Reyes Holdings
Ryerson, Inc.
Sidley Austin
Skidmore, Owings & Merrill
Solo Cup Company
Tellabs
TransUnion
True Value
Wirtz Corporation





Related topics



Breweries in Illinois
Companies in the Chicago metropolitan area
Food manufacturers of Chicago
Newspapers in Illinois
Wineries in Illinois












v
t
e


Food chains in the United Kingdom



Casual dining



Angus Steakhouse
Ask
Beefeater Grill
Bella Italia
Brewers Fayre
Byron Hamburgers
Café Rouge
Carluccio's
Chiquito
Damon's
Ed's Easy Diner
Frankie & Benny's
Giraffe
Gourmet Burger Kitchen
Harry Ramsden's
Harvester
Hungry Horse
La Tasca
Little Chef
Loch Fyne Restaurants
Nando's
OK Diner
Pizza Hut
PizzaExpress
Prezzo
Strada
Table Table
T.G.I. Friday's
Toby Carvery
Tony Roma's
Wagamama
Wahaca
Wildwood Kitchen
Zizzi





Fast food



Barburrito
Burger King
Chicken Cottage
Chipotle Mexican Grill
Dixy Chicken
Domino's Pizza
Five Guys
KFC
McDonald's
Morley's
Papa John's Pizza
Sam's Chicken
Southern Fried Chicken
Subway
Taco Bell
Tops Pizza
Tortilla
Wasabi
Wimpy
YO! Sushi





Baked goods



Auntie Anne's
Cinnabon
Cooplands
Ditsch
Dunkin' Donuts
Eat
Greggs
Krispy Kreme
Millie's Cookies
Patisserie Valerie
Pret a Manger
Sayers
Spudulike
Upper Crust
The West Cornwall Pasty Company





Coffee shops and tea rooms



AMT Coffee
Betty's
Caffè Nero
Caffè Ritazza
Coffee #1
Coffee Republic
Costa Coffee
Harris + Hoole
Starbucks





Dairy



Baskin-Robbins
Ben & Jerry's
Kaspa's





Pub chains



All Bar One
Chef & Brewer
O'Neill's
Scream Pubs
Slug and Lettuce
Walkabout
Wetherspoons
Yates's














Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 136891459
LCCN: n50000582
ISNI: 0000 0000 9322 4855
GND: 2084334-3
SUDOC: 029547199
BNF: cb121150481 (data)










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=McDonald%27s&oldid=791385530"					
Categories: McDonald's1940 establishments in California1955 establishments in IllinoisCompanies based in DuPage County, IllinoisCompanies in the Dow Jones Industrial AverageCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeFast-food chains of AustraliaFast-food chains of SingaporeFast-food chains of the United StatesFast-food franchisesFast-food hamburger restaurantsMultinational food companiesOak Brook, IllinoisRestaurant chains in the United StatesRestaurants established in 1940American companies established in 1940Hidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from April 2013Pages using citations with accessdate and no URLArticles with dead external links from August 2016CS1 German-language sources (de)Wikipedia indefinitely semi-protected pagesUse mdy dates from March 2017Use American English from August 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from May 2016Wikipedia articles needing clarification from January 2017Wikipedia articles needing clarification from March 2017Articles with unsourced statements from September 2015Articles with limited geographic scope from November 2015USA-centricArticles to be expanded from November 2015All articles to be expandedArticles using small message boxesArticles to be expanded from May 2014Articles with unsourced statements from April 2017NPOV disputes from July 2017All NPOV disputesArticles with peacock terms from July 2017All articles with peacock termsArticles with unsourced statements from December 2014Articles with unsourced statements from March 2015Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikinewsWikiquote 



Languages


AfrikaansالعربيةAsturianuAzərbaycancaবাংলাBân-lâm-gúБеларускаяBikol CentralБългарскиCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiΕλληνικάEspañolEsperantoEstremeñuEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisFryskGalego客家語/Hak-kâ-ngî한국어Հայերենहिन्दीHrvatskiIlokanoBahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתಕನ್ನಡКъарачай-малкъарქართულიҚазақшаKreyòl ayisyenKurdîLatinaLatviešuLietuviųLimburgsLumbaartMagyarМакедонскиമലയാളംმარგალურიمصرىBahasa MelayuBaso MinangkabauNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskOccitanਪੰਜਾਬੀPälzischپنجابیپښتوPolskiPortuguêsRomânăRumantschРусскийСаха тылаScotsSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSlovenščinaکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиBasa SundaSuomiSvenskaTagalogதமிழ்Татарча/tatarçaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаVepsän kel’Tiếng ViệtWinarayייִדיש粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 19 July 2017, at 22:46.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









McDonald's - Wikipedia




















 







McDonald's

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from MacDonalds)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other uses, see Macdonald (disambiguation).

McDonald's





Type

Public


Traded as



NYSE: MCD
DJIA Component
S&P 100 Component
S&P 500 Component





ISIN
US5801351017


Industry
Restaurants


Genre
Fast food restaurant


Founded
McDonald's:
May 15, 1940 (77 years ago)
 San Bernardino, CA
McDonald's Corporation:
April 15, 1955 (62 years ago)
 Des Plaines, IL


Founders
McDonald's:
Richard McDonald
Maurice McDonald
McDonald's Corporation:
Ray Kroc


Headquarters
 Oak Brook, Illinois, U.S.
(moving to Chicago in 2018)[1]



Number of locations

About 36,900[2] (December 31, 2016)



Area served

Worldwide



Key people




Andrew J. McKenna (Chairman)
Steve Easterbrook (President and CEO)





Products



Hamburgers
chicken
french fries
soft drinks
milkshakes
salads
desserts
coffee
breakfast





Revenue



 US$24.622 billion (2016)[2]






Operating income




 US$7.745 billion (2016)[2]






Net income




 US$4.686 billion (2016)[2]





Total assets



 US$31.024 billion (2016)[2]





Total equity



 US$2.2043 billion (2016)[2]






Number of employees

375,000 (2016)[2]


Website

corporate.mcdonalds.com/mcd.html
www.mcdonalds.com/us/en-us.html
This box:

view
talk
edit





McDonald's is an American hamburger and fast food restaurant chain. It was founded in 1940 as a barbecue restaurant operated by Richard and Maurice McDonald, in San Bernardino, California. In 1948, they reorganized their business as a hamburger stand, using production line principles. The first McDonald's franchise using the arches logo opened in Phoenix, Arizona in 1953. Businessman Ray Kroc joined the company as a franchise agent in 1955 and subsequently purchased the chain from the McDonald brothers. Based in Oak Brook, Illinois, McDonald's confirmed plans to move its global headquarters to Chicago by early 2018.[3][4]
Today, McDonald's is the world's largest restaurant chain, serving approximately 68 million customers daily in 120 countries across approximately 36,900 outlets.[5] McDonald's primarily sells hamburgers, cheeseburgers, chicken products, french fries, breakfast items, soft drinks, milkshakes, wraps, and desserts. In response to changing consumer tastes and after facing criticism for the unhealthy nature of their food,[6] the company has expanded its menu to include salads, fish, wraps, smoothies, and fruit. A McDonald's restaurant is operated by either a franchisee, an affiliate, or the corporation itself. The McDonald's Corporation revenues come from the rent, royalties, and fees paid by the franchisees, as well as sales in company-operated restaurants. According to a BBC report published in 2012, McDonald's is the world's second largest private employer (behind Walmart with 1.9 million employees), 1.5 million of whom work for franchises.



Contents


1 History
2 Corporate overview

2.1 Facts and figures
2.2 Business model
2.3 Headquarters
2.4 Board of directors
2.5 Global operations

2.5.1 Countries with McDonald's




3 Products

3.1 International menu variations


4 Restaurants

4.1 Types of restaurants

4.1.1 McDrive
4.1.2 McCafé
4.1.3 "Create Your Taste" restaurants
4.1.4 Other
4.1.5 Special diet
4.1.6 Playgrounds
4.1.7 McDonald's Next


4.2 2006 redesign
4.3 Smoking ban


5 Treatment of employees

5.1 Automation
5.2 Wages

5.2.1 Strikes


5.3 Working conditions


6 Animal welfare standards
7 Marketing and advertising

7.1 India
7.2 Space exploration
7.3 Children's advertising
7.4 Sports awards and honors


8 Charity

8.1 McHappy Day
8.2 McDonald's Monopoly donation
8.3 McRefugee


9 Criticism

9.1 Company responses to criticism
9.2 Environmental record
9.3 Legal cases

9.3.1 Asia
9.3.2 Australia
9.3.3 United Kingdom
9.3.4 United States


9.4 Use of genetically modified food


10 See also
11 References
12 Further reading
13 External links



History
Main article: History of McDonald's




McDonald's corporate logo used from November 18, 1968, to 2006. It still exists at some restaurants






The oldest operating McDonald's restaurant was the third one built, opening in 1953. It is located at 10207 Lakewood Blvd. at Florence Ave. in Downey, California (at 33°56′50″N 118°07′06″W﻿ / ﻿33.9471°N 118.1182°W﻿ / 33.9471; -118.1182).


The business began in 1940, with a restaurant opened by brothers Richard and Maurice McDonald at 1398 North E Street at West 14th Street in San Bernardino, California (at 34°07′32″N 117°17′41″W﻿ / ﻿34.1255°N 117.2946°W﻿ / 34.1255; -117.2946). Their introduction of the "Speedee Service System" in 1948 furthered the principles of the modern fast-food restaurant that the White Castle hamburger chain had already put into practice more than two decades earlier.[citation needed] The first McDonald's with the arches opened in Phoenix, Arizona in March 1953.[citation needed] The original mascot of McDonald's was a man with a chef's hat on top of a hamburger-shaped head whose name was "Speedee". In 1962, the Golden Arches replaced Speedee as the company symbol. A new mascot, Ronald McDonald, was introduced in 1965. The clown-like man having puffed out costume legs appeared in advertising aimed at children.[7]
On May 4, 1961, McDonald's first filed for a U.S. trademark on the name "McDonald's" with the description "Drive-In Restaurant Services", which continues to be renewed. On September 13, 1961, the company filed for a trademark on a new logo—an overlapping, double-arched "M" symbol. By September 6, 1962, this M-symbol was temporarily disfavored, when a trademark was filed for a single arch, which appeared over many of the early McDonald's restaurants in the early years.[clarification needed] Although the "Golden Arches" logo appeared in various forms, the present version as a letter "M" did not appear until November 18, 1968, when the company applied for a U.S. trademark.
The present corporation dates its founding to the opening of a franchised restaurant by businessman Ray Kroc in Des Plaines, Illinois on April 15, 1955, the ninth McDonald's restaurant overall; this location was demolished in 1984 after many remodels. Kroc later purchased the McDonald brothers' equity in the company and led its worldwide expansion, and the company became listed on the public stock markets ten years later. Kroc was also noted for aggressive business practices, compelling the McDonald brothers to leave the fast-food industry.
Kroc and the McDonald brothers feuded over control of the business, as documented in Kroc's autobiography. The San Bernardino restaurant was demolished in 1976 (1971, according to Juan Pollo) and the site was sold to the Juan Pollo restaurant chain. This area now serves as headquarters for the Juan Pollo chain, as well as a McDonald's and Route 66 museum.[8] With the expansion of McDonald's into many international markets, the company has become a symbol of globalization and the spread of the American way of life. Its prominence has also made it a frequent topic of public debates about obesity, corporate ethics, and consumer responsibility.
Corporate overview
Facts and figures




By 1993, McDonald's had sold more than 100 billion hamburgers. The once widespread restaurant signs that boasted the number of sales, such as this one in Harlem, were left at "99 billion" because there was space for only two digits.






The McDonald's in Northport, Alabama commemorates U.S. President Ronald Reagan's visit


McDonald's restaurants are found in 120 countries and territories around the world and serve 68 million customers each day.[9][10] McDonald's operates 36,899 restaurants worldwide, employing more than 375,000 people as of the end of 2016.[5][9] There are currently a total of 5,669 company-owned locations and 31,230 franchised locations, which includes 21,559 locations franchised to conventional franchisees, 6,300 locations licensed to developmental licensees, and 3,371 locations licensed to foreign affiliates, primarily Japan.[5]
Focusing on its core brand, McDonald's began divesting itself of other chains it had acquired during the 1990s. The company owned a majority stake in Chipotle Mexican Grill until October 2006, when McDonald's fully divested from Chipotle through a stock exchange.[11][12] Until December 2003, it also owned Donatos Pizza, and it owned a small share of Aroma Cafe from 1999 to 2001. On August 27, 2007, McDonald's sold Boston Market to Sun Capital Partners.[13]
Notably, McDonald's has increased shareholder dividends for 25 consecutive years,[14] making it one of the S&P 500 Dividend Aristocrats.[15][16] In October 2012, its monthly sales fell for the first time in nine years.[17] In 2014, its quarterly sales fell for the first time in seventeen years, when its sales dropped for the entirety of 1997.[18]
In the United States, it is reported that drive-throughs account for 70 percent of sales.[19][20] McDonald's plans to close 184 restaurants in the United States in 2015, which is 59 more than it plans to open.[21][22] This is the first time McDonald's will have a net decrease in the number of locations in the United States since 1970.[22]
Business model
The company currently owns all of its property[clarification needed] – valued at an estimated $16 to $18 billion. However, in recent times, there have been calls to spin off the company's US holdings into a potential real estate investment trust. The company earns a significant portion of its revenue from rental payments from franchisees. These rent payments rose 26 percent between 2010 and 2015, accounting for one-fifth of the company's total revenue at the end of the period.[23] The company announced at its investor conference on November 10, 2015, that it would not spin off its property into a real-estate investment trust. The CEO, Steve Easterbrook discussed that pursuing the REIT option would pose too large a risk to the company's business model.[24]




The McDonald's logo painted on the tail of a Crossair McDonnell Douglas MD-83 in 1999.


The United Kingdom and Ireland business model is different from the U.S, in that fewer than 30 percent of restaurants are franchised, with the majority under the ownership of the company. McDonald's trains its franchisees and management at Hamburger University in Oak Brook, Illinois.[25][26] In other countries, McDonald's restaurants are operated by joint ventures of McDonald's Corporation and other, local entities or governments.[27]
According to Fast Food Nation by Eric Schlosser (2001), nearly one in eight workers in the U.S. have at some time been employed by McDonald's. Employees are encouraged by McDonald's Corp. to maintain their health by singing along to their favorite songs in order to relieve stress, attending church services in order to have a lower blood pressure, and taking two vacations annually in order to reduce risk for myocardial infarction.[28] Fast Food Nation also states that McDonald's is the largest private operator of playgrounds in the U.S., as well as the single largest purchaser of beef, pork, potatoes, and apples. The selection of meats McDonald's uses varies to some extent based on the culture of the host country.[29]
Headquarters




McDonald's Plaza, located in Oak Brook, Illinois, is the headquarters of McDonald's


The McDonald's headquarters complex, McDonald's Plaza, is located in Oak Brook, Illinois. It sits on the site of the former headquarters and stabling area of Paul Butler, the founder of Oak Brook.[30] McDonald's moved into the Oak Brook facility from an office within the Chicago Loop in 1971.[31]
On June 13, 2016, McDonald's confirmed plans to move its global headquarters to Chicago's West Loop neighborhood in the Near West Side. The 608,000-square-foot structure will be built on the site of Oprah Winfrey's former Harpo Studios and open in early 2018.[3][4]
Board of directors
As of November 2014, the board of directors had the following members:[32]

Andrew J. McKenna, chairman
Susan E. Arnold, operating executive of Global Consumer & Retail Group of The Carlyle Group
Robert A. Eckert, operating partner of Friedman Fleischer & Lowe
Enrique Hernandez, Jr., president and CEO of Inter-Con Security
Jeanne P. Jackson, president of product and merchandising for Nike, Inc.
Richard H. Lenny, operating partner of Friedman Fleischer & Lowe
Walter E. Massey, president of the School of the Art Institute of Chicago
Cary D. McMillan, CEO of True Partners Consulting LLC
Sheila A. Penrose, non-executive chairman of Jones Lang LaSalle
John W. Rogers, Jr, chairman and CEO of Ariel Investments
Roger W. Stone, chairman and CEO of KapStone Paper and Packaging
Don Thompson, president and CEO
Miles D. White, chairman and CEO of Abbott Laboratories

On March 1, 2015, after being chief brand officer of McDonald's and its former head in the UK and northern Europe, Steve Easterbrook became CEO, succeeding Don Thompson, who stepped down on January 28, 2015.
Global operations
See also: List of countries with McDonald's restaurants and International availability of McDonald's products




Countries with McDonald's restaurants, showing their first year with its first restaurant






McDonald's on Nathan Road, Kowloon, Hong Kong.


McDonald's has become emblematic of globalization, sometimes referred to as the "McDonaldization" of society. The Economist newspaper uses the "Big Mac Index": the comparison of a Big Mac's cost in various world currencies can be used to informally judge these currencies' purchasing power parity. Switzerland has the most expensive Big Mac in the world as of July 2015, while the country with the least expensive Big Mac is India[33][34] (albeit for a Maharaja Mac—the next cheapest Big Mac is Hong Kong).[35]




McDonald's, Paulista Avenue, São Paulo, Brazil


Thomas Friedman once said that no country with a McDonald's had gone to war with another.[36][37] However, the "Golden Arches Theory of Conflict Prevention" is not strictly true. Exceptions are the 1989 United States invasion of Panama, NATO's bombing of Serbia in 1999, the 2006 Lebanon War, and the 2008 South Ossetia war. McDonald's suspended operations in its corporate-owned stores in Crimea after Russia annexed the region in 2014.[38] On August 20, 2014, as tensions between the United States and Russia strained over events in Ukraine, and the resultant U.S. sanctions, the Russian government temporarily shut down four McDonald's outlets in Moscow, citing sanitary concerns. The company has operated in Russia since 1990 and at August 2014 had 438 stores across the country.[39] On August 23, 2014, Russian Deputy Prime Minister Arkady Dvorkovich ruled out any government move to ban McDonald's and dismissed the notion that the temporary closures had anything to do with the sanctions.[40]




McDonald's, Old Mahabalipuram Road, Chennai, India


Some observers have suggested that the company should be given credit for increasing the standard of service in markets that it enters. A group of anthropologists in a study entitled Golden Arches East[41] looked at the impact McDonald's had on East Asia and Hong Kong, in particular. When it opened in Hong Kong in 1975, McDonald's was the first restaurant to consistently offer clean restrooms, driving customers to demand the same of other restaurants and institutions. McDonald's has taken to partnering up with Sinopec, the second largest oil company in the People's Republic of China, as it takes advantage of the country's growing use of personal vehicles by opening numerous drive-thru restaurants.[42] McDonald's has opened a McDonald's restaurant and McCafé on the underground premises of the French fine arts museum, The Louvre.[43]
The company stated it would open vegetarian-only restaurants in India by mid-2013.[44] Foreign restaurants are banned in Bermuda, with the exception of KFC, which was present before the current law was passed. Therefore, there are no McDonald's in Bermuda.[45]
On January 9, 2017, 80% of the franchise rights in the mainland China and in Hong Kong were sold for US$2.080 billion to a consortium of CITIC Limited (for 32%) and private equity funds managed by CITIC Capital (for 20%) and Carlyle (for 20%), which CITIC Limited and CITIC Capital would also formed a joint venture to own the stake.[46]
Countries with McDonald's

Africa


 Egypt
 Mauritius
 Mayotte
 Morocco
 Reunion
 South Africa
 Tunisia





Asia


 Azerbaijan
 Bahrain
 Brunei
 China

 Hong Kong
 Macau


 Cyprus
 Georgia
 India
 Indonesia
 Israel
 Japan
 Jordan
 Kazakhstan
 Kuwait
 Lebanon
 Malaysia
 Oman
 Pakistan
 Philippines
 Qatar
 Saudi Arabia
 Singapore
 South Korea
 Sri Lanka
 Taiwan
 Thailand
 Turkey
 United Arab Emirates
 Vietnam





Europe


 Andorra
 Austria
 Belarus
 Belgium
 Bosnia and Herzegovina
 Bulgaria
 Croatia
 Czech Republic
 Denmark
 Estonia
 Finland
 France
 Germany
 Greece
 Hungary
 Ireland
 Italy
 Latvia
 Liechtenstein
 Lithuania
 Luxembourg
 Malta
 Moldova
 Monaco
 Netherlands
 Norway
 Poland
 Portugal
 Romania
 Russia
 San Marino
 Serbia
 Slovakia
 Slovenia
 Spain
 Sweden
  Switzerland
 Ukraine
 United Kingdom

 Isle of Man
 Jersey







North America


 Aruba
 Bahamas
 Canada
 Costa Rica
 Cuba

 Guantanamo Bay Naval Base


 Curaçao
 Dominican Republic
 El Salvador
 Guadeloupe
 Guatemala
 Honduras
 Martinique
 Nicaragua
 Panama
 Sint Maarten
 Trinidad & Tobago
 Mexico
 United States

 Puerto Rico
 U.S. Virgin Islands







Oceania


 American Samoa
 Australia
 Fiji
 French Polynesia
 Guam
 New Caledonia
 New Zealand
 Northern Marianas
 Samoa





South America


 Argentina
 Brazil
 Chile
 Colombia
 Ecuador
 French Guiana
 Guyana
 Paraguay
 Peru
 Suriname
 Uruguay
 Venezuela




Products
Main article: List of McDonald's products




A typical "eat-in" McDonald's meal as sold in Hong Kong, consisting of French fries, a soft drink, and a "main product" - in this case, a McSpicy Chicken Fillet. Condiments are supplied in small packets; such a packet of tomato ketchup is seen in the foreground.


McDonald's predominantly sells hamburgers, various types of chicken, chicken sandwiches, French fries, soft drinks, breakfast items, and desserts. In most markets, McDonald's offers salads and vegetarian items, wraps and other localized fare. On a seasonal basis, McDonald's offers the McRib sandwich. Some speculate the seasonality of the McRib adds to its appeal.[47]
Products are offered as either "eat-in" (where the customer opts to eat in the restaurant) or "take-out" (where the customer opts to take the food for consumption off the premises). "Eat-in" meals are provided on a plastic tray with a paper insert on the floor of the tray. "Take-out" meals are usually delivered with the contents enclosed in a distinctive McDonald's-branded brown paper bag. In both cases, the individual items are wrapped or boxed as appropriate.
Since Steve Easterbrook became CEO of the company, McDonald's has streamlined the menu which in the United States contained nearly 200 items. The company has also looked to introduce healthier options, and removed high-fructose corn syrup from hamburger buns. The company has also removed artificial preservatives from Chicken McNuggets[48], replacing chicken skin, safflower oil and citric acid found in Chicken McNuggets with pea starch, rice starch and powdered lemon juice. [49]
International menu variations
See also: McDonald's products (international)




A McDonald's Ebi Feast meal sold at branches in Singapore, November 2013. McDonald's is known for tailoring its menus in different markets to cater to local tastes


Restaurants in several countries, particularly in Asia, serve soup. This local deviation from the standard menu is a characteristic for which the chain is particularly known, and one which is employed either to abide by regional food taboos (such as the religious prohibition of beef consumption in India) or to make available foods with which the regional market is more familiar (such as the sale of McRice in Indonesia, or Ebi (prawn) Burger in Singapore and Japan).
In Germany and some other Western European countries, McDonald's sells beer. In New Zealand, McDonald's sells meat pies, after the local affiliate partially relaunched the Georgie Pie fast food chain it bought out in 1996.
In the United States, after limited trials on a regional basis, McDonald's plans to offer an all-day breakfast menu whenever its restaurants are open, although eggs cannot be cooked at the same time on the same equipment as hamburgers due to different temperature requirements.[citation needed]
Restaurants





The examples and perspective in this section deal primarily with the United States and do not represent a worldwide view of the subject. You may improve this article, discuss the issue on the talk page, or create a new article, as appropriate. (November 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Types of restaurants




Counter service in a McDonald's restaurant in Dukhan, Qatar


Most standalone McDonald's restaurants offer both counter service and drive-through service, with indoor and sometimes outdoor seating.[50] Drive-Thru, Auto-Mac, Pay and Drive, or "McDrive" as it is known in many countries, often has separate stations for placing, paying for, and picking up orders, though the latter two steps are frequently combined;[50] it was first introduced in Arizona in 1975, following the lead of other fast-food chains. The first such restaurant in Britain opened at Fallowfield, Manchester in 1986.[51]
McDrive
In some countries, "McDrive" locations near highways offer no counter service or seating.[52] In contrast, locations in high-density city neighborhoods often omit drive-through service.[53] There are also a few locations, located mostly in downtown districts, that offer a "Walk-Thru" service in place of Drive-Thru.[54]
McCafé
Main article: McCafé




A Montevideo McCafé


McCafé is a café-style accompaniment to McDonald's restaurants and is a concept created by McDonald's Australia (also known, and marketed, as "Macca's" in Australia), starting with Melbourne in 1993.[55] As of 2016, most McDonald's in Australia have McCafés located within the existing McDonald's restaurant. In Tasmania, there are McCafés in every restaurant, with the rest of the states quickly following suit.[50] After upgrading to the new McCafé look and feel, some Australian restaurants have noticed up to a 60 percent increase in sales. At the end of 2003, there were over 600 McCafés worldwide.
"Create Your Taste" restaurants
From 2015–2016, McDonald's tried a new gourmet burger service/restaurant concept based on other gourmet restaurants such as Shake Shack and Grill'd. It was rolled out for the first time in Australia during the early months of 2015 and expanded to China, Hong Kong, Singapore, Arabia and New Zealand, with ongoing trials in the US market. In dedicated "Create Your Taste" (CYT) kiosks, customers could choose all ingredients including type of bun and meat along with optional extras. In late 2015 the Australian CYT service introduced CYT salads.
After a person had ordered, McDonald's advised that wait times were between 10–15 minutes. When the food was ready, trained crew ('hosts') brought the food to the customer's table. Instead of McDonald's usual cardboard and plastic packaging, CYT food was presented on wooden boards, fries in wire baskets and salads in china bowls with metal cutlery. A higher price applied.
In November 2016, Create Your Taste was replaced by a "Signature Crafted Recipes" program designed to be more efficient and less expensive.[56]
Other
Some locations are connected to gas stations/convenience stores,[57] while others called McExpress have limited seating and/or menu or may be located in a shopping mall. Other McDonald's are located in Walmart stores. McStop is a location targeted at truckers and travelers which may have services found at truck stops.[58]
In Sweden, customers who order a happy meal can use the meal's container for a pair of happy goggles.[59] The company created a game for the goggles known as "Slope Stars.[59]" McDonald's predicts happy goggles will continue in other countries.[59] In the Netherlands, McDonald's has introduced McTrax that doubles as a recording studio; it reacts to touch.[59] They can create their own beats with a synth and tweak sounds with special effects.[59]
Special diet




A kosher Express McDonald's outlet in the Malha Mall in Jerusalem





This section needs expansion with: Details of other McDonald's restaurants where special dietry requirements are catered for. You can help by adding to it. (November 2015)


The first kosher McDonald's was established in 1997 at the Abasto de Buenos Aires mall in Buenos Aires, Argentina. This is in addition to many kosher branches in Israel.[60][61]
Playgrounds




A McDonald's in Panorama City, Los Angeles, California with a Playplace designed to promote a family-friendly image





This section needs expansion. You can help by adding to it. (May 2014)


McDonald's playgrounds are called McDonald's PlayPlace. Some McDonald's in suburban areas and certain cities feature large indoor or outdoor playgrounds. The first PlayPlace with the familiar crawl-tube design with ball pits and slides was introduced in 1987 in the US, with many more being constructed soon after.
McDonald's Next




McDonald's Next in Admiralty, Hong Kong


McDonald's Next use open-concept design and offer "Create Your Taste" digital ordering. The concept store also offering free mobile device charging and table service after 6:00 pm. The first store open in Hong Kong in December 2015.[62]
2006 redesign




An American McDonald's in Mount Pleasant, Iowa in June 2008; this is an example of the "new" look of American McDonald's restaurants


In 2006, McDonald's introduced its "Forever Young" brand by redesigning all of its restaurants, the first major redesign since the 1970s.[63][64]
The goal of the redesign is to be more like a coffee shop, similar to Starbucks. The design includes wooden tables, faux-leather chairs, and muted colors; the red was muted to terracotta, the yellow was shifted to golden for a more "sunny" look, and olive and sage green were also added.
To create a warmer look, the restaurants have less plastic and more brick and wood, with modern hanging lights to produce a softer glow. Many restaurants now feature free Wi-Fi and flat-screen TVs. Other upgrades include double drive-thrus, flat roofs instead of the angled red roofs, and replacing fiber glass with wood. Also, instead of the familiar golden arches, the restaurants now feature "semi-swooshes" (half of a golden arch), similar to the Nike swoosh.[65]
Smoking ban
McDonald's began banning smoking in 1994 when it banned smoking within its 1,400 wholly owned restaurants.[66]
Treatment of employees




A McDonald's employee takes an order in the Philippines


Automation
Since the late 1990s, McDonald's has attempted to replace employees with electronic kiosks which would perform actions such taking orders and accepting money. In 1999, McDonald's first tested "E-Clerks" in suburban Chicago, Illinois, and Wyoming, Michigan, with the devices being able to "save money on live staffers" and attracting larger purchase amounts than average employees.[67]
In 2013, the University of Oxford estimated that in the succeeding decades, there was a 92% probability of food preparation and serving to become automated in fast food establishments.[68] By 2016, McDonald's "Create Your Taste" electronic kiosks were seen in some restaurants internationally where customers could custom order meals. As employees pushed for higher wages in the late-2010s, some believed that fast food companies such as McDonald's would use the devices to cut costs for employing individuals.[69]
Wages
On August 5, 2013, The Guardian revealed that 90 percent of McDonald's UK workforce are on zero hour contracts, making it possibly the largest such private sector employer in the country.[70] A study released by Fast Food Forward conducted by Anzalone Liszt Grove Research showed that approximately 84 percent of all fast food employees working in New York City in April 2013 had been paid less than their legal wages by their employers.[71]
From 2007 to 2011, fast food workers in the US drew an average of $7 billion of public assistance annually resulting from receiving low wages.[72] The McResource website advised employees to break their food into smaller pieces to feel fuller, seek refunds for unopened holiday purchases, sell possessions online for quick cash, and to "quit complaining" as "stress hormone levels rise by 15 percent after ten minutes of complaining."[73] In December 2013, McDonald's shut down the McResource website amidst negative publicity and criticism. McDonald's plans to continue an internal telephone help line through which its employees can obtain advice on work and life problems.[74]
Liberal thinktank the Roosevelt Institute accuses some McDonald's restaurants of actually paying less than the minimum wage to entry positions due to 'rampant' wage theft.[75] In South Korea, McDonald's pays part-time employees $5.50 an hour and is accused of paying less with arbitrary schedules adjustments and pay delays.[76] In late 2015, Anonymous aggregated data collected by Glassdoor suggests that McDonald's in the United States pays entry-level employees between $7.25 an hour and $11 an hour, with an average of $8.69 an hour. Shift managers get paid an average of $10.34 an hour. Assistant managers get paid an average of $11.57 an hour.[77] McDonald's CEO, Steve Easterbrook, currently earns an annual salary of $1,100,000.[78]
Strikes
See also: Fast food worker strikes




Fast food workers on strike outside of a McDonald's in St. Paul, Minnesota.


McDonald's workers have on occasions decided to strike over pay, with most of the employees on strike seeking to be paid $15.00.[79] When interviewed about the strikes occurring, former McDonald's CEO Ed Rensi stated: "It's cheaper to buy a $35,000 robotic arm than it is to hire an employee who's inefficient making $15 an hour bagging french fries" with Rensi explaining that increasing employee wages could possibly take away from entry-level jobs.[80] However, according to current McDonald's CEO Steve Easterbrook, increasing wages and benefits for workers saw a 6% increase in customer satisfaction when comparing 2015's first quarter data to the first quarter of 2016, with greater returns seen as a result.[80]
Working conditions
In March 2015, McDonald's workers in 19 US cities filed 28 health and safety complaints with OSHA which allege that low staffing, lack of protective gear, poor training and pressure to work fast has resulted in injuries. The complaints also allege that, because of a lack of first aid supplies, workers were told by management to treat burn injuries with condiments such as mayonnaise and mustard. The Fight for $15 labor organization aided the workers in filing the complaints.[81]
Animal welfare standards
In 2015, McDonald's pledged to stop using eggs from battery cage facilities by 2025. Since McDonald's purchases over 2 billion eggs per year or 4 percent of eggs produced in the United States, the switch is expected to have a major impact on the egg industry and is part of a general trend toward cage-free eggs driven by consumer concern over the harsh living conditions of hens.[82][83] The aviary systems from which the new eggs will be sourced are troubled by much higher mortality rates, as well as introducing environmental and worker safety problems.[84] The high hen mortality rate, which is more than double that of battery cage systems, will require new research to mitigate. The facilities also have higher ammonia levels due to faeces being kicked up into the air. Producers raised concerns about the production cost, which is expected to increase by 36 percent.[85]
McDonald's continues to source pork from facilities that use gestation crates, and in 2012 pledged to phase them out.[86]
Marketing and advertising
Main article: McDonald's advertising
McDonald's has for decades maintained an extensive advertising campaign. In addition to the usual media (television, radio, and newspaper), the company makes significant use of billboards and signage, sponsors sporting events ranging from Little League to the FIFA World Cup and Olympic Games.[87] Television has played a central role in the company's advertising strategy.[citation needed] To date, McDonald's has used 23 different slogans in United States advertising, as well as a few other slogans for select countries and regions.[88]
India





The neutrality of this section is disputed. Relevant discussion may be found on the talk page. Please do not remove this message until conditions to do so are met. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article contains wording that promotes the subject in a subjective manner without imparting real information. Please remove or replace such wording and instead of making proclamations about a subject's importance, use facts and attribution to demonstrate that importance. (July 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


McDonald's began operations in India in 1996. It retained Leo Burnett (India) to provide authentic Indian insights regarding local favorite items, religious-based food taboos, and India's strong vegetarian tradition. Hamburgers are made of lamb or chicken, instead of beef. Local favorite foods are adapted into menu items such as McAloo Tikki, a breaded potato pancake on a bun. To assure vegetarian customers, kitchens are divided into vegetarian and non-vegetarian zones. Advertising tells Indians that McDonald's bright, inviting restaurants do not mean high prices; profit strategy uses low prices to generate high volume sales. Locally McDonald's of India sponsored sports programs and donations to visible charities.[89]
Space exploration
McDonald's and NASA explored an advertising agreement for a planned mission to the asteroid 449 Hamburga; however, the spacecraft was eventually cancelled.[90]
Children's advertising
Main articles: Ronald McDonald and McDonaldland
Sports awards and honors
See also: Category:McDonald's High School All-Americans
McDonald's is the title sponsor of the McDonald's All-American Game, all-star basketball games played each year for American and Canadian boys' and girls' high school basketball graduates
Charity
See also: Ronald McDonald House Charities
McHappy Day




A Ronald McDonald House collection box in Framingham, Massachusetts


McHappy Day is an annual event at McDonald's, where a percentage of the day's sales go to charity. It is the signature fundraising event for Ronald McDonald House Charities.[91]
In 2007, it was celebrated in 17 countries: Argentina, Australia, Austria, Brazil, Canada, the United States, Finland, France, Guatemala, Hungary, England, Ireland, New Zealand, Norway, Sweden, Switzerland, and Uruguay.
According to the Australian McHappy Day website, McHappy Day raised $20.4 million in 2009. The goal for 2010 was $20.8 million.[92]
McDonald's Monopoly donation
In 1995, St. Jude Children's Research Hospital received an anonymous letter postmarked in Dallas, Texas, containing a $1 million winning McDonald's Monopoly game piece. McDonald's officials came to the hospital, accompanied by a representative from the accounting firm Arthur Andersen, who examined the card under a jeweler's eyepiece, handled it with plastic gloves, and verified it as a winner.[93] Although game rules prohibited the transfer of prizes, McDonald's waived the rule and has made the annual $50,000 annuity payments, even after learning that the piece was sent by an individual involved in an embezzlement scheme intended to defraud McDonald's (see McDonald's Monopoly).
McRefugee
See also: McRefugee
McRefugees are poor people in Hong Kong, Japan, and China who use McDonald's 24-hour restaurants as a temporary hostel. One in five of Hong Kong's population lives below the poverty line. The rise of McRefugees was first documented by photographer Suraj Katra in 2013.[94]
Criticism




A PETA activist dressed as a chicken confronts the manager of the Times Square McDonald's over the company's animal welfare standards


In 1990, activists from a small group known as London Greenpeace (no connection to the international group Greenpeace) distributed leaflets entitled What's wrong with McDonald's?, criticizing its environmental, health, and labor record. The corporation wrote to the group demanding they desist and apologize, and, when two of the activists refused to back down, sued them for libel in one of the longest cases in British civil law. A documentary film of the McLibel Trial has been shown in several countries.[95]
In the late 1980s, Phil Sokolof, a millionaire businessman who had suffered a heart attack at the age of 43, took out full-page newspaper ads in New York, Chicago, and other large cities accusing McDonald's menu of being a threat to American health, and asking them to stop using beef tallow to cook their french fries.[citation needed]
Despite the objections of McDonald's, the term "McJob" was added to Merriam-Webster's Collegiate Dictionary in 2003.[96] The term was defined as "a low-paying job that requires little skill and provides little opportunity for advancement".[97]
In 2001, Eric Schlosser's book Fast Food Nation included criticism of the business practices of McDonald's. Among the critiques were allegations that McDonald's (along with other companies within the fast food industry) uses its political influence to increase its profits at the expense of people's health and the social conditions of its workers. The book also brought into question McDonald's advertisement techniques in which it targets children. While the book did mention other fast-food chains, it focused primarily on McDonald's.
In 2002, vegetarian groups, largely Hindu and Buddhist, successfully sued McDonald's for misrepresenting its French fries as vegetarian, when they contained beef broth.[98]
Morgan Spurlock's 2004 documentary film Super Size Me claimed that McDonald's food was contributing to the increase of obesity in society and that the company was failing to provide nutritional information about its food for its customers. Six weeks after the film premiered, McDonald's announced that it was eliminating the super size option, and was creating the adult Happy Meal.




Screenshot from McDonald's Videogame


In 2006, an unsanctioned McDonald's Videogame was released online. It is parody of the business practices of the corporate giant, taking the guise of a tycoon style business simulation game. In the game, the player plays the role of a McDonald's CEO, choosing whether or not to use controversial practices like genetically altered cow feed, plowing over rainforests, and corrupting public officials. McDonald's issued a statement distancing itself from the game.[99]
In January 2014, it was reported that McDonald's was accused of having used a series of tax maneuvers to avoid taxes in France. The company confirmed that tax authorities had visited McDonald's French headquarters in Paris but insisted that it had not done anything wrong, saying, "McDonald's firmly denies the accusation made by L'Express according to which McDonald's supposedly hid part of its revenue from taxes in France."[100]
Company responses to criticism




Discreet shopfront in historic Stratford-upon-Avon


In response to public pressure, McDonald's has sought to include more healthy choices in its menu and has introduced a new slogan to its recruitment posters: "Not bad for a McJob".[101] The word McJob, first attested in the mid-1980s[96] and later popularized by Canadian novelist Douglas Coupland in his book Generation X, has become a buzz word for low-paid, unskilled work with few prospects or benefits and little security. McDonald's disputes this definition of McJob. In 2007, the company launched an advertising campaign with the slogan "Would you like a career with that?" on Irish television, asserting that its jobs have good prospects.
In an effort to respond to growing consumer awareness of food provenance, the fast-food chain changed its supplier of both coffee beans and milk. UK chief executive Steve Easterbrook said: "British consumers are increasingly interested in the quality, sourcing, and ethics of the food and drink they buy".[102] In a bid to tap into the ethical consumer market,[103] McDonald's switched to using coffee beans taken from stocks that are certified by the Rainforest Alliance, a conservation group. Additionally, in response to pressure, McDonald's UK started using organic milk supplies for its bottled milk and hot drinks, although it still uses conventional milk in its milkshakes, and in all of its dairy products in the United States.[104] According to a report published by Farmers Weekly in 2007, the quantity of milk used by McDonald's could have accounted for as much as 5 percent of the UK's organic milk output.[105]
McDonald's announced on May 22, 2008, that, in the United States and Canada, it would switch to using cooking oil that contains no trans fats for its french fries, and canola-based oil with corn and soy oils, for its baked items, pies and cookies, by year's end.[106][107]
With regard to acquiring chickens from suppliers who use CAK/CAS methods of slaughter, McDonald's says that it needs to see more research "to help determine whether any CAS system in current use is optimal from an animal welfare perspective."[108]
Environmental record
In April 2008, McDonald's announced that 11 of its Sheffield, England restaurants have been engaged in a biomass trial that had cut its waste and carbon footprint by half in the area. In this trial, wastes from the restaurants were collected by Veolia Environmental Services and were used to produce energy at a power plant. McDonald's plans to expand this project, although the lack of biomass power plants in the United States will prevent this plan from becoming a national standard anytime soon.[109] In addition, in Europe, McDonald's has been recycling vegetable grease by converting it to fuel for its diesel trucks.[110]
McDonald's has been using a corn-based bioplastic to produce containers for some of its products. The environmental benefits of this technology are controversial, with critics noting that biodegradation is slow, produces greenhouse gases and that contamination of traditional plastic waste streams with bioplastics can complicate recycling efforts.[111]
In 1990, McDonald's worked with the Environmental Defense Fund to stop using "clam shell" shaped styrofoam food containers to house its food products.[112] 20 years later, McDonald's announced they would try replacing styrofoam coffee cups with an alternative material.[113]
The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency has recognized McDonald's continuous effort to reduce solid waste by designing more efficient packaging and by promoting the use of recycled-content materials.[114] McDonald's reports that it is committed towards environmental leadership by effectively managing electric energy, by conserving natural resources through recycling and reusing materials, and by addressing water management issues within the restaurant.[115]
In an effort to reduce energy usage by 25 percent in its restaurants, McDonald's opened a prototype restaurant in Chicago in 2009 with the intention of using the model in its other restaurants throughout the world. Building on past efforts, specifically a restaurant it opened in Sweden in 2000 that was the first to intentionally incorporate green ideas, McDonald's designed the Chicago site to save energy by incorporating old and new ideas such as managing storm water, using skylights for more natural lighting and installing some partitions and tabletops made from recycled goods.[116]
When McDonald's received criticism for its environmental policies in the 1970s, it began to make substantial progress in reducing its use of materials.[117] For instance, an "average meal" in the 1970s—a Big Mac, fries, and a drink—required 46 grams of packaging; today, it requires only 25 grams, allowing a 46 percent reduction.[118] In addition, McDonald's eliminated the need for intermediate containers for cola by having a delivery system that pumps syrup directly from the delivery truck into storage containers, saving two million pounds (910 tonnes) of packaging annually.[119] Overall, weight reductions in packaging and products, as well as the increased usage of bulk packaging ultimately decreased packaging by twenty-four million pounds (11,000 tonnes) annually.[120]
Legal cases
Main article: McDonald's legal cases
McDonald's has been involved in a number of lawsuits and other legal cases, most of which involved trademark disputes. The company has threatened many food businesses with legal action unless it drops the Mc or Mac from trading names.
Asia
On September 8, 2009, McDonald's Malaysian operations lost a lawsuit to prevent another restaurant calling itself McCurry. McDonald's lost in an appeal to Malaysia's highest court, the Federal Court.[121]
Australia
In April 2007, in Perth, Western Australia, McDonald's pleaded guilty to five charges relating to the employment of children under 15 in one of its outlets and was fined A$8,000.[122]
In 2016, the Australian Taxation Office revealed that McDonald's Asia-Pacific Consortium had generated $478 million in revenue in 2013–14, but had paid no tax on those earnings whatsoever.[123]
United Kingdom
McDonald's has defended itself in several cases involving workers' rights.[citation needed]
The longest running legal action of all time in the UK was the McLibel case against 2 defendants who criticized a number of aspects of the company. The trial lasted 10 years and called 130 witnesses. The European Court of Human Rights deemed that the unequal resources of the litigants breached the defendants rights to freedom of speech and biased the trial. The result was widely seen as a "PR disaster."[124]
United States
A famous legal case in the US involving McDonald's was the 1994 decision in Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants where Stella Liebeck was awarded several million dollars after she suffered third-degree burns after spilling a scalding cup of McDonald's coffee on herself.[125]
Use of genetically modified food
In April 2014, it was reported that McDonald's will use, in Europe, chicken meat that was produced by using genetically modified animal feed. Greenpeace argues that McDonald's saves less than one Eurocent for each chicken burger and goes down a path not desired by its customers.[126]
See also





Book: McDonald's





Arcos Dorados Holdings
Burger King—the second largest burger chain
List of hamburger restaurants
List of restaurant chains
The Founder—a 2016 film detailing the creation and controversial business history of McDonald's, that is also a biopic of Ray Kroc
MaDonal—a restaurant operating in northern Iraq that copies many features of McDonald's, illicitly
Maxime, McDuff & McDo-documentary film about the unionizing of a McDonald's in Montreal, Quebec, Canada
Wendy's—the third largest hamburger chain



Food portal
Companies portal
Chicago portal
Illinois portal


References


^ Bomkamp, Samantha (June 13, 2016). "Mcdonald's HQ Move Is Boldest Step Yet in Effort to Transform Itself". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved May 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e f g "Form 10-K: McDonald's Corporation (McDonald's Corporation 2016 Annual Report)" (PDF). United States Securities and Exchange Commission. Commission File Number 1-5231. Retrieved May 1, 2017. 
^ a b "McDonald's future Near West Side neighbors air parking, traffic safety beefs". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved August 7, 2016. 
^ a b Hufford, Austen (June 14, 2016). "McDonald’s to Move Headquarters to Downtown Chicago". Retrieved August 7, 2016 – via Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c http://d18rn0p25nwr6d.cloudfront.net/CIK-0000063908/62200c2b-da82-4364-be92-79ed454e3b88.pdf
^ Robbins, John (October 8, 2010). "How Bad Is McDonald's Food?". Huffington Post. 
^ "The McDonalds and Their Restaurant". www.referenceforbusiness.com. Retrieved January 16, 2017. In 1962, McDonald's golden arches replaced Speedee as the restaurant's main symbol, and ads told customers to "Look for the golden arches." ... Kroc believed in advertising heavily and in targeting children. In 1965, the company introduced a new mascot, a red-haired clown named Ronald McDonald, who became a frequent and friendly face in television commercials. 
^ "McDonalds Museum". Juan Pollo. Retrieved May 14, 2012. 
^ a b McDonald's – The Leading Global Food Service Retailer :: AboutMcDonalds.com, retrieved May 8, 2008
^ "McDonald's Momentum Delivers Another Year of Strong Results for 2011". Yahoo Finance. 2012. Retrieved January 25, 2012. [dead link]
^ Brand, Rachel (December 23, 2006). "Chipotle founder had big dreams". Rocky Mountain News. Archived from the original on July 8, 2009. Retrieved April 27, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's sets October deadline to sell Chipotle stock". Denver Business Journal. BizJournals.com. July 25, 2006. Retrieved August 10, 2009. 
^ "McDonald's Wraps Up Boston Market Sale". Dow Jones & Company, Inc. News Services. August 27, 2007. Archived from the original on September 28, 2007. Retrieved August 28, 2007. 
^ Baertlein, Lisa (September 24, 2009). "McDonald's raises cash dividend by 10%". reuters.com. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ "Definition of S&P 500 Aristocrat at Investopedia". Investopedia.com. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ "List of 2009 Dividend Aristocrats via Seeking Alpha, retrieved 10/1/2009". Seekingalpha.com. December 23, 2008. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ Tiffany Hsu (November 9, 2012). "McDonald's monthly sales fall for first time in nine years". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved March 9, 2013. 
^ "McDonald's New Turnaround Plan Is So 1990s". 
^ Baertlein, Lisa (March 14, 2017). "McDonald's, late to mobile ordering, seeks to avoid pitfalls". Reuters. Retrieved March 15, 2017. 
^ Patton, Leslie (November 23, 2015). "McDonald's Knows You're Sick of Screw-Ups at Drive-Thru Windows". Bloomberg. Retrieved March 15, 2017. 
^ Ferdman, Roberto A. (August 13, 2015). "This is a terrible sign for McDonald's". The Washington Post. 
^ a b "McDonald's to Cut U.S. Stores for First Time in Decades". The New York Times. Associated Press. June 18, 2015. 
^ LUBLIN, JOANN S.; JARGON, JULIE (October 15, 2015). "McDonald’s Nears Decision on Real Estate". Retrieved October 22, 2015. 
^ Jargon, Julie. "McDonald's Won't Spin Off Real Estate Holdings". Wall Street Journal. ISSN 0099-9660. Retrieved November 11, 2015. 
^ "Hamburger University Campus". mcdonalds.com. Retrieved January 18, 2017. 
^ "Hamburger University - Our Facility". 
^ "McDonald’s Business Model and Strategy :: McDonald’s". corporate.mcdonalds.com. Retrieved January 24, 2017. 
^ Eidelson, Josh (November 19, 2013). "McDonald's tells workers to "sing away stress," "chew away cares" and go to church". Salon. Retrieved August 21, 2014. These and other tips appear on a "McResource Line" website created by the McDonald's Corp. to advise workers on stress, health and personal finances. Among the tips that appear on the site: "Chewing gum can reduce cortisol levels by 16%"; "At least two vacations a year can cut heart attack risk by 50%"; "Singing along to your favorite songs can lower your blood pressure"; and "People who attend more church services tend to have lower blood pressure." 
^ Schlosser, Eric. Fast Food Nation. 
^ Steele, Jeffrey. Oak Brook history in caring hands society president is part of village's changing heritage". Chicago Tribune. July 29, 1998. Page 88. Retrieved on September 17, 2009.
^ Cross, Robert. Inside Hamburger Central". Chicago Tribune. January 9, 1972. G18. Retrieved on September 17, 2009.
^ "Board of Directors Biographical Information". McDonald's. Retrieved November 3, 2014. 
^ "India's 50 most trusted brands". Rediff.com. January 20, 2011. 
^ "The Big Mac index". The Economist. October 7, 2015. 
^ "The Big Mac index – Currency comparisons, to go". The Economist. July 28, 2011. Retrieved July 28, 2011. 
^ Friedman, Thomas L. (December 8, 1996). "Foreign Affairs Big Mac I". The New York Times. ISSN 0362-4331. Retrieved January 24, 2017. 
^ "The Lexus and the Olive Tree". Thomaslfriedman.com. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's quits Crimea due to fears of trade clash". INA Daily News. Retrieved April 5, 2014. 
^ "Russia Shuts 4 McDonald's Restaurants Amid Ukraine Tensions". Moscow News.Net. August 20, 2014. Retrieved August 21, 2014. 
^ "Russian Deputy PM says McDonalds is not being targeted in response to sanctions". Russia Herald. August 23, 2014. Retrieved August 23, 2014. 
^ Stanford University Press, 1998, edited by James L. Watson
^ "McDonald's deal with oil company marries China's new love of fast food, cars". Archived from the original on March 25, 2007. 
^ Samuel, Henry (October 4, 2009). "McDonald's restaurants to open at the Louvre". The Daily Telegraph. London. 
^ Gasparro, Annie; Jargon, Julie (September 5, 2012). "McDonald's to Go Vegetarian in India". The Wall Street Journal. p. B7. 
^ "10 Countries That Don't Have McDonald's". WhatCulture.com. Retrieved December 1, 2015. 
^ "VOLUNTARY ANNOUNCEMENT: ACQUISITION OF A CONTROLLING INTEREST IN MCDONALD'S MAINLAND CHINA AND HONG KONG BUSINESSES" (PDF). CITIC Limited. Hong Kong Stock Exchange. January 9, 2017. Retrieved January 13, 2017. 
^ "Fanatics Preach Fast Food Evangelism". Fox News. July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald’s is going for healthier fare and greater digitisation". The Economist. January 28, 2017. ISSN 0013-0613. Retrieved February 5, 2017. 
^ "McDonald's to remove corn syrup from buns, curbs antibiotics in chicken". August 1, 2016 – via Reuters. 
^ a b c Mohapatra, Sanjay (2012). Information Strategy Design and Practices. Google Books: Springer Science & Business Media. p. 301. ISBN 1-4614-2427-5. 
^ "McDonald's Restaurants". Caterersearch.com. Archived from the original on July 16, 2011. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDrive: il fast food comodo, facile e veloce". McDonald's Italia. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's vs Newk's Franchise Cost Comparison and Analysis". www.thefranchisemall.com. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ Duca, Lauren. "This McDonald's has a "Walk-Thru"". Teen Vogue. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's Australia". mcdonalds.com.au. Retrieved June 6, 2016. 
^ Kieler, Ashlee. "McDonald's Ends 'Create Your Taste' Customized Burger Program". Consumerist. Retrieved December 18, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's and BP test combined operations. (McDonald's Restaurants; BP Oil Co.)". Archived from the original on January 18, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's serves up 'MCSTOP' – Its restaurant for big crowds". August 16, 1984. 
^ a b c d e "Restaurants going high tech". Yahoo Tech. June 14, 2016. Retrieved June 14, 2016. 
^ "El único Mc Donald's kosher del mundo fuera de Israel es certificado por Ajdut Kosher" (Spanish and English). Last consulted: May 22, 2011
^ "Buenos Aires Restaurants – Kosher McDonald's". travel.nytimes.com. Archived from the original on March 3, 2009. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "Big Mac with a side of quinoa? Inside the world's first McDonald's Next". edition.cnn.com. Cable News Network. Retrieved August 9, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's wants a digital-age makeover". 
^ "Mickey D's McMakeover". Archived from the original on May 24, 2006. 
^ Bruce Horovitz (May 9, 2011). "McDonald's revamps store to look more upscale". USA Today. Retrieved June 26, 2012. 
^ "McDonald's Bans Smoking at All the Sites It Owns". The New York Times. February 24, 1994. 
^ Gibson, Richard (August 12, 1999). "Want Fries With That? Ask McDonald's New E-Clerks". The Wall Street Journal.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ O'Toole, James (May 22, 2014). "Robots will replace fast-food workers". CNN Money. Retrieved August 18, 2016. 
^ Johnson, Hollis (May 16, 2016). "Fast food workers are becoming obsolete". Business Insider. Retrieved August 18, 2016. 
^ Neville, Simon (August 25, 2008). "McDonald's ties nine out of 10 workers to zero-hours contracts". The Guardian. London. Retrieved August 10, 2013. 
^ ' 'Anzalone Liszt Grove Research' ' and ' 'Fast Food Foreward' '. New York's Hidden Crime Wave: Wage Theft and New York City's Fast Food Workers
^ Maclay, Kathleen. "Fast Food, Poverty Wages: The Public Cost of Low-wage jobs in the Fast Food Industry". University of California Labor Center October 15, 2013.
^ Susanna Kim (November 21, 2013). McDonald's Defends Telling Workers to 'Quit Complaining' to Reduce Stress. ABC News. Retrieved November 21, 2013.
^ Associated Press (December 26, 2013). "McDonald's Closes Employee Website Amid Criticism". DailyDigest. Archived from the original on December 28, 2013. Retrieved December 26, 2013. 
^ Goldberg, Harmony, "How McDonald's gets away with rampant wage theft", Salon, April 6, 2015. Accessed May 22, 2015.
^ Tae-hoon, Lee (August 16, 2015). "McDonald's lures customers with illegal ads on Independence Day". The Korea Observer. Retrieved August 17, 2015. 
^ "McDonald's Hourly Pay". Glassdoor. Retrieved December 1, 2015. 
^ Beckerman, Josh. "McDonald's New CEO Gets 69% Pay Raise"[dead link], Wall Street Journal, March 3, 2015. Accessed May 22, 2015.
^ Bruce Horovitz and Yamiche Alcindor (April 15, 2015). Fast-food strikes widen into social-justice movement. USA Today. Accessed May 22, 2015.
^ a b Taylor, Kate (May 25, 2016). "McDonald's ex-CEO just revealed a terrifying reality for fast-food workers". Business Insider. Retrieved August 18, 2016. 
^ Jana Kasperkevic (March 16, 2015). McDonald's workers told to treat burns with condiments, survey shows. The Guardian. Retrieved March 17, 2015.
^ Owen, Tess (September 10, 2015). "McDonald's Is Switching to Cage-Free Eggs at a Delicate Moment for the Poultry Industry". VICE News. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ "The Insanely Complicated Logistics of Cage-Free Eggs for All". Wired. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ Gelles, David (July 16, 2016). "Eggs That Clear the Cages, but Maybe Not the Conscience". New York Times. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ Kesmodel, David (March 18, 2015). "Cage-Free Hens Study Finds Little Difference in Egg Quality". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ Strom, Stephanie (February 13, 2012). "McDonald's Set to Phase Out Suppliers' Use of Sow Crates". New York Times. Retrieved August 4, 2016. 
^ "McDonald's renews as FIFA World Cup Sponsor until 2014". FIFA.com. Retrieved October 24, 2014
^ "McDonald's slogans used around the world, past and present". Retrieved June 23, 2015. 
^ William M. O'Barr, "Advertising in India." Advertising & Society Review 9#3 (2008): 1-33.
^ "Mars rover Curiosity's other mission: publicity machine". Statesman.com. December 5, 2012. Retrieved March 9, 2013. 
^ McHappy Day, Ronald McDonald House Charities. Retrieved September 12, 2010.
^ McHappy Day Retrieved November 8, 2010.
^ "Donor Turns Fast Food Into Big Bucks For Hospital". The New York Times. December 8, 1995. Retrieved May 24, 2010. 
^ "The night time 'McRefugees' of Hong Kong". BBC news. October 27, 2015. Retrieved October 10, 2016. 
^ "BBC NEWS | UK | McLibel: Longest case in English history". BBC News. Retrieved April 9, 2015. 
^ a b Associated Press (November 11, 2003). "Merriam-Webster: 'McJob' is here to stay". CNN Offbeat News. 
^ "McJob". Merriam-Webster's Online Dictionary. 1986. Retrieved November 29, 2009. 
^ "Letter from McDonald's headquarters claiming fries are vegetarian". 
^ Bluestien, Greg. "Creators Put Politics Into Video Games", The Associated Press, published January 21, 2007, accessed April 20, 2007.
^ "Do You Want Fries With That Audit?". Forbes. January 23, 2014. 
^ Sweney, Mark (April 20, 2006). "Not bad for a McJob?". The Guardian. London. Retrieved March 30, 2009. 
^ Ian Ashbridge (July 3, 2007). "McDonalds' milk goes organic – 7/3/2007 – Farmers Weekly". Fwi.co.uk. Archived from the original on May 14, 2012. Retrieved June 7, 2012. 
^ Carrigan, Marylyn and De Pelsmacker, Patrick (2009). Will ethical consumers sustain their values in the global credit crunch? International Marketing Review, 26(6), pp. 674–687,(p.7).
^ "The Truth-O-Meter : Chef Jamie Oliver praises McDonald's in England". Truth-O-Meter. Tampa Bay Times. Retrieved October 22, 2012. 
^ Ian Ashbridge (July 3, 2007). "McDonald's milk goes organic – 03/07/2007 – FarmersWeekly". Fwi.co.uk. Archived from the original on September 24, 2009. Retrieved August 27, 2010. 
^ "McDonald's Holds down Dollar Meal, Making Menu Healthier". International Business Times. May 22, 2008. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's says all US French fries cooked in zero-trans-fat oil". www.gmanews. Archived from the original on January 14, 2011. 
^ "Report of the Corporate Responsibility Committee of the Board of Directors of McDonald's Corporation" (PDF). November 19, 2009. Archived from the original (PDF) on July 17, 2011. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's hails success of waste-to-energy trial". Businessgreen.com. April 14, 2008. Archived from the original on September 26, 2012. Retrieved April 9, 2015. 
^ "Local woman creates environmental-friendly Web site". Herald-dispatch.com. April 19, 2008. Archived from the original on September 5, 2012. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ Vidal, John (April 26, 2008). "'Sustainable' bio-plastic can damage the environment". The Guardian. London. Retrieved July 23, 2011. 
^ "McDonald's and Environmental Defense Fund Mark 20 Years of Partnerships for Sustainability". Environmental Defense Fund. November 15, 2010. Retrieved November 28, 2013. 
^ "McDonald's testing eco-friendlier coffee cups". NBC News. March 12, 2012. Retrieved November 28, 2013. 
^ "U.S. Environmental Protection Agency". Archived from the original on August 5, 2012. Retrieved April 17, 2008. 
^ "McDonald's Corporation website". Archived from the original on May 31, 2016. Retrieved April 17, 2008. 
^ Goodman, Matthew (April 5, 2009). "Big Mac, hold the CO2". The Sunday Times. London. 
^ "National Pollution Prevention Center for Higher Education" (PDF). 
^ Environmental Defense Fund. Task Force Report. p. 42.
^ Environmental Defense Fund and McDonald's Corporation. Waste Reduction Task Force Final Report. Oak Brook, IL: McDonald's, 1991. p. 22.
^ "Corporation. McDonald's Packaging – The Facts. Oak Brook, IL: McDonald's, 1990. p. 7.". 
^ BBC online news article dated September 8, 2009 News.BB.co.uk
^ "McDonald's fined for employing underage workers". ABC News Online. April 12, 2007. Archived from the original on April 18, 2007. Retrieved April 12, 2007. 
^ "98 private companies earning over $200m pay no tax: ATO". ABC News. Retrieved April 4, 2016. 
^ "McLibel: Longest case in English history". BBC news. February 15, 2005. Retrieved January 17, 2016. 
^ Do You Know the Full Story Behind the Infamous McDonald's Coffee Case and How Corporations Used it to Promote Tort Reform? Democracy Now! January 25, 2011.
^ "McDonald's: Gentechnik im Burger". Spiegel Online (in German). April 27, 2014. Retrieved December 1, 2015. 


Further reading

Evans, Stephen (April 20, 2004). "McDonald's: The journey to health". BBC News. Retrieved June 30, 2016. 
Horovitz, Bruce (May 8, 2014). "McDonald's testing seasoned fries". USA Today. Retrieved June 30, 2016. 
Love, John F. (April 1987). "Big Macs, Fries, and Real Estate". Financial Executive (4): 20–6. 
Thomas Derdak and Jay P. Pederson, ed. (2004). "McDonald's". International directory of company histories. 67 (3rd ed.). St. James Press. pp. 108–9. ISBN 978-1-55862-512-9. 
"McDonald's : Behind The Arches" by John F. Love, paperback July 1, 1995
"Grinding It Out: The Making of McDonald's" by Ray Kroc, 1977 ISBN 0809282593
"Ray & Joan: The Man Who Made the McDonald's Fortune and the Woman Who Gave It All Away" by Lisa Napoli, 2016 ISBN 1101984953
"Fast Food Nation: The Dark Side of the All-American Meal" by Eric Schlosser, 2001 ISBN 0395977894

External links

Find more aboutMcDonald'sat Wikipedia's sister projects

Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Travel guide from Wikivoyage
Learning resources from Wikiversity
Data from Wikidata



Official Website
Corporate Website



Business data for McDonald's: Google Finance
Yahoo! Finance
Reuters
SEC filings










v
t
e


McDonald's






History
Advertising

ad programs


Countries with franchises
Legal cases
Product list
International availability





People



Richard and Maurice McDonald
Ray Kroc
Joan Kroc
Ralph Alvarez
Charlie Bell
Al Bernardin
Jim Cantalupo
George Cohon
Dan Coudreaut
Steve Easterbrook
Janice L. Fields
Den Fujita
Don Gorske
Jack M. Greenberg
Eikō Harada
June Martino
Herb Peterson
Michael R. Quinlan
Ed Rensi
Willard Scott
James A. Skinner
Donald N. Smith
Harry J. Sonneborn
Don Thompson
Fred L. Turner





Company



Hamburger University
Leaps and Bounds
McBarge
McCafé
McDonald's #1 Store Museum
McDonald's (Will Rogers Turnpike)
Oldest McDonald's restaurant
Rock N Roll McDonald's
Ronald McDonald House Charities





Products




Beef



Big Mac
Big N' Tasty
Deluxe line
Kiwiburger
Quarter Pounder (McRoyal)





Chicken



Chicken McNuggets
McChicken





Other



Deli Choices
Filet-O-Fish
Georgie Pie
Happy Meal
McArabia
McGriddles
McMuffin
McRib
Premium line
Shamrock Shake





Former



Arch Deluxe
McAfrika








Advertising




Campaigns



Changeables
Global Gladiators
Golden Arches
Mac Tonight
McDonaldland
McDonald's Monopoly
McDonald's Treasure Land Adventure
M.C. Kids
McKids
Ronald McDonald
Teenie Beanies
The Wacky Adventures of Ronald McDonald





Sponsorships



Kyle Larson (NASCAR)
Jamie McMurray (NASCAR)
Graham Rahal (IndyCar Series)
McDonald's All-American Game
McDonald's Championship
McDonald's Championship (golf)
McDonald's Cycle Center
McDonald's Gospelfest
McDonald's Olympic Swim Stadium





Related



Burger wars
Donald Land
Fast food advertising
Mac and Me (1988 film)
McDonald's sign (Pine Bluff, Arkansas)
Supersize








Branches



Canada
Israel
New Zealand





Criticism



Fast Food Nation (film)
McDonaldization
McDonald's Videogame
McJob
McRefugee
McLibel
Maxime, McDuff & McDo
Super Size Me

Don't Eat This Book







Legal cases



Liebeck v. McDonald's Restaurants
Magee v. McDonald's
McDonald's Restaurants v. Morris & Steel
Sid & Marty Krofft Television Productions Inc. v. McDonald's Corp.





Related



McDelivery
Big Mac Index
Bill Elliott
McDonald's Young Entertainers
McWords
San Ysidro McDonald's massacre
"Seriously McDonalds"
Sydney River McDonald's murders
Taiwan McDonald's bombings
Urban legends
Boom, Like That
The Founder (2016 film)










Links to related articles











v
t
e


Components of the Dow Jones Industrial Average






3M
American Express
Apple
Boeing
Caterpillar
Chevron
Cisco Systems
Coca-Cola
Disney
DuPont
ExxonMobil
General Electric
Goldman Sachs
The Home Depot
Intel
IBM
Johnson & Johnson
JPMorgan Chase
McDonald's
Merck & Co.
Microsoft
Nike
Pfizer
Procter & Gamble
Travelers
UnitedHealth Group
United Technologies
Verizon Communications
Visa
Walmart












v
t
e


Fast food and fast casual restaurant chains in the United States






Chicken chains
Coffeehouse chains
Pizza chains





Hamburgers



A&W
Arctic Circle
Back Yard
Big Boy
Burger King
Burgerville
Carl's Jr.
Checkers/Rally's
Cook Out
Fatburger
Five Guys
Freddy's
Fuddruckers
The Habit
Hardee's
Hwy 55
In-N-Out
Jack in the Box
Johnny Rockets
Krystal
McDonald's
Red Robin
Roy Rogers
Shake Shack
Smashburger
Sonic
Steak 'n Shake
Wayback
Wendy's
Whataburger
White Castle





Asian



L&L Hawaiian Barbecue
Manchu Wok
Panda Express
Pei Wei Asian Diner
P. F. Chang's China Bistro
Pick Up Stix
Sarku





Baked goods



Au Bon Pain
Auntie Anne's
Bruegger's
Cinnabon
Corner Bakery Cafe
Dunkin' Donuts
Einstein Bros.
Great American Cookies
Honey Dew Donuts
Krispy Kreme
Mrs. Fields
Nestlé Toll House
Panera Bread
Pretzelmaker/Pretzel Time
Shipley Do-Nuts
Tim Hortons
T.J. Cinnamons
Wetzel's
Winchell's





Beverages



Argo Tea
Biggby Coffee
Caribou
Coffee Bean & Tea Leaf
Coffee Beanery
Dunn Bros
Gloria Jean's
Jamba Juice
Juice It Up!
Orange Julius
Peet's
Planet Smoothie
Robeks
Seattle's Best Coffee
Smoothie King
Starbucks
Teavana
Tropical Smoothie Cafe
Tully's





Frozen
desserts



Baskin-Robbins
Ben & Jerry's
Braum's
Bruster's
Carvel
Cold Stone
Culver's
Dairy Queen
Dippin' Dots
Fosters Freeze
Friendly's
Golden Spoon
Graeter's
Häagen-Dazs
Handel's
Kiwi Yogurt
MaggieMoo's
Marble Slab
Menchie's
Pinkberry
Red Mango
Rita's
Sweet Frog
Tastee-Freez
TCBY
Tropical Sno
Tutti Frutti
Yogen Früz
Yogurtland





Hot dogs



Hot Dog on a Stick
Nathan's Famous
Portillo's
Wienerschnitzel





Mexican-style /
Tex-Mex



Baja Fresh
Cafe Rio
Chipotle
Chronic Tacos
Del Taco
El Pollo Loco
Freebirds
Green/Red Burrito
La Salsa
Moe's
Pancheros
Qdoba
Rubio's
Taco Bell
Taco Bueno
Taco Cabana
Taco del Mar
Taco John's
Taco Mayo
Taco Time
Tijuana Flats
Wahoo's Fish Taco





Noodles



Fazoli's
Noodles & Company
Skyline Chili





Sandwiches



Arby's
Atlanta Bread
Blimpie
Capriotti's
Charley's
Così
Cousins
D'Angelo
Daphne's
Erbert & Gerbert's
Firehouse Subs
Great Wraps
Jason's
Jerry's Subs
Jersey Mike's
Jimmy John's
Lee's Sandwiches
Lenny's Sub
McAlister's Deli
Miami Subs
Mr. Hero
Newk's Eatery
Penn Station
Port of Subs
PDQ
Potbelly
Quiznos
Rax
Runza
Sandella's
Schlotzsky's
Steak Escape
Subway
Togo's
Tubby's
Tudor's Biscuit World
Which Wich?





Seafood



Arthur Treacher's
Captain D's
H. Salt Esquire
Ivar's
Long John Silver's
Skippers Seafood & Chowder House





Defunct



Bresler's Ice Cream
Brigham's
Burger Chef
Carrols
D'Lites
Druther's
Henry's Hamburgers
Hot 'n Now
Hot Sam Pretzels
Naugles
Red Barn
Sandy's
Zantigo












v
t
e


Illinois-based corporations



Fortune 500
corporations
(by size–2013)



Walgreens Boots Alliance
Archer Daniels Midland
Boeing
Caterpillar Inc.
State Farm Insurance
Abbott Laboratories
Sears Holdings
United Continental Holdings
Deere & Company
Mondelēz International
Allstate
McDonald's
Exelon
Kraft Heinz
Illinois Tool Works
Baxter International
Navistar International
RR Donnelley
CDW
Hillshire Brands
Discover Financial
W. W. Grainger
Motorola Solutions
Dover Corporation
Tenneco
Ingredion
Anixter
United Stationers
AbbVie
Old Republic International





Other major
public companies
(alphabetically)



ACCO Brands
Accretive Health
Allscripts
Amcol International Corporation
Arthur J. Gallagher & Co.
Brunswick Corporation
Calamos
Career Education Corporation
Catamaran Corporation
CBOE Holdings
CF Industries Holdings
CME Group
CNA Financial
Equity Residential
Fortune Brands Home & Security
General Growth Properties
Hospira
Hyatt Hotels Corp.
Integrys Energy Group
Jones Lang LaSalle
Kemper Corporation
Nalco Holding Company
Nicor
Northern Trust
RLI Corp.
Rubicon Technology
Stericycle
Telephone and Data Systems
Titan International
Tribune Media
Tronc
Tootsie Roll Industries
ULTA Beauty
US Foods
USG Corporation
Westell
Zebra Technologies





Other major
private companies
(alphabetically)



Ace Hardware
Baker & McKenzie
Blue Cross Blue Shield Association
Claire's
Country Financial
Danfoss Power Solutions
Dot Foods
Eby-Brown
Electro-Motive Diesel
Flex-N-Gate
Follett Corporation
Gardner Denver
Grant Thornton LLP
Health Care Service Corporation
Heico Cos.
Hendrickson International
Hub International
Jenner & Block
Kirkland & Ellis
Marmon Group
Mayer Brown
Medline Industries
Molex
Morton Salt
Nestlé Frozen Pizza
OSI Group
Pactiv
Reyes Holdings
Ryerson, Inc.
Sidley Austin
Skidmore, Owings & Merrill
Solo Cup Company
Tellabs
TransUnion
True Value
Wirtz Corporation





Related topics



Breweries in Illinois
Companies in the Chicago metropolitan area
Food manufacturers of Chicago
Newspapers in Illinois
Wineries in Illinois












v
t
e


Food chains in the United Kingdom



Casual dining



Angus Steakhouse
Ask
Beefeater Grill
Bella Italia
Brewers Fayre
Byron Hamburgers
Café Rouge
Carluccio's
Chiquito
Damon's
Ed's Easy Diner
Frankie & Benny's
Giraffe
Gourmet Burger Kitchen
Harry Ramsden's
Harvester
Hungry Horse
La Tasca
Little Chef
Loch Fyne Restaurants
Nando's
OK Diner
Pizza Hut
PizzaExpress
Prezzo
Strada
Table Table
T.G.I. Friday's
Toby Carvery
Tony Roma's
Wagamama
Wahaca
Wildwood Kitchen
Zizzi





Fast food



Barburrito
Burger King
Chicken Cottage
Chipotle Mexican Grill
Dixy Chicken
Domino's Pizza
Five Guys
KFC
McDonald's
Morley's
Papa John's Pizza
Sam's Chicken
Southern Fried Chicken
Subway
Taco Bell
Tops Pizza
Tortilla
Wasabi
Wimpy
YO! Sushi





Baked goods



Auntie Anne's
Cinnabon
Cooplands
Ditsch
Dunkin' Donuts
Eat
Greggs
Krispy Kreme
Millie's Cookies
Patisserie Valerie
Pret a Manger
Sayers
Spudulike
Upper Crust
The West Cornwall Pasty Company





Coffee shops and tea rooms



AMT Coffee
Betty's
Caffè Nero
Caffè Ritazza
Coffee #1
Coffee Republic
Costa Coffee
Harris + Hoole
Starbucks





Dairy



Baskin-Robbins
Ben & Jerry's
Kaspa's





Pub chains



All Bar One
Chef & Brewer
O'Neill's
Scream Pubs
Slug and Lettuce
Walkabout
Wetherspoons
Yates's














Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 136891459
LCCN: n50000582
ISNI: 0000 0000 9322 4855
GND: 2084334-3
SUDOC: 029547199
BNF: cb121150481 (data)










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=McDonald%27s&oldid=791385530"					
Categories: McDonald's1940 establishments in California1955 establishments in IllinoisCompanies based in DuPage County, IllinoisCompanies in the Dow Jones Industrial AverageCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeFast-food chains of AustraliaFast-food chains of SingaporeFast-food chains of the United StatesFast-food franchisesFast-food hamburger restaurantsMultinational food companiesOak Brook, IllinoisRestaurant chains in the United StatesRestaurants established in 1940American companies established in 1940Hidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from April 2013Pages using citations with accessdate and no URLArticles with dead external links from August 2016CS1 German-language sources (de)Wikipedia indefinitely semi-protected pagesUse mdy dates from March 2017Use American English from August 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from May 2016Wikipedia articles needing clarification from January 2017Wikipedia articles needing clarification from March 2017Articles with unsourced statements from September 2015Articles with limited geographic scope from November 2015USA-centricArticles to be expanded from November 2015All articles to be expandedArticles using small message boxesArticles to be expanded from May 2014Articles with unsourced statements from April 2017NPOV disputes from July 2017All NPOV disputesArticles with peacock terms from July 2017All articles with peacock termsArticles with unsourced statements from December 2014Articles with unsourced statements from March 2015Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikinewsWikiquote 



Languages


AfrikaansالعربيةAsturianuAzərbaycancaবাংলাBân-lâm-gúБеларускаяBikol CentralБългарскиCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiΕλληνικάEspañolEsperantoEstremeñuEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisFryskGalego客家語/Hak-kâ-ngî한국어Հայերենहिन्दीHrvatskiIlokanoBahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתಕನ್ನಡКъарачай-малкъарქართულიҚазақшаKreyòl ayisyenKurdîLatinaLatviešuLietuviųLimburgsLumbaartMagyarМакедонскиമലയാളംმარგალურიمصرىBahasa MelayuBaso MinangkabauNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskOccitanਪੰਜਾਬੀPälzischپنجابیپښتوPolskiPortuguêsRomânăRumantschРусскийСаха тылаScotsSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSlovenščinaکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиBasa SundaSuomiSvenskaTagalogதமிழ்Татарча/tatarçaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаVepsän kel’Tiếng ViệtWinarayייִדיש粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 19 July 2017, at 22:46.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 











Guy  Macdonald's Phone & Address | PeopleByName















 
Contact
Login










 Home
People Alphabetically
M
Macdonald

Guy  Macdonald




People directory with over 600,000,000 names!

Record ID: 254750037Guy  Macdonald3 Benjamin RdLexington, MA 02421Age 58 (Born 1959)(781) 538-5134Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750038Guy  Macdonald6812 Sparkman StTampa, FL 33616Age 39 (Born Dec 1978)(813) 831-8643Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750039Guy  Macdonald807 Terry DrFort Benning, GA 31905Age 39 (Born Dec 1978)(706) 689-1388Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750040Guy  Macdonald125 Magazine StCambridge, MA 02139Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750041Guy  Macdonald156 Tinari DrRichboro, PA 18954Age 58 (Born 1959)(215) 504-2740Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750042Guy  Macdonald2454 State Route 79Harpursville, NY 13787(607) 655-5751Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750043Guy  Macdonald442 Old Route 17Windsor, NY 13865(607) 655-5789Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750044Guy  Macdonald1s6 Tnari DrNewtown, PA 18940(215) 534-2743Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750045Guy  Macdonald515 9th St NwWashington, DC 20004(202) 737-0437Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750046Guy  Macdonald2505 Sandy TrlKeller, TX 76248(817) 428-3755Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750047Guy  Macdonald156 Tinari DrNewtown, PA 18940Age 58 (Born 1959)(215) 504-2740Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750048Guy W Macdonald6909 Woodale DrFort Worth, TX 76148Age 47 (Born Aug 1970)(817) 581-2090Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750049Guy W Macdonald301 State Rt 17Rutherford, NJ 07070Age 73 (Born 1944)Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750050Guy W Macdonald301 State RtRutherford, NJ 07070Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750051Guy W Macdonald300 Bourland RdKeller, TX 76248Age 47 (Born Aug 1970)Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750052Guy W Macdonald1800 Walker RdPenhook, VA 24137Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750053Guy W Macdonald4701 Hillcrest StWichita, KS 67220Age 77 (Born 1940)(316) 744-2501Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750054Guy W Macdonald112 Plymouth RdHillsdale, NJ 07642Age 73 (Born 1944)Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750055Guy W Macdonald817 Fall CrkGrapevine, TX 76051Age 47 (Born Aug 1970)(817) 416-7474Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750056Guy W Macdonald306 Belmont AveAsbury Park, NJ 07712Age 105 (Born Oct 1912)(732) 774-4640Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750057Guy M Macdonald190 Terracina BlvdRedlands, CA 92373(909) 793-8948Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750058Guy M Macdonald2165 Anchor StAnaheim, CA 92802Age 56 (Born 1961)(714) 971-5182Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750059Guy M Macdonald279 Osgood StNorth Andover, MA 01845Age 64 (Born 1953)(978) 685-1398Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750060Guy A Macdonald13060 Sanctuary Cove DrTampa, FL 33637Age 61 (Born Jul 1956)Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750061Guy A Macdonald169 Hunt Club DrAkron, OH 44321Age 61 (Born Jul 1956)Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750062Guy A Macdonald3825 Northgreen AveTampa, FL 33624Age 61 (Born Jul 1956)(813) 968-1453Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750063Guy A Macdonald4657 Coventry PkwyFort Wayne, IN 46804Age 61 (Born Jul 1956)Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750064Guy A Macdonald9811 Red Twig PlFort Wayne, IN 46804Age 61 (Born Jul 1956)Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750065Guy A Macdonald821 Cherry StStockbridge, MI 49285Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750066Guy A Macdonald4403 Hunt Club DrYpsilanti, MI 48197Age 61 (Born Jul 1956)Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750067Guy F Macdonald1084 Rosebud DrBullhead City, AZ 86442Age 89 (Born 1928)(928) 758-4583Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750068Guy J Macdonald9851 Harrison RdMinneapolis, MN 55437Age 59 (Born Jun 1958)Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750069Guy J Macdonald38911 Albert BlvdClinton Township, MI 48036Age 61 (Born Jul 1956)(586) 463-3667Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750070Guy J Macdonald22419 Edgewood StSaint Clair Shores, MI 48080Age 61 (Born Jul 1956)(810) 498-4655Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750071Guy J Macdonald1010 Lake St NeHopkins, MN 55343Age 59 (Born Jun 1958)Background Check - Available
Record ID: 254750072Guy J Macdonald7520 Cahill RdMinneapolis, MN 55439Age 59 (Born Jun 1958)(952) 942-0921Background Check - Available








 


 




1,379,043,021 total records available




Tweet





  Testimonials Read testimonials from real customers who already used our services. Read More

  Webmasters Earn 75% commission on every sale you drive to our website. Weekly payouts! Read More

   Mobile Version Visit us from your smart phone anywhere you are. Read More

   Recent Lookups Check out the most recent reverse phone lookups on PeopleByName.com Read More

 



 Home Mobile Version Phone Directory People Directory Remove information
 Terms of Service Privacy Policy Affiliate Program About Us 
 Member Login Frequently Asked Questions Contact Us Testimonials 
 Careers Product & Services Volume Discounts Site Map 




© PeopleByName All Rights Reserved. 2010-2017




























McDonald's Specials: What's New at McDonald's | McDonald's














{{tmplFields.popuptitle}}
{{tmplFields.popupsubtitle}}























{{tmplFields.popupbutton}}














{{notification.msg}}



{{notification.msg}}
















TRENDING NOW

There’s always something brewing in our kitchens. Get in the loop with the latest on promotions, events, new products, specials, and more.














TRENDING NOW

There’s always something brewing in our kitchens. Get in the loop with the latest on promotions, events, new products, specials, and more.
























Thirsty for a great deal? $1 SOFT DRINKSGet any size for a limited time* 
Thirsty for a great deal?
$1 SOFT DRINKS
Get any size for a limited time*





START SIPPIN’




Limited time only at part. McD. Cannot be combined with other offer or combo meal. ©2017 The Coca-Cola Company














Get sippin’ on this delicious deal $2 SMALL McCAFÉ® Smoothies, Frappés, or Shakes for a limited time* 
Get sippin’ on this delicious deal
$2 SMALL McCAFÉ® 
Smoothies, Frappés, or Shakes for a limited time*





TRY A COOL DRINK




Limited time only at part. McD. Cannot be combined with other offer or combo meal.














Enjoy our $1 any-size soft drinks* CELEBRATE SUMMERWith exclusive summer-themed camera filters and challenges every week in our App.
 
Enjoy our $1 any-size soft drinks*
CELEBRATE SUMMER

With exclusive summer-themed camera filters and challenges every week in our App.






DOWNLOAD OUR APP




*Limited time only at part. McD. Cannot be combined with other offer or combo meal. A la carte only. McD App download and registration required.




















JOIN OUR EMAIL LIST
               For news, promotions, and more delivered right to your inbox.
            















Submit





*By clicking "Submit" you agree to receive emails, promotions, and general messages from McDonald's. In addition, you also agree to the McDonald’s Privacy Statement and Terms & Conditions.

 Already on our list? Update your profile 



You’re In!
               Thanks for signing up! 
Complete Your Profile





Update Your Profile
				 Hello ! This is the info we have for you. Feel free to change it any time you like.
			






Name:




Email:




Spanish:






Birthday:
 



Password:
••••••••



Address:

edit






Update your profile 











JOIN OUR EMAIL LIST
			 For news, promotions, and more delivered right to your inbox.
	  






 








Submit





*By clicking "Submit" you agree to receive emails, promotions, and general messages from McDonald's. In addition, you also agree to the McDonald’s Privacy Statement and Terms & Conditions.
 Already on our list?
		Update your profile





You’re In!
			 Thanks for signing up! 
Complete Your Profile





Update Your Profile
         Hello ! This is the info we have for you. Feel free to change it any time you like.
      






Name:




Email:




Spanish:






Birthday:
 



Password:
••••••••



Address:

edit






Update your profile 


























Please select a location below:




 {{location.formattedAddress}} 




















                          French McDonald’s are selling burgers with two new sides: A knife and a fork - The Washington Post                                                                        2         Desktop notifications are on   | Turn off                    Subscribe       Account Profile Newsletters & Alerts Gift Subscriptions Contact Us Help Desk              Accessibility for screenreader                Share on Facebook  Share on Twitter  Share on Google Plus  Share via Email  Share on LinkedIn  Share on Pinterest  Share on Tumblr           Resize Text Print Article  Comments             The inside track on Washington politics.     Be the first to know about new   stories from PowerPost. Sign up to follow, and we’ll e-mail you free updates as they’re published.    You’ll receive free e-mail news updates each time a new story is published.    You’re all set!       Sign up   *Invalid email address   Got it   Got it                                   Food French McDonald’s are selling burgers with two new sides: A knife and a fork            The inside track on Washington politics.     Be the first to know about new   stories from PowerPost. Sign up to follow, and we’ll e-mail you free updates as they’re published.    You’ll receive free e-mail news updates each time a new story is published.    You’re all set!       Sign up   *Invalid email address   Got it   Got it                 By Maura Judkis  By Maura Judkis   June 13  Follow @MauraJudkis       This Paris McDonald’s restaurant will now have couteaux (knives) and fourchettes (forks) behind the counter. (Kenzo Tribouillard/AFP via Getty Images)  In America, we hold these truths to be self-evident: Pizza, burgers, french fries, hot dogs and fast-food fried chicken are meant to be eaten with our hands (a.k.a “God’s Utensils”). Using a fork or knife, as many politicians have learned after unfortunate photo-ops throughout the years, is a sign of weakness, un-American-ness and unfitness for public office. Heaven forbid you eat your pizza with a knife and fork, as New York City Mayor Bill de Blasio did in 2014, and Gov. John Kasich did last year. Even President Trump was mocked for eating his Kentucky Fried Chicken with a knife and fork on the campaign trail. Because there’s nothing more American than getting grease and salt on your bare hands, Americans may be surprised to learn that one of the country’s most famous culinary exports — McDonald’s — is kowtowing to local cutlery mores. In France, certain McDonald’s burgers will now come with utensils, because French people — quelle surprise! — eat burgers with a knife and a fork.   [I tried to eat with the McDonald’s frork. It was actually kind of fun.]   This is a fact that should surprise no one — of course the French, always more sophisticated, would eat fast food with a knife and a fork. And yet, it still manages to surprise just about everyone.   Guy next to me with a French accent eating the Nopa burger with a fork and knife and I’m getting irrationally angry help — Richie Nakano (@linecook) August 19, 2015     Was judging the hell out of this French lady for eating her burger with a knife and fork, but when mine arrived, I understood. #tolerance — Alison Grasso (@grassowhat) August 15, 2016   Burgers have been getting more popular in France over the years, and one French market research firm found that, at 80 percent of the 145,000 restaurants they surveyed, burgers were outselling steak frites. Le Figaro reports today that McDo’s, as the company is colloquially called there, will offer recyclable plastic knives and forks in its 1,400 French restaurants, some of which also offer table service. Save your “Pulp Fiction” jokes about a Royale with cheese — the cutlery will only be handed out for orders of the brand’s more expensive signature burgers, not the regular menu.   [McDonald’s latest move to regain customers: Actually use fresh beef]   “The cutlery is an evolution and not a break,” said Xavier Royaux, vice president of marketing for McDonald’s France, to Le Figaro. But what would they think of the frork? More from Food An Irish restaurant chain is upset that McDonald’s owns so many ‘Mc’ trademarks Can smart kitchen devices actually make you a better cook? What are cloud eggs? The latest food trend flooding your Instagram feed.         lifestyle food food       true          Please provide a valid email address.           Sign up      You’re all set!   See all newsletters                Comments           Share on FacebookShare       Share on TwitterTweet     Share via Email                  Maura Judkis covers culture, food, and the arts.  Follow @MauraJudkis                          Show Comments       Discussion Policy     Comments       SuperFan Badge SuperFan badge holders consistently post smart, timely comments about Washington area sports and teams. More about badges | Request a badge   Culture Connoisseur Badge Culture Connoisseurs consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on the arts, lifestyle and entertainment. More about badges | Request a badge   Fact Checker Badge Fact Checkers contribute questions, information and facts to The Fact Checker. More about badges | Request a badge   Washingtologist Badge Washingtologists consistently post thought-provoking, timely comments on events, communities, and trends in the Washington area. More about badges | Request a badge   Post Writer Badge This commenter is a Washington Post editor, reporter or producer.   Post Forum Badge Post Forum members consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on politics, national and international affairs. More about badges | Request a badge   Weather Watcher Badge Weather Watchers consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on climates and forecasts. More about badges | Request a badge   World Watcher Badge World Watchers consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on international affairs. More about badges | Request a badge   Post Contributor Badge This commenter is a Washington Post contributor. Post contributors aren’t staff, but may write articles or columns. In some cases, contributors are sources or experts quoted in a story. More about badges | Request a badge   Post Recommended Washington Post reporters or editors recommend this comment or reader post.   You must be logged in to report a comment. Sign in here   You must be logged in to recommend a comment. Sign in here   Comments our editors find particularly useful or relevant are displayed in Top Comments, as are comments by users with these badges: . Replies to those posts appear here, as well as posts by staff writers.All comments are posted in the All Comments tab. More about badgesGet a badge  To pause and restart automatic updates, click "Live" or "Paused". If paused, you'll be notified of the number of additional comments that have come in.    Comments our editors find particularly useful or relevant are displayed in Top Comments, as are comments by users with these badges: . Replies to those posts appear here, as well as posts by staff writers.          Spam Offensive Disagree Off-Topic        Among the criteria for featured comments: likes by users, replies by users, previous history of valuable commenting, and selection by moderators.                 Facebook  Twitter  Reddit     StumbleUpon  Digg                         Most Read        1   Sean Spicer’s 6 months in the White House, as told by Stephen Colbert       2   Beyoncé’s wax figure looked too white to some. So Madame Tussauds gave it new ‘styling.’       3   A car crash topples a Confederate statue and forces a Southern town to confront its past       4   The ballad of Sean Spicer: He snagged the Washington dream job, but at a price.       5   Jim Vance was a TV news fixture for decades, in a largely transient town.            The story must be told. Subscribe to The Washington Post.   Subscribe           lifestyle food food     Success! Check your inbox for details.        Please enter a valid email address    You might also like:                 Sign Up No Thanks   See all newsletters        Our Online Games    Play right from this page                    Mahjongg Dimensions  Strategy game              Mahjongg Candy  Strategy game              Word Wipe  Word game                        washingtonpost.com © 1996-2017 The Washington Post   Help and Contact Us Terms of Service Privacy Policy Print Products Terms of Sale Digital Products Terms of Sale Submissions and Discussion Policy RSS Terms of Service Ad Choices        Close video player   Now Playing                                                             


 














McDonalds Asked To Stop Advertising During 'F | The Daily Caller





















 


























































The DCHome
Politics
US
World
Entertainment
Sports
Business
Opinion
Outdoors
Deals
Issues
Blogs
Send a Tip
ColumnistsAnn Coulter
Ask Matt Labash
The Mirror
DC Trawler
Ginni Thomas
 












 
 



        

The Daily Caller 

 
Search:






 






 














 








Entertainment


 
 
The Parents Television Council asks McDonalds to stop running commericals during "Family Guy". 

  


McDonalds Asked To Stop Advertising During ‘Family Guy’





Alexis Gulino

 


9:14 PM 06/17/2015 





 


 


 























 Pinterest



 Reddit



 LinkedIn



 WhatsApp








 



 



 
Share



 


 


 


 


TOP












The Parents Television Council is making efforts to get McDonald’s to stop running commercials during Fox’s “Family Guy,” claiming that the show is not family-friendly.
Robert Gibbs, McDonald’s new communications chief as of June, has been forced to respond to a series of claims that the suggestive and sexual language of Seth MacFarlane’s cartoon is not suitable for McDonald’s customers.
The Council has singled out McDonald’s as one company whose advertising does not cater to the correct audience, reports The Chicago Tribune.
One board member, Gary Lesser, a lawyer and Democratic donor from Florida, sent a letter on June 11, citing the show’s TV-14 rating and inappropriate humor as a reason to completely alter advertising schedules in an effort to change the company’s decision to air advertisements during “Family Guy” episodes.



WATCH:

In the letter to Gibbs, he wrote, “How can a company that sells Happy Meals to children use its media dollars to sponsor jokes about sexually assaulting children?”
The Parents Television Council’s page urges people to take action by writing on their page, “Is it any wonder that this once-trusted family brand is losing customers – especially families – when they are paying for content like this?”



The Chicago Tribune reported that the Parents Television Council singled McDonald’s out as the top sponsor of sexual content, suggestive dialogue and foul language, based on its research of broadcast television programs in May 2014.
Just one month ago, TheBlaze reported that PTC President Tim Winter wrote in a statement, “The maker of Happy Meals is underwriting jokes about statutory rape, date rape, and other sexually exploitative content on a prime-time broadcast television cartoon watched by millions of children.”
That same month, the group started campaigning to U.S. Chief Marketing Officer Deborah Wahl. PTC created a website form in which concerned parents can send Wahl a form letter to convince her to modify the company’s philosophy from “Billions Served” to “Billions Heard”.
The letter ends with the line, “Content like that seen on Family Guy does not reflect well on the McDonald’s brand, and continued association with this kind of content will make me think twice about doing business with McDonald’s.”
Despite the group’s incessant efforts to quell the fast food company’s relationship with the popular sitcom, many disagree with the claims.
Peter Shankman is a customer service and marketing consultant for the fast food chain. He said, “When a company is down like that, everybody is going to find something to give them [a hard time] about.”
Shankman suggested to The Tribune that the company should focus on more pressing matters, such as stemming its decline in sales.
“There is a huge user base, a younger user base, that watches ‘Family Guy’ and eats McDonald’s,” Shankman said. “If you stop reaching those people you’re cutting off your nose to spite your face.”
Tags: Family Guy, McDonald's 


Hide Comments
   Show 0			comments		

















 







Free News Alerts











Privacy: We never share your email




 
















				© Copyright 2010 - 2017 | The Daily Caller
			















 




















































 Examples of Differentiation in Fast Food | Chron.com              Skip to main content.  Examples of Differentiation in Fast Food  by Neil Kokemuller        Product quality is one differentiation factor you can us in fast food. George Doyle/Stockbyte/Getty Images   Related Articles  1 [Differentiation Strategies] | Examples of Differentiation Strategies 2 [Cost Leadership] | Examples of Cost Leadership & Strategy Marketing 3 [Food Marketing Strategies] | Fast Food Marketing Strategies 4 [Product Differentiation Strategy] | The Advantages of a Product Differentiation Strategy    Differentiation is a marketing term used to describe the process of developing promotional messages that distinguish your products from those offered by competitors in the minds of target customers. Effective differentiation is critical to building a strong business, especially in a highly competitive marketplace like fast food. Before starting a fast food shop or franchise, or buying into one, you need to consider how to differentiate from local competitors and chain restaurants.        Taste Quality One way to differentiate a brand is by emphasizing superior product quality. Success in differentiating a fast food brand on taste quality revolves around impacting advertisements backed by a great product. Burger King stresses the quality of its flame-broiled burgers in its ads. Given that the company's price points are higher than those offered by others, it is critical that customers believe the taste quality exceeds the quality of less expensive competitors. If you own an independent fast food business, developing a distinctive taste or cooking process is often a better opportunity for differentiation than competing on cost with large chains. Efficiency The word "fast" in fast food is the basis for differentiation for companies that offer and promote a convenient, efficient service experience. Efficiency is central to differentiation strategies used by McDonald's. The company routinely locates restaurants just off of highway exits or in well-traveled business districts. This factor makes it easier for buses to stop in. Additionally, the company stresses its fast ordering process, including indicating the typical service time on the cash registers in busier restaurants. Hiring quality workers, paying them fairly and motivating them can help a small fast food owner compete on efficiency. Customer Service Differentiating through effective customer service is a challenge for fast food providers given the importance typical customers place on efficiency. Thus, companies more commonly turn to gimmicky service experiences rather than overly personalized or customized service. Sonic, for instance, differentiates itself because of the unconventional "drive-in" experience it offers customers. Sandwich shop Jimmy John's emphasizes its "freaky fast delivery" in its TV and radio commercials. With quality local workers, you may be able to compete on quality service in a small fast food shop. Nutrition The cultural trend toward more health-conscious eating has opened the door for fast food alternatives to the burger shop. Sandwich shop Subway has diligently differentiated itself as a healthy option. It has done so with the story of Jared, a regular guy who lost a lot of weight on the Subway diet. The company also regularly promotes several sandwiches with "six grams of fat, or less." Additionally, the company has used direct comparison ads to promote its superior nutritional value relative to McDonald's and other fast food shops.              References (2)   Net MBA: The Value ChainQuick MBA: Porter's Generic Strategies   About the Author Neil Kokemuller has been an active business, finance and education writer and content media website developer since 2007. He has been a college marketing professor since 2004. Kokemuller has additional professional experience in marketing, retail and small business. He holds a Master of Business Administration from Iowa State University.   Photo Credits  George Doyle/Stockbyte/Getty Images    Suggest an Article Correction      Related Searches           More Articles    [Differentiation Marketing Strategy] | What Are Examples of a Differentiation Marketing Strategy?    [Examples] | Examples of Differentiation in Marketing    [Fast Food Industry] | Key Elements of Success in the Fast Food Industry    [Fast Food Restaurant] | Things to Consider Before Opening a Fast Food Restaurant          Also Viewed  [Product Marketing Strategy] | Differentiation in Product Marketing Strategy [Food Industry] | Fast Food Industry: The Bargaining Power of Suppliers [Differentiation Strategies] | Positioning & Differentiation Strategies of Marketing [Differentiated Business Strategies] | Differentiated Business Strategies [Differentiation Strategy] | Pros & Cons of Differentiation Strategy [Service Quality Differentiation Competitive Strategies] | Service Quality Differentiation Competitive Strategies [Entry Barriers] | Entry Barriers for Restaurants            























McDonald's Menu: Our Full McDonald's Food Menu | McDonald's














{{tmplFields.popuptitle}}
{{tmplFields.popupsubtitle}}























{{tmplFields.popupbutton}}














{{notification.msg}}



{{notification.msg}}
















Take a Food Tour of ourFull Menu

View our delicious menu featuring a wide selection of meals, snacks, drinks, and more.
Show your local Menu














Take a Food Tour of ourFull Menu

View our delicious menu featuring a wide selection of meals, snacks, drinks, and more.
Show your local Menu







































                    Breakfast
                    



                    
                        View All





















{{data.marketingName}}





View All 









                    Burgers
                    



                    
                        View All





















{{data.marketingName}}





View All 









                    Chicken & Sandwiches
                    



                    
                        View All





















{{data.marketingName}}





View All 









                    Salads
                    



                    
                        View All





















{{data.marketingName}}





View All 









                    Snacks & Sides
                    



                    
                        View All





















{{data.marketingName}}





View All 









                    Desserts & Shakes
                    



                    
                        View All





















{{data.marketingName}}





View All 









                    Drinks
                    



                    
                        View All





















{{data.marketingName}}





View All 









                    McCafé®
                    



                    
                        View All





















{{data.marketingName}}





View All 





Important Note:
At McDonald's, we take great care to serve quality, great-tasting menu items to our customers each and every time they visit our restaurants. We understand that each of our customers has individual needs and considerations when choosing a place to eat or drink outside their home, especially those customers with food allergies. As part of our commitment to you, we provide the most current ingredient information available from our food suppliers for the eight most common allergens as identified by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (eggs, dairy, wheat, soy, peanuts, tree nuts, fish and shellfish), so that our guests with food allergies can make informed food selections. However, we also want you to know that despite taking precautions, normal kitchen operations may involve some shared cooking and preparation areas, equipment and utensils, and the possibility exists for your food items to come in contact with other food products, including allergens. We encourage our customers with food allergies or special dietary needs to visit www.mcdonalds.com for ingredient information, and to consult their doctor for questions regarding their diet. Due to the individualized nature of food allergies and food sensitivities, customers' physicians may be best positioned to make recommendations for customers with food allergies and special dietary needs. If you have questions about our food, please reach out to us directly at mcdonalds.com/contact or 1- 800-244-6227.
Nutrient contributions from individual components may not equal the total due to federal rounding regulations. Percent Daily Values (DV) and RDIs are based on unrounded values.

** Percent Daily Values (DV) are based on a 2,000 calorie diet. Your daily values may be higher or lower depending on your calorie needs.


The nutrition information on this website is derived from testing conducted in accredited laboratories, published resources, or from information provided from McDonald's suppliers. The nutrition information is based on standard product formulations and serving sizes (including ice for beverages). All nutrition information is based on average values for ingredients from McDonald's suppliers throughout the U.S. and is rounded to meet current U.S. FDA NLEA guidelines. Variation in serving sizes, preparation techniques, product testing and sources of supply, as well as regional and seasonal differences may affect the nutrition values for each product. In addition, product formulations change periodically. You should expect some variation in the nutrient content of the products purchased in our restaurants. Beverage sizes may vary in your market. McDonald’s USA does not certify or claim any of its US menu items as Halal, Kosher or meeting any other religious requirements. We do not promote any of our US menu items as vegetarian, vegan or gluten-free. The natural flavors that we use are derived from animal, plant, dairy or honey sources. Our fried menu items are cooked in a vegetable oil blend with citric acid added as a processing aid and dimethylpolysiloxane to reduce oil splatter when cooking. We are no longer adding TBHQ to our restaurant cooking oil, but as we transition to our new oil supply, some restaurants may have trace amounts of TBHQ in their cooking oil for a period of time. This information is correct as of February 2017, unless stated otherwise.



















JOIN OUR EMAIL LIST
               For news, promotions, and more delivered right to your inbox.
            















Submit





*By clicking "Submit" you agree to receive emails, promotions, and general messages from McDonald's. In addition, you also agree to the McDonald’s Privacy Statement and Terms & Conditions.

 Already on our list? Update your profile 



You’re In!
               Thanks for signing up! 
Complete Your Profile





Update Your Profile
				 Hello ! This is the info we have for you. Feel free to change it any time you like.
			






Name:




Email:




Spanish:






Birthday:
 



Password:
••••••••



Address:

edit






Update your profile 











JOIN OUR EMAIL LIST
			 For news, promotions, and more delivered right to your inbox.
	  






 








Submit





*By clicking "Submit" you agree to receive emails, promotions, and general messages from McDonald's. In addition, you also agree to the McDonald’s Privacy Statement and Terms & Conditions.
 Already on our list?
		Update your profile





You’re In!
			 Thanks for signing up! 
Complete Your Profile





Update Your Profile
         Hello ! This is the info we have for you. Feel free to change it any time you like.
      






Name:




Email:




Spanish:






Birthday:
 



Password:
••••••••



Address:

edit






Update your profile 


























Please select a location below:




 {{location.formattedAddress}} 























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          











Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          


















Amazon.com: Amazon Music Unlimited








































Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















Digital Music



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 






 Amazon Music Unlimited Prime Music CDs & Vinyl Download Store         Open Web Player MP3 cart Settings













































































































$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          




$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          




$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          
















Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.




Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.




Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.
















Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).




Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).




Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).
















Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More




Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More




Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More


























Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          

















There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started

















v



























Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          







